Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5076.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
ARTICLE 1 RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
ARTICLE 2 RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
ARTICLE 3 RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
ARTICLE 4 RELATING TO DEBT MANAGEMENT ACT JOINT RESOLUTIONS
ARTICLE 5 RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
ARTICLE 6 RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ARTICLE 7 RELATING TO EDUCATION
ARTICLE 8 RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
ARTICLE 9 RELATING TO HOUSING
ARTICLE 10 RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
ARTICLE 11 RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE 12 RELATING TO LEASES
ARTICLE 13 RELATING TO RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN
SUPPORT OF FY 2025
ARTICLE 14 RELATING TO EFFECTIVE DATE
========
LC000670/SUB A
========

=======
art.001/5/001/4/001/3/001/2/001/1
=======
ARTICLE 1 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
SECTION 1. Subject to the conditions, limitations and restrictions hereinafter contained in
this act, the following general revenue amounts are hereby appropriated out of any money in the
treasury not otherwise appropriated to be expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
The amounts identified for federal funds and restricted receipts shall be made available pursuant to
§ 35-4-22 and chapter 41 of title 42. For the purposes and functions hereinafter mentioned, the state
controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw the state controller’s orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required from time to
time upon receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.
Administration
Central Management
General Revenues 4,359,358
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,000,000
Restricted Receipts 193,701
Total - Central Management 37,553,059
Legal Services
General Revenues 2,872,990
Accounts and Control
General Revenues 5,804,845
Restricted Receipts - OPEB Board Administration 150,959
Restricted Receipts - Grants Management Administration 2,540,109
Total - Accounts and Control 8,495,913
Office of Management and Budget
General Revenues 11,000,012
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 151,689
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
CPF Administration 530,582

Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Pandemic Recovery Office 1,436,547
Restricted Receipts 300,000
Other Funds 1,242,011
Total - Office of Management and Budget 14,660,841
Purchasing
General Revenues 4,008,986
Restricted Receipts 1,262,987
Other Funds 636,500
Total - Purchasing 5,908,473
Human Resources
General Revenues 889,580
Personnel Appeal Board
General Revenues 160,838
Information Technology
General Revenues 1,838,147
Restricted Receipts 1,162,424
Total - Information Technology 3,000,571
Library and Information Services
General Revenues 2,143,053
Federal Funds 1,617,500
Restricted Receipts 6,990
Total - Library and Information Services 3,767,543
Planning
General Revenues 1,222,229
Federal Funds 3,050
Restricted Receipts 50,000
Other Funds
Air Quality Modeling 24,000
Federal Highway - PL Systems Planning 3,821,438
State Transportation Planning Match 504,926
FTA - Metro Planning Grant 1,525,830
Total - Planning 7,151,473
General
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -2-)

General Revenues
Miscellaneous Grants/Payments 811,678
Torts Court Awards 1,750,000
Wrongful Conviction Awards 1,000,000
Resource Sharing and State Library Aid 12,095,022
Library Construction Aid 2,115,628
Restricted Receipts 1,113,557
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Security Measures State Buildings 700,000
Cranston Street Armory 600,000
State House Renovations 1,759,000
Zambarano Buildings and Campus 4,500,000
Replacement of Fueling Tanks 430,000
Environmental Compliance 225,000
Big River Management Area 797,000
Shepard Building Upgrades 2,805,000
RI Convention Center Authority 2,800,000
Pastore Center Power Plant 2,000,000
DoIT Enterprise Operations Center 5,550,000
Cannon Building 150,000
Old State House 600,000
State Office Building 500,000
State Office Reorganization & Relocation 750,000
William Powers Building 2,500,000
Pastore Center Non-Hospital Buildings Asset Protection 7,750,000
Washington County Government Center 100,000
Chapin Health Laboratory 100,000
560 Jefferson Blvd Asset Protection 2,050,000
Arrigan Center 200,000
Civic Center 3,800,000
Veterans Auditorium 380,000
Pastore Center Hospital Buildings Asset Protection 1,000,000
Pastore Campus Infrastructure 15,000,000
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -3-)

Community Facilities Asset Protection 225,000
Medical Examiners - New Facility 50,000
Group Home Replacement & Rehabilitation 5,000,000
Expo Center 500,000
Group Homes Consolidation 5,350,000
Total - General 87,056,885
Debt Service Payments
General Revenues 178,801,286
Other Funds
Transportation Debt Service 32,982,697
Investment Receipts - Bond Funds 100,000
Total - Debt Service Payments 211,883,983
Rhode Island Health Benefits Exchange
General Revenues 1,889,227
Federal Funds 10,758,473
Restricted Receipts 17,298,973
Total - Rhode Island Health Benefits Exchange 29,946,673
Division of Equity, Diversity & Inclusion
General Revenues 2,308,469
Other Funds 108,978
Total - Division of Equity, Diversity & Inclusion 2,417,447
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
General Revenues 10,990,302
Statewide Personnel and Operations
FEMA Contingency Reserve
General Revenues 2,500,000
Primary Care Health Assessment State Cost
General Revenues 750,000
Federal Funds 100,500
Restricted Receipts 44,575
Other Funds 477,295
Total - Statewide Personnel and Operations 3,872,370
Grand Total - Administration 430,628,941
Office of Energy Resources
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -4-)

Federal Funds 31,554,214
Restricted Receipts 39,089,028
Other Funds
National Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Formula Program 4,668,785
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Energy Efficiency Improvements 1,000,000
Grand Total – Office of Energy Resources 76,312,027
Business Regulation
Central Management
General Revenues 4,360,810
Restricted Receipts 39,014
Total - Central Management 4,399,824
Banking Regulation
General Revenues 2,107,972
Restricted Receipts 50,000
Total - Banking Regulation 2,157,972
Securities Regulation
General Revenues 1,000,863
Insurance Regulation
General Revenues 5,125,539
Restricted Receipts 1,617,538
Total - Insurance Regulation 6,743,077
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner
General Revenues 3,107,152
Federal Funds 439,300
Restricted Receipts 603,592
Total - Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner 4,150,044
Board of Accountancy
General Revenues 5,490
Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics Licensing
General Revenues 1,268,739
Restricted Receipts 1,045,581
Total - Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics Licensing 2,314,320
Building, Design and Fire Professionals
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -5-)

General Revenues 8,793,216
Federal Funds 346,788
Restricted Receipts 2,130,377
Other Funds
Quonset Development Corporation 52,983
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Fire Academy Expansion 7,000,000
Total - Building, Design and Fire Professionals 18,323,364
Grand Total - Business Regulation 39,094,954
RI Cannabis Control Commission
Restricted Receipts 7,303,563
Executive Office of Commerce
Central Management
General Revenues 2,369,982
Quasi-Public Appropriations
General Revenues
Rhode Island Commerce Corporation 8,506,041
Airport Impact Aid 1,010,036
Sixty percent (60%) of the first $1,000,000 appropriated for airport impact aid shall be
distributed to each airport serving more than 1,000,000 passengers based upon its percentage of the
total passengers served by all airports serving more than 1,000,000 passengers. Forty percent (40%)
of the first $1,000,000 shall be distributed based on the share of landings during calendar year 2025
at North Central Airport, Newport-Middletown Airport, Block Island Airport, Quonset Airport,
T.F. Green International Airport and Westerly Airport, respectively. The Rhode Island commerce
corporation shall make an impact payment to the towns or cities in which the airport is located
based on this calculation. Each community upon which any part of the above airports is located
shall receive at least $25,000.
STAC Research Alliance 900,000
Innovative Matching Grants/Internships 1,000,000
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 1,245,050
Polaris Manufacturing Grant 500,000
East Providence Waterfront Commission 50,000
Urban Ventures 140,000
Chafee Center at Bryant 476,200
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -6-)

Blackstone Valley Visitor Center 75,000
Industrial Recreational Building Authority Obligations 105,094
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 700,000
I-195 Park Improvements 1,100,000
Quonset Infrastructure 2,500,000
PFAS Mitigation at Quonset Business Park 1,000,000
Total - Quasi-Public Appropriations 19,307,421
Economic Development Initiatives Fund
General Revenues
Rebuild RI Tax Credit Fund 10,085,000
Destination Marketing 1,400,000
RI Innovation Ecosystem 250,000
Federal Funds 20,000,000
Total - Economic Development Initiatives Fund 31,735,000
Commerce Programs
General Revenues
Wavemaker Fellowship 2,566,621
Air Service Development Fund 2,728,800
Main Street RI Streetscape Improvement Fund 125,000
Total - Commerce Programs 5,420,421
Grand Total - Executive Office of Commerce 58,832,824
Housing
General Revenues 6,464,465
Provided that $100,000 shall support Sojourner House’s supportive housing and rapid
rehousing activities.
Federal Funds 15,596,037
Restricted Receipts 23,018,954
Grand Total - Housing 45,079,456
Labor and Training
Central Management
General Revenues 1,661,890
Restricted Receipts 488,494
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -7-)

Total - Central Management 2,150,384
Workforce Development Services
General Revenues 878,758
Federal Funds 19,112,629
Total - Workforce Development Services 19,991,387
Workforce Regulation and Safety
General Revenues 5,347,291
Income Support
General Revenues 3,684,566
Federal Funds 22,883,898
Restricted Receipts 4,635,586
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 287,480,146
Employment Security Fund 249,200,000
Total - Income Support 567,884,196
Injured Workers Services
Restricted Receipts 11,233,092
Labor Relations Board
General Revenues 556,737
Governor’s Workforce Board
General Revenues 6,050,000
Provided that $600,000 of these funds shall be used for enhanced training for direct care
and support services staff to improve resident quality of care and address the changing health care
needs of nursing facility residents due to higher acuity and increased cognitive impairments
pursuant to § 23-17.5-36.
Restricted Receipts 19,054,596
Provided that at least $150,000 of these funds shall be used to provide hospitality industry
workforce training grants including, but not limited to, certified food and alcohol safety training
programs offered in multiple languages.
Total - Governor’s Workforce Board 25,104,596
Grand Total - Labor and Training 632,267,683
Department of Revenue
Director of Revenue
General Revenues 3,168,518
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -8-)

Office of Revenue Analysis
General Revenues 1,173,041
Lottery Division
Other Funds 448,042,227
Municipal Finance
General Revenues 2,045,839
Taxation
General Revenues 38,331,490
Restricted Receipts 4,660,479
Other Funds
Motor Fuel Tax Evasion 175,000
Total - Taxation 43,166,969
Registry of Motor Vehicles
General Revenues 35,374,576
Federal Funds 493,061
Restricted Receipts 5,429,330
Total - Registry of Motor Vehicles 41,296,967
State Aid
General Revenues
Distressed Communities Relief Fund 14,884,458
Payment in Lieu of Tax Exempt Properties 51,317,647
Motor Vehicle Excise Tax Payments 239,547,419
Property Revaluation Program 712,390
Tangible Tax Exemption Program 25,903,228
Restricted Receipts 995,120
Total - State Aid 333,360,262
Collections
General Revenues 994,263
Grand Total - Revenue 873,248,086
Legislature
General Revenues 58,734,623
Restricted Receipts 2,690,297
Grand Total - Legislature 61,424,920
Lieutenant Governor
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -9-)

General Revenues 1,519,219
Secretary of State
Administration
General Revenues 5,975,167
Provided that $100,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Council for the
Humanities for grant making to civic and cultural organizations, and $50,000 to support Rhode
Island’s participation in the We the People Civics Challenge.
Corporations
General Revenues 2,913,879
State Archives
General Revenues 356,659
Restricted Receipts 404,790
Total - State Archives 761,449
Elections and Civics
General Revenues 2,107,040
Federal Funds 2,000,000
Total - Elections and Civics 4,107,040
State Library
General Revenues 668,263
Provided that $125,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Historical Society and
$18,000 be allocated to support the Newport Historical Society, pursuant to §§ 29-2-1 and 29-2-2,
and $25,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Black Heritage Society.
Office of Public Information
General Revenues 840,724
Receipted Receipts 25,000
Total - Office of Public Information 865,724
Grand Total - Secretary of State 15,291,522
General Treasurer
Treasury
General Revenues 3,665,773
Federal Funds 365,134
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 246,415
Tuition Savings Program - Administration 388,916
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -10-)

Total - Treasury 4,666,238
State Retirement System
Restricted Receipts
Admin Expenses - State Retirement System 13,193,967
Retirement - Treasury Investment Operations 2,846,571
Defined Contribution - Administration 277,654
Total - State Retirement System 16,318,192
Unclaimed Property
Restricted Receipts 3,338,043
Crime Victim Compensation
General Revenues 934,450
Federal Funds 467,993
Restricted Receipts 250,000
Total - Crime Victim Compensation 1,652,443
Grand Total - General Treasurer 25,974,916
Board of Elections
General Revenues 4,474,931
Rhode Island Ethics Commission
General Revenues 2,419,632
Office of Governor
General Revenues
General Revenues 9,184,918
Contingency Fund 150,000
Grand Total - Office of Governor 9,334,918
Commission for Human Rights
General Revenues 2,249,158
Federal Funds 523,529
Grand Total - Commission for Human Rights 2,772,687
Public Utilities Commission
Federal Funds 753,555
Restricted Receipts 14,754,719
Grand Total - Public Utilities Commission 15,508,274
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Central Management
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -11-)

General Revenues 32,413,726
Provided that of this amount, $900,000 will be for Mobile Response and Stabilization
Services for uninsured and underinsured child and youth and cover services and costs not otherwise
reimbursed. Also $500,000 is for Thundermist’s Family Residency Program contingent upon
receiving federal funds and $150,000 will be for an Olmstead Plan Coordinator.
All-Payer Claims Database 509,950
Health System Planning and Overtight 777,260
Medicaid Enterprise System 1,873,838
Medicaid Management Information System 6,064,700
Unified Health Infrastructure 22,368,654
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 70,793,907
All-Payer Claims Database 10,212,239
Health System Planning and Oversight 153,750
Medicaid Enterprise System 12,364,541
Medicaid Management Information System 19,566,585
Unified Health Infrastructure Project 56,336,615
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics 205,295
Restricted Receipts 15,463,598
Total - Central Management 249,104,658
Medical Assistance
General Revenues
Managed Care 464,278,305
Hospitals 136,238,010
Nursing Facilities 204,266,507
Home and Community Based Services 125,703,952
Other Services 160,879,834
Pharmacy 100,069,654
Rhody Health 234,976,854
Federal Funds
Managed Care 653,184,013
Hospitals 285,888,183
Nursing Facilities 273,055,474
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -12-)

Home and Community Based Services 168,075,434
Other Services 796,373,214
Pharmacy 4,130,346
Rhody Health 326,578,917
Other Programs 32,611,481
Restricted Receipts 11,021,948
Total - Medical Assistance 3,977,332,126
Grand Total – Executive Office of Health and Human Services 4,226,436,784
Children, Youth and Families
Central Management
General Revenues 17,937,159
The director of the department of children, youth and families shall provide to the speaker
of the house and president of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 30,
2025, a report on the process to maintain accreditation in accordance with § 42-72-5.3. The report
shall, at minimum, provide data regarding recruitment and retention efforts, including maintaining
a diverse workforce, documentation of newly filled and vacated positions, and progress in reducing
worker caseloads.
It shall also contain the number of filled full-time equivalent positions compared to the
department’s authorization and disaggregated by job classification, and as compared to the staffing
recommended in the October 1, 2020 accreditation plan that was funded beginning in the fiscal
year 2022 budget. The report shall also include information on turnover assumptions, expressed
as funded positions compared to filled and authorized.
Federal Funds 15,237,654
Total - Central Management 33,174,813
Children's Behavioral Health Services
General Revenues 7,109,636
Federal Funds 8,824,070
Total - Children's Behavioral Health Services 15,933,706
Youth Development Services
General Revenues 25,678,366
Federal Funds 647,931
Restricted Receipts 1,500
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -13-)

Training School Asset Protection 250,000
Residential Treatment Facilities 11,000,000
Total - Youth Development Services 37,577,797
Child Welfare
General Revenues 211,849,897
Federal Funds 93,910,710
Restricted Receipts 1,743,471
Total - Child Welfare 307,504,078
Higher Education Incentive Grants
General Revenues 200,000
Provided that these funds and any unexpended or unencumbered previous years’ funding
are to be used exclusively to fund awards to eligible youth.
Grand Total - Children, Youth and Families 394,390,394
Health
Central Management
General Revenues
General Revenues 2,588,732
Of this amount, $50,000 is to support the Gloria Gemma Breast Cancer Resource
Foundation and the organization’s new survivorship and well-being center in Lincoln, RI.
Psychiatry Resource Network 750,000
Primary Care Training Sites Program 2,000,000
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2026 are hereby
reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 4,884,431
Restricted Receipts 22,233,391
Provided that the disbursement of any indirect cost recoveries on federal grants budgeted
in this line item that are derived from grants authorized under The Coronavirus Preparedness and
Response Supplemental Appropriations Act (P.L. 116-123); The Families First Coronavirus
Response Act (P.L. 116-127); The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-
136); The Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (P.L. 116-139); the
Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (P.L. 116-260); and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
(P.L. 117-2), are hereby subject to the review and prior approval of the director of management and
budget. No obligation or expenditure of these funds shall take place without such approval.
Total - Central Management 32,456,554
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -14-)

Community Health and Equity
General Revenues 2,051,358
Federal Funds 88,096,432
Restricted Receipts 67,695,968
Total - Community Health and Equity 157,843,758
Environmental Health
General Revenues 6,836,896
Federal Funds 14,433,189
Restricted Receipts 1,104,785
Total - Environmental Health 22,374,870
Health Laboratories
General Revenues 9,514,520
Federal Funds 2,666,663
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Health Laboratories & Medical Examiner Equipment 400,000
New Health Laboratory Building 8,363,883
Total - Health Laboratories 20,945,066
State Medical Examiners
General Revenues 4,521,784
Federal Funds 67,325
Total – State Medical Examiners 4,589,109
Healthcare Quality and Safety
General Revenues 7,868,321
Federal Funds 6,746,561
Restricted Receipts 1,199,564
Total – Healthcare Quality and Safety 15,814,446
Policy, Information and Communications
General Revenues 2,785,613
Provided that $200,000 of this amount and its corresponding federal match is used for loan
repayment assistance specifically for primary care physicians and pediatricians through the Health
Professional Loan Repayment Program authorized by § 23-14.1.
Federal Funds 5,593,898
Restricted Receipts 842,433
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -15-)

Total - Policy, Information and Communications 9,221,944
Emergency Preparedness and Infectious Disease
General Revenues 1,907,851
Federal Funds 15,196,529
Total – Emergency Preparedness and Infectious Disease 17,104,380
COVID-19
Federal Funds 15,176,647
Grand Total - Health 295,526,774
Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 8,050,831
Of this amount, $400,000 is to support the domestic violence prevention fund to provide
direct services through the Coalition Against Domestic Violence, $25,000 for the Center for
Southeast Asians, $450,000 to support Project Reach activities provided by the RI Alliance of Boys
and Girls Clubs, $300,000 is for outreach and supportive services through Day One, $950,000 is
for food collection and distribution through the Rhode Island Community Food Bank, $500,000 for
services provided to the homeless at Crossroads Rhode Island, $600,000 for the Community Action
Fund, $250,000 is for the Institute for the Study and Practice of Nonviolence’s Reduction Strategy,
$200,000 to provide operational support to the United Way’s 211 system, $125,000 is to support
services provided to the immigrant and refugee population through Higher Ground International,
$50,000 is for services provided to refugees through the Refugee Dream Center and $150,000 for
the Substance Use and Mental Health Leadership Council of RI.
The director of the department of human services shall provide to the speaker of the house,
president of the senate, and chairs of the house and senate finance committees at least every sixty
(60) days beginning August 1, 2022, a report on its progress in recruiting and retaining customer
serving staff. The report shall include: documentation of newly filled and vacated positions,
including lateral transfers, position titles, civil service information, including numbers of eligible
and available candidates, plans for future testing and numbers of eligible and available candidates
resulting from such testing, impacts on caseload backlogs and call center wait times, as well as
other pertinent information as determined by the director.
Federal Funds 8,064,314
Of this amount, $3.0 million is to sustain Early Head Start and Head Start programs.
Restricted Receipts 300,000
Total - Central Management 16,415,145
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -16-)

Child Support Enforcement
General Revenues 4,390,046
Federal Funds 10,229,053
Restricted Receipts 3,816,099
Total - Child Support Enforcement 18,435,198
Individual and Family Support
General Revenues 35,143,366
Federal Funds 128,579,088
Restricted Receipts 115,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Blind Vending Facilities 165,000
Total - Individual and Family Support 164,002,454
Office of Veterans Services
General Revenues 33,499,864
Of this amount, $200,000 is to provide support services through veterans’ organizations,
$50,000 is to support Operation Stand Down, and $100,000 is to support the Veterans Services
Officers (VSO) program through the Veterans of Foreign Wars.
Federal Funds 15,752,830
Restricted Receipts 1,725,342
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Veterans Home Asset Protection 665,000
Veterans Memorial Cemetery Asset Protection 300,000
Total - Office of Veterans Services 51,943,036
Health Care Eligibility
General Revenues 10,511,087
Federal Funds 16,662,419
Total - Health Care Eligibility 27,173,506
Supplemental Security Income Program
General Revenues 16,680,780
Rhode Island Works
General Revenues 9,891,538
Federal Funds 109,225,738
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -17-)

Total - Rhode Island Works 119,117,276
Other Programs
General Revenues 2,231,840
Federal Funds 382,432,873
Restricted Receipts 8,000
Total - Other Programs 384,672,713
Office of Healthy Aging
General Revenues 15,623,340
Of this amount, $325,000 is to provide elder services, including respite, through the
Diocese of Providence; $40,000 is for ombudsman services provided by the Alliance for Long
Term Care in accordance with chapter 66.7 of title 42; and $1,600,000 is for Senior Services
Support and $730,000 is for elderly nutrition, of which $680,000 is for Meals on Wheels.
Federal Funds 19,011,572
Restricted Receipt 46,200
Other Funds
Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund 4,267,406
The Office shall reimburse the Rhode Island public transit authority for the elderly/disabled
transportation program expenses no later than fifteen (15) days of the authority’s submission of a
request for payment.
Total - Office of Healthy Aging 38,948,518
Grand Total - Human Services 837,388,626
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Central Management
General Revenues 8,058,892
Federal Funds 2,631,491
Restricted Receipts 559,071
Total - Central Management 11,249,454
Services for the Developmentally Disabled
General Revenues 218,735,702
Provided that of this general revenue funding, an amount certified by the department shall
be expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -18-)

Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that of this general revenue funding, $928,200 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services, or which a total of $650,000 shall be expended specifically on those who self-direct for
creation of regional service advisement models and pool of substitute staff. All unexpended or
unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to
the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 286,950,145
Provided that of this federal funding, an amount certified by the department shall be
expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that of this federal funding, $371,800 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services. All unexpended or unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year
shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same
purpose.
Restricted Receipts 1,300,866
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DD Residential Support 100,000
Total - Services for the Developmentally Disabled 507,086,713
Behavioral Healthcare Services
General Revenues 4,817,486
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 32,467,553
Provided that $250,000 from Social Services Block Grant funds is awarded to The
Providence Center to coordinate with Oasis Wellness and Recovery Center for its support and
services program offered to individuals with behavioral health issues.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -19-)

9-8-8 Hotline 1,800,000
Restricted Receipts 5,416,046
Provided that $450,000 from the opioid stewardship fund is distributed equally to the seven
regional substance abuse prevention task forces to fund priorities determined by each Task Force.
Total - Behavioral Healthcare Services 44,501,085
Hospital and Community Rehabilitative Services
General Revenues 53,723,206
Federal Funds 61,515,889
Restricted Receipts 4,634,700
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Hospital Equipment 300,000
Total - Hospital and Community Rehabilitative Services 120,173,795
State of RI Psychiatric Hospital
General Revenues 33,443,552
Restricted Receipts 144,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
RISPH Equipment 100,000
Total - State of RI Psychiatric Hospital 33,687,552
Grand Total - Behavioral Healthcare,
Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 716,698,599
Office of the Child Advocate
General Revenues 2,264,613
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
General Revenues 786,233
Restricted Receipts 142,921
Grand Total - Comm. On Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing 929,154
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities
General Revenues
General Revenues 870,754
Livable Home Modification Grant Program 515,278
Provided that this will be used for home modification and accessibility enhancements to
construct, retrofit, and/or renovate residences to allow individuals to remain in community settings.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -20-)

This will be in consultation with the executive office of health and human services. All unexpended
or unencumbered balances, at the end of the fiscal year, shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal
year, and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 340,067
Restricted Receipts 79,943
Grand Total - Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 1,806,042
Office of the Mental Health Advocate
General Revenues 1,117,164
Elementary and Secondary Education
Administration of the Comprehensive Education Strategy
General Revenues 34,222,798
Provided that $90,000 be allocated to support the hospital school at Hasbro Children’s
Hospital pursuant to § 16-7-20; $395,000 be allocated to support child opportunity zones through
agreements with the department of elementary and secondary education to strengthen education,
health and social services for students and their families as a strategy to accelerate student
achievement; $450,000 and 3.0 full-time equivalent positions be allocated to support a special
education function to facilitate individualized education program (IEP) and 504 services; and
further provided that $130,000 be allocated to City Year for the Whole School Whole Child
Program, which provides individualized support to at-risk students.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 255,593,813
Provided that $684,000 from the department’s administrative share of Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act funds be allocated to the Paul V. Sherlock Center on Disabilities to
support the Rhode Island Vision Education and Services Program.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Adult Education Providers 128,373
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 1,724,551
HRIC Adult Education Grants 3,500,000
Total - Admin. of the Comprehensive Ed. Strategy 295,169,535
Davies Career and Technical School
General Revenues 18,532,152
Federal Funds 924,285
Restricted Receipts 5,471,394
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -21-)

Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Davies School HVAC 50,000
Davies School Asset Protection 750,000
Davies School Healthcare Classroom Renovations 6,911,727
Davies School Wing Renovation 34,515,423
Total - Davies Career and Technical School 67,154,981
RI School for the Deaf
General Revenues 8,809,938
Federal Funds 271,830
Restricted Receipts 1,097,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
School for the Deaf Asset Protection 100,000
Total - RI School for the Deaf 10,278,768
Metropolitan Career and Technical School
General Revenues 12,966,926
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
MET School Asset Protection 250,000
Total - Metropolitan Career and Technical School 13,216,926
Education Aid
General Revenues 1,272,230,353
Provided that the criteria for the allocation of early childhood funds shall prioritize pre-
kindergarten seats and classrooms for four-year-olds whose family income is at or below one
hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines and who reside in communities
with higher concentrations of low performing schools.
Restricted Receipts 38,952,936
Total - Education Aid 1,311,183,289
Central Falls School District
General Revenues 54,567,882
School Construction Aid
General Revenues
School Housing Aid 119,887,755
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -22-)

Teachers' Retirement
General Revenues 137,991,006
Grand Total - Elementary and Secondary Education 2,009,450,142
Public Higher Education
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner
General Revenues 33,322,291
Provided that $455,000 shall be allocated to Onward We Learn pursuant to § 16-70-5,
$75,000 shall be allocated to Best Buddies Rhode Island to support its programs for children with
developmental and intellectual disabilities. It is also provided that $7,367,460 shall be allocated to
the Rhode Island promise scholarship program; $151,410 shall be used to support Rhode Island’s
membership in the New England Board of Higher Education; $5,476,723 shall be allocated to the
Rhode Island hope scholarship program; and $100,000 shall be allocated to the Rhode Island
School for Progressive Education to support access to higher education opportunities for teachers
of color.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 5,582,208
Guaranty Agency Administration 60,000
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 8,383,189
Tuition Savings Program - Scholarships and Grants 3,400,000
Other Funds
Nursing Education Center - Operating 3,295,810
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
WEC Expansion - Annex Site 1,220,000
Total - Office of Postsecondary Commissioner 55,263,498
University of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 115,308,021
Provided that in order to leverage federal funding and support economic development,
$700,000 shall be allocated to the small business development center, $125,000 shall be allocated
to the Institute for Labor Studies & Research, $50,000 shall be allocated to Special Olympics Rhode
Island to support its mission of providing athletic opportunities for individuals with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, and $874,069 shall be used to support programming related to career
readiness, career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -23-)

Debt Service 31,526,482
RI State Forensics Laboratory 1,803,420
Other Funds
University and College Funds 847,374,010
Debt - Dining Services 781,957
Debt - Education and General 5,076,811
Debt - Health Services 16,032
Debt - Housing Loan Funds 13,863,455
Debt - Memorial Union 758,853
Debt - Ryan Center 2,888,322
Debt - Parking Authority 889,077
URI Restricted Debt Service - Energy Conservation 536,169
URI Debt Service - Energy Conservation 1,956,906
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 14,606,536
Mechanical, Electric, and Plumbing Improvements 7,293,838
Fire Protection Academic Buildings 1,641,903
Bay Campus 8,146,722
Athletics Complex 33,942,707
Provided that total Rhode Island capital plan funds provide no more than 80.0 percent of
the total project.
Stormwater Management 4,252,678
PFAS Removal Water Treatment Plant 13,759,400
Campus Accessibility 2,300,000
Building Envelope Improvements 3,000,000
Total - University of Rhode Island 1,111,723,299
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026 relating to the university of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year
2027.
Rhode Island College
General Revenues
General Revenues 70,714,722
Provided that $464,377 shall be used to support programming related to career readiness,
career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -24-)

Debt Service 7,933,336
Rhode Island Vision Education and Services Program 1,800,000
Other Funds
University and College Funds 120,309,539
Debt - Education and General 1,478,585
Debt - Student Union 212,200
Debt - G.O. Debt Service 1,585,353
Debt - Energy Conservation 762,375
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 5,950,000
Infrastructure Modernization 5,675,000
Total - Rhode Island College 216,421,110
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026, relating to Rhode Island college are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2027.
Community College of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 63,740,346
Provided that $391,175 shall be used to support programming related to career readiness,
career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Debt Service 1,097,898
Restricted Receipts 953,442
Other Funds
University and College Funds 114,885,691
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 3,469,452
Data, Cabling, and Power Infrastructure 5,750,000
Flanagan Campus Renovations 3,200,000
CCRI Renovation and Modernization Phase I 15,000,000
CCRI Renovation and Modernization Phase II - IV 6,100,000
CCRI Accessibility Improvements 290,000
Total - Community College of RI 214,486,829
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026, relating to the community college of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to
fiscal year 2027.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -25-)

Grand Total - Public Higher Education 1,597,894,736
RI State Council on the Arts
General Revenues
Operating Support 1,224,685
Grants 1,190,000
Provided that $400,000 be provided to support the operational costs of WaterFire
Providence art installations.
Federal Funds 1,022,711
Restricted Receipts 115,058
Other Funds
Art for Public Facilities 690,000
Grand Total - RI State Council on the Arts 4,242,454
RI Atomic Energy Commission
General Revenues 1,278,282
Restricted Receipts 25,036
Other Funds
URI Sponsored Research 361,177
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 50,000
Grand Total - RI Atomic Energy Commission 1,714,495
RI Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
General Revenues 1,969,751
Provided that $30,000 support the operational costs of the Fort Adams Trust’s restoration
activities and that $25,000 shall be allocated to Rhode Island Slave History Medallions.
Federal Funds 822,451
Restricted Receipts 511,827
Other Funds
RIDOT Project Review 144,602
Grand Total - RI Historical Preservation and Heritage Comm. 3,448,631
Attorney General
Criminal
General Revenues 23,147,524
Federal Funds 3,404,012
Restricted Receipts 2,096,085
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -26-)

Total - Criminal 28,647,621
Civil
General Revenues 7,301,706
Federal Funds 100,000
Restricted Receipts 4,724,238
Total - Civil 12,125,944
Bureau of Criminal Identification
General Revenues 2,440,742
Federal Funds 64,547
Restricted Receipts 1,329,498
Total - Bureau of Criminal Identification 3,834,787
General
General Revenues 5,354,455
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Building Renovations and Repairs 2,525,000
Total - General 7,879,455
Grand Total - Attorney General 52,487,807
Corrections
Central Management
General Revenues 24,875,748
Parole Board
General Revenues 1,673,257
Custody and Security
General Revenues 182,260,831
Federal Funds 1,371,846
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Intake Service Center HVAC 27,818,335
Total - Custody and Security 211,451,012
Institutional Support
General Revenues 40,099,600
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -27-)

Asset Protection 8,277,650
Correctional Facilities – Renovations 3,179,677
Total - Institutional Support 51,556,927
Institutional Based Rehab/Population Management
General Revenues 15,027,101
Provided that $1,050,000 be allocated to Crossroads Rhode Island for sex offender
discharge planning.
The director of the department of corrections shall provide to the speaker of the house and
president of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 1, 2022, a report on
efforts to modernize the correctional industries program. The report shall, at minimum, provide
data on the past ninety (90) days regarding program participation; changes made in programming
to more closely align with industry needs; new or terminated partnerships with employers,
nonprofits, and advocacy groups; current program expenses and revenues; and the employment
status of all persons on the day of discharge from department care who participated in the
correctional industries program.
Federal Funds 386,256
Restricted Receipts 1,300,000
Total - Institutional Based Rehab/Population Mgt. 16,713,357
Healthcare Services
General Revenues 37,051,880
Community Corrections
General Revenues 23,026,186
Restricted Receipts 3,091
Total - Community Corrections 23,029,277
Grand Total - Corrections 366,351,458
Judiciary
Supreme Court
General Revenues
General Revenues 36,665,481
Provided however, that no more than $1,430,073 in combined total shall be offset to the
public defender’s office, the attorney general’s office, the department of corrections, the department
of children, youth and families, and the department of public safety for square-footage occupancy
costs in public courthouses and further provided that $500,000 be allocated to the Rhode Island
Coalition Against Domestic Violence for the domestic abuse court advocacy project pursuant to §
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -28-)

12-29-7 and that $90,000 be allocated to Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. to provide housing and
eviction defense to indigent individuals.
Defense of Indigents 7,875,432
Federal Funds 205,395
Restricted Receipts 4,312,243
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Judicial Complexes - HVAC 500,000
Judicial Complexes Asset Protection 1,500,000
Judicial Complexes Fan Coil Unit Replacements 500,000
Garrahy Courthouse Restoration 1,125,000
Total - Supreme Court 52,683,551
Judicial Tenure and Discipline
General Revenues 188,686
Superior Court
General Revenues 30,216,228
Restricted Receipts 325,000
Total - Superior Court 30,541,228
Family Court
General Revenues 29,167,951
Federal Funds 5,392,549
Total - Family Court 34,560,500
District Court
General Revenues 17,697,776
Federal Funds 696,951
Restricted Receipts 60,000
Total - District Court 18,454,727
Traffic Tribunal
General Revenues 11,704,985
Workers' Compensation Court
Restricted Receipts 11,090,756
Grand Total - Judiciary 159,224,433
Military Staff
General Revenues 3,424,058
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -29-)

Federal Funds 28,982,412
Restricted Receipts
RI Military Family Relief Fund 55,000
RING Counterdrug Program 11,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Aviation Readiness Center 4,538,673
Asset Protection 2,564,675
Quonset Airport Runway Reconstruction 446,663
Counter-Drug Training Facility 1,025,250
Squadron Ops Facility (Air Guard) 600,000
Grand Total - Military Staff 41,647,731
Public Safety
Central Management
General Revenues 1,899,154
Provided that $400,000 shall be allocated to support the Family Service of Rhode Island’s
GO Team program of on-scene support to children who are victims of violence and other traumas.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 18,479,969
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence 29,753
Restricted Receipts 738,584
Total - Central Management 21,147,460
E-911 Emergency Telephone System
Restricted Receipts 10,730,138
Security Services
General Revenues 33,685,555
Municipal Police Training Academy
General Revenues 349,440
Federal Funds 417,455
Total - Municipal Police Training Academy 766,895
State Police
General Revenues 96,907,970
Federal Funds 8,126,146
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -30-)

Restricted Receipts 2,845,158
Other Funds
Airport Corporation Assistance 151,310
Road Construction Reimbursement 3,355,100
Weight and Measurement Reimbursement 402,401
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DPS Asset Protection 1,205,000
Southern Barracks 16,750,000
Training Academy Upgrades 1,550,000
Statewide Communications System Network 245,048
Total - State Police 131,538,133
Grand Total - Public Safety 197,868,181
Office of Public Defender
General Revenues 18,178,679
Federal Funds 85,035
Grand Total - Office of Public Defender 18,263,714
Emergency Management Agency
General Revenues 7,457,256
Federal Funds 34,906,616
Restricted Receipts 428,308
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
RI Statewide Communications Infrastructure 315,404
RI Statewide Communications Network Tower 550,000
Grand Total - Emergency Management Agency 43,657,584
Environmental Management
Office of the Director
General Revenues 9,446,875
Of this general revenue amount, $180,000 is appropriated to the conservation districts and
$100,000 is appropriated to the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island for a
veterinarian at the Wildlife Clinic of Rhode Island.
Federal Funds 354,975
Restricted Receipts 5,930,220
Total - Office of the Director 15,732,070
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -31-)

Natural Resources
General Revenues 32,325,750
Provided that of this general revenue amount, $150,000 is to be used for marine mammal
response activities in conjunction with matching federal funds.
Federal Funds 31,528,201
Restricted Receipts 6,185,022
Other Funds
DOT Recreational Projects 762,000
Blackstone Bike Path Design 1,000,000
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Dam Repair 6,815,000
Fort Adams Rehabilitation 500,000
Port of Galilee 20,500,000
Newport Pier Upgrades 500,000
Recreation Facilities Asset Protection 750,000
Recreational Facilities Improvements 2,900,000
Natural Resources Office and Visitor's Center 1,836,709
Fish & Wildlife Maintenance Facilities 200,000
Marine Infrastructure/Pier Development 700,000
Total - Natural Resources 106,502,682
Environmental Protection
General Revenues 16,607,743
Federal Funds 12,825,343
Restricted Receipts 12,660,382
Other Funds
Transportation MOU 95,967
Total - Environmental Protection 42,189,435
Grand Total - Environmental Management 164,424,187
Coastal Resources Management Council
General Revenues 3,904,812
Federal Funds 3,331,166
Restricted Receipts 624,768
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -32-)

South Coast Restoration Project 7,000,000
Grand Total - Coastal Resources Mgmt. Council 14,860,746
Transportation
Central Management
Federal Funds 13,777,360
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 9,004,830
Total - Central Management 22,782,190
Management and Budget
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 3,839,065
Infrastructure Engineering
Federal Funds 460,804,783
Restricted Receipts 6,066,037
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 88,272,135
Provided that of this amount, $6,500,000 is appropriated to the Municipal Roads Grant
Program known as RhodeRestore to provide funding to municipalities for the construction and
maintenance of roads, sidewalks, and bridges. Provided that twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds
shall be distributed equally to each city and town, and seventy-five percent (75%) shall be allocated
proportionally based on each municipality’s share of municipally maintained road miles, as
determined by the most recent data available from the Rhode Island department of transportation.
Provided further that each municipality is required to provide a sixty-seven percent (67%) match.
Provided that of this amount, sufficient funds from the Rhode Island public transit
authority’s share of gasoline tax proceeds shall be allocated to the state paratransit program,
including the expansion pilot program known as ride anywhere to ensure statewide paratransit
services are maintained.
Land Sale Revenue 6,239,422
Tolling Revenue 10,000,000
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Highway Improvement Program 115,617,814
Bike Path Asset Protection 400,000
RIPTA - Land and Buildings 6,905,927
RIPTA - Pawtucket/Central Falls Bus Hub Passenger Facility 1,500,000
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -33-)

RIPTA - Providence High-Capacity Transit Corridor Study 90,000
Total - Infrastructure Engineering 695,896,118
Infrastructure Maintenance
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 41,781,096
The department of transportation will establish a municipal roadway database, which will
include information concerning the name, condition, length, roadway infrastructure, and pedestrian
features of each municipal roadway, updated annually by municipalities. The database will serve
as a comprehensive and transparent list of municipal roadway conditions.
Rhode Island Highway Maintenance Account 114,037,366
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Maintenance Capital Equipment Replacement 1,800,000
Maintenance Facilities Improvements 859,756
Welcome Center 150,000
Salt Storage Facilities 1,150,000
Train Station Asset Protection 500,000
Total - Infrastructure Maintenance 160,278,218
Grand Total - Transportation 882,795,591
Statewide Totals
General Revenues 5,809,363,121
Federal Funds 5,108,485,986
Restricted Receipts 458,544,467
Other Funds 2,959,985,019
Statewide Grand Total 14,336,378,593
SECTION 2. Each line appearing in section 1 of this article shall constitute an
appropriation.
SECTION 3. Upon the transfer of any function of a department or agency to another
department or agency, the governor is hereby authorized by means of executive order to transfer or
reallocate, in whole or in part, the appropriations and the full-time equivalent limits affected
thereby; provided, however, in accordance with § 42-6-5, when the duties or administrative
functions of government are designated by law to be performed within a particular department or
agency, no transfer of duties or functions and no re-allocation, in whole or part, or appropriations
and full-time equivalent positions to any other department or agency shall be authorized.
SECTION 4. From the appropriation for contingency shall be paid such sums as may be
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -34-)

required at the discretion of the governor to fund expenditures for which appropriations may not
exist. Such contingency funds may also be used for expenditures in the several departments and
agencies where appropriations are insufficient, or where such requirements are due to unforeseen
conditions or are non-recurring items of an unusual nature. Said appropriations may also be used
for the payment of bills incurred due to emergencies or to any offense against public peace and
property, in accordance with the provisions of titles 11 and 45, as amended. All expenditures and
transfers from this account shall be approved by the governor.
SECTION 5. The general assembly authorizes the state controller to establish the internal
service accounts shown below, and no other, to finance and account for the operations of state
agencies that provide services to other agencies, institutions and other governmental units on a cost
reimbursed basis. The purpose of these accounts is to ensure that certain activities are managed in
a businesslike manner; promote efficient use of services by making agencies pay the full costs
associated with providing the services; and allocate the costs of central administrative services
across all fund types, so that federal and other non-general fund programs share in the costs of
general government support. The controller is authorized to reimburse these accounts for the cost
of work or services performed for any other department or agency subject to the following
expenditure limitations:
Account Expenditure Limit
State Assessed Fringe Benefit Internal Service Fund 37,255,808
Administration Central Utilities Internal Service Fund 30,366,642
State Central Mail Internal Service Fund 9,020,425
State Telecommunications Internal Service Fund 3,426,061
State Automotive Fleet Internal Service Fund 21,610,397
Surplus Property Internal Service Fund 44,789
Health Insurance Internal Service Fund 272,933,573
Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund 63,854,008
Capitol Police Internal Service Fund 1,659,403
Corrections Central Distribution Center Internal Service Fund 8,679,440
Correctional Industries Internal Service Fund 8,477,292
Secretary of State Record Center Internal Service Fund 1,231,684
Human Resources Internal Service Fund 18,711,878
DCAMM Facilities Internal Service Fund 40,492,965
Information Technology Internal Service Fund 70,587,805
SECTION 6. The director of the department of administration shall exercise his powers
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -35-)

under chapter 11 of title 42 to centralize state fleet operations under the department as it relates to
light and medium duty vehicle management, in accordance with best practices.
SECTION 7. Legislative Intent - The general assembly may provide a written "statement
of legislative intent" signed by the chairperson of the house finance committee and by the
chairperson of the senate finance committee to show the intended purpose of the appropriations
contained in section 1 of this article. The statement of legislative intent shall be kept on file in the
house finance committee and in the senate finance committee.
At least twenty (20) days prior to the issuance of a grant or the release of funds, which
grant or funds are listed on the legislative letter of intent, all department, agency, and corporation
directors shall notify in writing the chairperson of the house finance committee and the chairperson
of the senate finance committee of the approximate date when the funds are to be released or
granted.
SECTION 8. Appropriation of Temporary Disability Insurance Funds -- There is hereby
appropriated pursuant to §§ 28-39-5 and 28-39-8 all funds required to be disbursed for the benefit
payments from the temporary disability insurance fund and temporary disability insurance reserve
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 9. Appropriation of Employment Security Funds -- There is hereby appropriated
pursuant to § 28-42-19 all funds required to be disbursed for benefit payments from the employment
security fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 10. Appropriation of Lottery Division Funds -- There is hereby appropriated to
the lottery division any funds required to be disbursed by the lottery division for the purposes of
paying commissions or transfers to the prize fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 11. Appropriation of CollegeBoundSaver Funds - There is hereby appropriated
to the office of the general treasurer designated funds received under the collegeboundsaver
program for transfer to the division of higher education assistance within the office of the
postsecondary commissioner to support student financial aid for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026.
SECTION 12. Departments and agencies listed below may not exceed the number of full-
time equivalent (FTE) positions shown below in any pay period. Full-time equivalent positions do
not include limited period positions or, seasonal or intermittent positions whose scheduled period
of employment does not exceed twenty-six consecutive weeks or whose scheduled hours do not
exceed nine hundred and twenty-five (925) hours, excluding overtime, in a one-year period. Nor
do they include individuals engaged in training, the completion of which is a prerequisite of
employment. Provided, however, that the governor or designee, speaker of the house of
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -36-)

representatives or designee, and the president of the senate or designee may authorize an adjustment
to any limitation. Prior to the authorization, the state budget officer shall make a detailed written
recommendation to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. A copy
of the recommendation and authorization to adjust shall be transmitted to the chairman of the house
finance committee, senate finance committee, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor.
State employees whose funding is from non-state general revenue funds that are time
limited shall receive limited term appointment with the term limited to the availability of non-state
general revenue funding source.
FY 2026 FTE POSITION AUTHORIZATION
Departments and Agencies Full-Time Equivalent
Administration 684.6
Provided that no more than 434.1 of the total authorization would be limited to positions
that support internal service fund programs.
Office of Energy Resources 17.0
Business Regulation 155.0
Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission 26.0
Executive Office of Commerce 5.0
Housing 38.0
Labor and Training 461.7
Revenue 605.5
Legislature 298.5
Office of the Lieutenant Governor 8.0
Office of the Secretary of State 62.0
Office of the General Treasurer 92.0
Board of Elections 13.0
Rhode Island Ethics Commission 12.0
Office of the Governor 45.0
Commission for Human Rights 15.0
Public Utilities Commission 57.0
Executive Office of Health and Human Services 243.0
Children, Youth and Families 713.5
Health 572.6
Human Services 779.0
Office of Veterans Services 267.0
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -37-)

Office of Healthy Aging 33.0
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 1,223.4
Provided that 18.0 of the total authorization would be limited to independent facilitators
positions to comply with the Consent Decree Addendum.
Office of the Child Advocate 13.0
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing 4.0
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 5.0
Office of the Mental Health Advocate 6.0
Elementary and Secondary Education 156.1
Provided that 3.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by the healthy environments advance learning grant at the school building authority.
School for the Deaf 61.0
Davies Career and Technical School 125.0
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner 48.0
Provided that 1.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds, 12.0 would be available only for positions at the state’s higher
education centers located in Woonsocket and Westerly, 10.0 would be available only for positions
at the nursing education center, and 9.0 would be available for the longitudinal data systems
program.
University of Rhode Island 2,671.0
Provided that 378.8 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island College 949.2
Provided that 76.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Community College of Rhode Island 849.1
Provided that 89.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island State Council on the Arts 10.0
RI Atomic Energy Commission 8.6
Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission 15.6
Office of the Attorney General 268.1
Corrections 1,461.0
Judicial 749.3
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -38-)

Military Staff 93.0
Emergency Management Agency 38.0
Public Safety 634.0
Office of the Public Defender 104.0
Environmental Management 439.0
Coastal Resources Management Council 32.0
Transportation 755.0
Total 15,921.8
No agency or department may employ contracted employee services where contract
employees would work under state employee supervisors without determination of need by the
director of administration acting upon positive recommendations by the budget officer and the
personnel administrator and fifteen (15) days after a public hearing.
Nor may any agency or department contract for services replacing work done by state
employees at that time without determination of need by the director of administration acting upon
the positive recommendations of the state budget officer and the personnel administrator and thirty
(30) days after a public hearing.
SECTION 13. The amounts reflected in this article include the appropriation of Rhode
Island capital plan funds for fiscal year 2026 and supersede appropriations provided for FY 2026
within Pub. L. 2024, ch. 117, art. 1, § 13.
The following amounts are hereby appropriated out of any money in the State’s Rhode
Island capital plan fund not otherwise appropriated to be expended during the fiscal years ending
June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, June 30, 2029, and June 30, 2030. These amounts supersede
appropriations provided within Pub. L. 2024, ch. 117, art. 1, § 13.
For the purposes and functions hereinafter mentioned, the state controller is hereby
authorized and directed to draw the controller's orders upon the general treasurer for the payment
of such sums and such portions thereof as may be required by the controller upon receipt of properly
authenticated vouchers.
FY Ending FY Ending FY Ending FY Ending
Project 06/30/2027 06/30/2028 06/30/2029 06/30/2030
DOA – Civic Center 1,250,000 1,075,000 1,500,000 1,475,000
DOA – DoIT Enterprise Operations Center 3,700,000 200,000 200,000 200,000
DOA – Group Homes Consolidation 4,325,000 4,426,000 5,450,000 5,650,000
DOA – Pastore Campus Infrastructure 15,000,000 15,000,000 10,000,000 20,000,000
DOA – Pastore Hospital Buildings
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -39-)

Asset Protection 1,000,000 1,250,000 2,150,000 2,500,000
DOA – Pastore Center Power Plant 3,500,000 0 0 0
DOA – RI Convention Center Authority 2,825,000 2,500,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
DOA – Shepard Building Upgrades 3,920,000 3,785,000 3,785,000 4,540,000
DOA – State House Renovations 17,379,000 16,000,000 31,940,000 8,309,000
DOA – Veterans Auditorium 275,000 150,000 100,000 100,000
DOA – William Powers Building 2,350,000 1,850,000 1,700,000 200,000
DOA – Zambarano LTAC Hospital 23,804,439 24,427,656 24,155,740 26,065,740
DBR – Fire Academy Expansion 962,000 0 0 0
EOC – I-195 Redevelopment Commission 700,000 700,000 0 0
EOC – Quonset Infrastructure 2,500,000 0 0 0
SOS – Rhode Island Archives and History
Center 4,500,000 0 0 0
DCYF – Residential Treatment Facilities 4,000,000 0 0 0
ELSEC – Davies School Wing Renovation 2,500,000 0 0 0
URI – Asset Protection 15,236,863 15,528,074 15,885,220 16,250,580
URI – Mechanical, Electric and Plumbing
Improvements 4,542,055 2,350,000 0 0
URI – Building Envelope Improvements 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
URI – Campus Accessibility 1,700,000 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
URI – Athletics Complex 20,779,251 0 0 0
URI – Bay Campus Phase II 16,853,278 0 0 0
URI – PFAS Removal Water Treatment Plant 780,269 0 0 0
RIC – Asset Protection 6,500,000 6,632,000 6,850,000 6,850,000
RIC – Infrastructure Modernization 5,675,000 5,925,000 5,925,000 6,061,275
CCRI – Asset Protection 3,369,452 2,780,000 2,870,000 2,936,010
CCRI – Data, Cabling, and Power Infrastructure 5,250,885 4,150,000 2,394,000 0
CCRI – Flanagan Campus Renovations 3,600,505 2,500,000 584,000 0
CCRI – Renovation and Modernization Phase I 13,499,928 7,000,000 2,785,000 0
CCRI – Renovation and Modernization
Phase II-IV 2,400,000 600,000 0 0
DOC – HVAC 4,976,281 0 0 0
DOC – Correctional Facilities - Renovations 7,419,248 0 0 0
Military Staff – Asset Protection 1,801,639 1,598,858 2,424,420 1,662,463
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -40-)

Military Staff – Aviation Readiness Center 7,603,990 0 0 0
DPS – Training Academy Upgrades 695,000 690,000 475,000 600,000
DEM – Dam Repair 6,651,030 6,015,000 1,015,000 1,015,000
DEM – Natural Resources Offices and
Visitor's Center 1,836,709 0 0 0
DEM – Port of Galilee 17,413,820 1,500,000 1,500,000 1,500,000
DEM – Recreational Facilities Improvements 3,338,551 3,260,000 2,750,000 2,500,000
CRMC – Confined Aquatic Dredged
Material Disposal Cells 11,380,000 0 0 0
DOT – Highway Improvement Program 44,200,000 22,200,000 22,200,000 22,200,000
DOT – Maintenance Capital Equipment
Replacement 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000
DOT – Salt Storage Facilities 1,150,000 1,500,000 1,500,000 1,500,000
DOT – RIPTA - Land and Buildings 7,558,492 3,162,119 3,162,119 812,500
SECTION 14. Reappropriation of Funding for Rhode Island capital plan fund projects.
Any unexpended and unencumbered funds from Rhode Island capital plan fund project
appropriations shall be reappropriated in the ensuing fiscal year and made available for the same
purpose. However, any such reappropriations are subject to final approval by the general assembly
as part of the supplemental appropriations act. Any unexpended funds of less than five hundred
dollars ($500) shall be reappropriated at the discretion of the state budget officer.
SECTION 15. For the Fiscal Year ending June 30, 2026, the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation shall provide from its resources such sums as appropriate in support
of the Neighborhood Opportunities Program. The corporation shall provide a report detailing the
amount of funding provided to this program, as well as information on the number of units of
housing provided as a result to the director of administration, the secretary of housing, the chair of
the house finance committee, the chair of the senate finance committee, and the state budget officer.
SECTION 16. Appropriation of Economic Activity Taxes in accordance with the city of
Pawtucket downtown redevelopment statute -- There is hereby appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, all state economic activity taxes to be collected pursuant to § 45-33.4-4, as
amended (including, but not limited to, the amount of tax revenues certified by the commerce
corporation in accordance with § 45-33.4-1(13)), for the purposes of paying debt service on bonds,
funding debt service reserves; paying costs of infrastructure improvements in and around the
ballpark district, arts district, and the growth center district; funding future debt service on bonds;
and funding a redevelopment revolving fund established in accordance with § 45-33-1.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -41-)

SECTION 17. The appropriations from federal funds contained in section 1 shall not be
construed to mean any federal funds or assistance appropriated, authorized, allocated or
apportioned to the State of Rhode Island from the state fiscal recovery fund and capital projects
fund enacted pursuant to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for fiscal year 2026
except for those instances specifically designated.
The State fiscal recovery fund and capital projects fund appropriations herein shall be made
in support of the following projects:
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA- Pandemic Recovery Office. These funds shall be allocated to finance the pandemic
recovery office established within the department of administration.
Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS)
EOHHS - Certified Community Behavioral Clinics. These funds shall be allocated to a
program to support certified community behavioral health clinics to bolster behavioral health
supports, medical screening and monitoring, and social services to particularly vulnerable
populations in response to a rise in mental health needs during the public health emergency.
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
(BHDDH)
BHDDH – 9-8-8 Hotline. These funds shall be allocated for the creation and operation of
a 9-8-8 hotline to maintain compliance wit the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020
and the Federal Communications Commission-adopted rules to assure that all citizens receive a
consistent level of 9-8-8 and crisis behavioral health services.
Rhode Island Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (ELSEC)
RIDE - Adult Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed through the
office of adult education to nonprofit adult education providers to expand access to educational
programs and literary services.
Department of Public Safety (DPS)
DPS – Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence. These funds shall be allocated to invest
in the nonprofit community to provide additional housing, clinical and mental health services to
victims of domestic violence and sexual assault. This includes increased investments for therapy
and counseling, housing assistance, job training, relocation aid and case management.
Federal Funds - Capital Projects Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA - CPF Administration. These funds shall be allocated to the department of
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -42-)

administration to oversee the implementation of the capital projects fund award from the American
Rescue Plan Act.
SECTION 18. Reappropriation of Funding for State Fiscal Recovery Fund and Capital
Projects Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of general law, any unexpended and unencumbered
federal funds from the state fiscal recovery fund and capital projects fund shall be reappropriated
in the ensuing fiscal year and made available for the same purposes. However, any such
reappropriations are subject to final approval by the general assembly as part of the supplemental
appropriations act.
SECTION 19. The pandemic recovery office shall monitor the progress and performance
of all programs financed by the state fiscal recovery fund and the capital projects fund. On or before
October 31, 2023 through April 30, 2025, the office shall provide a report to the speaker of the
house and senate president, with copies to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance
committees, on a quarterly basis and biannually thereafter until and including October 31, 2026,
identifying programs that are at risk of significant underspending or noncompliance with federal or
state requirements. The report, at a minimum must include an assessment of how programs that are
at risk can be remedied. In the event that any state fiscal recovery fund program underspends its
appropriation or receives program income as defined by U.S. Treasury and would put the state at
risk of forfeiture of federal funds, the governor may propose to reclassify unspent funds or program
income from the at-risk program to other eligible uses as determined by U.S. Treasury. This
proposal shall be referred to the general assembly. For a state fiscal recovery fund program, if the
amount of the underspend or receipt of program income is less than or equal to one million dollars
($1,000,000) and less than or equal to twenty percent (20%) of its total appropriation, the
governor’s proposed reclassification shall take effect immediately. For a state fiscal recovery fund
program, if the amount of the underspend or receipt of program income is greater than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) or greater than twenty percent (20%) of its total appropriation, the governor’s
proposed reclassification shall go into effect thirty (30) days after its referral to the general
assembly by the governor, unless rejected by formal action of the house and senate acting
concurrently within that time.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island student
loan authority shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2026, the sum of two million nine
hundred thousand dollars ($2,900,000).
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the state controller shall
transfer the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
by June 30, 2026.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -43-)

SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the state controller shall
transfer the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to the housing resources
and homelessness restricted receipt account by June 30, 2026.
SECTION 23. The general assembly makes the following findings:
(1) Federal disbursements play a significant role in the financial management of Rhode
Island’s overall budget and revenues;
(2) With pending federal legislative proposals, uncertainty exists regarding projected future
federal disbursements to Rhode Island;
(3) Potential federal tax actions, actions related to Medicare/Medicaid programs, and
actions related to grants could all pose significant state budget challenges in fiscal year 2026 and
thereafter;
(4) In order to be prepared to address these potential challenges, it is in the best interest of
the State to convene advisory working groups to inform any budget changes that may be
necessitated by federal actions; and
(5) It is further in the best interest of the State for the Office of Management and Budget,
in coordination with other state agencies, to develop options for consideration by the general
assembly;
Therefore, the general assembly respectfully requests the administration to convene an
advisory group, as set forth in Article 5, § 3, to assist in the review and analysis of federal tax
actions; to appoint an advisory group, as set forth in Article 8, § 8, to assist in the review and
analysis of federal actions related to Medicare/Medicaid; and to monitor the status of federal grants
and develop options for the general assembly to address federal funding changes, as set forth in
Article 3, § 7.
SECTION 24. This article shall take effect as of July 1, 2025, except as otherwise provided
herein.
Art1
RELATING TO MAKING APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
(Page -44-)

=======
art.002/5/002/4/002/3/002/2/002/1
=======
ARTICLE 2 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-57 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Higher Education
Assistance Act [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following sections:
16-57-4.1. Dissolution of division of higher education assistance -- Transfer of
functions.
(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the division of higher education assistance shall be dissolved.
Upon said dissolution and date, all functions, powers, duties and authority of the division of higher
education assistance shall transfer to the office of postsecondary commissioner.
(b) On July 1, 2025, the office of postsecondary commissioner shall assume all rights,
responsibilities, duties, assets, liabilities and obligations of the dissolved division of higher
education assistance, and the office of postsecondary commissioner shall be considered for all
purposes the successor in interest to the division of higher education assistance.
(c) All contracts and agreements of whatsoever kind of the division of higher education
assistance are hereby assigned, transferred to, and assumed by the office of postsecondary
commissioner.
(d) Whenever in any general law, public law or rule or regulation reference is made to "the
division of higher education assistance", the reference shall be deemed to refer to and mean "the
office of postsecondary commissioner", which also may be referred to as the "office".
16-57-4.2. Tuition savings program fund.
There is hereby established a restricted receipt account in the general fund and housed in
the office of postsecondary commissioner to be known as the "tuition savings program fund". The
purpose of the fund is to receive and disburse scholarship funds pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
SECTION 2. Sections 16-57-2, 16-57-3, 16-57-4, 16-57-6.1, 16-57-7, 16-57-8, 16-57-9,
16-57-10 and 16-57-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-57 entitled "Rhode Island Higher
Education Assistance Act [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]"
are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-57-2. Findings.

The purpose of this chapter is to authorize a system of financial assistance, consisting of
loan guaranties, savings programs, and other aids, for qualified students, parents, and others
responsible for paying the costs of education to enable them to obtain an education beyond the high
school level by attending public or private educational institutions. The general assembly has found
and declares that it is in the public interest and essential to the welfare and well being of the
inhabitants of the state and to the proper growth and development of the state to foster and provide
financial assistance to qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of
education in order to help prospective students to obtain an education beyond the high school level.
The general assembly has found that many inhabitants of the state who are fully qualified to enroll
in appropriate educational institutions for furthering their education beyond the high school level
lack the financial means and are unable, without financial assistance as authorized under this
chapter, to pay the cost of their education, with a consequent irreparable loss to the state of valuable
talents vital to its welfare. The general assembly also recognizes that educational institutions for
higher education are in need of appropriate additional means to provide financial assistance to
qualified students, parents, and others responsible for paying the costs of education. The general
assembly has determined that the establishment of a proper system of financial assistance,
containing eligibility opportunities for students and residents of this state and other states serves a
public purpose and is fully consistent with the long established policy of the state to encourage,
promote, and assist the education of the people of the state. The general assembly further finds that
higher education financial assistance needs of Rhode Islanders will be better served by transferring
all of the functions and programs of the former Rhode Island higher education assistance authority
to and of the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance to the office of postsecondary
commissioner and the office of the general treasurer.
16-57-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following meanings unless
the context indicates another or different meaning or intent:
(1) “Authority” means the governmental agency and public instrumentality previously
authorized, created, and established pursuant to § 16-57-4 commissioner of postsecondary
education.
(2) “Commissioner of postsecondary education” means the commissioner appointed by the
council on postsecondary education pursuant to § 16-59-6 or his or her the commissioner's
designee.
(3) “Eligible borrower” means a student, or the parent of a student, who is either a resident
of the state or who, under rules promulgated by the office, is qualified to make an eligible loan.
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -2-)

(4) “Eligible institution,” subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by
regulation of the office, means:
(i) An institution of higher learning;
(ii) A vocational school; or
(iii) With respect to students who are nationals of the United States, an institution outside
the United States that is comparable to an institution of higher education or to a vocational school
and that has been approved by the commissioner of postsecondary education for purposes of the
guaranteed student loan program.
(5) “Eligible loan” means a loan to a student or to the parent of a student insured or
guaranteed by the commissioner of postsecondary education, or by any other governmental or
private agency, corporation, or organization having a reinsurance or guaranty agreement with the
commissioner applicable to the student loan.
(6) “Guaranteed student loan program” means the program of federal student loan
insurance and reinsurance administered by the commissioner of postsecondary education.
(7) “Lender,” subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by regulation of the
office, means any governmental or private agency, corporation, organization, or institution
designated as an “eligible lender” by federal statute, regulation, or administrative ruling for the
purposes of the guaranteed student loan program.
(8) “Participant” means an individual, corporation, trust, or other “person” within the
meaning of § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529], who makes contributions to the
tuition savings program established pursuant to § 16-57-6.1 for purposes of paying qualified higher
education expenses on behalf of a beneficiary.
(9) “Participating institution” means an institution for higher education that agrees to
participate in a savings program or pre-paid tuition program established pursuant to this chapter.
(10) “Pre-paid tuition program” means a program administered by the division, in
conjunction with the executive director of the Rhode Island Student Loan Authority and the
commissioner of postsecondary education, that provides a means for qualified students, parents,
and others responsible for paying the costs of education to fix all or a portion of the direct cost of
attendance at participating institutions in one or more future years.
(11) “Program” means the tuition savings program established pursuant to § 16-57-6.1.
(12) “Qualified higher education expenses” means the costs of tuition, fees, books, supplies
and equipment required for enrollment or attendance at an institution of higher education, and other
education costs defined by federal law.
(13) “Secretary” means the United States secretary of education.
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -3-)

(14) “State” means the state of Rhode Island.
(15) “Student,” as used with reference to the guaranteed student loan program and the
parent loan program, means an individual who, under rules promulgated by the division
commissioner of postsecondary education, is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an eligible
institution and who is making suitable progress in his or her the student's education toward
obtaining a degree or other appropriate certification in accordance with standards acceptable to the
authority.
(16) “Tuition savings program” or “savings program” means a program approved and
administered by the general treasurer, in conjunction with the executive director of the Rhode Island
Student Loan Authority, and the commissioner of postsecondary education, designed to facilitate
and encourage savings by, or on behalf of, students, future students, and parents for the purpose of
paying the costs of attending institutions of higher education.
(17) “Council” means the council on postsecondary education established pursuant to § 16-
59-1.
(18) “Division” means the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance, the
division authorized, created, and established pursuant to § 16-57-4, and dissolved pursuant to the
provisions of § 16-57-4.1.
16-57-4. Creation Authorization and powers.
(a) There is authorized, created, and established within the The office of the commissioner
of postsecondary education, a division of higher education assistance is hereby granted and
authorized to use all of the powers set forth in this chapter for the purposes of guaranteeing eligible
loans to students in eligible institutions and to parents of those students and administering other
programs of postsecondary student financial assistance assigned by law to the division
commissioner of postsecondary education.
(b) The exercise by the division commissioner of postsecondary education of the powers
conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential
governmental function of the state for public purposes. It is the intent of the general assembly by
the passage of this chapter to vest in the office commissioner all powers, authority, rights,
privileges, and titles that may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes set forth in this
section and this chapter, and the powers granted by it shall be liberally construed in conformity
with these purposes.
(c) The authority and its corporate existence shall be terminated on July 1, 2015, or upon
approval by the U.S. Department of Education, whichever is later, and all its rights and properties
shall pass to and be vested in the division of higher education assistance, except as otherwise
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -4-)

provided in § 16-57-6.1, and except for any real property held by the authority, the legal title to
which is hereby passed to and vested in (in trust for the state) the council on postsecondary
education. The division shall continue until terminated by law or until the division shall cease
entirely and continuously to conduct or be involved in any business in furtherance of its purposes;
provided, that no termination shall take effect so long as the division shall have guaranties or other
obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision shall have been made for the payment of the
obligations pursuant to the documents securing them or to this law. Upon termination of the
existence of the division, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state. At no
time shall the assets or other property of the division enure to the benefit of any person or other
corporation or entity.
(d)(c) Except as provided in § 16-57-6.1, effective July 1, 2015 2025, or upon approval by
the U.S. Department of Education, whichever is later:
(i) All functions formerly administered by the Rhode Island higher education assistance
authority are hereby transferred to the and by Rhode Island division of higher education assistance
are hereby transferred to the office of postsecondary commissioner;
(ii) The Rhode Island division of higher education assistance office of postsecondary
commissioner shall assume all rights, duties, assets, liabilities, and obligations of the former Rhode
Island higher education assistance authority and the Rhode Island division of higher education
assistance. The office of postsecondary commissioner shall be considered to be the successor in
interest to both the Rhode Island higher education assistance authority and the Rhode Island
division of higher education assistance; and
(iii) All contracts and agreements of whatsoever kind of the Rhode Island higher education
assistance authority are hereby assigned, transferred to, and assumed by and by the Rhode Island
division of higher education assistance are hereby assigned, transferred to and assumed by office
of postsecondary commissioner.
(e)(d) Upon the completion of the transfer, the corporation known as the “Rhode Island
higher education assistance authority” Rhode Island division of higher education assistance shall
cease to exist. Whenever in any general law, or public law or rule or regulation reference is made
to the “Rhode Island higher education assistance authority,” the reference shall be deemed to refer
to and mean or the “Rhode Island division of higher education assistance,” which also may be
referred to as the “division.” the reference shall be deemed to refer to and mean the office of
postsecondary commissioner.
16-57-6.1. Tuition savings program.
(a) The general treasurer, in conjunction with the division, the state investment
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -5-)

commission, executive director of the Rhode Island student loan authority, and the commissioner
of postsecondary education, shall establish, in any form as he or she deems appropriate, a tuition
savings program to allow persons to save money for the sole purpose of meeting qualified higher
education expenses.
(b) All money received in connection with the tuition savings program shall be segregated
from all other funds into two (2) funds, a program fund and an administrative fund. No more than
two percent (2%) of money in the program fund may be transferred annually to the administrative
fund for the purpose of paying operating costs of administering the tuition savings program. Money
accrued by participants in the program fund may be used for payments to an eligible institution. All
proceeds from the tuition savings program shall be directed to the administrative fund, and to the
extent they exceed the operating costs of administering the tuition savings program, said excess
shall be used for financial aid-related activities in Rhode Island pursuant to § 16-56-6.
(c) The state investment commission shall invest money within the program fund in any
investments that are authorized by the general laws, including equities and fixed-income securities.
The composition of investments shall be determined by the state investment commission.
(d) A participant may at any time withdraw funds from the participant’s account in the
tuition savings program in an amount up to the value of the account at the time the withdrawal is
implemented, less such administrative fee as may be levied by the treasurer in connection with the
withdrawal.
(e) Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, no administrative fee may be levied
by the treasurer in the event that a participant requests withdrawal of funds from the participant’s
account in the tuition savings program on account of, and within the meanings of § 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529]:
(1) The death of the beneficiary of the account;
(2) The disability of the beneficiary; or
(3) A scholarship, allowance, or payment received by the beneficiary to the extent that the
amount of the refund does not exceed the amount of the scholarship, allowance, or payment.
(f) In the event that a participant requests a withdrawal from an account in the tuition
savings program other than: (1) A withdrawal used for qualified higher education expenses of the
beneficiary of the account or (2): For a reason referred to in subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), or (e)(3) of
this section, the treasurer shall impose a more than de minimis penalty on the earnings portion of
the withdrawal in accordance with § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529]; provided
that no penalty shall be imposed with respect to any such withdrawal, or any other withdrawal,
from any account in the tuition savings plan to which the tax made applicable by § 529 of the
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -6-)

Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 529] is effective.
(g) [Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.]
16-57-7. Council on postsecondary education.
(a) The council on postsecondary education established pursuant to § 16-59-1 shall retain
all authority formerly vested in the higher education assistance authority board of directors, except
as provided by § 16-57-6.1. Whenever in any general or public law reference is made to the “board
of directors of the higher education assistance authority,” the reference shall be deemed to refer to
and mean the “council on postsecondary education.” The council on postsecondary education shall
be the employer of record for the division of higher education assistance.
(b) No full-time employee shall, during the period of his or her employment by the division,
engage in any other private employment, profession, or business, except with the approval of the
commissioner of postsecondary education; provided, that the executive director shall not engage in
any other private employment, profession, or business, including, but not limited to, consulting.
16-57-8. Designated agency.
The division established within the office of the postsecondary commissioner is designated
the state agency to apply for, receive, accept, and disburse federal funds, and funds from other
public and private sources, made available to the state for use as reserves to guarantee student loans
or as administrative money to operate student loan programs, and is designated to administer any
statewide programs of student assistance that shall be established under federal law.
16-57-9. Loans to minors — Loan obligations.
(a) Any person qualifying for an eligible loan shall not be disqualified to receive a loan
guaranteed by the division office of the postsecondary commissioner by reason of his or her the
person being a minor. For the purpose of applying for, securing, receiving, and repaying a loan,
any person shall be deemed to have full legal capacity to act and shall have all the rights, powers,
privileges, and obligations of a person of full age with respect to a loan.
(b) No loan obligation incurred by any individual under the provisions of this chapter may
be expunged, reduced, or discharged in any proceeding, including any proceeding in federal
bankruptcy court. Any individual receiving a loan under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required to sign an affidavit acknowledging the loan and agreeing to this condition.
16-57-10. Reserve funds.
(a) To ensure the continued operation and solvency of the guaranteed student loan program,
the office of the postsecondary commissioner shall create and establish reserve funds, and may pay
into the funds any money appropriated and made available by the state or any other source for the
purpose of the funds, and any money collected by the division office as fees for the guaranty of
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -7-)

eligible loans.
(b) Furthermore, it is the intent of the general assembly that these funds eventually be used
to increase financial assistance to Rhode Island students in the form of scholarships and grants as
approved by the commissioner of postsecondary education and as directed by the U.S. Department
of Education and in accordance with federal statutes and regulations governing the use of funds in
the guaranty agency’s operating fund pursuant to the provisions and restrictions of the 1998
reauthorization of the federal Higher Education Act.
(c) [Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 6.]
16-57-12. Credit of state.
Guaranties made under the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute debts, liabilities,
or obligations of the state or of any political subdivision of the state other than the division of higher
education assistance office of the postsecondary commissioner or a pledge of the faith and credit
of the state or any political subdivision other than the division of higher education assistance office
of the postsecondary commissioner, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of
reserve funds set forth in § 16-57-10.
SECTION 3. Section 24-18-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-18 entitled "Municipal
Road and Bridge Revolving Fund" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-18-7. Procedure for project approval.
(a) By September 1, 2013, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations
establishing the project evaluation criteria and the process through which a city or town may submit
an infrastructure plan. By December 31, 2013, the agency shall promulgate rules and regulations
to effectuate the provisions of this chapter which may include, without limitation, forms for
financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments. All rules and regulations
promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 35 of title 42.
(b) Cities and towns shall submit infrastructure plans to the department in accordance with
the department’s rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The department shall evaluate all submitted infrastructure plans and, in accordance with
the project evaluation criteria, identify all eligible projects, and after a public hearing, the
department shall finalize and provide the agency and statewide planning with a project priority list.
The agency shall not award financial assistance to any project not listed on the project priority list
other than as set forth in subsection (f) herein.
(d) The agency shall not obligate more than fifty percent (50%) of available funding in any
calendar year to any one city or town unless there are no other eligible projects on the project
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -8-)

priority list.
(e) Upon issuance of the project priority list, the agency shall award financial assistance to
cities and towns for approved projects. The agency may decline to award financial assistance to an
approved project that the agency determines will have a substantial adverse effect on the interests
of holders of bonds or other indebtedness of the agency or the interests of other participants in the
financial assistance program, or for good and sufficient cause affecting the finances of the agency.
All financial assistance shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the agency and the city
or town, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized
by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer, according to terms and conditions as determined
by the agency, and each loan shall be evidenced and secured by the issue to the agency of city or
town obligations in fully marketable form in principal amount, bearing interest at the rate or rates
specified in the applicable loan agreement, and shall otherwise bear such terms and conditions as
authorized by this chapter and/or the loan agreement.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the agency may provide financial
assistance for an approved project without the necessity of the approved project being listed on a
project priority list if the financial assistance for the approved project is to provide match to other
state funding for the approved project.
SECTION 4. Section 35-4-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-4 entitled "State Funds"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-4-27. Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts. [Effective January 1,
2025.]
Indirect cost recoveries of fifteen percent (15%) ten percent (10%) of cash receipts shall
be transferred from all restricted receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general
fund. However, there shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively:
(1) From contributions from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect
cost-recovery rates on federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the
department of administration for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall
be applied to all accounts, unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court
settlement. The following restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this
section:
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates
Health System Transformation Project
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -9-)

Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account
HCBS Support-ARPA
HCBS Admin Support-ARPA
Department of Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
Veterans’ home — Restricted account
Veterans’ home — Resident benefits
Pharmaceutical Rebates Account
Demand Side Management Grants
Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund
Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction
Commodity Supplemental Food Program-Claims
Department of Health
Pandemic medications and equipment account
Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits
State Loan Repayment Match
Healthcare Information Technology
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account
Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts
RICLAS Group Home Operations
Group Home Facility Improvement Fund
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Emergency and public communication access account
Department of Environmental Management
National heritage revolving fund
Environmental response fund II
Underground storage tanks registration fees
De Coppet Estate Fund
Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
Historic preservation revolving loan fund
Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue
Department of Public Safety
E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -10-)

Forfeited property — Retained
Forfeitures — Federal
Forfeited property — Gambling
Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training
Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account
Fire Academy Training Fees Account
Attorney General
Forfeiture of property
Federal forfeitures
Attorney General multi-state account
Forfeited property — Gambling
Department of Administration
OER Reconciliation Funding
Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund
RI Health Benefits Exchange
Information Technology restricted receipt account
Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage
Convention Center Authority rental payments
Investment Receipts — TANS
OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account
Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
Grants Management Administration
RGGI-Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Operating and Maintenance Account
Office of Energy Resources
OER Reconciliation Funding
RGGI Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Operating and Maintenance Account
Clean Transportation Programs
Department of Housing
Housing Resources and Homelessness Restricted Receipt Account
Housing Production Fund
Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
Department of Revenue
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -11-)

Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
DMV Modernization Project
Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund
Legislature
Audit of federal assisted programs
Department of Children, Youth and Families
Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI
Military Staff
RI Military Family Relief Fund
RI National Guard Counterdrug Program
Treasury
Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System
Retirement — Treasury Investment Options
Defined Contribution — Administration - RR
Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds
Treasury Research Fellowship
Business Regulation
Banking Division Reimbursement Account
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account
Securities Division Reimbursement Account
Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account
Insurance Division Reimbursement Account
Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account
Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission
Marijuana Trust Fund
Social Equity Assistance Fund
Judiciary
Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account
Third-Party Grants
RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Statewide Student Transportation Services Account
School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account
School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -12-)

Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account
Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program
School Construction Services
Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner
Tuition Savings Program Fund
Higher Education and Industry Center
IGT STEM Scholarships
Department of Labor and Training
Job Development Fund
Contractor Training Restricted Receipt Account
Workers' Compensation Administrative Account
Rhode Island Council on the Arts
Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund
Statewide records management system account
SECTION 5. Section 35-6-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-6 entitled "Accounts and
Control" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-6-1. Controller — Duties in general.
(a) Within the department of administration there shall be a controller who shall be
appointed by the director of administration pursuant to chapter 4 of title 36. The controller shall be
responsible for accounting and expenditure control and shall be required to:
(1) Administer a comprehensive accounting and recording system that will classify the
transactions of the state departments and agencies in accordance with the budget plan;
(2) Maintain control accounts for all supplies, materials, and equipment for all departments
and agencies except as otherwise provided by law;
(3) Prescribe a financial, accounting, and cost accounting system for state departments and
agencies;
(4) Identify federal grant-funding opportunities to support the governor’s and general
assembly’s major policy initiatives and provide technical assistance with the application process
and post-award grants management;
(5) Manage federal fiscal proposals and guidelines and serve as the state clearinghouse for
the application of federal grants;
(6) Pre-audit all state receipts and expenditures;
(7) Prepare financial statements required by the several departments and agencies, by the
governor, or by the general assembly;
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -13-)

(8) Approve the orders drawn on the general treasurer; provided, that the pre-audit of all
expenditures under authority of the legislative department and the judicial department by the state
controller shall be purely ministerial, concerned only with the legality of the expenditure and
availability of the funds, and in no event shall the state controller interpose his or her judgment
regarding the wisdom or expediency of any item or items of expenditure;
(9) Prepare and timely file, on behalf of the state, any and all reports required by the United
States, including, but not limited to, the Internal Revenue Service, or required by any department
or agency of the state, with respect to the state payroll; and
(10) Prepare a preliminary closing statement for each fiscal year. The controller shall
forward the statement to the chairpersons of the house finance committee and the senate finance
committee, with copies to the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal and policy advisor, by
September 1 following the fiscal year ending the prior June 30 or thirty (30) days after enactment
of the appropriations act, whichever is later. The report shall include but is not limited to:
(i) A report of all revenues received by the state in the completed fiscal year, together with
the estimates adopted for that year as contained in the final enacted budget, and together with all
deviations between estimated revenues and actual collections. The report shall also include cash
collections and accrual adjustments;
(ii) A comparison of actual expenditures with each of the actual appropriations, including
supplemental appropriations and other adjustments provided for in the Rhode Island general laws;
(iii) A statement of the opening and closing surplus in the general revenue account; and
(iv) A statement of the opening surplus, activity, and closing surplus in the state budget
reserve and cash stabilization account and the state bond capital fund.
(b) The controller shall provide supporting information on revenues, expenditures, capital
projects, and debt service upon request of the house finance committee chairperson, senate finance
committee chairperson, house fiscal advisor, or senate fiscal and policy advisor.
(c) Upon issuance of the audited annual financial statement, the controller shall provide a
report of the differences between the preliminary financial report and the final report as contained
in the audited annual financial statement.
(d) The controller shall create a special fund not part of the general fund and shall deposit
amounts equivalent to all deferred contributions under this act into that fund. Any amounts
remaining in the fund on June 15, 2010, shall be transferred to the general treasurer who shall
transfer such amounts into the retirement system as appropriate.
(e) Upon issuance of the audited financial statement, the controller shall transfer fifty
percent (50%) of all general revenues received in the completed fiscal year net of transfer to the
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -14-)

state budget reserve and cash stabilization account as required by § 35-3-20 in excess of those
estimates adopted for that year as contained in the final enacted budget to the employees’ retirement
system of the state of Rhode Island as defined in § 36-8-2 and fifty percent (50%) to the
supplemental state budget reserve account as defined in § 35-3-20.2, except that excess revenues
from fiscal year 2023 years 2023 and 2024 shall not be transferred to the supplemental state budget
reserve account.
(f) The controller shall implement a direct deposit payroll system for state employees.
(1) There shall be no service charge of any type paid by the state employee at any time
which shall decrease the net amount of the employee’s salary deposited to the financial institution
of the personal choice of the employee as a result of the use of direct deposit.
(2) Employees hired after September 30, 2014, shall participate in the direct deposit
system. At the time the employee is hired, the employee shall identify a financial institution that
will serve as a personal depository agent for the employee.
(3) No later than June 30, 2016, each employee hired before September 30, 2014, who is
not a participant in the direct deposit system, shall identify a financial institution that will serve as
a personal depository agent for the employee.
(4) The controller shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary for implementation
and administration of the direct deposit system, which shall include limited exceptions to required
participation.
(g) The controller shall oversee the office of risk management (§ 37-11-1 et seq.)
SECTION 6. Section 40.1-1-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 40.1-1 entitled
"Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40.1-1-13. Powers and duties of the office.
Notwithstanding any provision of the Rhode Island general laws to the contrary, the
department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) To establish and promulgate the overall plans, policies, objectives, and priorities for
state substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment; provided, however, that the director
shall obtain and consider input from all interested state departments and agencies prior to the
promulgation of any such plans or policies;
(2) Evaluate and monitor all state grants and contracts to local substance abuse service
providers;
(3) Develop, provide for, and coordinate the implementation of a comprehensive state plan
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -15-)

for substance abuse education, prevention, and treatment;
(4) Ensure the collection, analysis, and dissemination of information for planning and
evaluation of substance abuse services;
(5) Provide support, guidance, and technical assistance to individuals, local governments,
community service providers, public and private organizations in their substance abuse education,
prevention, and treatment activities;
(6) Confer with all interested department directors to coordinate the administration of state
programs and policies that directly affect substance abuse treatment and prevention;
(7) Seek and receive funds from the federal government and private sources in order to
further the purposes of this chapter;
(8) To act in conjunction with the executive office of health and human services as the
state’s co-designated agency (42 U.S.C. § 300x-30(a)) for administering federal aid and for the
purposes of the calculation of the expenditures relative to the substance abuse block grant and
federal funding maintenance of effort. The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals, as the state’s substance abuse authority, will have the sole responsibility
for the planning, policy and implementation efforts as it relates to the requirements set forth in
pertinent substance abuse laws and regulations including 42 U.S.C. § 300x-21 et seq.;
(9) Propose, review, and/or approve, as appropriate, proposals, policies, or plans involving
insurance and managed care systems for substance abuse services in Rhode Island;
(10) To enter into, in compliance with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 37, contractual
relationships and memoranda of agreement as necessary for the purposes of this chapter;
(11) To license facilities and programs for the care and treatment of substance abusers and
for the prevention of substance abuse, and provide the list of licensed chemical dependency
professionals (LCDP) and licensed chemical dependency clinical supervisors (LCDCS) (licensed
by the department of health pursuant to chapter 69 of title 5) for use by state agencies including,
but not limited to, the adjudication office of the department of transportation, the district court and
superior court and the division of probation and parole for referral of individuals requiring
substance use disorder treatment;
(12) To promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the requirements of this
chapter;
(13) Perform other acts and exercise any other powers necessary or convenient to carry out
the intent and purposes of this chapter;
(14) To exercise the authority and responsibilities relating to education, prevention, and
treatment of substance abuse, as contained in, but not limited to, the following chapters: chapters
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -16-)

1.10, 10.1, and 28.2 of title 23; chapters 21.2 and 21.3 of title 16; chapter 50.1 of title 42 [repealed];
chapter 109 of title 42; chapter 69 of title 5; and § 35-4-18;
(15) To establish a Medicare Part D restricted-receipt account in the hospitals and
community rehabilitation services program and the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital program
to receive and expend Medicare Part D reimbursements from pharmacy benefit providers consistent
with the purposes of this chapter;
(16) To establish a RICLAS group home operations restricted-receipt account in the
services for the developmentally disabled program to receive and expend rental income from
RICLAS group clients for group home-related expenditures, including food, utilities, community
activities, and the maintenance of group homes;
(17) To establish a non-Medicaid, third-party payor restricted-receipt account in the
hospitals and community rehabilitation services program to receive and expend reimbursement
from non-Medicaid, third-party payors to fund hospital patient services that are not Medicaid
eligible; and
(18) To certify any and all recovery housing facilities directly, or through a contracted
entity, as defined by department guidelines, which includes adherence to using National Alliance
for Recovery Residences (NARR) standards. In accordance with a schedule to be determined by
the department, all referrals from state agencies or state-funded facilities shall be to certified
houses, and only certified recovery housing facilities shall be eligible to receive state funding to
deliver recovery housing services. As of January 1, 2027, all recovery housing facilities shall be
registered with the department and shall adhere to the NARR certification process.
SECTION 7. Section 42-11-2.5 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-11 entitled "Department
of Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-11-2.5. Information technology restricted receipt account and large systems
initiatives fund.
(a) All sums from the sale of any land and the buildings and improvements thereon, and
other real property, title to which is vested in the state, except as provided in § 37-7-15(b) through
(d), shall be transferred to an information technology restricted receipt account (ITRR account) that
is hereby established. This ITRR account shall consist of such sums from the sale of any land and
the buildings and improvements thereon, and other real property, title to which is vested in the state,
except as provided in § 37-7-15(b) through (d), as well as a share of first response surcharge
revenues collected under the provisions of § 39-21.1-14. This ITRR account may also consist of
such sums as the state may from time to time appropriate; as well as money received from the
disposal of information technology hardware, loan, interest, and service charge payments from
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -17-)

benefiting state agencies; as well as interest earnings, money received from the federal government,
gifts, bequests, donations, or otherwise from any public or private source. Any such funds shall be
exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
(1) This ITRR account shall be used for the purpose of acquiring information technology
improvements, including, but not limited to: hardware, software, consulting services, and ongoing
maintenance and upgrade contracts for state departments and agencies.
(2) The division of enterprise technology strategy and services of the Rhode Island
department of administration shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 35 of this title, in order to provide for the orderly and equitable disbursement
of funds from this ITRR account.
(3) For all requests for proposals that are issued for information technology projects, a
corresponding information technology project manager shall be assigned.
(b) There is also hereby established a special fund to be known as the large systems
initiatives fund (LSI fund), separate and apart from the general fund of the state, to be administered
by the chief information officer within the department of administration for the purpose of
implementing and maintaining enterprise-wide software projects for executive branch departments.
The LSI fund shall consist of such sums as the state may from time to time directly appropriate to
the LSI fund, any accrued interest, and any funds collected pursuant to § 42-11-2.5(b)(1). After the
completion of any project, the chief digital officer shall inform the state controller of unexpended
sums previously transferred to the LSI Fund for that project and the state controller shall
subsequently transfer any such unexpended funds to the information technology restricted receipt
account. The state controller shall transfer any excess interest accrued in the LSI fund and any funds
collected pursuant to § 42-11-2.5(b)(1) to the ITRR account.
(1) The director of the department of administration may allocate and charge capitalized
costs, in accordance with statewide cost allocation plan, to agencies that benefit from initiatives
funded through the LSI Fund. The department of administration shall include as part of its budget
submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 an expected billing schedule for any capitalized costs that the
department intends to charge to agencies for the next ensuing fiscal year.
(c) For any new project initiated using sums expended from the LSI Fund, as part of its
budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to state fiscal year 2025 and thereafter, the
department of administration shall include a statement of project purpose and the estimated project
cost.
SECTION 8. Section 45-12-33 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-12 entitled
"Indebtedness of Towns and Cities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -18-)

45-12-33. Borrowing for road and bridge, infrastructure, and school building
projects.
(a)(1) In addition to other authority previously granted, during calendar year 2014 a city or
town may authorize the issuance of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness to evidence
loans from the municipal road and bridge revolving fund administered by the Rhode Island clean
water finance agency Rhode Island infrastructure bank in accordance with chapter 18 of title 24.
Beginning July 1, 2025, and thereafter, a city or town may authorize the issuance of bonds, notes,
or other evidences of indebtedness to evidence loans from the municipal road and bridge revolving
fund administered by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank in accordance with chapter 18 of title
24 to provide a match to other state funding for an approved project from the municipal road and
bridge revolving fund.
(2) In addition to other authority previously granted, from July 1, 2015 to June 30, 2016, a
city or town may authorize the issuance of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness to
evidence loans from the efficient buildings fund administered by the Rhode Island clean water
finance agency infrastructure bank in accordance with chapter 12.2 of title 46 or the school building
authority capital fund administered by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation
in accordance with chapter 38.2 of this title.
(b) These bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness are subject to the maximum
aggregate indebtedness permitted to be issued by any city or town under § 45-12-2.
(c) The denominations, maturities, interest rates, methods of sale, and other terms,
conditions, and details of any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this section may be
fixed by resolution of the city or town council authorizing them, or if no provision is made in the
resolution, by the treasurer or other officer authorized to issue the bonds, notes or evidences of
indebtedness; provided, that the payment of principal shall be by sufficient annual payments that
will extinguish the debt at maturity, the first of these annual payments to be made not later than
three (3) years, and the last payment not later than twenty (20) years after the date of the bonds.
The bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness may be issued under this section by
any political subdivision without obtaining the approval of its electors, notwithstanding the
provisions of §§ 45-12-19 and 45-12-20 and notwithstanding any provision of its charter to the
contrary.
SECTION 9. Sections 46-23-18.5 and 46-23-18.6 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-23
entitled "Coastal Resources Management Council" are hereby amended to read as follows:
46-23-18.5. Fees for disposal.
The council is authorized to impose a fee of not less than eleven dollars and sixty-five cents
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -19-)

($11.65) thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per cubic yard for the disposal of dredge materials at the sites
established by the council pursuant to § 46-23-18.3, with eleven dollars and sixty-five cents
($11.65) being deposited into the general fund. The amount of the fee established by the council
pursuant to the section shall be reviewed by the council on an annual basis and revised as the council
deems necessary, but in no event shall the fee be set at an amount less than eleven dollars and sixty-
five cents ($11.65) thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per cubic yard of material.
46-23-18.6. Coastal Resources Management Council Dredge Fund.
There is hereby created a separate fund to be held by the coastal resources management
council to be known as the dredge fund. Any amount All amounts charged above the eleven dollars
and sixty-five cents ($11.65) pursuant to § 46-23-18.5 must be deposited into the fund and shall
not be deposited into the general fund of the state, but and shall be kept by the general treasurer of
the state in a separate fund for the coastal resources management council, and shall be paid out by
the treasurer upon the order of the council, without the necessity of appropriation or re-
appropriation by the general assembly. Funds must be used to create additional dredging and
disposal options and for the management of said disposal options.
SECTION 10. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art2
RELATING TO STATE FUNDS
(Page -20-)

=======
art.003/8/003/7/003/6/003/5/003/4/003/3/003/2/003/1
=======
ARTICLE 3 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
SECTION 1. Sections 2-26-3, 2-26-4, 2-26-5, 2-26-6, 2-26-7, 2-26-8, 2-26-9 and 2-26-10
of the General Laws in Chapter 2-26 entitled "Hemp Growth Act" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
2-26-3. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Applicant” means any person, firm, corporation, or other legal entity who or that, on
his, her, or its own behalf, or on behalf of another, has applied for permission to engage in any act
or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) “Cannabis” means all parts of the plant of the genus marijuana, also known as marijuana
sativa L. whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant;
and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds,
or resin regardless of cannabinoid content or cannabinoid potency including “marijuana” and
“industrial hemp” or “industrial hemp products” which satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
(3) “Cannabidiol” or “CBD” means cannabidiol (CBD) derived from a hemp plant as
defined in § 2-26-3, not including products derived from exempt cannabis plant material as defined
in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.35.
(4) “Department” means the office of cannabis regulation within the department of
business regulation “Cannabis control commission” or “commission” means the Rhode Island
cannabis control commission established by § 21-28.11-4.
(5) “Division” means the division of agriculture in the department of environmental
management.
(6) “Grower” means a person or entity who or that produces hemp for commercial
purposes.
(7) “Handler” means a person or entity who or that produces or processes hemp or
agricultural hemp seed into commodities or who manufactures hemp products.
(8) “Hemp” or “industrial hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that
plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of

not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight or per volume basis regardless of
moisture content, and which satisfies the requirements of this chapter.
(9) “Hemp-derived consumable CBD product” means any product meant for ingestion,
including, but not limited to, concentrates, extracts, and cannabis-infused foods and products,
which contains cannabidiol derived from a hemp plant as defined in this section, which shall only
be sold to persons age twenty-one (21) or older, and which shall not include products derived from
exempt cannabis plant material as defined in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.35.
(10) “Hemp products” or “industrial hemp products” means all products made from the
plants, including, but not limited to, concentrated oil, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, fuel, hemp-derived
consumable CBD products, paint, paper, construction materials, plastics, seed, seed meal, seed oil,
and seed certified for cultivation, which satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
(11) “Licensed CBD distributor” means a person licensed to distribute hemp-derived
consumable CBD products pursuant to this chapter.
(12) “Licensed CBD retailer” means a person licensed to sell hemp-derived consumable
CBD products pursuant to this chapter.
(13) “Cannabis office” or “office” means the cannabis office established by § 21-28.11-
18.1.
(13)(14) “THC” means tetrahydrocannabinol, the principal psychoactive constituent of
cannabis.
(14)(15) “THCA” means tetrahydrocannabinol acid.
2-26-4. Hemp an agricultural product.
Hemp is an agricultural product that may be grown as a crop, produced, possessed,
distributed, sold at retail, and commercially traded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Hemp
is subject to primary regulation by the department commission. The division may assist the
department commission in the regulation of hemp growth and production.
2-26-5. Authority over licensing and sales.
(a) The department commission shall prescribe rules and regulations for the licensing and
regulation of hemp growers, handlers, licensed CBD distributors, and licensed CBD retailers and
persons employed by the applicant not inconsistent with law, to carry into effect the provision of
this chapter and shall be responsible for the enforcement of the licensing.
(b) All growers, handlers, licensed CBD distributors, and licensed CBD retailers must have
a hemp license issued by the department commission. All production, distribution, and retail sale
of hemp-derived consumable CBD products must be consistent with any applicable state or local
food processing and safety regulations, and the applicant shall be responsible to ensure its
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -2-)

compliance with the regulations and any applicable food safety licensing requirements, including,
but not limited to, those promulgated by the department of health.
(c) The application for a hemp license shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1)(i) The name and address of the applicant who will supervise, manage, or direct the
growing and handling of hemp and the names and addresses of any person or entity partnering or
providing consulting services regarding the growing or handling of hemp; and
(ii) The name and address of the applicant who will supervise, manage, or direct the
distribution or sale of hemp-derived consumable CBD products, and names and addresses of any
person or entity partnering or providing consulting services regarding the distribution or sale of
hemp-derived CBD products.
(2) A certificate of analysis that the seeds or plants obtained for cultivation are of a type
and variety that do not exceed the maximum concentration of delta-9 THC, as set forth in § 2-26-
3; any seeds that are obtained from a federal agency are presumed not to exceed the maximum
concentration and do not require a certificate of analysis.
(3)(i) The location of the facility, including the Global Positioning System location, and
other field reference information as may be required by the department commission with a tracking
program and security layout to ensure that all hemp grown is tracked and monitored from seed to
distribution outlets; and
(ii) The location of the facility and other information as may be required by the department
commission as to where the distribution or sale of hemp-derived consumable CBD products will
occur.
(4) An explanation of the seed-to-sale tracking, cultivation method, extraction method, and
certificate of analysis or certificate of analysis for the standard hemp seeds or hemp product if
required by the department commission.
(5) Verification, prior to planting any seed, that the plant to be grown is of a type and
variety of hemp that will produce a delta-9 THC concentration of no more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis.
(6) Documentation that the licensee and/or its agents have entered into a purchase
agreement with a hemp handler, processor, distributor, or retailer.
(7) All applicants:
(i) Shall apply to the state police, attorney general, or local law enforcement for a National
Criminal Identification records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation. Upon the discovery of a disqualifying conviction defined in subsections
(c)(7)(iv) and (c)(7)(v), and in accordance with the rules promulgated by the department
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -3-)

commission, the state police shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the conviction,
and the state police shall notify the department commission, in writing, without disclosing the
nature of the conviction, that a conviction has been found;
(ii) In those situations in which no conviction has been found, the state police shall inform
the applicant and the department commission, in writing, of this fact;
(iii) All applicants shall be responsible for any expense associated with the criminal
background check with fingerprints.
(iv) Any applicant who has been convicted of any felony offense under chapter 28 of title
21, or any person who has been convicted of murder; manslaughter; first-degree sexual assault;
second-degree sexual assault; first-degree child molestation; second-degree child molestation;
kidnapping; first-degree arson; second-degree arson; mayhem; robbery; burglary; breaking and
entering; assault with a dangerous weapon; or any assault and battery punishable as a felony or
assault with intent to commit any offense punishable as a felony, shall, subject to § 28-5.1-14, be
disqualified from holding any license or permit under this chapter. The department commission
shall notify any applicant, in writing, of a denial of a license pursuant to this subsection.
(v) For purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction
entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty, or plea of guilty, those instances where the
defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received a jail sentence or a suspended jail
sentence, or those instances wherein the defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement
with the Rhode Island attorney general and the period of deferment has not been completed.
(8) Any other information as set forth in rules and regulations as required by the department
commission.
(d) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.]
(e) The department commission shall issue a hemp license to the grower or handler
applicant if he, she, or it meets the requirements of this chapter, upon the applicant paying a
licensure fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The license shall be renewed every
two (2) years upon payment of a two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500) renewal fee. Any
licensee convicted of any disqualifying offense described in subsection (c)(7)(iv) shall, subject to
§ 28-5.1-14, have his, her, or its license revoked. All license fees shall be directed to the department
commission to help defray the cost of enforcement. The department commission shall collect a
nonrefundable application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each application to obtain a
license.
(f) Any grower or handler license applicant or license holder may also apply for and be
issued one (1) CBD distributor and/or one (1) CBD retailer license at no additional cost, provided
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -4-)

their grower or handler license is issued or renewed. CBD distributor and CBD retailer licenses
shall be renewed each year at no additional fee provided the applicant also holds or renews a grower
and/or handler license.
(g) For applicants who do not hold, renew, or receive a grower or handler license, CBD
distributor and CBD retailer licenses shall have a licensure fee of five hundred dollars ($500). The
licenses shall be renewed each year upon approval by the department commission and payment of
a five hundred dollar ($500) renewal fee.
(h) The commission shall have the authority to temporarily suspend hemp applications and
issuance of new hemp licenses for a defined period if the commission determines that such action
is necessary to:
1. Conduct a study or evaluation of market conditions, supply and demand dynamics, or
regulatory impacts;
2. Ensure adequate oversight and compliance with existing licensees; and
3. Address any identified risks to public health, safety, or environmental welfare.
(i) During a suspension period, the commission may continue to process renewal
applications of existing licensees.
2-26-6. Rulemaking authority.
(a) The department commission shall adopt rules to provide for the implementation of this
chapter, which shall include rules to require hemp to be tested during growth for THC levels and
to require inspection of hemp during sowing, growing season, harvest, storage, and processing.
Included in these rules should be a system requiring the licensee to submit crop samples to an
approved testing facility, as determined by the department commission for testing and verification
of compliance with the limits on delta-9 THC concentration.
(b) The department commission shall prescribe rules and regulations for all operational
requirements for licensed growers, handlers, CBD distributors, and retailers, and to ensure
consistency in manufactured products and appropriate packaging, labeling, and placement with
respect to retail sales not inconsistent with law, to carry in effect the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The department commission shall not adopt, under this or any other section, a rule that
would prohibit a person or entity to grow, distribute, or sell hemp based solely on the legal status
of hemp under federal law.
(d) The department commission may adopt rules and regulations based on federal law
provided those rules and regulations are designed to comply with federal guidance and mitigate
federal enforcement against the licenses issued under this chapter.
(e) [Deleted by P.L. 2020, ch. 1, § 2 and P.L. 2020, ch. 2, § 2.]
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -5-)

2-26-7. Licensure.
(a) Except as provided in this section, beginning sixty (60) days after the effective date of
this chapter, the department commission shall accept the application for licensure to cultivate hemp
submitted by the applicant.
(b) A person or entity, licensed by the department commission pursuant to this chapter,
shall allow hemp crops, throughout sowing, year-long growing seasons, harvest storage, and
processing, manufacturing, and retail facilities to be inspected and tested by and at the discretion
of the department commission and as required pursuant to any applicable state or local food
processing and safety regulations, including, but not limited to those, promulgated by the Rhode
Island department of health.
2-26-8. Methods of extraction.
(a) The department commission shall adopt rules regarding permissible methods of
extraction.
(b) No butane method of extraction shall be permitted by the department commission.
2-26-9. Research and educational growth by institutions of higher education.
(a) The department commission is authorized to certify any higher educational institution
in Rhode Island to grow or handle, or assist in growing or handling, industrial hemp for the purpose
of agricultural or academic research where such higher educational institution submits the
following to the department commission:
(1) The location where the higher educational institution intends to grow or cultivate the
industrial hemp;
(2) The higher educational institution’s research plan; and
(3) The name of the employee of the higher educational institution who will supervise the
hemp growth, cultivation, and research.
(b) Growth for purposes of agricultural and educational research by a higher educational
institution shall not be subject to the licensing requirements set forth in § 2-26-5.
(c) The applicant is encouraged to partner with an institution of higher learning within the
state of Rhode Island to develop best practices for growing and handling hemp.
(d) The department commission shall maintain a list of each higher education institution
certified to grow or cultivate industrial hemp under this chapter.
2-26-10. Enforcement of violations of chapter.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the director of the department
chairperson of the commission, or his or her designee, has cause to believe that a violation of any
provision of this chapter or any regulations promulgated hereunder has occurred by a licensee who
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -6-)

or that is under the department's commission's jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, or that any
person or entity is conducting any activities requiring licensure by the department commission
under this chapter or the regulations promulgated hereunder without such licensure, the director
chairperson, or his or her designee, may, in accordance with the requirements of the administrative
procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42:
(1) Revoke or suspend a license;
(2) Levy an administrative penalty in an amount established pursuant to regulations
promulgated by the department commission;
(3) Order the violator to cease and desist such actions;
(4) Require a licensee or person or entity conducting any activities requiring licensure
under this chapter to take such actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter and the
regulations promulgated thereunder; or
(5) Any combination of the above penalties.
(b) If the director of the department chairperson of the commission finds that public health,
safety, or welfare requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in his or her
order, summary suspension of license and/or cease and desist may be ordered pending proceedings
for revocation or other action.
SECTION 2. Sections 5-43-1 and 5-43-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-43 entitled
"Instruction in Jiu-Jitsu or Karate" are hereby repealed.
5-43-1. City and town licensing power.
The city and town councils of the several cities and towns may license schools and other
institutions offering instruction in jiu-jitsu and karate. The fee for this license shall not exceed
twenty-five dollars ($25.00); provided, that nonprofit organizations and governmental agencies
shall be exempt from paying that fee.
5-43-2. Penalty for violations.
Any city or town issuing licenses under this chapter may impose a fine not in excess of
twenty dollars ($20.00) upon anyone convicted of offering instruction in jiu-jitsu or karate without
that license.
SECTION 3. Section 16-32-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-32 entitled "University
of Rhode Island [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-32-2. Board of Trustees established.
(a) There is hereby created a board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island, sometimes
referred to as the “board” or “board of trustees,” which shall be and is constituted a public
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -7-)

corporation, empowered to sue and be sued in its own name; to borrow money; to compromise and
settle claims; to have a seal; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or
convenient to the exercise of its powers; and to exercise all the powers, in addition to those
specifically enumerated in this chapter, usually appertaining to public corporations entrusted with
control of postsecondary educational institutions and functions. Upon its organization, the board
shall be vested with the legal title to all property, real and personal, now owned by and/or under
the control or in the custody of the council on postsecondary education for the use of the university
of Rhode Island, including all its departments, divisions, and branches, sometimes referred to as
the property.
(b) The board is empowered to hold and operate the property in trust for the state; to
acquire, hold, and dispose of the property and other like property as deemed necessary for the
execution of its corporate purposes. The board is made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and
privileges for the university of Rhode Island formerly belonging to the council on postsecondary
education pertaining to postsecondary education and the board of governors for higher education.
(c) The board shall be the employer of record for the university. It shall retain all authority
formerly vested in the council on postsecondary education and the board of education regarding
the employment of faculty and staff at the university of Rhode Island. The board shall appoint the
president of the university and shall review their performance on an annual basis.
(1) The board is empowered to enter into contracts and agreements with the council on
postsecondary education and/or the department of administration related to employee benefits,
including but not limited to retirement benefits, health, dental, vision and life insurance, disability
insurance, workers’ compensation, and tuition waivers to maximize the state’s and university’s
purchasing and investment portfolio and educational opportunities for the benefit of its employees.
(2) The board is empowered to enter into collective bargaining agreements as appropriate
with its employees and all existing collective bargaining agreements in effect when the board is
established pursuant to § 16-32-2.2 shall be transferred from the council on postsecondary
education to the board.
(d) The board shall make rules and regulations for the control and use of all public
properties and highways under its care, and for violations of those rules and regulations; penalties,
up to one hundred dollars ($100) and costs for any one offense, may be imposed by any district
court or police court in the city or town where the violation occurs; and, in general, the board shall
take all actions necessary for the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to, and imposed
upon, the board by the terms of this chapter.
(e) The board shall make rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 to implement
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -8-)

its responsibilities as a public agency for procurement purposes as defined in § 37-2-7(16).
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 37-2-22, small procurements made by the board
and the university shall not exceed an aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for
construction and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for all other purchases, regardless of the source of
funding, and shall be made in accordance with small purchase regulations promulgated by the
board. These thresholds may be increased annually through an amendment to the small purchase
regulations promulgated by the board of trustees, to reflect the annual increase in the federal
Consumer Price Index published by the United States Department of Labor from the date of any
prior adjustment.
(f) The board shall evaluate data on which to base performance of the university as
described in subsection (g) of this section which shall be defined by the president of the university.
These measures may include and incorporate outcomes or goals from multiple, previous years. The
lack of information from previous years, however, will not affect the use of performance-based
measures.
(g) The university of Rhode Island shall have unique measures consistent with its purpose,
role, scope, and mission. The board shall provide faculty and students an opportunity to provide
input on the development of performance measures.
(1) The performance-based measures shall include, but not be limited to, the following
metrics:
(i) The number and percentage, including growth in relation to enrollment and prior years
of bachelor’s degrees awarded to first-time, full-time students within four (4) years and six (6)
years, including summer graduates;
(ii) The number of degrees awarded that are tied to Rhode Island’s high demand, high-
wage employment opportunities consistent with the institution’s mission;
(iii) One metric that applies only to the university, in consultation with the president, which
shall consider faculty, staff, and student input; and
(iv) Any other metrics that are deemed appropriate by the board.
(2) Weight may be assigned to any of the aforementioned metrics to reinforce the mission
of the university, the economic needs of the state, and the socio-economic status of the students.
(h) The board shall hold the university accountable for developing and implementing
transfer pathways for students from the community college of Rhode Island and Rhode Island
college.
(i) The board shall adopt a process requiring every academic program at the university to
accept for credit the advanced placement subject test scores of students who obtain a three (3) or
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -9-)

better in any advanced placement course.
(j) The board shall supervise, coordinate, and/or authorize audits, civil and administrative
investigations, and inspections or oversight reviews, when necessary, relating to expenditure of
state or federal funds, or to any and all university programs and operations, as well as the
procurement of any supplies, services, or construction, by the university. In the course of an audit
or investigation, the board authorized auditor(s) shall review statutes and regulations of the
university and shall determine if the university is in compliance and shall make recommendations
concerning the efficiency of operations, and the effect of such statutes or regulations on internal
controls and the prevention and detection of fraud, waste, and abuse. The board authorized
auditor(s) may recommend policies or procedures that may strengthen internal controls, or assist in
the prevention or detection of fraud, waste, and abuse or mismanagement. Any audits conducted
shall be transmitted to the office of internal audit and program integrity established in chapter 7.1
of title 35.
SECTION 4. Sections 21-28.11-4 and 21-28.11-10.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-
28.11 entitled "The Rhode Island Cannabis Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.11-4. Cannabis control commission.
(a) Establishment of commission. There is hereby established an independent
commission known as the Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission (commission). The purpose
of the commission is to oversee the regulation, licensing and control of adult use and medical
cannabis and upon transfer of powers pursuant to the provisions of § 21-28.11-10.1, to exercise
primary responsibility to oversee the regulation, licensing and control of all cannabis and marijuana
use to include medical marijuana.
(b) Appointment of commissioners. The Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission
shall consist of three (3) voting commissioners as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, the three (3)
voting members of the commission. The speaker of the house shall, within thirty (30) days of the
effective date of this chapter, submit to the governor a list of three (3) individuals that the governor
shall give due consideration in appointing one individual from this list. The governor shall appoint
the other two (2) commissioners without regard to the list submitted by the speaker of the house.
The governor shall designate one of the members to serve as chairperson of the commission. Within
forty (40) days of the effective date of this chapter, the governor shall submit to the senate for
advice and consent the list of three (3) individuals for appointment to the commission along with
the governor’s designation of chairperson.
(2) Prior to appointment to the commission, a background investigation shall be conducted
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -10-)

into the financial stability, integrity and responsibility of each appointee, including the appointee’s
reputation for good character, and honesty. No commissioner or commissioner’s spouse, or child
shall have any interest whatsoever in any entity regulated by the commission.
(c) Commissioner requirements. Each commissioner shall be a resident of the state within
ninety (90) days of appointment, and while serving on the commission, shall not:
(1) Hold, or be a candidate for, federal, state or local elected office;
(2) Hold an appointed office or other employment in a federal, state or local government;
or
(3) Serve as an official in a political party.
(d) Term Limits. Term limits on the initial commissioners shall be as follows: The
appointee chosen after consideration of the list provided to the governor by the speaker of the house
shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and shall be eligible for reappointment in accordance
with this section. Of the appointees chosen by the governor without regard to the list submitted by
the speaker of the house, one shall serve an initial term of two (2) years, and one shall serve an
initial term of one year and both shall be eligible for reappointment in accordance with this section.
(1) Each initial commissioner is eligible for reappointment for one six (6) year term or until
a successor is appointed. Each subsequent commissioner shall serve for a term of six (6) years or
until a successor is appointed. Every person appointed or reappointed to fill a vacancy on the
cannabis control commission shall be appointed in the manner established pursuant to this section.
(2) If a vacancy is created prior to the expiration of any commissioner’s term, said vacancy
shall be filled in the manner established pursuant to this section. Any person appointed to fill said
vacancy shall complete the commissioner’s unexpired term and shall then be eligible for
reappointment for one additional term pursuant to this section.
(e) Compensation. The chairperson of the commission shall devote their full time attention
to the duties of the commission. Upon confirmation, the chairperson shall become a state employee
and shall receive a salary as determined by the governor subject to appropriation by the general
assembly. The remaining commissioners shall not be state employees but shall receive a monthly
stipend as determined by the governor, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, and shall
devote sufficient time and attention to the commission to adequately perform their duties.
(f) Records. The commission shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission
and the chair shall be the custodian and keeper of the records of all books, documents and papers
filed by the commission and of its minute book. The chair shall cause copies to be made of all
minutes and other records and documents of the commission and shall certify that such copies are
true copies and all persons dealing with the commission may rely upon such certification. These
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -11-)

records shall also be subject to the provisions of title 38, “public records.” The chair shall have and
exercise supervision and control over all the affairs of the commission. The chair shall preside at
all hearings at which the chair is present and shall designate a commissioner to act as chair in the
chair’s absence. To promote efficiency in administration, the chair shall make such division or re-
division of the work of the commission among the commissioners, as the chair deems expedient.
(g) Conduct of hearings. The commissioners shall, if so directed by the chair, participate
in the hearing and decision of any matter before the commission.
(1) For purposes of this section, “formal matter”, as so designated by the chair, shall include
all non-procedural matters to include, but not limited to, hearings subject to the provisions of
chapter 35 of title 42 (the “administrative procedures act”) and all decisions relative to the awarding
of a license or to the denial or revocation of licenses. A majority of the commissioners is required
to hear and approve all formal matters.
(2) For purposes of this section, “procedural matters”, as so designated by the chair, include
scheduling, inclusion of agenda items, administrative compliance decisions, ministerial matters,
routine clerical functions, and any other act delegated by the commission to be performed by an
employee of the commission or the cannabis office. Any procedural or administrative matter may
be heard, examined and investigated by a single commissioner or an employee of the commission
or the cannabis office as designated and assigned by the chair, with the concurrence of one other
commissioner. If designated by the commission or the cannabis office, the designated employee
shall make a report in writing relative to the hearing, examination and investigation of every
procedural or administrative matter. For the purposes of hearing, examining and investigating any
procedural or administrative matter, the designated employee shall have all of the powers conferred
upon a commissioner by this section. Any procedural or administrative decision made by a single
commissioner or designated employee may be appealed within ten (10) days of issuance of the
decision for a hearing before the full commission.
(3) The commission may designate a hearing officer to conduct hearings and make
recommendations of decision to the commission in contested cases consistent with chapter 35 of
title 42.
(h) Ethics. The provisions of chapter 14 of title 36, the state code of ethics, shall apply to
the commissioners and to employees operating under the jurisdiction of the commission to include,
but not limited to, personnel of the cannabis office; provided, however, that the commission may
promulgate an internal code of ethics for all members and employees that may be more restrictive
than the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36. A copy of any internal code of ethics adopted or as
amended shall be filed with the state ethics commission. The internal code may include provisions
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -12-)

reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(i) Public body. The cannabis control commission shall be a public body for the purposes
of chapter 46 of title 42 (the “open meetings act”).
(j) Finance. The commission shall, for the purposes of compliance with state finance law,
and subject to appropriation by the general assembly, operate as an independent state agency and
shall be subject to the laws applicable to agencies under the control of the governor; provided,
however, that the chairperson may identify any additional instructions or actions necessary for the
department of administration to manage fiscal operations in the state accounting system and meet
statewide and other governmental accounting and audit standards. The commission shall properly
classify the commission’s operating and capital expenditures, and shall not include any salaries of
employees in the commission’s capital expenditures. Unless otherwise exempted by law, the
commission shall participate in any other available state administrative services including, but not
limited to, the state payroll system, the state retirement system, and state purchases.
(k) Prohibition on discrimination. The commission and all personnel and employees
operating under the jurisdiction of the commission to include, but not limited to, personnel of the
cannabis office, shall not unlawfully discriminate by considering race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, or disability in granting, denying,
or revoking a license, nor shall any person, corporation, or business firm which is licensed pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter unlawfully discriminate against or segregate any person based on
these grounds. All businesses licensed by the commission shall operate on a nondiscriminatory
basis, according to equal employment treatment and access to their services to all persons, unless
otherwise exempted by the laws of the state. Any licensee who fails to comply with this policy is
subject to any disciplinary action that is consistent with the legal authority and rules and regulations
of the commission. The commission shall cooperate with the state equal opportunity office to
prevent any person, corporation, or business firm from unlawfully discriminating because of race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, or
disability or from participating in any practice which may have a disparate effect on any protected
class within the population. The state equal opportunity office shall monitor the equal employment
opportunity activities and affirmative action plans of the commission.
21-28.11-10.1. Transitional period and transfer of authority.
(a) To protect public health and public safety, upon the effective date of this chapter [May
25, 2022] until final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter, there shall exist a transitional period of regulatory and enforcement
authority regarding the production, possession, regulation, distribution, sale, and use of cannabis
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -13-)

relating to the sale by hybrid cannabis retailers of adult use cannabis pursuant to § 21-28.11-10.
(b) During the transitional period, the office of cannabis regulation shall prescribe such
forms, procedures, and requirements as necessary to facilitate the acquisition of hybrid retail and
cultivation licenses by compassion centers and cultivators licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this
title.
(c) Such forms, procedures, and requirements shall be posted on the website of the office
of cannabis regulation no later than October 15, 2022, at which time an application period will
commence. Applications shall be received, reviewed, and approved on a rolling basis provided that
in no case shall an approved hybrid retailer begin adult use sales before December 1, 2022.
(d) The forms, procedures, and requirements prescribed by the office of cannabis regulation
shall incorporate, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Requirements pertaining to the physical premises of hybrid retail licensees. Where
physically possible these shall include prospective licensee plans to physically separate marijuana
and marijuana products designated for adult use and medical sales, respectively, in inventory,
storage, and customer-facing floor and display areas; plans to physically separate sales areas for
adult use and medical sales, which may be provided by a temporary or semi-permanent physical
barrier; plans to provide and maintain a patient consultation area that will allow privacy for
confidential consultation with qualifying patients; and plans to prioritize patient and caregiver
identification verification and physical entry into retail areas in the event of capacity or other
constraints; however, if the premises of a hybrid retail licensee does not allow the licensee to meet
the requirements of this subsection or would cause undue hardship on the licensee, the office of
cannabis regulation may authorize the hybrid retail licensee to conduct adult use sales at an adjunct
location. In authorizing any such adjunct location, the office shall require, at a minimum, the
following:
(i) The adjunct location must be physically located within the same municipality and
geographic zone;
(ii) The adjunct location must comply with all municipal zoning requirements and obtain
municipal approval;
(iii) The approval of any adjunct location will not cause undue hardship upon another
licensed cannabis retailer; and
(iv) In the instance that an adjunct location is approved by the office, the hybrid cannabis
retailer shall not be permitted to engage in the sale of cannabis for adult use at more than one
premises.
(2) Requirements pertaining to inventory, product, and sales tracking. These shall include
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -14-)

prospective licensee submission of plans to electronically separate finished marijuana products
designated for medical or adult use sales in hybrid licensees’ inventory and sales tracking systems.
If prospective hybrid licensees are conducting cultivation activities, they shall submit plans to
distinguish between sales of marijuana or finished marijuana products at wholesale based on
designation for medical or adult use sales.
(3) Requirements relating to the maintenance of medical marijuana program service levels.
These shall include prospective licensee submission of comprehensive policies and procedures
detailing plans to maintain a sufficient quantity and variety of medical marijuana products, and if
substitutions of medical marijuana products with adult use marijuana products are to be made, a
justification for such substitutions. Prospective hybrid licensees shall also be required to designate
an individual who will be primarily responsible for maintenance of medical marijuana program
service levels and ongoing compliance with existing program requirements, rules, and regulations.
(4) Requirements relating to operating plans, policies, and procedures. These shall include
prospective licensee submission, maintenance of, and adherence to a set of written standard
operating procedures that encompass both adult use and medical marijuana service lines. These
operating plans and procedures shall take the form of an updated operations manual as currently
required under medical marijuana program regulations and shall include, but not be limited to,
policies and procedures relating to the maintenance of medical marijuana program service levels
as defined in this section.
(5) Requirements relating to the advertising of cannabis and cannabis products by hybrid
cannabis retailers who have been permitted to sell adult use cannabis and hybrid cannabis
cultivators who have been permitted to cultivate adult use cannabis pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, all prospective and approved
applicants for hybrid cannabis retailer and cannabis cultivator licenses under this chapter shall
maintain compliance with the existing provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title and the regulations
promulgated thereunder until final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, including,
but not limited to, existing restrictions and requirements related to financial disclosures; registration
of owners, managers, key persons, agents, and employees; product testing; packaging and labeling;
transportation; and home delivery.
(f) Forms, procedures, and requirements relating to this transitional period may be amended
by the office of cannabis regulation or the commission up until the final issuance of the
commission’s regulations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter at which time the forms,
procedures, and requirements will be superseded by the commission’s final rules and regulations.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -15-)

(g) Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, the following shall
occur:
(1) All powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department of business regulation and the
office of cannabis regulation with respect to the regulation, administration, and enforcement of the
provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title and chapter 26 of title 2 shall be transferred to the commission
or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office.
(2) All powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department of environmental
management with respect to regulation, administration, and enforcement of chapter 28.6 of this title
shall be transferred to the commission or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office.
(3) All powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department of health with respect to
regulation, administration, and enforcement of chapter 28.6 of this title shall be transferred to the
commission or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office, except for the following:
(i) Administration of registry identification cards to qualified patients; and
(ii) Powers delegated to the department pursuant to this chapter or by rules and regulations
of the commission.
(4) There shall be established a “cannabis office” with the powers, duties, and
responsibilities authorized pursuant to § 21-28.11-18.1.
(5) All powers exercised by state agencies, departments, and offices pursuant to the
provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section relating to transitional period authority shall
cease.
(h) Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, whenever the term
“office of cannabis regulation” appears in any general law or regulation, the term shall mean the
“cannabis office” as defined in this chapter.
SECTION 5. Section 28-30-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-30 entitled "Workers’
Compensation Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-30-18. Additional benefits payable to retired judges and their surviving spouses or
domestic partners.
(a) All judges of the workers’ compensation court, or their surviving spouses or domestic
partners, who retire after January 1, 1970, and who receive a retirement allowance pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall, on the first day of January next following the third anniversary date
of their retirement, receive a cost-of-living retirement adjustment in addition to his or her retirement
allowance in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each
succeeding subsequent year during the month of January the retirement allowance shall be
increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original allowance, compounded annually from
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -16-)

the year the cost-of-living adjustment was first payable to be continued during the lifetime of that
judge or his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner. For the purpose of that computation, credit
shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance.
(b) Any judge who retired prior to January 31, 1980, shall be deemed for the purpose of
this section to have retired on January 1, 1980.
(c) For judges not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage
of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost-of-living adjustment described in subsection (a)
above shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance,
indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or
when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar
($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for
all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics
determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less.
The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be
multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of
September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less on the month
following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For judges eligible to retire as of September
30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this
subsection (c) shall not apply.
(d) This subsection (d) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.
(1) Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to subsection (d)(2)
below, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving
any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on
behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31, 1989, as a noncontributory justice or
engaged after December 31, 1989, as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided
in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal
to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”)
from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day
of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not
to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser
of the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of
retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually
in the same percentage as determined under (d)(1)(A) above. The “five-year average investment
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -17-)

return” shall mean the average of the investment return of the most recent five (5) plan years as
determined by the retirement board. Subject to subsection (d)(2) below, the benefit adjustment
provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of
retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return
for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or
downward in the same amount.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (d)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for
any plan year shall be suspended in their entirely unless the funded ratio of the employees’
retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police
retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty
percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan
year.
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (d)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five
(5) plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection
(d)(1) above until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this subsection
(d) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or
prior to June 30, 2012.
(e) This subsection (e) shall become effective July 1, 2015.
(1)(i) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this
subsection (e)(1)(i), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to justices and/or beneficiaries
of justices who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%) of the lesser
of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of
the justice’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without
regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.
(ii) Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former justices,
active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -18-)

or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to
December 31, 1989, as a noncontributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989, as a
contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section
for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (e)(2) below, shall be equal
to (A) multiplied by (B):
(A) Shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (I) plus fifty percent (50%) of (II) where:
(I) Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
(the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns
of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the
retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or
downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.
(II) Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of
Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year. In no event shall the sum
of (I) plus (II) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).
(B) Is equal to the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five
thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be
indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (e)(1)(ii)(A) above.
The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (e)(1)(ii) shall be provided to all
retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect,
and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the
date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (e)(3), the benefit adjustments under subsection
(e)(1)(ii) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state
police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds
eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for
such plan year. Effective July 1, 2024, the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of
Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust,
calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) for the
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -19-)

benefit adjustment to be reinstated for all members for such plan year shall be replaced with
seventy-five percent (75%).
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (e)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (e)(2), in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four
plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection
(e)(1)(ii) above; and (ii) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or
before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (e)(1)(ii)(B) of twenty-five thousand eight
hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six
dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the
judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the
system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%). Effective July 1, 2024, the
funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits
trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an
aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) shall be replaced with seventy-five percent
(75%).
(4) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before
July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60)
days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time
stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends
shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable
payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of
this section.
SECTION 6. Section 28-42-51 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-42 entitled
"Employment Security — General Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-42-51. Additional functions and duties of director of administration.
In addition to and/or in lieu of the sections enumerated in § 28-42-50, the director of
administration shall perform, at the department of labor and training, in the manner and to the extent
that the director may prescribe, the following functions and duties:
(1) Establish and maintain a current system of internal financial controls and checks
necessary to insure the proper handling of accounts in connection with the employment security
fund and the employment security administration account created by this chapter, by conducting a
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -20-)

continuous pre-audit or a continuous post-audit or by conducting a combination of both (pre-audit
or post-audit). The cost of these post-audit activities by the office of internal audit and program
integrity in the department of administration shall be reimbursed in full by the department;
(2) Establish and maintain any methods, procedures, and systems of accounting that may
be deemed necessary; those records and accounts to be considered, for all purposes, the official
records of the state and department;
(3) Prepare and furnish financial and any other reports that may be required; and
(4) Perform any other related functions and duties that may be required by chapters 42 —
44 of this title.
SECTION 7. Section 35-1.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-1.1 entitled "Office of
Management and Budget" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-1.1-4. Offices and functions assigned to the office of management and budget —
Powers and duties.
(a) The offices assigned to the office of management and budget include the budget office,
the office of regulatory reform, the performance management office, and the office of internal audit
and program integrity.
(b) The offices assigned to the office of management and budget shall:
(1) Exercise their respective powers and duties in accordance with their statutory authority
and the general policy established by the governor or by the director acting on behalf of the
governor or in accordance with the powers and authorities conferred upon the director by this
chapter;
(2) Provide such assistance or resources as may be requested or required by the governor
and/or the director;
(3) Provide such records and information as may be requested or required by the governor
and/or the director, to the extent allowed under the provisions of any applicable general or public
law, regulation, or agreement relating to the confidentiality, privacy, or disclosure of such records
or information; and
(c) Except as provided herein, no provision of this chapter or application thereof shall be
construed to limit or otherwise restrict the budget officer from fulfilling any statutory requirement
or complying with any valid rule or regulation.
(d) The office of management and budget shall monitor the status of federal grants and
identify any impacts of federal funding rescission. In the event of federal funding termination,
agencies must provide the reported reason for termination, the types of activities funded by the
awards, and the number of full-time equivalent positions assigned to the awards to the office.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -21-)

(1) The office of management and budget, may coordinate with the governor's office, the
department of administration's division of purchases, the division of human resources, and the
office of accounts and control, to develop options for administrative action or general assembly
consideration that may be needed to address any federal funding changes.
(2) As soon as practicable after enactment of the federal budget for fiscal year 2026, but
no later than October 31, 2025, the office shall forward a report to the governor, speaker of the
house and president of the senate containing the findings, recommendations, and options to become
compliant with federal changes prior to the governor's budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-7.
SECTION 8. Section 35-3-24.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-3 entitled "State
Budget" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-3-24.1. Program performance measurement.
(a) Beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, the governor shall submit, as part
of each budget submitted to the general assembly pursuant to § 35-3-7, performance objectives for
each program in the budget for the ensuing fiscal year, estimated performance data for the fiscal
year in which the budget is submitted, and actual performance data for the preceding two (2)
completed fiscal years. Performance data shall include efforts at achieving equal opportunity hiring
goals as defined in the department’s annual affirmative action plan. The governor shall, in addition,
recommend appropriate standards against which to measure program performance. Performance in
prior years may be used as a standard where appropriate. These performance standards shall be
stated in terms of results obtained.
(b) The governor may submit, in lieu of any part of the information required to be submitted
pursuant to subsection (a), an explanation of why the information cannot as a practical matter be
submitted.
(c)(1) The office of management and budget shall be responsible for managing and
collecting program performance measures on behalf of the governor. The office is authorized to
conduct performance reviews and audits of agencies to determine the manner and extent to which
executive branch agencies achieve intended objectives and outcomes.
(2) In order to collect performance measures from agencies, review performance, and
provide recommendations, the office of budget and management is authorized to coordinate with
the office of internal audit and program integrity regarding the findings and recommendations that
result from audits conducted by the office.
(3) In order to facilitate the office of management and budget’s performance reviews,
agencies must generate and provide timely access to records, reports, analyses, audits, reviews,
documents, papers, recommendations, contractual deliverables, or other materials available relating
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -22-)

to agency programs and operations.
(4) In order to ensure alignment of executive branch agency operations with the state’s
priorities, the office of management and budget may produce, with all necessary cooperation from
executive branch agencies, analyses and recommendations to improve program performance,
conduct evidence-based budgeting, and respond to sudden shifts in policy environments.
(5) In order to gain insight into performance or outcomes and inform policymaking and
program evaluation, the office of management and budget may lead, manage, and/or coordinate
interagency and cross-system collaboration or integration initiatives.
SECTION 9. Section 35-7-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-7 entitled "Post Audit of
Accounts" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-7-15. Audit of information security systems.
(a) The general assembly recognizes that the security of government computer systems is
essential to ensuring the stability and integrity of vital information gathered and stored by the
government for the benefit of the citizenry and the breach of security over computer systems
presents a risk to the health, safety, and welfare of the public. It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure that government computer systems and information residing on these systems are protected
from unauthorized access, compromise, sabotage, hacking, viruses, destruction, illegal use, cyber
attack, or any other act that might jeopardize or harm the computer systems and the information
stored on them.
(b) In conjunction with the powers and duties outlined in this chapter, the office of internal
audit and program integrity may conduct reviews and assessments of the various government
computer systems and the security systems established to safeguard these computer systems.
Computer systems subject to this section shall include systems that pertain to federal, state, or local
programs, and quasi-governmental bodies, and the computer systems of any entity or program that
is subject to audit by the office of internal audit and program integrity. The office of internal audit’s
audit and program integrity's review may include an assessment of system vulnerability, network
penetration, potential security breaches, and susceptibility to cyber attack and cyber fraud.
(c) The office of internal audit’s audit and program integrity's findings shall be deemed
public records and available for public inspection; provided, however, in the event the review
indicates a computer system is vulnerable, or security over the system is otherwise deficient,
reasonably segregable portions of the findings shall be subject to public inspection after the
redaction of any information, the disclosure of which, would endanger the security of the system
or reveal the specific nature of the vulnerabilities found. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the work papers developed in connection with the review of computer systems
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -23-)

and the security over those systems authorized by this section shall not be deemed public records
and are not subject to disclosure.
(d) In order to maintain the integrity of the computer system, the office of internal audit
and program integrity may procure the services of specialists in information security systems or
other contractors deemed necessary in conducting reviews under this section, and in procuring
those services shall be exempt from the requirements of the state purchasing law or regulation.
(e) Any outside contractor or vendor hired to provide services in the review of the security
of a computer system shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of this section.
SECTION 10. The title of Chapter 35-7.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Office of
Internal Audit" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 35-7.1
The Office of Internal Audit
CHAPTER 35-7.1
THE OFFICE OF INTERNAL AUDIT AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY
SECTION 11. Sections 35-7.1-1, 35-7.1-2, 35-7.1-3, 35-7.1-4, 35-7.1-6, 35-7.1-8 and 35-
7.1-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-7.1 entitled "The Office of Internal Audit" are hereby
amended to read as follows:
35-7.1-1. Establishment of office of internal audit.
(a) There is hereby established within the office of management and budget an office of
internal audit and program integrity. Within the office of internal audit and program integrity, there
shall be a chief, appointed by the director of administration, who shall be the administrative head
of the office. The person so selected to be the chief shall be selected without regard to political
affiliation and with a demonstrated ability in the following areas: accounting, auditing, financial
analysis, investigation, management analysis, and public administration. The office of internal
audit and program integrity will report to the office of management and budget director. Any
reference in general law to the “bureau of audits” or "office of internal audit" shall mean the office
of internal audit and program integrity.
(b) The purpose of the office is to prevent and detect fraud, waste, abuse, and
mismanagement in the expenditure of public funds including:
(1) All state programs and operations;
(2) The procurement of any supplies, services, or construction by state agencies, bureaus,
divisions, sections, departments, offices, commissions, institutions, and activities of the state; and
(3) The procurement or expenditure of public funds by organizations or individuals.
(b)(c) The chief of the office of internal audit and program integrity shall not hold, or be a
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -24-)

candidate for, any elective or any other appointed public office while a chief. No current chief shall
hold a position in any political party or political committee, or, aside from voting, actively engage
in the political campaign of any candidate for public office that may cause a real or perceived
conflict of interest, or participate as a board member of any entity that receives state or federal
funding.
(c)(d) No employee of the office of internal audit and program integrity shall hold, or be a
candidate for, any elective public office while an employee, nor shall he/she hold a position in any
political party or political committee or, aside from voting, actively engage in a political campaign
of any candidate for public office that may cause a real or perceived conflict of interest, or
participate as a board member of any not for profit entity that receives state or federal funding.
(d)(e) Purposes and scope. The office of internal audit and program integrity is authorized
to conduct audits of any state department, state agency, or private entity that is a recipient of state
funding or state grants. In addition, the office of internal audit and program integrity is authorized,
but not limited to, evaluating the efficiency of operations and internal controls, preventing and
detecting fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement in the expenditure of public funds, whether
federal, state, or local, that are related to any and all state programs and operations as well as the
procurement of any goods, services, or construction, by public bodies. As deemed necessary or
expedient by the office of internal audit and program integrity, audits may be made relative to the
financial affairs or the economy and efficiency of management of each department, agency or
public body. The office of internal audit and program integrity shall determine which such audits
shall be performed in accordance with a risk-based evaluation.
(e)(f) “Public body” or “public bodies” under this chapter shall mean state agencies,
bureaus, divisions, departments, offices, commissions, boards, institutions, including the public
institutions of higher education, districts, authorities, quasi-agencies, or political subdivisions
created by the general assembly, or the governor. “Public body” shall also include any city and
town within the state of Rhode Island but municipal audits under this chapter shall only cover the
expenditure of state or federal funds distributed by the state. Audits and investigations of public
bodies may include the expenditures by nongovernmental agencies of federal, state, and local
public funds.
35-7.1-2. Duties.
(a) The chief of internal audit and program integrity shall supervise, coordinate, and/or
conduct audits, civil and administrative investigations, and inspections or oversight reviews, when
necessary, relating to expenditure of state or federal funds, or to any and all state programs and
operations, as well as the procurement of any supplies, services, or construction, by public bodies.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -25-)

In the course of an audit or investigation, the office of internal audit and program integrity shall
review statutes and regulations of the public body and shall determine if such a public body is in
compliance and shall make recommendations concerning the efficiency of operations, and the
effect of such statutes or regulations on internal controls and the prevention and detection of fraud,
waste and abuse. The chief of internal audit and program integrity may recommend policies or
procedures that may strengthen internal controls, or assist in the prevention or detection of fraud,
waste, and abuse or mismanagement.
(b) The person, or persons, with legal authority for any public body may request the
assistance of the office of internal audit and program integrity. Any such request must include the
scope of services requested and the work to be performed. In such events, the chief, with the
approval of the director of management and budget, may assign personnel to conduct, supervise,
or coordinate such activity as deemed necessary and appropriate to perform his/her duties in a
diligent and prudent manner. The expenses for any such assistance requested by the public body
shall be reimbursed by the public body to the office of internal audit and program integrity. The
chief may recommend policies for the conduct, supervision, or coordination of the relationship,
between state and other state, local governmental agencies as well as federal governmental agencies
and nongovernmental entities with respect to all matters relating to the prevention and detection of
fraud, waste, abuse or mismanagement in or relating to any and all programs and activities of the
state of Rhode Island.
(c) When it is determined by the office of internal audit that an audit and program integrity
is necessary because there is sufficient evidence to believe that there may have been fiscal
impropriety, wrongdoing, or fiscal mismanagement by any agent, employee, board member, or
commissioner of any public body, the office of internal audit and program integrity may conduct a
forensic examination of such entity. All costs associated with the forensic examination shall be
paid, as deemed appropriate, either by the examined entity or by an appropriation by the general
assembly. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to, the following expenses:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) of the total salaries and benefits paid to the examining
personnel of the office of internal audit and program integrity engaged in those examinations;
(2) All costs associated with the procurement of a forensic consultant;
(3) All costs associated with a consultant that provides expertise pertinent to the examinee’s
operations;
(4) All reasonable administrative and technology costs related to the forensic examination
process. Technology costs shall include the actual cost of software and hardware utilized in the
examination process and the cost of training examination personnel in the proper use of the software
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -26-)

and hardware.
(d) The chief of internal audit and program integrity, or their designee, may investigate
reports of any person who, either prior to, or at the time of, or subsequent to the application for
public assistance:
(1) Willfully makes a false statement or misrepresentation;
(2) Impersonates someone else;
(3) Willfully fails to disclose a material fact regarding eligibility or other fraudulent means;
or
(4) Secures, aids, or abets, or attempts to secure, aid, or abet, others in securing public
assistance (including Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) or Medicaid) through
fraudulent actions.
(e) The chief of internal audit and program integrity, or their designee, is authorized to:
(1) Coordinate, conduct, and/or support investigations aimed at preventing and detecting,
fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanagement in public assistance programs;
(2) Coordinate and support state and local efforts to investigate and eliminate fraud in
public assistance programs;
(3) Work to recover both state and federal funds related to fraudulent activities.
(f) In the course of these investigations, the office of internal audit and program integrity
shall collaborate with local law enforcement agencies, the Rhode Island department of human
services, the Rhode Island state police, the Rhode Island attorney general, or other local, state, and
federal entities as needed to complete the investigations.
(g) The office shall identify methods to implement innovative technology and data sharing
in order to detect, analyze, and prevent fraud, waste, and abuse.
35-7.1-3. Investigations or management advisory and consulting services upon
request of governor or general assembly.
The office of internal audit and program integrity may, upon the written request of the
governor or of the general assembly, conduct audits, provide management advisory and consulting
services, or conduct investigations relative to the financial affairs or the economy and efficiency of
management, or both, of any public bodies as defined in § 35-7.1-1(e). The office of internal audit
and program integrity may, from time to time, make such investigations and additional reports to
the governor, the director of the department of administration, the director of the office of
management and budget, and the general assembly as deemed necessary or advisable.
35-7.1-4. Management advisory and consulting services provided to public bodies.
When requested in writing by a public body to the chief, the office of internal audit and
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -27-)

program integrity may provide management advisory or consulting services to the public body.
Any such request must include the scope of services requested and a schedule for the work to be
performed.
35-7.1-6. Inspection of records and papers — Investigations Inspection of records,
papers, and witness testimony -- Investigations and subpoenas.
(a) The chief, in carrying out the duties outlined in this chapter, shall have access to all
records, reports, audits, reviews, papers, books, documents, recommendations, correspondence,
including information relative to the purchase of goods or services or anticipated purchase of goods
or services, from any agent, contractor, or vendor by any public body, as defined in § 35-7.1-1(e),
and any other data and material that is maintained by or available to any public body regardless of
the media in which it is maintained which is in any way related to the programs and operations with
respect to public bodies.
(b) The chief may request information and records, cooperation, and assistance from any
state, or local governmental agency as may be necessary for carrying out his/her duties and
responsibilities. Upon receipt of such request, each person in charge of the public body shall furnish
to the chief, or his/her authorized agent or representative, such information and records, cooperation
and assistance, including information relative to the purchase of goods or services or anticipated
purchase of goods or services from any contractor or vendor by any public body, within ten (10)
business days of receipt of the chief’s request. If the public body is unable to comply with the
request for records and/or information within (10) business days, the public body must notify the
chief, prior to the expiration of the ten (10) business days, in writing as to the reason, or reasons,
why the request cannot be fulfilled within this time and whether additional time is necessary.
(c) The chief may initiate and conduct audits, investigations, and compliance reviews and
shall prepare detailed findings, conclusions, and recommendations concerning the administration
of programs or operations, and internal controls over processes of public bodies.
(d) The chief shall have direct and prompt access to any public body, its agents, officers,
and employees when necessary for any purpose pertaining to the performance of his/her duties and
responsibilities under this chapter.
(e) In furtherance of carrying out any of the duties of this chapter, the chief may request,
with the written approval of the director of the department of administration and through an
administrative subpoena, the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books,
records, and other evidence relevant to an active fraud investigation as described in this chapter.
The subpoena shall specify the time, date, and place where the witness is to respond. Within twenty
(20) days after the service of the subpoena or at any time before the return date specified in the
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -28-)

subpoena, whichever period is shorter, the person served may file in a state superior court and serve
upon the unit and the attorney general a civil petition for an order of the court modifying or setting
aside the subpoena. The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner is seeking
relief. If a person neglects or refuses to comply with any request to provide testimony or produce
books, records, and other evidence relevant to an investigation, the office of internal audit and
program integrity or the attorney general may petition the superior court for an order compelling
the person to answer the request. Books, records, and other evidence obtained through an
administrative subpoena that are not used in a court proceeding shall be destroyed as soon as
practicable.
35-7.1-8. Reports to the state police.
In carrying out his/her duties and responsibilities, the chief shall report to the Rhode Island
state police whenever the chief has reasonable grounds to believe there has been a violation of
federal or state criminal law. The chief shall also refer findings to the state ethics commission, or
to any other federal, state, or local agency with an interest in said findings, in the discretion of the
chief. Any referrals made under this section shall not be made public by the office of internal audit
and program integrity.
35-7.1-10. Annual and interim reports Audit and Annual reports.
(a) The office of internal audit and program integrity shall prepare an annual report
summarizing the activities of the office of internal audit and program integrity for the prior fiscal
year. The office of internal audit and program integrity may also prepare interim performance
reports. These reports shall be presented to the director of management and budget. The annual
reports shall be posted on the office’s website.
(b) The annual report shall include, but not be limited to: a general description of significant
problems in the areas of efficiencies, internal controls, fraud, waste, and abuse within programs
and operations within the jurisdiction of the office; a general description of the recommendations
for corrective actions made by the office during the reporting period with respect to significant
deficiencies in the areas of efficiencies, internal controls, fraud, waste, and abuse; the identification
of each significant recommendation described in previous annual reports on which corrective action
has not been completed; a summary of matters referred to prosecuting authorities; a summary of
any matters concerning the recovery of monies as a result of an audit finding or civil suit or a
referral to another agency for the purposes of such suit; a list of all audit reports completed by the
office during the reporting period; and a statement of recommendations of amendment to this
chapter or the rules, regulations, or procedures governing the office of internal audit and program
integrity that would improve the effectiveness or the operations of the office.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -29-)

(c) The annual report of the office of internal audit and program integrity shall be made
public on the day of filing.
(d) At the conclusion of each formal audit, the office of internal audit and program integrity
shall produce an audit report which contains, but is not limited to, the scope of the audit, findings,
and recommendations. Within twenty (20) calendar days following the date of the issuance of the
management-response copy of the draft audit report, the head of the department, agency, public
body, or private entity audited shall respond, in writing, to each recommendation made in the audit
report. This response shall address the department’s, agency’s, or public body’s or private entity’s
plan of corrective action, the party responsible to implement the corrective action plan, and the
anticipated date to complete the implementation of the corrective action; and, if applicable, the
reasons for disagreement with any recommendation proposed in the audit report and justification
of management’s acceptance of risk. The office of internal audit and program integrity may perform
follow-up procedures for the purpose of determining whether the department, agency, public body,
or private entity has implemented, in an efficient and effective manner, its plan of correction action
for the recommendations proposed in the audit report or addressed the risk discussed in the audit
report.
(e) Copies of each audit report, inclusive of management’s responses noted in subsection
(d) shall be submitted to the chairpersons of the house finance committee, and the senate finance
committee and posted on the office’s website.
SECTION 12. Chapter 35-7.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Office of Internal Audit"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
35-7.1-11. Civil actions.
The chief of the office of internal audit and program integrity shall have the authority to
initiate civil recovery actions. In any case where the office of internal audit and program integrity
has discovered fraudulent acts and believes that civil recovery proceedings may be appropriate, the
chief may authorize the initiation of appropriate civil proceedings or refer the case to the
appropriate state agency for civil recovery.
SECTION 13. Section 35-18-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-18 entitled "Public
Corporation Debt Management" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-18-4. Procedure.
(a) A financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation shall be deemed to have been
approved by the general assembly when the general assembly passes a concurrent joint resolution
of approval regarding the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation which the governor
or a public corporation, as the case may be, requests that the financing lease, guarantee, bond, or
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -30-)

other obligation be approved by the general assembly. These requests shall be transmitted to the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective
finance committees and fiscal advisors. The request for approval shall include:
(1) A full description of the essential public facility to which the financing lease, guarantee,
bond, or other obligation is related;
(2) An explanation as to why the facility is needed and how it will be paid off; and
(3) The maximum possible obligation of the state or of any public corporation under the
financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation.
(b) The governor shall provide the general assembly with a timely explanation of any
certification made by him or her pursuant to this chapter in connection with any financing lease,
guarantee, bond, or other obligation. These explanations shall be transmitted to the speaker of the
house and the president of the senate with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance
committees and fiscal advisors. The explanation shall also include:
(1) A full description of the essential public facility to which the financing lease, guarantee,
bond, or other obligation is related;
(2) An explanation as to why the facility is needed and how it will be paid off; and
(3) The maximum possible obligation of the state or of any public corporation under the
financing lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation.
(c) The state shall not enter into any financing lease or guarantee relating to, nor shall any
public corporation issue any bond or other obligation in connection with, any essential public
facility unless the facility conforms to the description included in the request for approval or in the
explanation for certification submitted by the governor in connection with the financing lease,
guarantee, bond, or other obligation; nor shall the state’s obligation in connection with the financing
lease, guarantee, bond, or other obligation exceed the amount set forth in the request for approval
or explanation of certification.
(d) Immediately following the first sale of each issue of bonds in connection with the
financing of an economic development project, the governor shall provide the general assembly
with copies of any offering statement for those bonds and his or her analysis of the benefits and
risks to the state of the project. These statements and analyses shall be transmitted to the speaker
of the house and the president of the senate, with copies to the chairpersons of the respective finance
committees and fiscal advisors.
SECTION 14. Chapter 36-4 of the General Laws entitled "Merit System" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
36-4-15.1. Specialized information technology positions in state service.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -31-)

(a) For purposes of this section, "specialized information technology position" means a
technical or specialized job classification in state service under the supervision of the division of
enterprise technology strategy and services (“ETSS”), within the department of administration.
Such positions may include information technology leadership roles (i.e., chief information officer,
chief technology officer, chief information security officer, etc.) and any other information
technology positions which are supervisory, confidential, or managerial as defined by chapter 7 of
title 28 and the rules and regulations of the Rhode Island state labor relations board. There shall be
no more than fifteen (15) specialized information technology positions employed by the state in
any fiscal year.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law or regulation to the
contrary, including the personnel rules adopted pursuant to § 36-4-8, the personnel administrator,
in their sole discretion, may modify, change or amend any official pay plan for employees in the
classified or unclassified service in order to create new job classifications, and/or modify the title,
content or pay grade of an existing job classification, for any new or existing specialized
information technology positions as defined above. All information technology job specifications
and corresponding pay grades, shall be reviewed annually to maintain accuracy and fluency with
emerging technologies, operating systems, and/or applications.
(c) The personnel administrator is hereby authorized to take whatever administrative action
is necessary to implement the changes to the official pay plans for specialized information
technology positions, as defined in this section, without conducting a public hearing or obtaining
the approval of the Governor prior to the implementation of any such action.
(d) Within thirty (30) days after any personnel action under this section, the personnel
administrator shall file a written report with the governor, the speaker of the house, the senate
president, and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees. This report shall
include:
(1) The title and paygrade of the position(s);
(2) The job description of the position(s); and
(3) The reason why the position(s) is/are necessary. The personnel administrator shall also
post the report on the division of human resources’ website for at least one year.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any specialized information technology
position utilized by ETSS that is part of a collective bargaining unit established and certified by the
Rhode Island state labor relations board or which are eligible to be accreted into an existing
collective bargaining unit pursuant to chapter 7 of title 28 and the rules or regulations of the Rhode
Island state labor relations board.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -32-)

(f) Except as authorized by chapter 7 of title 28 and the rules or regulations of the Rhode
Island state labor relations board, nothing shall permit the conversion of any/all information
technology positions in the classified, unclassified, or non-classified, covered by a collective
bargaining unit to any/all specialized information technology position utilized by ETSS.
(g) The authorization granted 36-4-15.1 to the personnel administrator to convert any/all
information technology positions to specialized information technology positions shall sunset on
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 15. Section 37-2-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-2 entitled "State
Purchases" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-2-12. Centralization of the procurement authority.
(a) All rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies,
services, and construction, and the management, control, warehousing, sale, and disposal of
supplies, services, and construction now vested in or exercised by any state agency under the
several statutes relating thereto are hereby transferred to the chief purchasing officer as provided
in this chapter, subject to the provisions of § 37-2-54. A public agency does not have to utilize the
centralized purchasing of the state but the public agency, through its existing internal purchasing
function, shall adhere to the general principles, policies and practices set forth in this chapter.
(b) The chief purchasing officer, as defined in § 37-2-7(3)(i), may establish, charge, and
collect from state contractors, listed on master-price agreements, an statewide contract
administrative fee not to exceed one-third of one percent (0.331%) of the total value of the annual
spend against a contract awarded to a state contractor. All statewide contract administrative fees
collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a restricted-receipt account within the
general fund designated as the “division of purchases administrative-fee account” and shall be used
for the purposes of implementing, maintaining, or operating technology for the submission and
processing of bids, online vendor registration, bid notification, and other costs related to state
procurement including staffing. On or before January 15, 2019, and annually thereafter on or before
January 15, the chief purchasing officer or designee shall file a report with the governor, the speaker
of the house, and the president of the senate detailing:
(i) The total amount of funds collected and deposited into the division of purchases
administrative-fee account for the most recently completed fiscal year;
(ii) The account balance as of the date of the report;
(iii) An itemization of all expenditures and other uses of said funds from said account for
the most recently completed fiscal year; and
(iv) An annual evaluation as to the appropriateness of the amount of the contract
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -33-)

administrative fee on master-price agreements.
(c) Subject to the approval of the director of the department of administration, the state
controller is authorized to offset any currently recorded outstanding liability on the part of
developmental disability organizations (DDOs) to repay previously authorized startup capital
advances against the proceeds from the sale of group homes within a fiscal year prior to any sale
proceeds being deposited into the information technology restricted receipt account established
pursuant to § 42-11-2.5(a).
SECTION 16. Section 42-7-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7 entitled "Executive
Department" is hereby repealed.
42-7-8. American Recovery and Reinvestment Act administration expenses.
(a) There is hereby created restricted receipt accounts, within the office of the governor,
for the office of economic recovery and reinvestment, and within the department of administration
for the office of internal audit and the division of purchasing, to be known as ARRA administrative
expense accounts. Payments from the accounts shall be limited to expenses for administrative
oversight of American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA) funds. The governor’s office of
economic recovery and reinvestment is authorized by OMB memorandum 09-18 to receive up to
one-half percent (0.5%) of stimulus funding to cover oversight expenses.
(b) All amounts deposited in the ARRA administration accounts shall be exempt from the
indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
(c) It is hereby provided, at the end of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act
oversight period, balances from the ARRA administrative accounts shall revert to general revenues.
SECTION 17. Section 42-11-2.9 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-11 entitled
"Department of Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-11-2.9. Division of capital asset management and maintenance established.
(a) Establishment. Within the department of administration there shall be established the
division of capital asset management and maintenance (“DCAMM”). Any prior references to the
division of facilities management and/or capital projects, if any, shall now mean DCAMM. Within
the DCAMM there shall be a director of DCAMM who shall be in the classified service and shall
be appointed by the director of administration. The director of DCAMM shall have the following
responsibilities:
(1) Oversee, coordinate, and manage the operating budget, personnel, and functions of
DCAMM in carrying out the duties described below;
(2) Review agency capital-budget requests to ensure that the request is consistent with
strategic and master facility plans for the state of Rhode Island;
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -34-)

(3) Promulgate and adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of DCAMM shall be to manage and maintain state property and
state-owned facilities in a manner that meets the highest standards of health, safety, security,
accessibility, energy efficiency, and comfort for citizens and state employees and ensures
appropriate and timely investments are made for state property and facility maintenance.
(c) Duties and responsibilities of DCAMM. DCAMM shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:
(1) To oversee all new construction and rehabilitation projects on state property, not
including property otherwise assigned outside of the executive department by Rhode Island general
laws or under the control and supervision of the judicial branch;
(2) To assist the department of administration in fulfilling any and all capital-asset and
maintenance-related statutory duties assigned to the department under chapter 8 of title 37 (public
buildings) or any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, the following statutory duties
provided in § 42-11-2:
(i) To maintain, equip, and keep in repair the statehouse, state office buildings, and other
premises, owned or rented by the state, for the use of any department or agency, excepting those
buildings, the control of which is vested by law in some other agency;
(ii) To provide for the periodic inspection, appraisal, or inventory of all state buildings and
property, real and personal;
(iii) To require reports from state agencies on the buildings and property in their custody;
(iv) To issue regulations to govern the protection and custody of the property of the state;
(v) To assign office and storage space, and to rent and lease land and buildings, for the use
of the several state departments and agencies in the manner provided by law;
(vi) To control and supervise the acquisition, operation, maintenance, repair, and
replacement of state-owned motor vehicles by state agencies;
(3) To generally manage, oversee, protect, and care for the state’s properties and facilities,
not otherwise assigned by Rhode Island general laws, including, but not limited to, the following
duties:
(i) Space management, procurement, usage, and/or leasing of private or public space;
(ii) Care, maintenance, cleaning, and contracting for such services as necessary for state
property;
(iii) Capital equipment replacement;
(iv) Security of state property and facilities unless otherwise provided by law;
(v) Ensuring Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) compliance;
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -35-)

(vi) Responding to facilities emergencies;
(vii) Managing traffic flow on state property;
(viii) Grounds keeping/landscaping/snow-removal services;
(ix) Maintenance and protection of artwork and historic artifacts;
(x) On or before August 31, 2022, and each April 1 thereafter to submit to the division of
municipal finance a comprehensive list of all real property owned by the state as of the preceding
December 31 to facilitate the purposes of § 45-13-5.1. The comprehensive list and all other
information provided shall be in a format prescribed by the division of municipal finance. The
division of municipal finance shall subsequently provide to DCAMM a certified list of all
properties eligible under § 45-13-5.1 for identification in the statewide database established under
subsection (d) of this section. Any changes to the comprehensive list of all real property owned by
the state after the list has been supplied to the division of municipal finance shall require notification
to the division of municipal finance within thirty (30) days;
(4) To manage and oversee state fleet operations.
(d)(1) All state agencies shall participate in a statewide database and/or information system
for capital assets, that shall be established and maintained by DCAMM.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2023, all state agencies, departments, boards, commissions,
corporations, authorities, quasi-state agencies, councils, or other political subdivisions that utilize
real property shall provide DCAMM any information, documentary and otherwise, that may be
necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of subsection (c)(3)(x) of this section by March 1
annually, or subsection (d)(1) of this section as required by DCAMM. The administrative head of
each submitting entity shall attest to the accuracy and completeness of the information in writing.
(e) Offices and boards assigned to DCAMM. DCAMM shall oversee the following boards,
offices, and functions:
(1) Office of planning, design, and construction (PDC);
(2) Office of facilities management and maintenance (OFMM);
(3) [Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 3, § 7.]
(4) [Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 3, § 7.]
(5) Office of risk management (§ 37-11-1 et seq.);
(6) (5) [Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 3, § 7.]
(7) (6) Office of state fleet operations (§ 42-11-2.4(d)).
(f) The boards, offices, and functions assigned to DCAMM shall:
(1) Exercise their respective powers and duties in accordance with their statutory authority
and the general policy established by the director of DCAMM or in accordance with the powers
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -36-)

and authorities conferred upon the director of DCAMM by this section;
(2) Provide such assistance or resources as may be requested or required by the director of
DCAMM or the director of administration;
(3) Provide such records and information as may be requested or required by the director
of DCAMM or the director of administration; and
(4) Except as provided herein, no provision of this chapter or application thereof shall be
construed to limit or otherwise restrict the offices stated above from fulfilling any statutory
requirement or complying with any valid rule or regulation.
SECTION 18. Section 42-13-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-13 entitled "Department
of Transportation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-13-2. Organization and functions of the department.
(a) The department shall be organized in accordance with a project management-based
program and shall utilize an asset management system.
(1) A project management-based program manages the delivery of the department’s
portfolio of transportation improvement projects from project conception to the project completion.
Project management activities include:
(i) Managing and reporting on the delivery status of portfolio projects;
(ii) Developing overall workload and budget for the portfolio;
(iii) Developing and implementing the tools to estimate the resources necessary to deliver
the projects; and
(iv) Developing and implementing processes and tools to improve the management of the
projects.
(2) Asset management is the process used for managing transportation infrastructure by
improving decision making for resource allocation. Asset management activities include a systemic
process based on economic, engineering, and business principles which includes the following
functions:
(i) Completing a comprehensive inventory of system assets;
(ii) Monitoring system performance; and
(iii) Performing analysis utilizing accurate data for managing various assets within the
transportation network.
(b) The director of transportation shall appoint a chief operating officer to oversee the day-
to-day operations of the department.
(c) The department shall be organized into such divisions as are described in this section
and such other divisions, subdivisions, and agencies as the director shall find are necessary to carry
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -37-)

out the responsibilities of the department, including: division of finance; division of planning;
division of project management; division of operations and maintenance; office of civil rights;
office of safety; office of external affairs; office of legal; office of personnel; office of information
services.
(d) The director may assign such other responsibilities as he or she shall find appropriate
and may reassign functions other than as set out in this section if he or she finds the reassignment
necessary to the proper and efficient functioning of the department or of the state’s transportation
system.
(e) The department shall submit a report annually no later than March 31 to the speaker of
the house, the president of the senate, and the house and senate fiscal advisors concerning the status
of the ten-year (10) transportation plan.
(f) Any functions, duties, and staff relating to the Rhode Island department of
transportation’s external audit section shall be transferred to the Rhode Island department of
administration’s office of internal audit and program integrity, or its successor, upon passage [Feb.
11, 2016].
(1) The chief of the office of internal audit and program integrity, or its successor, who
shall be the administrative head of the office of internal audit and program integrity, or its successor,
shall supervise, coordinate, and/or conduct audits, civil and administrative investigations, and
inspections or oversight reviews, when necessary, relating to programs and operations listed in §
42-13-2.
(2) The office of internal audit’s audit and program integrity’s (or its successor’s)
authorization shall include, but not be limited to, evaluating the efficiency of operations and internal
controls, preventing and detecting fraud, waste, abuse or mismanagement in the expenditure of
public funds, whether state, federal or those revenues collected by the use of tolls and related to
any and all transportation-related programs and operations as well as the procurement of any
supplies, services, or construction, by the department of transportation or related institutions of the
department of transportation. Investigations may include the expenditures by nongovernmental
agencies of federal, state, and local public funds. As deemed necessary or expedient by the office
of internal audit and program integrity, or its successor, audits may be made relative to the financial
affairs or the economy and efficiency of management of the department of transportation or related
institutions.
SECTION 19. Section 42-28-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-28 entitled "State
Police" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-28-22. Retirement of members.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -38-)

(a) Whenever any member of the state police hired prior to July 1, 2007, has served for
twenty (20) years, the member may retire therefrom or they may be retired by the superintendent
with the approval of the governor, and in either event a sum equal to one-half (½) of the whole
salary for the position from which the member retired determined on the date the member receives
their first retirement payment shall be paid the member during life.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “whole salary” means:
(1) For each member who retired prior to July 1, 1966, “whole salary” means the base
salary for the position from which the member retired as the base salary for that position was
determined on July 31, 1972;
(2) For each member who retired between July 1, 1966, and June 30, 1973, “whole salary”
means the base salary for the position from which the member retired as the base salary,
implemented by the longevity increment, for that position was determined on July 31, 1972, or on
the date of the member’s retirement, whichever is greater;
(3) For each member who retired or who retires after July 1, 1973, “whole salary” means
the base salary, implemented by the longevity increment, holiday pay, and clothing allowance, for
the position from which the member retired or retires.
(c)(1) Any member who retired prior to July 1, 1977, shall receive a benefits payment
adjustment equal to three percent (3%) of the member’s original retirement, as determined in
subsection (b) of this section, in addition to the member’s original retirement allowance. In each
succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased
an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be
continued until January 1, 1991. For the purposes of the computation, credit shall be given for a
full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the service retirement allowance. For purposes
of this subsection, the benefits payment adjustment shall be computed from January 1, 1971, or the
date of retirement, whichever is later in time.
(2) Any member of the state police who retires pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
on or after January 1, 1977, shall on the first day of January, next following the third anniversary
date of the retirement receive a benefits payment adjustment, in addition to their retirement
allowance, in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each
succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased
an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be
continued until January 1, 1991. For the purposes of the computation, credit shall be given for a
full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the service retirement allowance.
(3) Any retired member of the state police who is receiving a benefit payment adjustment
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -39-)

pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section shall beginning January 1, 1991, and ending
June 30, 2012, receive a benefits payment adjustment equal to fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500).
(d) The benefits payment adjustment as provided in this section shall apply to and be in
addition to the retirement benefits under the provisions of § 42-28-5, and to the injury and death
benefits under the provisions of § 42-28-21.
(e)(1) Any member who retires after July 1, 1972, and is eligible to retire prior to July 1,
2012, and who has served beyond twenty (20) years shall be allowed an additional amount equal
to three percent (3%) for each completed year served after twenty (20) years, but in no event shall
the original retirement allowance exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of the member’s whole salary as
defined in subsection (b) hereof or sixty-five percent (65%) of the member’s salary as defined in
subsection (b) hereof in the member’s twenty-fifth (25th) year whichever is less.
(2) Each member who retired prior to July 1, 1975, shall be entitled to all retirement
benefits as set forth above or shall be paid benefits as set forth in subdivision (b)(1) with “whole
salary” meaning the base salary for the position from which the member retired as the base salary
for the position was determined on July 1, 1975, whichever is greater.
(f)(1) Any member who retires, has served as a member for twenty (20) years or more, and
who served for a period of six (6) months or more of active duty in the armed service of the United
States or in the merchant marine service of the United States as defined in § 2 of chapter 1721 of
the Public Laws, 1946, may purchase credit for such service up to a maximum of two (2) years;
provided that any member who has served at least six (6) months or more in any one year shall be
allowed to purchase one year for such service and any member who has served a fraction of less
than six (6) months in the member’s total service shall be allowed to purchase six (6) months’ credit
for such service.
(2) The cost to purchase these credits shall be ten percent (10%) of the member’s first year
salary as a state policeman multiplied by the number of years and/or fraction thereof of such armed
service up to a maximum of two (2) years. The purchase price shall be paid into the general fund.
For members hired on or after July 1, 1989, the purchase price shall be paid into a restricted revenue
account entitled “state police retirement benefits” and shall be held in trust.
(3) There will be no interest charge provided the member makes such purchase during their
twentieth (20th) year or within five (5) years from May 18, 1981, whichever is later, but will be
charged regular rate of interest as defined in § 36-8-1 as amended to date of purchase from the date
of the member’s twentieth (20th) year of state service or five (5) years from May 18, 1981,
whichever is later.
(4) Any member who is granted a leave of absence without pay for illness, injury, or any
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -40-)

other reason may receive credit therefor by making the full actuarial cost as defined in § 36-8-
1(10); provided the employee returns to state service for at least one year upon completion of the
leave.
(5) In no event shall the original retirement allowance exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of
the member’s whole salary as defined in subsection (b) hereof or sixty-five percent (65%) of the
member’s salary as defined in subsection (b) hereof in the member’s twenty-fifth (25th) year,
whichever is less.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service
credit may be purchased by a member of the system. The five (5) year limit shall not apply to any
purchases made prior to January 1, 1995. A member who has purchased more than five (5) years
of service credits before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply those purchases towards the
member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be permitted. Repayment in
accordance with applicable law and regulation of any contribution previously withdrawn from the
system shall not be deemed a purchase of service credit.
(g) The provisions of this section shall not apply to civilian employees in the Rhode Island
state police; and, further, from and after April 28, 1937, chapters 8 — 10, inclusive, of title 36 shall
not be construed to apply to the members of the Rhode Island state police, except as provided by
§§ 36-8-3, 36-10-1.1, 42-28-22.1, and 42-28-22.2, and § 36-8-1(5) and (8)(a) effective July 1, 2012.
(h) Any member of the state police other than the superintendent of state police, who is
hired prior to July 1, 2007, and who has served for twenty-five (25) years or who has attained the
age of sixty-two (62) years, whichever shall first occur, shall retire therefrom.
(i)(1) Any member of the state police, other than the superintendent, who is hired on or
after July 1, 2007, and who has served for twenty-five (25) years, may retire therefrom or the
member may be retired by the superintendent with the approval of the governor, and shall be
entitled to a retirement allowance of fifty percent (50%) of the member’s “whole salary” as defined
in subsection (b) hereof.
(2) Any member of the state police who is hired on or after July 1, 2007, may serve up to
a maximum of thirty (30) years, and shall be allowed an additional amount equal to three percent
(3.0%) for each completed year served after twenty-five (25) years, but in no event shall the original
retirement allowance exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of his or her “whole salary” as defined in
subsection (b) hereof.
(j) Effective July 1, 2012, any other provision of this section notwithstanding:
(1) Any member of the state police, other than the superintendent of state police, who is
not eligible to retire on or prior to June 30, 2012, may retire at any time subsequent to the date the
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -41-)

member’s retirement allowance equals or exceeds fifty percent (50%) of average compensation as
defined in § 36-8-1(5)(a), provided that a member shall retire upon the first to occur of:
(i) The date the member’s retirement allowance equals sixty-five percent (65%); or
(ii) The later of the attainment of age sixty-two (62) or completion of five (5) years of
service; provided however, any current member as of June 30, 2012, who has not accrued fifty
percent (50%) upon attaining the age of sixty-two (62) shall retire upon accruing fifty percent
(50%); and upon retirement a member shall receive a retirement allowance which shall equal:
(A) For members hired prior to July 1, 2007, the sum of (i), (ii), and (iii) where:
(i) is calculated as the member’s years of total service before July 1, 2012, multiplied by
two and one-half percent (2.5%) of average compensation for a member’s first twenty (20) total
years,
(ii) is calculated as the member’s years of total service before July 1, 2012, in excess of
twenty (20) years not to exceed twenty-five (25) years multiplied by three percent (3%) of average
compensation, and
(iii) is the member’s years of total service on or after July 1, 2012, multiplied by two
percent (2%) of average compensation as defined in § 36-8-1(5)(a)(b).
(B) For members hired on or after July 1, 2007, the member’s retirement allowance shall
be calculated as the member’s years of total contributory service multiplied by two percent (2%)
of average compensation.
(C) Any member of the state police who is eligible to retire on or prior to June 30, 2012,
shall retire with a retirement allowance calculated in accordance with paragraph (a) and (e) above
except that whole salary shall be defined as final compensation where compensation for purposes
of this section and § 42-28-22.1 includes base salary, longevity, and holiday pay.
(D) Notwithstanding the preceding provisions, in no event shall a member’s final
compensation be lower than their final compensation determined as of June 30, 2012.
(2) In no event shall a member’s original retirement allowance under any provisions of this
section exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of their average compensation.
(3) For each member who retires on or after July 1, 2012, except as provided in paragraph
(j)(1)(C) above, compensation and average compensation shall be defined in accordance with § 36-
8-1(5)(a) and (8), provided that for a member whose regular work period exceeds one hundred
forty-seven (147) hours over a twenty-four-day (24) period at any time during the four-year (4)
period immediately prior to the member’s retirement, that member shall have up to four hundred
(400) hours of their pay for regularly scheduled work earned during this period shall be included
as “compensation” and/or “average compensation” for purposes of this section and § 42-28-22.1.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -42-)

(4) This subsection (4) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.
(i) Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to paragraph (4)(ii)
below, for all present and former members, active and retired members, and beneficiaries receiving
any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether for or on behalf of a
non-contributory member or contributory member, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any
calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal to the
percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the
Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the
plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to
exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser
of the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of
retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually
in the same percentage as determined under (4)(i)(A) above. The “Five-Year Average Investment
Return” shall mean the average of the investment returns for the most recent five (5) plan years as
determined by the retirement board. Subject to paragraph (4)(ii) below, the benefit adjustment
provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of
retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches age fifty-five (55), whichever is later. In the
event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either
upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same
amount.
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (4)(iii), the benefit adjustments under this section for
any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’
retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police
retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty
percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all members for such
plan year.
In determining whether a funding level under this paragraph (4)(ii) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding paragraph (4)(ii), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five
(5) plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph
(4)(i) above until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -43-)

actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).
(iv) The provisions of this paragraph (j)(4) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall
apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or prior to June 30, 2012.
(v) The cost-of-living adjustment as provided in this paragraph (j)(4) shall apply to and be
in addition to the retirement benefits under the provisions of § 42-28-5 and to the injury and death
benefits under the provisions of § 42-28-21.
(5) This subsection (5) shall become effective July 1, 2015.
(i)(A) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this
paragraph (5)(i)(A), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to members and/or
beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent
(2%) of the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) of the member’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be
provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.
(B) Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former
members, active and retired members, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or
death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year
under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (5)(ii)
below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):
(I) shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (1) plus fifty percent (50%) of (2) where:
(1) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
(the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns
of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the
retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or
downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.
(2) is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor
Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
In no event shall the sum of (1) plus (2) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be
less than zero percent (0%).
(II) is equal to the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-
five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -44-)

to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (5)(i)(B)(I) above.
The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (5)(i)(B) shall be provided to all retirees
entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect, and for all
other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the date of
retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches their Social Security retirement age, whichever
is later.
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (5)(iii), the benefit adjustments under subsection
(5)(i)(B) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state
police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds
eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all members for
such plan year. Effective July 1, 2024, the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of
Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust,
calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) for the
benefit adjustment to be reinstated for all members for such plan year shall be replaced with
seventy-five percent (75%).
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (5)(ii) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subsection (5)(ii), in each fourth plan year commencing after June
30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of
four plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph
(5)(i)(B) above; and (ii) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or
before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (5)(i)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand eight
hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six
dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the
judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the
system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%). Effective July 1, 2024, the
funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits
trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an
aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) shall be replaced with seventy-five percent
(75%).
(iv) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before
July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60)
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -45-)

days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time
stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends
shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable
payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of
this section.
(6) Any member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, who has completed at
least five (5) years of contributory service but who has not retired in accordance with (j)(1) above,
shall be eligible to retire upon the attainment of member’s Social Security retirement age as defined
in § 36-8-1(20).
(7) In no event shall a member’s retirement allowance be less than the member’s retirement
allowance calculated as of June 30, 2012, based on the member’s years of total service and whole
salary as of June 30, 2012.
(k) In calculating the retirement benefit for any member, the term base salary as used in
subdivision (b)(3) or average compensation as used in paragraph (j) shall not be affected by a
deferral of salary plan or a reduced salary plan implemented to avoid shutdowns or layoffs or to
effect cost savings. Basic salary shall remain for retirement calculation that which it would have
been but for the salary deferral or salary reduction due to a plan implemented to avoid shutdowns
or layoffs or to effect cost savings.
SECTION 20. Section 42-64-38 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64 entitled "Rhode
Island Commerce Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64-38. Audit of the corporation.
(a) Commencing July 1, 2014, and every five (5) years thereafter, the corporation shall be
subject to a performance audit, conducted in compliance with the generally accepted governmental
auditing standards, by the office of internal audit and program integrity or a certified public
accounting firm qualified in performance audits.
(b) If the audit is not directly performed by his or her office, the selection of the auditor
and the scope of the audit shall be subject to the approval of the chief of the office of internal audit
and program integrity.
(c) The audit shall be conducted in conformance with § 35-7-3(b) through (d) [repealed].
(d) The results of the audit shall be made public upon completion, posted on the websites
of the office of internal audit and program integrity and the corporation.
(e) The corporation shall be responsible for all costs associated with the audit.
SECTION 21. Sections 42-140-3, 42-140-7 and 42-140-8 of the General Laws in Chapter
42-140 entitled "Rhode Island Energy Resources Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -46-)

42-140-3. Purposes.
The purposes of the office shall be to:
(1) Develop and put into effect plans and programs to promote, encourage, and assist the
provision of energy resources for Rhode Island in a manner that enhances economic well-being,
social equity, and environmental quality;
(2) Monitor, forecast, and report on energy use, energy prices, and energy demand and
supply forecasts, and make findings and recommendations with regard to energy supply diversity,
reliability, and procurement, including least-cost procurement;
(3) Develop and to put into effect plans and programs to promote, encourage, and assist
the efficient and productive use of energy resources in Rhode Island, and to coordinate energy
programs for natural gas, electricity, and heating oil to maximize the aggregate benefits of
conservation and efficiency of investments;
(4) Monitor and report technological developments that may result in new and/or improved
sources of energy supply, increased energy efficiency, and reduced environmental impacts from
energy supply, transmission, and distribution;
(5) Administer the programs, duties, and responsibilities heretofore exercised by the state
energy office, except as these may be assigned by executive order or the general laws to other
departments and agencies of state government;
(6) Develop, recommend, and, as appropriate, implement integrated and/or comprehensive
strategies, including at regional and federal levels, to secure Rhode Island’s interest in energy
resources, their supply and efficient use, and as necessary to interact with persons, private sector,
nonprofit, regional, federal entities and departments and agencies of other states to effectuate this
purpose;
(7) Cooperate with agencies, departments, corporations, and entities of the state and of
political subdivisions of the state in achieving its purposes;
(8) Cooperate with and assist the state planning council and the division of state planning
in developing, maintaining, and implementing state guide plan elements pertaining to energy and
renewable energy;
(9) Coordinate the energy efficiency, renewable energy, least-cost procurement, and
systems reliability plans and programs with the energy efficiency and resources management
council; and the renewable energy coordinating board;
(10) Participate in, monitor implementation of, and provide technical assistance for the
low-income home energy assistance program enhancement plan established pursuant to § 39-1-
27.12;
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -47-)

(11) Participate in and monitor the distributed generation standard contracts program
pursuant to chapter 26.2 of title 39;
(12) Coordinate opportunities with and enter into contracts and/or agreements with the
commerce corporation associated with the energy efficiency, least-cost procurement, system
reliability, and renewable energy fund programs;
(13) Provide support and information to the division of planning and the state planning
council in the development of a ten-year (10) Rhode Island Energy Guide Plan, which shall be
reviewed and amended if necessary every five (5) years;
(14) Provide funding support if necessary to the renewable energy coordinating board
and/or the advisory council to carry out the objectives pursuant to chapter 140.3 of this title
[repealed];
(15) Advise and provide technical assistance to state and federally funded energy programs
to support:
(i) The federal low-income home energy assistance program which provides heating
assistance to eligible low-income persons and any state funded or privately funded heating
assistance program of a similar nature assigned to it for administration;
(ii) The weatherization assistance program which offers home weatherization grants and
heating system upgrades to eligible persons of low-income;
(iii) The emergency fuel program which provides oil deliveries to families experiencing a
heating emergency;
(iv) The energy conservation program, which offers service and programs to all sectors;
(v) [Deleted by P.L. 2008, ch. 228, § 2, and P.L. 2008, ch. 422, § 2.]
(16)(15) Advise the commerce corporation in the development of standards and rules for
the solicitation and award of renewable energy program investment funds in accordance with § 42-
64-13.2;
(17)(16) Develop, recommend, and evaluate energy programs for state facilities and
operations in order to achieve and demonstrate the benefits of energy-efficiency, diversification of
energy supplies, energy conservation, and demand management; and
(18)(17) Advise the governor and the general assembly with regard to energy resources
and all matters relevant to achieving the purposes of the office.
42-140-7. Conduct of activities.
(a) To the extent reasonable and practical, the conduct of activities under the provisions of
this chapter shall be open and inclusive. ; the commissioner and the council shall seek in addressing
the purposes of the office to involve the research and analytic capacities of institutions of higher
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -48-)

education within the state, industry, advocacy groups, and regional entities, and shall seek input
from stakeholders including, but not limited to, residential and commercial energy users.
(b) The commissioner shall transmit any unencumbered funds from the renewable energy
program under chapter 2 of title 39 to the commerce corporation to be administered in accordance
with the provisions of § 39-2-1.2.
42-140-8. Annual report.
The commissioner shall report annually, on or before June 30 March 1 of each year, to the
governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house with regard to the status of
energy supplies, markets, and conditions, the effectiveness of energy programs, and the activities
of the office. including the council, and such other matters related to energy as the commissioner
or the council may deem appropriate.
SECTION 22. Chapter 42-140 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Energy
Resources Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-140-12. Clean transportation programs.
There is established a restricted receipt account within the general fund of the state, to be
known as the "clean transportation programs", to be administered by the office of energy resources.
The purpose of the account is to receive and expend funds for clean transportation programs,
including but not limited to electric vehicle rebate, electric bicycle rebate and other programs.
SECTION 23. Section 42-155-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-155 entitled "Quasi-
Public Corporations Accountability and Transparency Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-155-7. Audit of quasi-public corporations.
(a) Commencing January 1, 2015, and every five (5) years thereafter, each quasi-public
corporation shall be subject to a performance audit, conducted in compliance with the generally
acceptable governmental auditing standards or the standards for the professional practice of internal
auditing, by the chief of the office of internal audit and program integrity. The chief, in
collaboration with the quasi-public corporation, shall determine the scope of the audit. To assist in
the performance of an audit, the chief, in collaboration with the quasi-public corporation, may
procure the services of a certified public accounting firm, which shall be a subcontractor of the
office of internal audit and program integrity, and shall be under the direct supervision of the office
of internal audit and program integrity. The chief of the office of internal audit and program
integrity shall establish a rotating schedule identifying the year in which each quasi-public
corporation shall be audited. The schedule shall be posted on the website of the office of internal
audit and program integrity.
(b) The audit shall be conducted in conformance with chapter 7 of title 35 (“Post Audit of
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -49-)

Accounts”).
(c) Each quasi-public corporation shall be responsible for costs associated with its own
audit. The chief and each quasi-public corporation shall agree upon reasonable costs for the audit,
not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), that shall be remitted to the office of internal
audit and program integrity.
(d) The results of the audit shall be made public upon completion and posted on the
websites of the office of internal audit and program integrity and the quasi-public corporation.
(e) For purposes of this section, a performance audit shall mean an independent
examination of a program, function, operation, or the management systems and procedures of a
governmental or nonprofit entity to assess whether the entity is achieving economy, efficiency, and
effectiveness in the employment of all available resources.
SECTION 24. Section 42-157-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-157 entitled "Rhode
Island Health Benefit Exchange" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-157-6. Audit.
(a) Annually, the exchange shall cause to have a financial and/or performance audit of its
functions and operations performed in compliance with the generally accepted governmental
auditing standards and conducted by the state office of internal audit and program integrity or a
certified public accounting firm qualified in performance audits.
(b) If the audit is not directly performed by the state office of internal audit and program
integrity, the selection of the auditor and the scope of the audit shall be subject to the approval of
the state office of internal audit and program integrity.
(c) The results of the audit shall be made public upon completion, posted on the
department’s website and otherwise made available for public inspection.
SECTION 25. The title of Chapter 42-165 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island
Longitudinal Data System Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 42-165
Rhode Island Longitudinal Data System Act
CHAPTER 42-165
RHODE ISLAND INTEGRATED DATA SYSTEM ACT
SECTION 26. Sections 42-165-1, 42-165-2, 42-165-3, 42-165-4, 42-165-5, 42-165-6 and
42-165-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-165 entitled "Rhode Island Longitudinal Data System
Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-165-1. Rhode Island longitudinal data system act. Rhode Island integrated data
system act.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -50-)

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Longitudinal Integrated
Data System Act.”
42-165-2. Findings.
(a) Purpose. The Rhode Island Longitudinal Integrated Data System (RILDSRIIDS)
“DATA RI” is Rhode Island’s statewide longitudinal integrated data system that integrates and
links individual or unit-level data. The purpose of the RILDSRIIDS is to connect federated data
across sectors and over time to support research aligned with the state’s priorities; inform
policymaking and program evaluation; and improve the well-being of all Rhode Islanders.
(b) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The state is committed to maintaining a longitudinal data system that the public,
researchers, and policymakers can use to analyze and assess Rhode Islanders’ aggregate progress
from early learning programs through postsecondary education and into employment; and
(2) A national collaborative effort among federal and state policymakers, state officials,
and national education organizations has defined the essential components of a statewide
longitudinal data system; and
(3) The RI Longitudinal Data System (RILDS)DataHUB is the state education and
workforce longitudinal data system, aligned to the U.S. Department of Education’s Statewide
Longitudinal Data System (SLDS) grant program and the U.S. Department of Labor’s Workforce
Data Quality Initiative grant program.
(4) The Ecosystem is the state’s health and human services integrated data system focused
on improving the outcomes of these related programs and starting from the base of the Medicaid
program.
(5) The Ecosystem, the RILDS and individual programs can be connected in a federated
manner that enables programs to retain control of their data but also allows secure sharing of data
when there is an approved data analysis project.
(6) Unified governance across the Ecosystem and RILDS will allow more efficient and
secure operation of the state’s data infrastructure.
42-165-3. Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) “Participating agency” means the Rhode Island department of education, the office of
the postsecondary commissioner, the Rhode Island department of labor and training, executive
office of health and human services, and any agency that has executed a memorandum of
understanding for recurring participation in the Rhode Island longitudinal data system.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -51-)

(2) “Rhode Island Longitudinal Data System” (RILDS) formerly known as the RI
DataHUB operated by DataSpark, is the current statewide longitudinal data system and will be
located for budgetary purposes in the office of the postsecondary commissioner.
(3) The “Ecosystem” is the executive office of health and human services integrated data
system. “Rhode Island Longitudinal Data System Center” (Center) is comprised of the current
entity known as DataSpark and whatever other resources as necessary to accomplish the powers
and duties prescribed herein.
(4) “State and federal privacy laws” means all applicable state and federal privacy laws
and accompanying regulations, including but not limited to the federal Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act and its accompanying regulations (“FERPA”), Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), R.I. Gen. Laws § 28-42-38, 20 C.F.R. § 603.1 et seq., and any
other privacy measures that apply to the personally identifiable information that is used by the
center and/or becomes part of the RILDS, the Ecosystem or RIIDS hereunder.
(5) “Statewide Rhode Island integrated data system” or “integrated data system” or
“RIIDS” means an the state individual-, family- or unit-level data system that links and integrates
records from state datasets from all major education, economic, health, human service, labor, and
public safety programs including the RILDS, the Ecosystem and any other data repositories
accepted by the RIIDS governing board.
(6) “Statewide longitudinal data system” or “longitudinal data system” or “SLDS” means
an individual- or unit-level data system that links and integrates records from state datasets
including but not limited to early childhood and prekindergarten, through elementary, secondary,
and postsecondary education, and into the workforce from participating agencies and entities.
42-165-4. Creation.
(a) The RILDS RIIDS “DATA RI” is hereby established within the office of the
postsecondary commissioner and is granted and authorized to use all the powers set forth in this
chapter.
(b) Functions. The RILDS RIIDS “DATA RI” shall:
(1) Transmit, store, enable access to, permit the use, and dispose of linked data and
information in accordance with the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)
Cybersecurity Framework and associated NIST 800-53 security controls commensurate with data
sensitivity level and in accordance with all applicable state and privacy laws and state security
policies;
(2) Serve as a central repository of the state’s inter-agency, longitudinal, linked and
individual data;
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -52-)

(3) Enable the integration, linkage, and management of information;
(4) Report on and provide public access to aggregate data to, among other things, address
inequities in access, opportunities, and outcomes and improve student and educator decision-
making;
(5) Provide clarity to university and other researchers on the process to request data and
what data is available to request; and
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall negate or otherwise adversely affect the validity and legal
enforceability of any existing data sharing and/or research agreements executed between and
among the state’s participating agencies and the state’s statewide longitudinal data system RILDS
or Ecosystem: and
(7) Nothing in this section and chapter shall negate or overrule the right of an agency,
institution or entity that has provided and/or transferred data to the RIIDS, RILDS, or the
Ecosystem to determine the use of and access to its data.
42-165-5. Governing board.
(a) Composition of board. The RILDS RIIDS “DATA RI” will be governed by the Rhode
Island longitudinal Integrated data system governing board (the board).
(1) The board shall be composed of:
(i) The director of the department of administration or designee who serves as one co-chair;
(ii) The directors of any participating agencies as described in § 42-165-3 and § 42-165-6,
or their designee;
(iii) The director of the office of management and budget or designee;
(iv) The chief digital officer or designee;
(v) The director of the center, as set forth in § 42-165-7;
(vi) The secretary of health and human services or designee who serves as one co-chair;
and
(vii) The commissioner of postsecondary education or designee who serves as one co-chair.
(2) The board shall be overseen by two co-chairs. As The co-chairs co-chair, the director
of administration or designee shall be responsible for overseeing and directing the policy duties
and responsibilities of the board. The other co-chair shall be the commissioner of postsecondary
education who shall be responsible for and overseeing, supervising, and directing the operational
duties of the center and its personnel.
(b) Powers and duties. The board shall:
(1) In consultation with the center and the Ecosystem, and in accordance with federal and
state privacy law, approve policies regarding how data requests from state and local agencies, the
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -53-)

Rhode Island general assembly, universities, third-party researchers, and the public will be
managed;
(2) In consultation with the center and the Ecosystem, approve policies regarding the
publishing of reports and other information that should be available to public stakeholders;
(3) Approve standards implemented by the center and the Ecosystem for the security,
privacy, access to, and confidentiality of data, including policies to comply with the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, R.I. Gen.
Laws § 28-42-38, 20 C.F.R. § 603.1 et seq., and any other privacy measures, as required by law,
state policy, or the board;
(4) Perform other functions that are necessary to ensure the successful continuation,
management, and expansion of the RILDS RIIDS;
(5) Establish a data governance committee to work with the center and Ecosystem on an
ongoing basis to among other responsibilities, approve data requests;
(6) Oversee and collaborate with the data governance committee, the Ecosystem and the
center as set forth in § 42-165-7; and
(7) By November 1, 2023, provide a plan to the governor, the house, and the senate on how
to establish a statewide integrated data system. The plan should consider elements such as:
(i) The role an IDS can play in improving the operation of programs; reducing fraud, waste,
and abuse; and establishing a state culture of program evaluation;
(ii) Providing state agencies with evaluation services and providing state analysts access to
data based on their role;
(iii) Providing researchers with access to state data;
(iv) The importance of data privacy and security;
(v) The importance of public transparency and the role of the state transparency portal;
(vi) The creation of a state chief data officer;
(vii) Sustainable funding and governance for the IDS;
(viii) The role of data federation; and
(ix) The timeline for implementing the IDS.
Serve as the single governing board for the RILDS and the Ecosystem;
(8) Set the strategic direction for RIIDS to ensure it:
(i) Improves transparency and public accessibility of data, including increasing the
availability of dashboards, plain language summaries; public data catalogs of research and reports;
(ii) Enhances data availability for internal state use, ensuring data is accessible to state
analysts to conduct broad analysis of state programs, thereby improving the state’s understanding
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -54-)

of the operation and impact of its programs; and
(iii) Improves data availability for external researchers. Data shall be made available to
researchers to the greatest extent possible limited to allow evidence-based improvements to state
programs; and
(9) The center or the Ecosystem is considered to be an agent of the executive state agency
sharing government information for a particular data project and is an authorized receiver of
government information under the statutory or administrative law that governs the government
information. Interagency data sharing under this chapter does not constitute a disclosure or release
under any statutory or administrative law that governs the government information.
42-165-6. Participating agencies.
(a) Participating agencies shall transfer data, as applicable, to the RILDS RIIDS's in
accordance with the data security policies as approved by the board, and pursuant to the
requirements of state and federal privacy laws and policies.
(b) Any agencies providing data on a recurring basis to the RILDS shall provide a
representative to the board and be governed in the same manner as the initial agencies and entities
and shall be subject to applicable board policies.
(c) All Rhode Island state agencies shall:
(1) Participate in the RIIDS to the extent practical;
(2) Identify datasets of greatest value for policy analysis efforts and investigate the
feasibility of making them available for the federated data system and other internal policy analysis
efforts; and
(3) Share data to the greatest extent possible as practical and permissible under law.
42-165-7. The Rhode Island longitudinal data system center.
(a) Purpose. The purpose of the center is to manage and operate the RILDS and conduct
research and evaluate programs regarding federal, state, and local programs and policies. The center
shall be managed by an executive director (hereafter the “director”) responsible for the daily
management and operations of the center. The director will also be responsible for interfacing and
collaborating between the board and the data governance committee, as well as external
communications and agreements. The director shall be a non-classified employee of the council on
postsecondary education under the supervision of and subject to the authority of the commissioner
of postsecondary education.
(b) Powers and duties. The duties of the center shall be to:
(1) Act as an authorized representative, research partner, and business associate of the
state’s agencies, including those responsible for education and workforce, under and in accordance
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -55-)

with the requirements of applicable federal and state statutes and/or state and federal privacy laws
and state security policies;
(2) Enter into memoranda of understanding with state agencies, nonprofits, universities,
subnational governments, and other entities for the purposes of data sharing and analysis;
(3) Coordinate with participating agencies and other entities to ensure the integrity and
quality of data being collected, including implementing the data quality and metadata policies
approved by the board;
(4) Advance research and allow policymakers to explore critical research policy questions
and to measure investments in education and workforce development;
(5) In consultation with the board, identify the state’s critical research and policy questions;
(6) Provide analysis and reports that assist with evaluating programs and measuring
investments, subject to the policies approved by the board;
(7) Implement policies and procedures approved by the board that govern the security,
privacy, access to, and confidentiality of the data, in accordance with relevant federal and state
privacy laws;
(8) Ensure that information contained in and available through the RILDS is kept secure,
and that individual privacy is protected, and maintain insurance coverage;
(9) Respond to approved research data requests in accordance with the policies and
procedures approved by the board;
(10) Enter into contracts or other agreements with appropriate entities, including but not
limited to universities, and federal, state, and local agencies, to the extent necessary to carry out its
duties and responsibilities only if such contracts or agreements incorporate adequate protections
with respect to the privacy and security of any information to be shared, and are approved, in
writing, by the applicable agency whose data or information is to be shared, and are allowable
under applicable state and federal privacy laws; and
(11) Maintain staff necessary to carry out the above duties as provided for in the state
budget. Staff at the center shall be non-classified employees of the council on postsecondary
education, under the supervision of and subject to the authority of the commissioner of
postsecondary education. The non-SLDS activity of the center shall also be under the supervision
and authority of the commissioner of postsecondary education and the council on postsecondary
education. The council on postsecondary education, its office of the postsecondary commissioner,
and its employees shall be included under the limitation of damages for tort liability for the State
set out in § 9-31-1 et seq., for all actions involving the center regarding the RILDS and/or SLDS
and for any other activity of the center regarding its receipt, storage, sharing, and transmission of
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -56-)

data as part of its non-SLDS operations and activities.
(12) The council on postsecondary education shall be the employer of public record for the
Center.
(c) Funding. Appropriations made pursuant to this chapter shall be used exclusively for
the development and operation of RILDS, RIIDS or the Ecosystem.
(1) The board and the center may implement a data request fee policy to compensate for
excessive use of the data system, to recover costs that would otherwise typically be borne by the
requesting data researcher, or both. A data request fee policy implemented pursuant to this section
shall be reviewed and approved by the board, revised periodically, and made publicly available and
posted in a prominent location on the RILDS’s RIIDS's internet website.
(2) The center may receive funding for its operation of the RILDS from the following
sources:
(i) State appropriations;
(ii) Federal grants;
(iii) User fees; and
(iv) Any other grants or contributions from public agencies or other entities.
(3) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account in the general fund of the state
and housed in the budget of the office of postsecondary commissioner entitled “longitudinal data
system — non-federal grants.” The express purpose of this account is to record receipts and
expenditures of the program herein described and established within this chapter.
SECTION 27. Section 44-1-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-1 entitled "State Tax
Officials" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-1-14. Disclosure of information to tax officials of federal government or other
states, or to other persons.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) The tax administrator may make available: (i) To the taxing officials of any other states
or of the federal government for tax purposes only, any information that the administrator may
consider proper contained in tax reports or returns or any audit or the report of any investigation
made with respect to them, filed pursuant to the tax laws of this state; provided, that other states or
the federal government grant like privileges to the taxing officials of this state; and/or (ii) To an
officer or employee of the office of internal audit and program integrity of the Rhode Island
department of administration, any information that the administrator may consider proper contained
in tax reports or returns or any audit or the report of any investigation made with respect to them,
filed pursuant to the tax laws of this state, to whom disclosure is necessary for the purposes of fraud
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -57-)

detection and prevention in any state or federal program.
(2) The tax administrator shall not permit any federal return or federal return information
to be inspected by, or disclosed to, an individual who is the chief executive officer of the state or
any person other than:
(i) To another employee of the tax division for the purpose of, and only to the extent
necessary in, the administration of the state tax laws for which the tax division is responsible;
(ii) To another officer or employee of the state to whom the disclosure is necessary in
connection with processing, storage, and transmission of those returns and return information and
solely for purposes of state tax administration;
(iii) To another person for the purpose of, but only to the extent necessary in, the
programming, maintenance, repair, testing, and procurement of equipment used in processing or
transmission of those returns and return information; or
(iv) To a legal representative of the tax division, personally and directly engaged in, and
solely for use in, preparation for a civil or criminal proceeding (or investigation which may result
in a proceeding) before a state administrative body, grand jury, or court in a matter involving state
tax administration, but only if:
(A) The taxpayer is or may be a party to the proceeding;
(B) The treatment of an item reflected on the return is or may be related to the resolution
of an issue in the proceeding or investigation; or
(C) The return or return information relates, or may relate, to a transactional relationship
between a person who is or may be a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer that affects or may
affect the resolution of an issue in a proceeding or investigation.
SECTION 28. This article shall take effect upon passage, except Section 15, which shall
take effect on January 1, 2026.
Art3
RELATING TO GOVERNMENT REFORM AND REORGANIZATION
(Page -58-)

=======
art.004/2/004/1
=======
ARTICLE 4 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO DEBT MANAGEMENT ACT JOINT RESOLUTIONS
SECTION 1. This article shall serve as the joint resolutions required pursuant to Rhode
Island General Law § 35-18-1, et seq.
SECTION 2. Section 3, Article 4 of Chapter 162 of the 2021 Public Laws is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Section 3. University of Rhode Island – Combined Health & Counseling Center – Auxiliary
Enterprise
WHEREAS, The University of Rhode Island board of trustees and the university have a
long-standing commitment to the health and wellness of their students; and
WHEREAS, The university has a desire to create a one-stop center to address the physical,
emotional, and mental health of its students; and
WHEREAS, The University of Rhode Island board of trustees and the University of Rhode
Island are proposing a project which involves the construction of a new Combined Health &
Counseling Center to meet the ongoing and growing health needs of their students; and
WHEREAS, The university engaged a qualified architectural firm, which has completed
an advanced planning study schematic design for this new building; and
WHEREAS, The Rhode Island Public Corporation Debt Management Act requires the
general assembly to provide its consent to the issuance or incurring by the state of Rhode Island
and other public agencies of certain obligations including financing guarantees or other agreements;
and
WHEREAS, The design and construction associated with this work of an auxiliary
enterprise building will be financed through the Rhode Island health and educational building
corporation (RIHEBC) revenue bonds, with an expected term of thirty (30) years; and
WHEREAS, The total project costs associated with completion of the project through the
proposed financing method is twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000) thirty-three million six
hundred thousand dollars ($33,600,000), including the cost of issuance. Debt service payments
would be supported by revenues derived from student fees associated with the respective auxiliary
enterprises of the University of Rhode Island occupying said facility. Total debt service on the
bonds is not expected to exceed sixty-three million three hundred thousand dollars ($63,300,000)

seventy-eight million dollars ($78,000,000) in the aggregate based on an average interest rate of
six and one half (6%) percent (6.5%); now, therefore be it
RESOLVED, That this general assembly hereby approves financing in an amount not to
exceed twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000) thirty-three million six hundred thousand dollars
($33,600,000) for the combined health & counseling center project for the auxiliary enterprise
building on the University of Rhode Island campus; and be it further
RESOLVED, That, this joint resolution shall take effect upon passage.
SECTION 3. Section 2, Article 4 of Chapter 162 of the 2021 Public Laws is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Section 2. University of Rhode Island – Memorial Union – Auxiliary Enterprise
WHEREAS, The University of Rhode Island board of trustees and the university have a
long-standing commitment to the overall development of their students; and
WHEREAS, The university believes that the memorial union celebrates life at URI and
acts as the nexus for campus community, student engagement, and leadership. It is an intersection
connecting the academic core of campus and the campus's socially active residential community.
The student union at the university is an integral part of the educational ecosystem that shapes the
student experience; and
WHEREAS, The University of Rhode Island board of trustees and the University of Rhode
Island are proposing a project that involves the renovation and expansion of the memorial union to
meet the ongoing and growing needs of their students; and
WHEREAS, The university engaged a qualified architectural firm, which has completed
an advanced planning study for this renovation; and
WHEREAS, The Rhode Island Public Corporation Debt Management Act requires the
general assembly to provide its consent to the issuance or incurring by the state of Rhode Island
and other public agencies of certain obligations including financing guarantees or other agreements;
and
WHEREAS, The design and construction associated with this work of an auxiliary
enterprise building will be financed through the Rhode Island health and educational building
corporation (RIHEBC) revenue bonds, with an expected term of thirty (30) years; and
WHEREAS, The total project costs associated with completion of the project through the
proposed financing method is fifty-seven million six hundred thousand dollars ($57,600,000), one
hundred eighteen million dollars ($118,000,000), including the cost of issuance. Debt service
payments would be supported by revenues derived from student fees and retail lease payments
associated with the respective auxiliary enterprises of the University of Rhode Island occupying
Art4
RELATING TO DEBT MANAGEMENT ACT JOINT RESOLUTIONS
(Page -2-)

said facility. Total debt service on the bonds is not expected to exceed one hundred twenty-five
million six hundred thousand dollars ($125,600,000) two hundred seventy-two million dollars
($272,000,000) in the aggregate based on an average interest rate of six and one half (6%) percent
(6.5%); now, therefore be it
RESOLVED, That this General Assembly hereby approves financing in an amount not to
exceed is fifty-seven million six hundred thousand dollars ($57,600,000) one hundred eighteen
million dollars ($118,000,000) for the Memorial Union project for the auxiliary enterprise building
on the University of Rhode Island campus; and be it further
RESOLVED, That this joint resolution shall take effect upon passage.
SECTION 4. Confined Aquatic Dredged Material Disposal Cells.
WHEREAS, Over the past several years the Army Corps of Engineers has approached the
Coastal Resources Management Council to act as the local sponsor to the federal action of
maintaining the depths of the Providence River and Harbor Shipping Channel; and
WHEREAS, The Providence River and Shipping Channel was last maintained in 2003;
and
WHEREAS, The project will include dredging and removal of sediments not suitable for
ocean disposal, and thus will require the construction of a new Confined Aquatic Disposal (CAD)
Cell to dispose and sequester those sediments; and
WHEREAS, CAD cells are constructed in aquatic environments to reduce the
environmental risk from sediments not suitable for ocean disposal by storing these sediments in a
depression in the bottom of the aquatic system; and
WHEREAS, CAD cells offer a major economic value, as a significant cost of disposing
dredged materials is in the transportation of the dredged material to a disposal location; and
WHEREAS, Having CAD cells located in the same general area from a dredging operation
saves local port operators millions of dollars over the 20-year life of those cells; and
WHEREAS, The Coastal Resources Management Council seeks to build additional
capacity in the CAD Cells beyond that required only for this specific project, in order to account
for the many port, maritime, and marina and boatyard facilities that also have the need to dredge
material at their facilities, which may not be suitable for ocean disposal, thereby saving these
entities significant cost, in both sediment testing and transportation of the material to other
locations, due to the fact that the existing CAD cells in the river have reached their useful design
life; and
WHEREAS, With the approval by the voters of the 2016 Rhode Island Port Infrastructure
Bond referendum, the need to maintain the viability of port and maritime operations, the state's
Art4
RELATING TO DEBT MANAGEMENT ACT JOINT RESOLUTIONS
(Page -3-)

marine trades industry, and the increase economic value of ProvPort, increased disposal capacities
from new CAD cells are needed; and
WHEREAS, The Army Corps of Engineers expects to begin maintenance of the
Providence River and Harbor Shipping Channel in the fall of 2027, the total cost share of the non-
federal sponsor is required by August 2026; and
WHEREAS, The state share associated with this project is estimated to be thirty five
million dollars ($35.0 million), with six hundred and twenty thousand dollars ($620,000) derived
from the Coastal Resources Management Council Dredge Fund, financing from the issuance of
debt as described herein, and the remainder from other sources of capital funds. The total financing
obligation of the State of Rhode Island would be approximately twenty-three million dollars ($23.0
million), with twenty-two million eight hundred thousand dollars ($22.8 million) deposited in the
project fund and two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) allocated to pay the associated costs of
financing. Total payments on the State's obligation over twenty (20) years on the twenty-three
million dollars ($23.0 million) issuance are projected to be thirty-six million nine hundred thousand
dollars ($36.9 million) assuming an average interest rate of five percent (5.0%). A minimum of
eleven million and six hundred thousand dollars ($11.6 million) of the total principal and interest
payments is expected to be financed from an increase in fees charged to marine operators to deposit
their dredged materials into CAD cells, with general revenue appropriations used to supplement
fee revenues. General revenue appropriations shall finance principal and interest payments in any
fiscal year that fee revenues are insufficient; and
RESOLVED, That this General Assembly hereby approves financing in an amount not to
exceed twenty-three million dollars ($23.0 million) for the provision of funds for the Confined
Aquatic Disposal Cells project, including two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to pay costs of
financing; and be it further
RESOLVED, That this joint resolution shall take effect upon passage.
SECTION 5. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art4
RELATING TO DEBT MANAGEMENT ACT JOINT RESOLUTIONS
(Page -4-)

=======
art.005/9/005/8/005/7/005/6/005/5/005/4/005/3/005/2/005/1
=======
ARTICLE 5 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
SECTION 1. Sections 42-63.1-2 and 42-63.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-63.1
entitled "Tourism and Development" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-63.1-2. Definitions. [Effective January 30, 2025.]
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Consideration” means the monetary charge for the use of space devoted to transient
lodging accommodations.
(2) “Corporation” means the Rhode Island commerce corporation.
(3) “District” means the regional tourism districts set forth in § 42-63.1-5.
(4) “Hosting platform” means any electronic or operating system in which a person or
entity provides a means through which an owner may offer a residential unit for “tourist or
transient” use. This service is usually, though not necessarily, provided through an online or web-
based system which generally allows an owner to advertise the residential unit through a hosted
website and provides a means for a person or entity to arrange, or otherwise facilitate reservations
for, tourist or transient use in exchange for payment, whether the person or entity pays rent directly
to the owner or to the hosting platform. All hosting platforms are required to collect and remit the
tax owed under this section.
(5) “Hotel” means any facility offering a minimum of one (1) room for which the public
may, for a consideration, obtain transient lodging accommodations. The term “hotel” shall include
hotels, motels, tourist homes, tourist camps, lodging houses, and inns. The term “hotel” shall also
include houses, condominiums, or other residential dwelling units, regardless of the number of
rooms, which are used and/or advertised for rent for occupancy. The term “hotel” shall not include
schools, hospitals, sanitariums, nursing homes, and chronic care centers.
(6) “Occupancy” means a person, firm, or corporation’s use of space for transient lodging
accommodations not to exceed thirty (30) days. Excluded from “occupancy” is the use of space for
which the occupant has a written lease for the space, which lease covers a rental period of twelve
(12) months or more. Furthermore, any house, condominium, or other residential dwelling rented,
for which the occupant has a documented arrangement for the space covering a rental period of
more than thirty (30) consecutive days or for one calendar month is excluded from the definition

of occupancy.
(7) “Owner” means any person who owns real property and is the owner of record. Owner
shall also include a lessee where the lessee is offering a residential unit for “tourist or transient”
use.
(8) “Residential unit” means a room or rooms, including a condominium or a room or a
dwelling unit that forms part of a single, joint, or shared tenant arrangement, in any building, or
portion thereof, which is designed, built, rented, leased, let, or hired out to be occupied for non-
commercial use.
(9) “Tax” means the hotel tax and whole home short-term rental tax imposed by § 44-18-
36.1(a) and (d).
(10) “Tourist or transient” means any use of a residential unit for occupancy for less than
a thirty (30) consecutive day term of tenancy, or occupancy for less than thirty (30) consecutive
days of a residential unit leased or owned by a business entity, whether on a short-term or long-
term basis, including any occupancy by employees or guests of a business entity for less than thirty
(30) consecutive days where payment for the residential unit is contracted for or paid by the
business entity.
(11) “Tour operator” means a person that derives a majority of their or its revenue by
providing tour operator packages.
(12) “Tour operator packages” means travel packages that include the services of a tour
guide and where the itinerary encompasses five (5) or more consecutive days.
42-63.1-3. Distribution of tax.
(a) For returns and tax payments received on or before December 31, 2015, except as
provided in § 42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax
collected from residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall
be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) Forty-seven percent (47%) of the tax generated by the hotels in the district, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be given to the regional tourism district wherein the hotel
is located; provided, however, that from the tax generated by the hotels in the city of Warwick,
thirty-one percent (31%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick regional tourism district
established in § 42-63.1-5(a)(5) and sixteen percent (16%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11; and provided
further, that from the tax generated by the hotels in the city of Providence, sixteen percent (16%)
of that tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau
established by § 42-63.1-11, and thirty-one percent (31%) of that tax shall be given to the
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -2-)

Convention Authority of the city of Providence established pursuant to the provisions of chapter
84 of the public laws of January, 1980; provided, however, that the receipts attributable to the
district as defined in § 42-63.1-5(a)(7) shall be deposited as general revenues, and that the receipts
attributable to the district as defined in § 42-63.1-5(a)(8) shall be given to the Rhode Island
commerce corporation as established in chapter 64 of this title.
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the hotel tax shall be given to the city or town where the
hotel that generated the tax is physically located, to be used for whatever purpose the city or town
decides.
(3) Twenty-one percent (21%) of the hotel tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce
corporation established in chapter 64 of this title, and seven percent (7%) to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors’ Bureau.
(b) For returns and tax payments received after December 31, 2015, except as provided in
§ 42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from
residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed
as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
(1) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-
63.1-5, forty-two percent (42%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-
five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the
tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-eight percent
(28%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter
64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty eight percent (28%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-three percent (23%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-four percent (24%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-eight percent (28%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-three percent (23%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-four percent (24%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -3-)

(4) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated
the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy percent (70%)
of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this
title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated by hotels in districts other than those set forth in
subsections (b)(1) through (b)(4) of this section, forty-two percent (42%) of the tax shall be given
to the regional tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel is located, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is
physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-eight percent (28%) of
the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this
title.
(c) For returns and tax payments received before July 1, 2019, the proceeds of the hotel tax
collected from residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform shall
be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport: twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the residential unit that generated the tax
is physically located, and seventy-five percent (75%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island
commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(d) The Rhode Island commerce corporation shall be required in each fiscal year to spend
on the promotion and marketing of Rhode Island as a destination for tourists or businesses an
amount of money of no less than the total proceeds of the hotel tax it receives pursuant to this
chapter for the fiscal year.
(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, for returns and tax payments
received on or after July 1, 2016, and on or before June 30, 2017, except as provided in § 42-63.1-
12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from residential
units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed in
accordance with the distribution percentages established in subsections (a)(1) through (a)(3) of this
section by the division of taxation and the city of Newport.
(f) For returns and tax payments received on or after July 1, 2018, except as provided in §
42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, excluding the portion of the hotel tax collected from
residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform, shall be distributed
as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport:
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -4-)

(1) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-
63.1-5, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-
five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the
tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter
64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent (25%)
of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
thirty percent (30%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent (25%)
of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(4) For the tax generated by the hotels in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5,
twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated
the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy percent (70%)
of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this
title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated by hotels in districts other than those set forth in
subsections (f)(1) through (f)(4) of this section, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given
to the regional tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel is located, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel that generated the tax is
physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five (25%) of the tax shall
be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(g) For returns and tax payments received on or after July 1, 2019, except as provided in §
42-63.1-12, the proceeds of the hotel tax, including the portion of the hotel tax collected from
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -5-)

residential units offered for tourist or transient use through a hosting platform except as provided
in subsection (h) of this section, shall be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the
city of Newport:
(1) For the tax generated in the Aquidneck Island district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, forty-
five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the Aquidneck Island district, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated
the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-
Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five percent
(25%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter
64 of this title.
(2) For the tax generated in the Providence district as defined in § 42-63.1-5, thirty percent
(30%) of the tax shall be given to the Providence district, twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall
be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(3) For the tax generated in the Warwick district as defined in § 42-63.1-5, thirty percent
(30%) of the tax shall be given to the Warwick District, twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax shall
be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that generated the tax is physically
located, twenty-four percent (24%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater Providence-Warwick
Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-one percent (21%) of the
tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in chapter 64 of this title.
(4) For the tax generated in the Statewide district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, twenty-five
percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit that
generated the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and seventy
percent (70%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in
chapter 64 of this title.
(5) With respect to the tax generated in districts other than those set forth in subsections
(g)(1) through (g)(4) of this section, forty-five percent (45%) of the tax shall be given to the regional
tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the hotel or residential unit is located, twenty-
five percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the city or town where the hotel or residential unit
that generated the tax is physically located, five percent (5%) of the tax shall be given to the Greater
Providence-Warwick Convention and Visitors Bureau established in § 42-63.1-11, and twenty-five
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -6-)

percent (25%) of the tax shall be given to the Rhode Island commerce corporation established in
chapter 64 of this title.
(h) Distribution of whole home short-term rental tax. For returns and tax payments received
after December 31, 2025, the proceeds of the whole home short-term rental tax established in § 44-
18-36.1(d) shall be distributed as follows by the division of taxation and the city of Newport: fifty
percent (50%) of the tax shall be deposited into the Housing Resources and Homelessness restricted
receipt account, established pursuant to § 42-128-2(3), twenty-five percent (25%) shall be given to
the regional tourism district, as defined in § 42-63.1-5, wherein the residential unit is located, and
twenty-five percent (25%) shall be given to the city or town where the residential unit that generated
the tax is physically located.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-64.11 of the General Laws entitled "Jobs Growth Act" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-64.11-7. Sunset.
No modifications shall be allowed, no applications shall be certified, and no taxpayers
certified prior to January 1, 2026, shall pay the tax under this chapter for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 42-142-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-142 entitled
"Department of Revenue" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-142-2. Powers and duties of the department.
(a) The department of revenue shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To operate a division of taxation;
(2) To operate a division of motor vehicles;
(3) To operate a division of state lottery;
(4) To operate an office of revenue analysis;
(5) To operate a division of property valuation; and
(6) To operate a central collections unit; and
(7) To convene, in consultation with the governor, an advisory working group to assist in
the review and analysis of potential impacts of any adopted federal tax actions. The working group
shall develop options for administrative action or general assembly consideration that may be
needed to address any federal funding changes that impact Rhode Island revenues.
(b) The advisory working group may include, but not be limited to, the state tax
administrator, chief of revenue analysis, director of management and budget, as well as designees
from the following: state agencies, businesses, healthcare, public sector unions, and advocates.
(c) As soon as practicable after the enactment of the federal budget for fiscal year 2026,
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -7-)

but no later than October 31, 2025, the advisory working group shall forward a report to the
governor, speaker of the house, and president of the senate containing the findings,
recommendations and options for consideration to become compliant with federal changes prior to
the governor's budget submittal.
SECTION 4. Section 44-11-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-11 entitled "Business
Corporation Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-11-11. “Net income” defined. [Effective January 1, 2025.]
(a)(1) “Net income” means, for any taxable year and for any corporate taxpayer, the taxable
income of the taxpayer for that taxable year under the laws of the United States, plus:
(i) Any interest not included in the taxable income;
(ii) Any specific exemptions;
(iii) The tax imposed by this chapter;
(iv) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, the amount of any Paycheck
Protection Program loan forgiven for federal income tax purposes as authorized by the Coronavirus
Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act and/or the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and/or
any other subsequent federal stimulus relief packages enacted by law, to the extent that the amount
of the loan forgiven exceeds $250,000; and minus:
(v) Interest on obligations of the United States or its possessions, and other interest exempt
from taxation by this state;
(vi) The federal net operating loss deduction; and
(vii) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in the case of a taxpayer
that is licensed in accordance with chapters 28.6 and/or 28.11 of title 21, the amount equal to any
expenditure that is eligible to be claimed as a federal income tax deduction but is disallowed under
26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(viii) For the taxable year beginning on or before January 1, 2025, the amount of any
income, deduction or allowance that would be subject to federal income tax but for the
Congressional enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional
enactment. The enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional
enactment and any Internal Revenue Service changes to forms, regulations, and/or processing
which go into effect during the current tax year or within six (6) months of the beginning of the
next tax year shall be deemed grounds for the promulgation of emergency rules and regulations
under § 42-35-2.10 to effectuate the purpose of preserving the Rhode Island tax base under Rhode
Island law with respect to the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional
enactment.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -8-)

(2) All binding federal elections made by or on behalf of the taxpayer applicable either
directly or indirectly to the determination of taxable income shall be binding on the taxpayer except
where this chapter or its attendant regulations specifically modify or provide otherwise. Rhode
Island taxable income shall not include the “gross-up of dividends” required by the federal Internal
Revenue Code to be taken into taxable income in connection with the taxpayer’s election of the
foreign tax credit.
(b) A net operating loss deduction shall be allowed, which shall be the same as the net
operating loss deduction allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 172, except that:
(1) Any net operating loss included in determining the deduction shall be adjusted to reflect
the inclusions and exclusions from entire net income required by subsection (a) of this section and
§ 44-11-11.1;
(2) The deduction shall not include any net operating loss sustained during any taxable year
in which the taxpayer was not subject to the tax imposed by this chapter; and
(3) Limitation on 26 U.S.C. § 172 deduction.
(i) The deduction shall not exceed the deduction for the taxable year allowable under 26
U.S.C. § 172; provided, that the deduction for a taxable year may not be carried back to any other
taxable year for Rhode Island purposes but shall only be allowable on a carry forward basis for the
five (5) succeeding taxable years; and
(ii) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the deduction shall not
exceed the deduction for the taxable year allowable under 26 U.S.C. § 172; provided that, the
deduction for a taxable year may not be carried back to any other taxable year for Rhode Island
purposes, but shall only be allowable on a carry forward basis for the twenty (20) succeeding
taxable years.
(c) “Domestic international sales corporations” (referred to as DISCs), for the purposes of
this chapter, will be treated as they are under federal income tax law and shall not pay the amount
of the tax computed under § 44-11-2(a). Any income to shareholders of DISCs is to be treated in
the same manner as it is treated under federal income tax law as it exists on December 31, 1984.
(d) A corporation that qualifies as a “foreign sales corporation” (FSC) under the provisions
of subchapter N, 26 U.S.C. § 861 et seq., and that has in effect for the entire taxable year a valid
election under federal law to be treated as a FSC, shall not pay the amount of the tax computed
under § 44-11-2(a). Any income to shareholders of FSCs is to be treated in the same manner as it
is treated under federal income tax law as it exists on January 1, 1985.
(e) For purposes of a corporation’s state tax liability, any deduction to income allowable
under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(c) may be claimed in the case of any investment held by the taxpayer
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -9-)

for at least seven years. The division of taxation shall promulgate, in its discretion, rules and
regulations relative to the accelerated application of deductions under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(c).
SECTION 5. Section 44-30-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-30 entitled "Personal
Income Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-30-12. Rhode Island income of a resident individual. [Effective January 1, 2025.]
(a) General. The Rhode Island income of a resident individual means the individual’s
adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes, with the modifications specified in this
section.
(b) Modifications increasing federal adjusted gross income. There shall be added to
federal adjusted gross income:
(1) Interest income on obligations of any state, or its political subdivisions, other than
Rhode Island or its political subdivisions;
(2) Interest or dividend income on obligations or securities of any authority, commission,
or instrumentality of the United States, but not of Rhode Island or its political subdivisions, to the
extent exempted by the laws of the United States from federal income tax but not from state income
taxes;
(3) The modification described in § 44-30-25(g);
(4)(i) The amount defined below of a nonqualified withdrawal made from an account in
the tuition savings program pursuant to § 16-57-6.1. For purposes of this section, a nonqualified
withdrawal is:
(A) A transfer or rollover to a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 529, other than to the tuition savings program referred to in § 16-57-
6.1; and
(B) A withdrawal or distribution that is:
(I) Not applied on a timely basis to pay “qualified higher education expenses” as defined
in § 16-57-3(12) of the beneficiary of the account from which the withdrawal is made;
(II) Not made for a reason referred to in § 16-57-6.1(e); or
(III) Not made in other circumstances for which an exclusion from tax made applicable by
Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 529, pertains if the transfer, rollover,
withdrawal, or distribution is made within two (2) taxable years following the taxable year for
which a contributions modification pursuant to subsection (c)(4) of this section is taken based on
contributions to any tuition savings program account by the person who is the participant of the
account at the time of the contribution, whether or not the person is the participant of the account
at the time of the transfer, rollover, withdrawal, or distribution;
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -10-)

(ii) In the event of a nonqualified withdrawal under subsection (b)(4)(i)(A) or (b)(4)(i)(B)
of this section, there shall be added to the federal adjusted gross income of that person for the
taxable year of the withdrawal an amount equal to the lesser of:
(A) The amount equal to the nonqualified withdrawal reduced by the sum of any
administrative fee or penalty imposed under the tuition savings program in connection with the
nonqualified withdrawal plus the earnings portion thereof, if any, includible in computing the
person’s federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year; and
(B) The amount of the person’s contribution modification pursuant to subsection (c)(4) of
this section for the person’s taxable year of the withdrawal and the two (2) prior taxable years less
the amount of any nonqualified withdrawal for the two (2) prior taxable years included in
computing the person’s Rhode Island income by application of this subsection for those years. Any
amount added to federal adjusted gross income pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute Rhode
Island income for residents, nonresidents, and part-year residents;
(5) The modification described in § 44-30-25.1(d)(3)(i);
(6) The amount equal to any unemployment compensation received but not included in
federal adjusted gross income;
(7) The amount equal to the deduction allowed for sales tax paid for a purchase of a
qualified motor vehicle as defined by the Internal Revenue Code § 164(a)(6); and
(8) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, the amount of any Paycheck
Protection Program loan forgiven for federal income tax purposes as authorized by the Coronavirus
Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act and/or the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and/or
any other subsequent federal stimulus relief packages enacted by law, to the extent that the amount
of the loan forgiven exceeds $250,000, including an individual’s distributive share of the amount
of a pass-through entity’s loan forgiveness in excess of $250,000; and
(9) For the taxable year beginning on or before January 1, 2025, the amount of any income,
deduction or allowance that would be subject to federal income tax but for the Congressional
enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment. The
enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment and any
Internal Revenue Service changes to forms, regulations, and/or processing which go into effect
during the current tax year or within six (6) months of the beginning of the next tax year shall be
deemed grounds for the promulgation of emergency rules and regulations under § 42-35-2.10 to
effectuate the purpose of preserving the Rhode Island tax base under Rhode Island law with respect
to the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment.
(c) Modifications reducing federal adjusted gross income. There shall be subtracted
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -11-)

from federal adjusted gross income:
(1) Any interest income on obligations of the United States and its possessions to the extent
includible in gross income for federal income tax purposes, and any interest or dividend income on
obligations, or securities of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to
the extent includible in gross income for federal income tax purposes but exempt from state income
taxes under the laws of the United States; provided, that the amount to be subtracted shall in any
case be reduced by any interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry
obligations or securities the income of which is exempt from Rhode Island personal income tax, to
the extent the interest has been deducted in determining federal adjusted gross income or taxable
income;
(2) A modification described in § 44-30-25(f) or § 44-30-1.1(c)(1);
(3) The amount of any withdrawal or distribution from the “tuition savings program”
referred to in § 16-57-6.1 that is included in federal adjusted gross income, other than a withdrawal
or distribution or portion of a withdrawal or distribution that is a nonqualified withdrawal;
(4) Contributions made to an account under the tuition savings program, including the
“contributions carryover” pursuant to subsection (c)(4)(iv) of this section, if any, subject to the
following limitations, restrictions, and qualifications:
(i) The aggregate subtraction pursuant to this subdivision for any taxable year of the
taxpayer shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or one thousand dollars ($1,000) if a joint
return;
(ii) The following shall not be considered contributions:
(A) Contributions made by any person to an account who is not a participant of the account
at the time the contribution is made;
(B) Transfers or rollovers to an account from any other tuition savings program account or
from any other “qualified tuition program” under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. § 529; or
(C) A change of the beneficiary of the account;
(iii) The subtraction pursuant to this subdivision shall not reduce the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income to less than zero (0);
(iv) The contributions carryover to a taxable year for purpose of this subdivision is the
excess, if any, of the total amount of contributions actually made by the taxpayer to the tuition
savings program for all preceding taxable years for which this subsection is effective over the sum
of:
(A) The total of the subtractions under this subdivision allowable to the taxpayer for all
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -12-)

such preceding taxable years; and
(B) That part of any remaining contribution carryover at the end of the taxable year which
exceeds the amount of any nonqualified withdrawals during the year and the prior two (2) taxable
years not included in the addition provided for in this subdivision for those years. Any such part
shall be disregarded in computing the contributions carryover for any subsequent taxable year;
(v) For any taxable year for which a contributions carryover is applicable, the taxpayer
shall include a computation of the carryover with the taxpayer’s Rhode Island personal income tax
return for that year, and if for any taxable year on which the carryover is based the taxpayer filed a
joint Rhode Island personal income tax return but filed a return on a basis other than jointly for a
subsequent taxable year, the computation shall reflect how the carryover is being allocated between
the prior joint filers;
(5) The modification described in § 44-30-25.1(d)(1);
(6) Amounts deemed taxable income to the taxpayer due to payment or provision of
insurance benefits to a dependent, including a domestic partner pursuant to chapter 12 of title 36 or
other coverage plan;
(7) Modification for organ transplantation.
(i) An individual may subtract up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from federal adjusted
gross income if the individual, while living, donates one or more of their human organs to another
human being for human organ transplantation, except that for purposes of this subsection, “human
organ” means all or part of a liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung, or bone marrow. A subtract
modification that is claimed hereunder may be claimed in the taxable year in which the human
organ transplantation occurs.
(ii) An individual may claim that subtract modification hereunder only once, and the
subtract modification may be claimed for only the following unreimbursed expenses that are
incurred by the claimant and related to the claimant’s organ donation:
(A) Travel expenses.
(B) Lodging expenses.
(C) Lost wages.
(iii) The subtract modification hereunder may not be claimed by a part-time resident or a
nonresident of this state;
(8) Modification for taxable Social Security income.
(i) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2016:
(A) For a person who has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social
Security retirement benefits who files a return as an unmarried individual, head of household, or
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -13-)

married filing separate whose federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000); or
(B) A married individual filing jointly or individual filing qualifying widow(er) who has
attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social Security retirement benefits whose
joint federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), an amount equal to the Social Security benefits includible in federal adjusted gross
income.
(ii) Adjustment for inflation. The dollar amount contained in subsections (c)(8)(i)(A) and
(c)(8)(i)(B) of this section shall be increased annually by an amount equal to:
(A) Such dollar amount contained in subsections (c)(8)(i)(A) and (c)(8)(i)(B) of this section
adjusted for inflation using a base tax year of 2000, multiplied by;
(B) The cost-of-living adjustment with a base year of 2000.
(iii) For the purposes of this section the cost-of-living adjustment for any calendar year is
the percentage (if any) by which the consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeds
the consumer price index for the base year. The consumer price index for any calendar year is the
average of the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve-month (12) period ending on
August 31, of such calendar year.
(iv) For the purpose of this section the term “consumer price index” means the last
consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the department of labor. For the purpose
of this section the revision of the consumer price index which is most consistent with the consumer
price index for calendar year 1986 shall be used.
(v) If any increase determined under this section is not a multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00),
such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00). In the case of a
married individual filing separate return, if any increase determined under this section is not a
multiple of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00);
(9) Modification of taxable retirement income from certain pension plans or
annuities.
(i) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning January
1, 2022, a modification shall be allowed for up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), and for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, a
modification shall be allowed for up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), and for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a modification shall be allowed for up to fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000), of taxable pension and/or annuity income that is included in federal adjusted
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -14-)

gross income for the taxable year:
(A) For a person who has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social
Security retirement benefits who files a return as an unmarried individual, head of household, or
married filing separate whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than the
amount used for the modification contained in subsection (c)(8)(i)(A) of this section an amount not
to exceed $15,000 for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning
January 1, 2022, and an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, and an amount
not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
of taxable pension and/or annuity income includible in federal adjusted gross income; or
(B) For a married individual filing jointly or individual filing qualifying widow(er) who
has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social Security retirement benefits whose
joint federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than the amount used for the
modification contained in subsection (c)(8)(i)(B) of this section an amount not to exceed $15,000
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2022,
and an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, and an amount not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, of taxable pension
and/or annuity income includible in federal adjusted gross income.
(ii) Adjustment for inflation. The dollar amount contained by reference in subsections
(c)(9)(i)(A) and (c)(9)(i)(B) of this section shall be increased annually for tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2018, by an amount equal to:
(A) Such dollar amount contained by reference in subsections (c)(9)(i)(A) and (c)(9)(i)(B)
of this section adjusted for inflation using a base tax year of 2000, multiplied by;
(B) The cost-of-living adjustment with a base year of 2000.
(iii) For the purposes of this section, the cost-of-living adjustment for any calendar year is
the percentage (if any) by which the consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeds
the consumer price index for the base year. The consumer price index for any calendar year is the
average of the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve-month (12) period ending on
August 31, of such calendar year.
(iv) For the purpose of this section, the term “consumer price index” means the last
consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the department of labor. For the purpose
of this section, the revision of the consumer price index which is most consistent with the consumer
price index for calendar year 1986 shall be used.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -15-)

(v) If any increase determined under this section is not a multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00),
such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00). In the case of a
married individual filing a separate return, if any increase determined under this section is not a
multiple of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).
(vi) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the dollar amount contained by
reference in subsection (c)(9)(i)(A) shall be adjusted to equal the dollar amount contained in
subsection (c)(8)(i)(A), as adjusted for inflation, and the dollar amount contained by reference in
subsection(c)(9)(i)(B) shall be adjusted to equal the dollar amount contained in subsection
(c)(8)(i)(B), as adjusted for inflation;
(10) Modification for Rhode Island investment in opportunity zones. For purposes of
a taxpayer’s state tax liability, in the case of any investment in a Rhode Island opportunity zone by
the taxpayer for at least seven (7) years, a modification to income shall be allowed for the
incremental difference between the benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(b)(2)(B)(iv) and
the federal benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(c);
(11) Modification for military service pensions.
(i) For purposes of a taxpayer’s state tax liability, a modification to income shall be allowed
as follows:
(A) For the tax years beginning on January 1, 2023, a taxpayer may subtract from federal
adjusted gross income the taxpayer’s military service pension benefits included in federal adjusted
gross income;
(ii) As used in this subsection, the term “military service” shall have the same meaning as
set forth in 20 C.F.R. § 212.2;
(iii) At no time shall the modification allowed under this subsection alone or in conjunction
with subsection (c)(9) exceed the amount of the military service pension received in the tax year
for which the modification is claimed;
(12) Any rebate issued to the taxpayer pursuant to § 44-30-103 to the extent included in
gross income for federal tax purposes; and
(13) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in the case of a taxpayer that is
licensed in accordance with chapters 28.6 and/or 28.11 of title 21, the amount equal to any
expenditure that is eligible to be claimed as a federal income tax deduction but is disallowed under
26 U.S.C. § 280E.
(d) Modification for Rhode Island fiduciary adjustment. There shall be added to, or
subtracted from, federal adjusted gross income (as the case may be) the taxpayer’s share, as
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -16-)

beneficiary of an estate or trust, of the Rhode Island fiduciary adjustment determined under § 44-
30-17.
(e) Partners. The amounts of modifications required to be made under this section by a
partner, which relate to items of income or deduction of a partnership, shall be determined under §
44-30-15.
SECTION 6. Section 44-18-7.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-18 entitled "Sales and
Use Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-18-7.3. Services defined.
(a) “Services” means all activities engaged in for other persons for a fee, retainer,
commission, or other monetary charge, which activities involve the performance of a service in this
state as distinguished from selling property.
(b) The following businesses and services performed in this state, along with the applicable
2017 North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS) codes, are included in the
definition of services:
(1) Taxicab and limousine services including but not limited to:
(i) Taxicab services including taxi dispatchers (485310); and
(ii) Limousine services (485320).
(2) Other road transportation service including but not limited to:
(i) Charter bus service (485510);
(ii) “Transportation network companies” (TNC) defined as an entity that uses a digital
network to connect transportation network company riders to transportation network operators who
provide prearranged rides. Any TNC operating in this state is a retailer as provided in § 44-18-15
and is required to file a business application and registration form and obtain a permit to make sales
at retail with the tax administrator, to charge, collect, and remit Rhode Island sales and use tax; and
(iii) All other transit and ground passenger transportation (485999).
(3) Pet care services (812910) except veterinary and testing laboratories services.
(4)(i) “Room reseller” or “reseller” means any person, except a tour operator as defined in
§ 42-63.1-2, having any right, permission, license, or other authority from or through a hotel as
defined in § 42-63.1-2, to reserve, or arrange the transfer of occupancy of, accommodations the
reservation or transfer of which is subject to this chapter, such that the occupant pays all or a portion
of the rental and other fees to the room reseller or reseller. Room reseller or reseller shall include,
but not be limited to, sellers of travel packages as defined in this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of any other law, where said reservation or transfer of occupancy is done using a room
reseller or reseller, the application of the sales and use tax under §§ 44-18-18 and 44-18-20, and
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -17-)

the hotel tax under § 44-18-36.1 shall be as follows: The room reseller or reseller is required to
register with, and shall collect and pay to, the tax administrator the sales and use and hotel taxes,
with said taxes being calculated upon the amount of rental and other fees paid by the occupant to
the room reseller or reseller, less the amount of any rental and other fees paid by the room reseller
or reseller to the hotel. The hotel shall collect and pay to the tax administrator said taxes upon the
amount of rental and other fees paid to the hotel by the room reseller or reseller and/or the occupant.
No assessment shall be made by the tax administrator against a hotel because of an incorrect
remittance of the taxes under this chapter by a room reseller or reseller. No assessment shall be
made by the tax administrator against a room reseller or reseller because of an incorrect remittance
of the taxes under this chapter by a hotel. If the hotel has paid the taxes imposed under this chapter,
the occupant and/or room reseller or reseller, as applicable, shall reimburse the hotel for said taxes.
If the room reseller or reseller has paid said taxes, the occupant shall reimburse the room reseller
or reseller for said taxes. Each hotel and room reseller or reseller shall add and collect, from the
occupant or the room reseller or the reseller, the full amount of the taxes imposed on the rental and
other fees. When added to the rental and other fees, the taxes shall be a debt owed by the occupant
to the hotel or room reseller or reseller, as applicable, and shall be recoverable at law in the same
manner as other debts. The amount of the taxes collected by the hotel and/or room reseller or
reseller from the occupant under this chapter shall be stated and charged separately from the rental
and other fees, and shall be shown separately on all records thereof, whether made at the time the
transfer of occupancy occurs, or on any evidence of the transfer issued or used by the hotel or the
room reseller or the reseller. A room reseller or reseller shall not be required to disclose to the
occupant the amount of tax charged by the hotel; provided, however, the room reseller or reseller
shall represent to the occupant that the separately stated taxes charged by the room reseller or
reseller include taxes charged by the hotel. No person shall operate a hotel in this state, or act as a
room reseller or reseller for any hotel in the state, unless the tax administrator has issued a permit
pursuant to § 44-19-1.
(ii) “Travel package” means a room, or rooms, bundled with one or more other, separate
components of travel such as air transportation, car rental, or similar items, which travel package
is charged to the customer or occupant for a single, retail price. When the room occupancy is
bundled for a single consideration, with other property, services, amusement charges, or any other
items, the separate sale of which would not otherwise be subject to tax under this chapter, the entire
single consideration shall be treated as the rental or other fees for room occupancy subject to tax
under this chapter; provided, however, that where the amount of the rental, or other fees for room
occupancy is stated separately from the price of such other property, services, amusement charges,
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -18-)

or other items, on any sales slip, invoice, receipt, or other statement given the occupant, and such
rental and other fees are determined by the tax administrator to be reasonable in relation to the
value of such other property, services, amusement charges, or other items, only such separately
stated rental and other fees will be subject to tax under this chapter. The value of the transfer of any
room, or rooms, bundled as part of a travel package may be determined by the tax administrator
from the room reseller’s and/or reseller’s and/or hotel’s books and records that are kept in the
regular course of business.
(5) Investigation, Guard, and Armored Car Services (561611, 561612 & 561613).
(6) "Parking services" (812930) means the act of offering a parking space in or on a parking
facility for purposes of occupancy by a patron in exchange for a parking fee for a duration of less
than one month.
(c) All services as defined herein are required to file a business application and registration
form and obtain a permit to make sales at retail with the tax administrator, to charge, collect, and
remit Rhode Island sales and use tax.
(d) The tax administrator is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 to carry out the provisions, policies, and purposes of
this chapter.
SECTION 7. Section 44-18-36.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-18 entitled "Sales and
Use Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-18-36.1. Hotel tax Hotel tax and whole home short-term rental tax.
(a) There is imposed a hotel tax of five percent (5%) upon the total consideration charged
for occupancy of any space furnished by any hotel, travel packages, or room reseller or reseller as
defined in § 44-18-7.3(b) in this state. A house, condominium, or other resident dwelling shall be
exempt from the five percent (5%) hotel tax under this subsection if the house, condominium, or
other resident dwelling is rented in its entirety. The hotel tax is in addition to any sales tax imposed.
This hotel tax is administered and collected by the division of taxation and unless provided to the
contrary in this chapter, all the administration, collection, and other provisions of chapters 18 and
19 of this title apply. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the powers of the convention
authority of the city of Providence established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 84 of the public
laws of 1980, except that distribution of hotel tax receipts shall be made pursuant to chapter 63.1
of title 42 rather than chapter 84 of the public laws of 1980.
(b) There is hereby levied and imposed, upon the total consideration charged for occupancy
of any space furnished by any hotel in this state, in addition to all other taxes and fees now imposed
by law, a local hotel tax at a rate of one percent (1%) through December 31, 2025, and two percent
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -19-)

(2%) for tax periods beginning on or after January 1, 2026. The local hotel tax shall be administered
and collected in accordance with subsection (a).
(c) All sums received by the division of taxation from the local hotel tax, penalties or
forfeitures, interest, costs of suit and fines shall be distributed at least quarterly, credited and paid
by the state treasurer to the city or town where the space for occupancy that is furnished by the
hotel is located. Unless provided to the contrary in this chapter, all of the administration, collection,
and other provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of this title shall apply.
(d) There is hereby levied and imposed, upon the total consideration charged for
occupancy, as defined in § 42-63.1-2(6), of a house, condominium, or other resident dwelling in
this state rented in its entirety furnished by any room reseller or reseller as defined in § 44-18-7.3(b)
or any other taxpayer, in addition to all other taxes and fees now imposed by law, a whole home
short-term rental tax at a rate of five percent (5%). The whole home short-term rental tax shall be
administered, collected, and distributed in accordance with subsection (a).
(d)(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the city of Newport
shall have the authority to collect from hotels located in the city of Newport the tax imposed by
subsection (a) subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The city of Newport shall also have the
authority to collect the tax imposed by subsection (d) of this section with respect to a house,
condominium, or other resident dwelling rented in its entirety located in the city of Newport.
(1) Within ten (10) days of collection of the tax taxes, the city of Newport shall distribute
the tax taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (d) of this section as provided in § 42-63.1-3. No later
than the first day of March and the first day of September in each year in which the tax is taxes are
collected, the city of Newport shall submit to the division of taxation a report of the tax taxes
collected and distributed during the six (6) month period ending thirty (30) days prior to the
reporting date.
(2) The city of Newport shall have the same authority as the division of taxation to recover
delinquent hotel and/or whole home short-term rental taxes pursuant to chapter 44-19, and the
amount of any hotel and/or whole home short-term rental tax, penalty and interest imposed by the
city of Newport until collected constitutes a lien on the real property of the taxpayer.
SECTION 8. Section 44-20-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-1. Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2025.]
Whenever used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Administrator” means the tax administrator.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -20-)

(2) “Cigarettes” means and includes any cigarettes suitable for smoking in cigarette form,
“heat not burn products,” and each sheet of cigarette rolling paper, including but not limited to,
paper made into a hollow cylinder or cone, made with paper or any other material, with or without
a filter suitable for use in making cigarettes.
(3) “Dealer” means any person whether located within or outside of this state, who sells or
distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products to a consumer in this state.
(4) “Distributor” means any person:
(i) Whether located within or outside of this state, other than a dealer, who sells or
distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products within or into this state. Such term shall not include any cigarette or other tobacco product
manufacturer, export warehouse proprietor, or importer with a valid permit under 26 U.S.C. § 5712,
if such person sells or distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic
nicotine-delivery system products in this state only to licensed distributors, or to an export
warehouse proprietor or another manufacturer with a valid permit under 26 U.S.C. § 5712;
(ii) Selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery
system products directly to purchasers in this state by means of at least twenty-five (25) vending
machines;
(iii) Engaged in this state in the business of manufacturing cigarettes and/or other tobacco
products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products or any person engaged in the business
of selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products to dealers, or to other persons, for the purpose of resale only; provided, that seventy-five
percent (75%) of all cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery
system products sold by that person in this state are sold to dealers or other persons for resale and
selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products
directly to at least forty (40) dealers or other persons for resale; or
(iv) Maintaining one or more regular places of business in this state for that purpose;
provided, that seventy-five percent (75%) of the sold cigarettes and/or other tobacco products
and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products are purchased directly from the manufacturer
and selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products directly to at least forty (40) dealers or other persons for resale.
(5) “Electronic nicotine-delivery system” means an electronic device that may be used to
simulate smoking in the delivery of nicotine or other substance to a person inhaling from the device,
and includes, but is not limited to, an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo,
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -21-)

electronic little cigars, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, e-liquids, e-liquid products, or any related
device and any cartridge or other component of such device.
(6) “Electronic nicotine-delivery system products” means any combination of electronic
nicotine-delivery system and/or e-liquid and/or any derivative thereof, and/or any e-liquid
container. Electronic nicotine-delivery system products shall include hemp-derived consumable
CBD products as defined in § 2-26-3.
(7) “E-liquid” and “e-liquid products” mean any liquid or substance placed in or sold for
use in an electronic nicotine-delivery system that generally utilizes a heating element that
aerosolizes, vaporizes, or combusts a liquid or other substance containing nicotine or nicotine
derivative:
(i) Whether the liquid or substance contains nicotine or a nicotine derivative; or
(ii) Whether sold separately or sold in combination with a personal vaporizer, electronic
nicotine-delivery system, or an electronic inhaler.
(8) “Importer” means any person who imports into the United States, either directly or
indirectly, a finished cigarette or other tobacco product and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
product for sale or distribution.
(9) “Licensed,” when used with reference to a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or
dealer, means only those persons who hold a valid and current license issued under § 44-20-2 for
the type of business being engaged in. When the term “licensed” is used before a list of entities,
such as “licensed manufacturer, importer, wholesale dealer, or retailer dealer,” such term shall be
deemed to apply to each entity in such list.
(10) “Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures, fabricates, assembles,
processes, or labels a finished cigarette and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-
delivery system products.
(11) “Other tobacco products” (OTP) means any products that are made from or derived
from tobacco or that contain nicotine, whether natural or artificial, including, but not limited to,
cigars (excluding Little Cigars, as defined in § 44-20.2-1, which are subject to cigarette tax),
cheroots, stogies, smoking tobacco (including granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed and
any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for smoking in a pipe or otherwise), chewing tobacco
(including Cavendish, twist, plug, scrap and any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for
chewing), any and all forms of hookah, shisha and “mu’assel” tobacco, snuff, and shall include any
other articles or products made of, derived from, or containing tobacco or nicotine, in whole or in
part, or any tobacco or nicotine substitute, except cigarettes and electronic nicotine-delivery system
products. Other tobacco products shall not mean any product that has been approved by the United
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -22-)

States Food and Drug Administration for the sale of or use as a tobacco or nicotine cessation
product or for other medical purposes and is marketed and sold or prescribed exclusively for that
approved purpose.
(12) “Person” means any individual, including an employee or agent, firm, fiduciary,
partnership, corporation, trust, or association, however formed.
(13) “Pipe” means an apparatus made of any material used to burn or vaporize products so
that the smoke or vapors can be inhaled or ingested by the user.
(14) “Place of business” means any location where cigarettes and/or other tobacco products
and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products are sold, stored, or kept, including, but not
limited to; any storage room, attic, basement, garage or other facility immediately adjacent to the
location. It also includes any receptacle, hide, vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending machine.
(15) “Sale” or “sell” means gifts, exchanges, and barter of cigarettes and/or other tobacco
products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products. The act of holding, storing, or
keeping cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products at a place of business for any purpose shall be presumed to be holding the cigarettes and/or
other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products for sale. Furthermore,
any sale of cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products by the servants, employees, or agents of the licensed dealer during business hours at the
place of business shall be presumed to be a sale by the licensee.
(16) “Stamp” means the impression, device, stamp, label, or print manufactured, printed,
or made as prescribed by the administrator to be affixed to packages of cigarettes, as evidence of
the payment of the tax provided by this chapter or to indicate that the cigarettes are intended for a
sale or distribution in this state that is exempt from state tax under the provisions of state law; and
also includes impressions made by metering machines authorized to be used under the provisions
of this chapter.
SECTION 9. Section 44-20-13.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-13.2. Tax imposed on other tobacco products, smokeless tobacco, cigars, pipe
tobacco products, and electronic nicotine-delivery products.[Effective January 1, 2025.]
(a) A tax is imposed on all other tobacco products, smokeless tobacco, cigars, pipe tobacco
products, and electronic nicotine-delivery system products sold, or held for sale in the state by any
person, the payment of the tax to be accomplished according to a mechanism established by the
administrator, division of taxation, department of revenue. The tax imposed by this section shall be
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -23-)

as follows:
(1) For all other tobacco products, smokeless tobacco, cigars, and pipe tobacco products,
at the rate of eighty percent (80%) of the wholesale cost of other tobacco products, cigars, pipe
tobacco products, and smokeless tobacco other than snuff.
(2) Notwithstanding the eighty percent (80%) rate in subsection (a)(1) of this section, in
the case of cigars, the tax shall not exceed fifty cents ($.50) for each cigar.
(3) At the rate of one dollar ($1.00) per ounce of snuff, and a proportionate tax at the like
rate on all fractional parts of an ounce thereof. Such tax shall be computed based on the net weight
as listed by the manufacturer; provided, however, that any product listed by the manufacturer as
having a net weight of less than 1.2 ounces shall be taxed as if the product has a net weight of 1.2
ounces.
(4) Effective January 1, 2025:
(i) For electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the
manufacturer, and not refillable, at the rate of fifty cents per milliliter ($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid
and/or e-liquid products contained therein; and
(ii) For any other electronic nicotine-delivery system products, at the rate of ten percent
(10%) of the wholesale cost of such products, whether or not sold at wholesale, and if not sold,
then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler.
(iii) Existing Inventory Floor Tax. For all electronic nicotine-delivery system products held
by licensed electronic nicotine-delivery system products retailers as of January 1, 2025: Each
person engaging in the business of selling electronic nicotine-delivery system products at retail in
this state shall pay a tax measured by the volume of e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained in
electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not
refillable and the wholesale cost of all other electronic nicotine-delivery system products held by
the person in this state at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2025, and is computed for electronic nicotine-
delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable, at the
rate of fifty cents per milliliter ($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained therein
and for any other electronic nicotine-delivery system products at the rate of ten percent (10%) of
the wholesale cost of such products on January 1, 2025. Each person subject to the payment of the
tax imposed by this section shall, on or before January 16, 2025, file a return, under oath or certified
under the penalties of perjury, with the administrator on forms furnished by the administrator,
showing the volume of e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained in electronic nicotine-delivery
system products which are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable and the
wholesale cost of all other electronic nicotine-delivery system products in that person’s possession
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -24-)

in this state at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2025, as described in this section, and the amount of tax
due, and shall at the time of filing the return pay the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms
shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a return containing the information required by the
administrator.
(iv) For all electronic nicotine-delivery system products sold by licensed electronic
nicotine-delivery system products distributors, manufacturers, and/or importers in Rhode Island as
of January 1, 2025: Any person engaging in the business of distributing at wholesale electronic
nicotine-delivery system products in this state shall pay a tax measured by the volume of e-liquid
and/or e-liquid products contained in electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled,
sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable computed at the rate of fifty cents per milliliter
($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained therein and for all other electronic
nicotine-delivery system products at the rate of ten percent (10%) of the wholesale cost of such
products.
(b)(1) Prior to January 1, 2025, any dealer having in the dealer’s possession any other
tobacco products with respect to the storage or use of which a tax is imposed by this section shall,
within five (5) days after coming into possession of the other tobacco products in this state, file a
return with the tax administrator in a form prescribed by the tax administrator. The return shall be
accompanied by a payment of the amount of the tax shown on the form to be due. Records required
under this section shall be preserved on the premises described in the relevant license in such a
manner as to ensure permanency and accessibility for inspection at reasonable hours by authorized
personnel of the administrator.
(2) Effective January 1, 2025, all other tobacco products, except for cigars, and electronic
nicotine-delivery system products sold at wholesale in Rhode Island must be sold by a Rhode Island
licensed distributor, manufacturer, or importer, and purchases of other tobacco products, except for
cigars, and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products, from an unlicensed distributor,
manufacturer, or importer are prohibited. Any other tobacco products, except for cigars, and/or
electronic nicotine-delivery system products purchased and/or obtained from an unlicensed person
shall be subject to the terms of this chapter including, but not limited to, § 44-20-15 and shall be
taxed pursuant to this section.
(3) Effective January 1, 2025, any dealer having in the dealer’s possession any cigars with
respect to the storage or use of which a tax is imposed by this section shall, within five (5) days
after coming into possession of cigars in this state, file a return with the tax administrator in a form
prescribed by the tax administrator. The return shall be accompanied by a payment of the amount
of the tax shown on the form to be due. Records required under this section shall be preserved on
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -25-)

the premises described in the relevant license in such a manner as to ensure permanency and
accessibility for inspection at reasonable hours by authorized personnel of the administrator.
(c) Existing Inventory Floor Tax.
(1) For all nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products held by licensed retailers as of October 1 2025: Each
person engaging in the business of selling nicotine products at retail in this state shall pay a tax at
the rate of eighty percent (80%) of the wholesale cost of such products on October 1, 2025. Each
person subject to the payment of the tax imposed by this section shall, on or before October 16,
2025, file a return, under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury. with the administrator on
forms furnished by the administrator, showing the wholesale cost of all nicotine products not
previously taxed as other tobacco products in that person's possession in this state at 12:01 a.m. on
October 1, 2025, as described in this section, and the amount of tax due. and shall at the time of
filing the return pay the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms shall not be an excuse for
the failure to make a return containing the information required by the administrator.
(2) For all nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products held by licensed distributors, manufacturers, and/or
importers in Rhode Island as of October 1, 2025: Each person engaging in the business of
distributing at wholesale nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products in this state shall pay a tax at the rate of eighty percent
(80%) of the wholesale cost of such products on October 1, 2025. Each person subject to the
payment of the tax imposed by this section shall, on or before October 16, 2025, file a return, under
oath or certified under the penalties of perjury, with the administrator on forms furnished by the
administrator, showing the wholesale cost of all nicotine products not previously taxed as other
tobacco products in that person's possession in this state at 12:01 a.m. on October 1, 2025, as
described in this section, and the amount of tax due, and shall at the time of filing the return pay
the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a
return containing the information required by the administrator.
(c)(d) The proceeds collected are paid into the general fund.
SECTION 10. Section 44-25-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-25 entitled "Real Estate
Conveyance Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-25-1. Tax imposed — Payment — Burden.
(a) There is imposed, on each deed, instrument, or writing by which any lands, tenements,
or other realty sold is granted, assigned, transferred, or conveyed, to, or vested in, the purchaser or
purchasers, or any other person or persons, by his, her, or their direction, or on any grant,
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -26-)

assignment, transfer, or conveyance or such vesting, by such persons that has the effect of making
any real estate company an acquired real estate company, when the consideration paid exceeds one
hundred dollars ($100), a tax at the rate of two dollars and thirty cents ($2.30) three dollars and
seventy-five cents ($3.75) for each five hundred dollars ($500), or fractional part of it, that is paid
for the purchase of property or the interest in an acquired real estate company (inclusive of the
value of any lien or encumbrance remaining at the time the sale, grant, assignment, transfer, or
conveyance or vesting occurs, or in the case of an interest in an acquired real estate company, a
percentage of the value of such lien or encumbrance equivalent to the percentage interest in the
acquired real estate company being granted, assigned, transferred, conveyed, or vested). The tax is
payable at the time of making, the execution, delivery, acceptance, or presentation for recording of
any instrument affecting such transfer, grant, assignment, transfer, conveyance, or vesting. In the
absence of an agreement to the contrary, the tax shall be paid by the grantor, assignor, transferor,
or person making the conveyance or vesting.
(b) In addition to the tax imposed by subsection (a), there is imposed, on each deed,
instrument, or writing by which any residential real property sold is granted, assigned, transferred,
or conveyed to, or vested in, the purchaser or purchasers, or any other person or persons, by his,
her, or their direction, or on any grant, assignment, transfer, or conveyance or such vesting, by such
persons that has the effect of making any real estate company an acquired real estate company,
when the consideration paid exceeds eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000), a tax at the rate of
two dollars and thirty cents ($2.30) three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) for each five
hundred dollars ($500), or fractional part of it, of the consideration in excess of eight hundred
thousand dollars ($800,000) that is paid for the purchase of residential real property or the interest
in an acquired real estate company (inclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining at
the time the sale, grant, assignment, transfer, or conveyance or vesting occurs, or in the case of an
interest in an acquired real estate company, a percentage of the value of such lien or encumbrance
equivalent to the percentage interest in the acquired real estate company being granted, assigned,
transferred, conveyed, or vested). The tax imposed by this subsection shall be paid at the same time
and in the same manner as the tax imposed by subsection (a) For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, the threshold of eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) provided pursuant to
this section shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban
Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined
as of September 30 of the prior calendar years. Said adjustment shall be compounded annually and
shall be rounded up to the nearest five-dollar ($5.00) increment. In no event shall the threshold in
any tax year be less than the prior tax year.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -27-)

(c) In the event no consideration is actually paid for the lands, tenements, or realty, the
instrument or interest in an acquired real estate company of conveyance shall contain a statement
to the effect that the consideration is such that no documentary stamps are required.
(d) The tax shall be distributed as follows:
(1) With respect to the tax imposed by subsection (a): the tax administrator shall contribute
to the distressed community relief program the sum of thirty cents ($.30) fifty cents ($.50) per two
dollars and thirty cents ($2.30) three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) of the face value of the
stamps to be distributed pursuant to § 45-13-12, and to the housing resources and homelessness
restricted receipt account established pursuant to § 42-128-2 the sum of thirty cents ($.30) fifty
cents ($.50) per two dollars and thirty cents ($2.30) three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) of
the face value of the stamps. The state shall retain sixty cents ($.60) ninety-five cents ($.95) for
state use. The balance of the tax shall be retained by the municipality collecting the tax.
(2) With respect to the tax imposed by subsection (b): the tax administrator shall contribute
the entire tax to the housing production fund established to the housing production fund the sum of
two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) to be distributed
pursuant to § 42-128-2.1, and to the housing resources and homelessness restricted receipt account
the sum of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to be distributed pursuant to § 42-128-2.
(3) Notwithstanding the above, in the case of the tax on the grant, transfer, assignment, or
conveyance or vesting with respect to an acquired real estate company, the tax shall be collected
by the tax administrator and shall be distributed to the municipality where the real estate owned by
the acquired real estate company is located; provided, however, in the case of any such tax collected
by the tax administrator, if the acquired real estate company owns property located in more than
one municipality, the proceeds of the tax shall be allocated amongst said municipalities in the
proportion the assessed value of said real estate in each such municipality bears to the total of the
assessed values of all of the real estate owned by the acquired real estate company in Rhode Island.
Provided, however, in fiscal years 2004 and 2005, from the proceeds of this tax, the tax
administrator shall deposit as general revenues the sum of ninety cents ($.90) per two dollars and
thirty cents ($2.30) of the face value of the stamps. The balance of the tax on the purchase of
property shall be retained by the municipality collecting the tax. The balance of the tax on the
transfer with respect to an acquired real estate company, shall be collected by the tax administrator
and shall be distributed to the municipality where the property for which interest is sold is
physically located. Provided, however, that in the case of any tax collected by the tax administrator
with respect to an acquired real estate company where the acquired real estate company owns
property located in more than one municipality, the proceeds of the tax shall be allocated amongst
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -28-)

the municipalities in proportion that the assessed value in any such municipality bears to the
assessed values of all of the real estate owned by the acquired real estate company in Rhode Island.
(e) For purposes of this section, the term “acquired real estate company” means a real estate
company that has undergone a change in ownership interest if (1) The change does not affect the
continuity of the operations of the company; and (2) The change, whether alone or together with
prior changes has the effect of granting, transferring, assigning, or conveying or vesting,
transferring directly or indirectly, 50% or more of the total ownership in the company within a
period of three (3) years. For purposes of the foregoing subsection (e)(2), a grant, transfer,
assignment, or conveyance or vesting, shall be deemed to have occurred within a period of three
(3) years of another grant(s), transfer(s), assignment(s), or conveyance(s) or vesting(s) if during the
period the granting, transferring, assigning, or conveying party provides the receiving party a
legally binding document granting, transferring, assigning, or conveying or vesting the realty or a
commitment or option enforceable at a future date to execute the grant, transfer, assignment, or
conveyance or vesting.
(f) A real estate company is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other
legal entity that meets any of the following:
(1) Is primarily engaged in the business of holding, selling, or leasing real estate, where
90% or more of the ownership of the real estate is held by 35 or fewer persons and which company
either (i) derives 60% or more of its annual gross receipts from the ownership or disposition of real
estate; or (ii) owns real estate the value of which comprises 90% or more of the value of the entity’s
entire tangible asset holdings exclusive of tangible assets that are fairly transferrable and actively
traded on an established market; or
(2) Ninety percent or more of the ownership interest in such entity is held by 35 or fewer
persons and the entity owns as 90% or more of the fair market value of its assets a direct or indirect
interest in a real estate company. An indirect ownership interest is an interest in an entity 90% or
more of which is held by 35 or fewer persons and the purpose of the entity is the ownership of a
real estate company.
(g) In the case of a grant, assignment, transfer, or conveyance or vesting that results in a
real estate company becoming an acquired real estate company, the grantor, assignor, transferor, or
person making the conveyance or causing the vesting, shall file or cause to be filed with the division
of taxation, at least five (5) days prior to the grant, transfer, assignment, or conveyance or vesting,
notification of the proposed grant, transfer, assignment, or conveyance or vesting, the price, terms
and conditions thereof, and the character and location of all of the real estate assets held by the real
estate company and shall remit the tax imposed and owed pursuant to subsection (a). Any such
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -29-)

grant, transfer, assignment, or conveyance or vesting which results in a real estate company
becoming an acquired real estate company shall be fraudulent and void as against the state unless
the entity notifies the tax administrator in writing of the grant, transfer, assignment, or conveyance
or vesting as herein required in subsection (g) and has paid the tax as required in subsection (a).
Upon the payment of the tax by the transferor, the tax administrator shall issue a certificate of the
payment of the tax which certificate shall be recordable in the land evidence records in each
municipality in which such real estate company owns real estate. Where the real estate company
has assets other than interests in real estate located in Rhode Island, the tax shall be based upon the
assessed value of each parcel of property located in each municipality in the state of Rhode Island.
SECTION 11. Section 44-31-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-31 entitled "Investment
Tax Credit" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-31-2. Specialized investment tax credit.
(a) A certified building owner, as provided in chapter 64.7 of title 42, may be allowed a
specialized investment tax credit against the tax imposed by chapters 11, 14, 17 and 30 of this title.
(b) The taxpayer may claim credit for the rehabilitation and reconstruction costs of a
certified building, which has been substantially rehabilitated. Once substantial rehabilitation is
established by the taxpayer, the taxpayer may claim credit for all rehabilitation and reconstruction
costs incurred with respect to the certified building within five (5) years from the date of final
designation of the certified building by the council pursuant to § 42-64.7-6.
(c) The credit shall be ten percent (10%) of the rehabilitation and reconstruction costs of
the certified building. The credit shall be allowable in the year the substantially rehabilitated
certified building is first placed into service, which is the year in which, under the taxpayer’s
depreciation practice, the period for depreciation with respect to such property begins, or the year
in which the property is placed in a condition or state of readiness and availability for its specifically
assigned function, whichever is earlier.
(d) The credit shall not offset any tax liability in taxable years other than the year or years
in which the taxpayer qualifies for the credit. The credit shall not reduce the tax below the
minimum. Amounts of unused credit for this taxpayer may be carried over and offset against this
taxpayer’s tax for a period not to exceed the following seven (7) taxable years.
(e) In the case of a corporation, this credit is only allowed against the tax of that of a
corporation included in a consolidated return that qualifies for the credit and not against the tax of
other corporations that may join in the filing of a consolidated tax return.
(f) Sunset. No credits shall be allowed under this section for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026. Credits allowed for tax years ending on or before December 31, 2025, may be
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -30-)

carried forward into tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, in accordance with subsection
(d) of this section.
SECTION 12. Sections 44-31.2-5 and 44-31-.2-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-31.2
entitled "Motion Picture Production Tax Credits" are hereby amended to read as follows:
44-31.2-5. Motion picture production company tax credit.
(a) A motion picture production company shall be allowed a credit to be computed as
provided in this chapter against a tax imposed by chapters 11, 14, 17, and 30 of this title. The
amount of the credit shall be thirty percent (30%) of the state-certified production costs incurred
directly attributable to activity within the state, provided:
(1) That the primary locations are within the state of Rhode Island and the total production
budget as defined herein is a minimum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(2) The motion picture production incurs and pays a minimum of ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in state-certified production costs within a twelve-month (12) period.
The credit shall be earned in the taxable year in which production in Rhode Island is
completed, as determined by the film office in final certification pursuant to § 44-31.2-6(c).
(b) For the purposes of this section: “total production budget” means and includes the
motion picture production company’s pre-production, production, and post-production costs
incurred for the production activities of the motion picture production company in Rhode Island in
connection with the production of a state-certified production. The budget shall not include costs
associated with the promotion or marketing of the film, video, or television product.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the credit shall not exceed seven million
dollars ($7,000,000) and shall be allowed against the tax for the taxable period in which the credit
is earned and can be carried forward for not more than three (3) succeeding tax years. Pursuant to
rules promulgated by the tax administrator, the administrator may issue a waiver of the seven
million dollars ($7,000,000) tax credit cap for any feature-length film or television series up to the
remaining funds available pursuant to section (e) of this section.
(d) Credits allowed to a motion picture production company, which is a subchapter S
corporation, partnership, or a limited liability company that is taxed as a partnership, shall be passed
through respectively to persons designated as partners, members, or owners on a pro rata basis or
pursuant to an executed agreement among such persons designated as subchapter S corporation
shareholders, partners, or members documenting an alternate distribution method without regard to
their sharing of other tax or economic attributes of such entity.
(e) No more than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in total may be issued for any tax
year beginning after December 31, 2007, for motion picture tax credits pursuant to this chapter
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -31-)

and/or musical and theatrical production tax credits pursuant to chapter 31.3 of this title. After
December 31, 2019, no more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in total may be issued for
any tax year for motion picture tax credits pursuant to this chapter and/or musical and theater
production tax credits pursuant to chapter 31.3 of this title. Said credits shall be equally available
to motion picture productions and musical and theatrical productions. No specific amount shall be
set aside for either type of production.
(f) Exclusively for tax year 2022 and tax year 2023, the total amount of motion picture tax
credits issued pursuant to this section and/or musical and theatrical production tax credits pursuant
to chapter 31.3 of this title shall not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) thirty-five million
dollars ($35,000,000).
(g) Exclusively for tax year 2023 and tax year 2024, the total amount of motion picture tax
credits issued pursuant to this section and/or musical and theatrical production tax credits pursuant
to chapter 31.3 of this title shall not exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000).
44-31.2-6. Certification and administration.
(a) Initial certification of a production. The applicant shall properly prepare, sign, and
submit to the film office an application for initial certification of the Rhode Island production. The
application shall include such information and data as the film office deems necessary for the proper
evaluation and administration of the application, including, but not limited to, any information
about the motion picture production company, and a specific Rhode Island motion picture. The film
office shall review the completed application and determine whether it meets the requisite criteria
and qualifications for the initial certification for the production. If the initial certification is granted,
the film office shall issue a notice of initial certification of the motion picture production to the
motion picture production company and to the tax administrator. The notice shall state that, after
appropriate review, the initial application meets the appropriate criteria for conditional eligibility.
The notice of initial certification will provide a unique identification number for the production
based on the estimated completion date of the production and is only a statement of conditional
eligibility for the production and, as such, does not grant or convey any Rhode Island tax benefits.
The motion picture production company is responsible for notifying the film office and the Rhode
Island division of taxation if it does not expect to complete its production within the same calendar
year of its estimated completion date. If the motion picture production company does not expect to
complete its production within the same calendar year of its estimated completion date, it shall
notify both the film office and the Rhode Island division of taxation immediately upon learning of
the reason for the change in completion date.
(b) Final certification of a production. Upon completion of the Rhode Island production
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -32-)

activities, the applicant shall request a certificate of good standing from the Rhode Island division
of taxation. The certificates shall verify to the film office the motion picture production company’s
compliance with the requirements of § 44-31.2-2(11). The applicant shall properly prepare, sign,
and submit to the film office an application for final certification of the production and which must
include the certificate of good standing from the division of taxation. In addition, the application
shall contain such information and data as the film office determines is necessary for the proper
evaluation and administration, including, but not limited to, any information about the motion
picture production company, its investors, and information about the production previously granted
initial certification. The final application shall also contain a cost report and an “accountant’s
certification.” The film office and tax administrator may rely without independent investigation,
upon the accountant’s certification, in the form of an opinion, confirming the accuracy of the
information included in the cost report. Upon review of a duly completed and filed application, the
film office will make a determination pertaining to the final certification of the production. Within
ninety (90) days after the division of taxation’s receipt of the motion picture production company
final certification and cost report, the division of taxation shall issue a certification of the amount
of credit for which the motion picture production company qualifies under § 44-31.2-5. To claim
the tax credit, the division of taxation’s certification as to the amount of the tax credit shall be
attached to all state tax returns on which the credit is claimed.
(c) Final certification and credits. Upon determination that the motion picture production
company qualifies for final certification, the film office shall issue a letter to the production
company indicating “certificate of completion of a state-certified production.” A motion picture
production company is prohibited from using state funds, state loans, or state guaranteed loans to
qualify for the motion picture tax credit. All documents that are issued by the film office pursuant
to this section shall reference the identification number that was issued to the production as part of
its initial certification.
(d) The director of the Rhode Island council on the arts, in consultation as needed with the
tax administrator, shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the
intent and purposes of this chapter in accordance with the general guidelines provided herein for
the certification of the production and the resultant production credit.
(e) The tax administrator of the division of taxation, in consultation with the director of the
Rhode Island film and television office, shall promulgate the rules and regulations as are necessary
to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter in accordance with the general guidelines for
the tax credit provided herein.
(f) Any motion picture production company applying for the credit shall be required to
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -33-)

reimburse the division of taxation for any audits required in relation to granting the credit.
SECTION 13. Sections 44-32-1, 44-32-2 and 44-32-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-
32 entitled "Elective Deduction for Research and Development Facilities" are hereby amended to
read as follows:
44-32-1. Elective deduction against allocated entire net income.
(a) General. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, at the election of a taxpayer
who is subject to the income tax imposed by chapters 11 or 30 of this title, there shall be deducted
from the portion of its entire net income allocated within the state the items prescribed in subsection
(b) of this section, in lieu of depreciation or investment tax credit.
(b) One-year write-off of new research and development facilities.
(1) Expenditures paid or incurred during the taxable year for the construction,
reconstruction, erection or acquisition of any new, not used, property as described in subsection (c)
of this section, which is used or to be used for purposes of research and development in the
experimental or laboratory sense. The purposes are not deemed to include the ordinary testing or
inspection of materials or products for quality control, efficiency surveys, management studies,
consumer surveys, advertising, promotion, or research in connection with literary, historical, or
similar projects. The deduction shall be allowed only on condition that the entire net income for
the taxable year and all succeeding taxable years is computed without the deduction of any
expenditures and without any deduction for depreciation of the property, except to the extent that
its basis may be attributable to factors other than the expenditures, (expenditures and depreciation
deducted for federal income tax purposes shall be added to the entire net income allocated to Rhode
Island), or in case a deduction is allowable pursuant to this subdivision for only a part of the
expenditures, on condition that any deduction allowed for federal income tax purposes on account
of the expenditures or on account of depreciation of the property is proportionately reduced in
computing the entire net income for the taxable year and all succeeding taxable years. Concerning
property that is used or to be used for research and development only in part, or during only part of
its useful life, a proportionate part of the expenditures shall be deductible. If all or part of the
expenditures concerning any property has been deducted as provided in this section, and the
property is used for purposes other than research and development to a greater extent than originally
reported, the taxpayer shall report the use in its report for the first taxable year during which it
occurs, and the tax administrator may recompute the tax for the year or years for which the
deduction was allowed, and may assess any additional tax resulting from the recomputation as a
current tax, within three (3) years of the reporting of the change to the tax administrator. Any
change in use of the property in whole or in part from that, which originally qualified the property
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -34-)

for the deduction, requires a recomputation. The tax administrator has the authority to promulgate
regulations to prevent the avoidance of tax liability.
(2) The deduction shall be allowed only where an election for amortization of air or water
pollution control facilities has not been exercised in respect to the same property.
(3) The tax as a result of recomputation of a prior year’s deduction is due as an additional
tax for the year the property ceases to qualify.
(c) Property covered by deductions. The deductions shall be allowed only with respect to
tangible property which is new, not used, is depreciable pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 167, was acquired
by purchase as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 179(d), has a situs in this state, and is used in the taxpayer’s
trade or business. For the taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 1974, a taxpayer is not allowed
a deduction under this section with respect to tangible property leased by it to any other person or
corporation or leased from any other person or corporation. For purposes of the preceding sentence,
any contract or agreement to lease or rent or for a license to use the property is considered a lease,
unless the contract or agreement is treated for federal income tax purposes as an installment
purchase rather than a lease. With respect to property that the taxpayer uses itself for purposes other
than leasing for part of a taxable year and leases for a part of a taxable year, the taxpayer shall be
allowed a deduction under this section in proportion to the part of the year it uses the property.
(d) Entire net income. “Entire net income”, as used in this section, means net income
allocated to this state.
(e) Carry-over of excess deductions. If the deductions allowable for any taxable year
pursuant to this section exceed the portion of the taxpayer’s entire net income allocated to this state
for that year, the excess may be carried over to the following taxable year or years, not to exceed
three (3) years, and may be deducted from the portion of the taxpayer’s entire net income allocated
to this state for that year or years.
(f) Gain or loss on sale or disposition of property. In any taxable year when property is sold
or disposed of before the end of its useful life, with respect to which a deduction has been allowed
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the gain or loss on this entering into the computation of
federal taxable income is disregarded in computing the entire net income, and there is added to or
subtracted from the portion of the entire net income allocated within the state the gain or loss upon
the sale or other disposition. In computing the gain or loss, the basis of the property sold or disposed
of is adjusted to reflect the deduction allowed with respect to the property pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section; provided, that no loss is recognized for the purpose of this subsection with
respect to a sale or other disposition of property to a person whose acquisition of this property is
not a purchase as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 179(d).
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -35-)

(g) Investment credit not allowed on research and development property. No investment
credit under chapter 31 of this title shall be allowed on the research and development property for
which accelerated write-off is adopted under this section.
(h) Consolidated returns. The research and development deduction shall only be allowed
against the entire net income of the corporation included in a consolidated return and shall not be
allowed against the entire net income of other corporations that may join in the filing of a
consolidated state tax return.
(i) Sunset. No deductions shall be allowed under this section for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026. Deductions allowed for tax years ending on or before December 31, 2025,
may be carried forward into tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section.
44-32-2. Credit for research and development property acquired, constructed, or
reconstructed or erected after July 1, 1994.
(a) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by chapters 11, 17, or 30
of this title. The amount of the credit shall be ten percent (10%) of the cost or other basis for federal
income tax purposes of tangible personal property, and other tangible property, including buildings
and structural components of buildings, described in subsection (b) of this section; acquired,
constructed or reconstructed, or erected after July 1, 1994.
(b) A credit shall be allowed under this section with respect to tangible personal property
and other tangible property, including buildings and structural components of buildings which are:
depreciable pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 167 or recovery property with respect to which a deduction is
allowable under 26 U.S.C. § 168, have a useful life of three (3) years or more, are acquired by
purchase as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 179(d), have a situs in this state and are used principally for
purposes of research and development in the experimental or laboratory sense which shall also
include property used by property and casualty insurance companies for research and development
into methods and ways of preventing or reducing losses from fire and other perils. The credit shall
be allowable in the year the property is first placed in service by the taxpayer, which is the year in
which, under the taxpayer’s depreciation practice, the period for depreciation with respect to the
property begins, or the year in which the property is placed in a condition or state of readiness and
availability for a specifically assigned function, whichever is earlier. These purposes shall not be
deemed to include the ordinary testing or inspection of materials or products for quality control,
efficiency surveys, management studies, consumer surveys, advertising, promotions, or research in
connection with literary, historical or similar projects.
(c) A taxpayer shall not be allowed a credit under this section with respect to any property
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -36-)

described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, if a deduction is taken for the property under §
44-32-1.
(d) A taxpayer shall not be allowed a credit under this section with respect to tangible
personal property and other tangible property, including buildings and structural components of
buildings, which it leases to any other person or corporation. For purposes of the preceding
sentence, any contract or agreement to lease or rent or for a license to use the property is considered
a lease.
(e) The credit allowed under this section for any taxable year does not reduce the tax due
for that year, in the case of corporations, to less than the minimum fixed by § 44-11-2(e). If the
amount of credit allowable under this section for any taxable year is less than the amount of credit
available to the taxpayer, any amount of credit not credited in that taxable year may be carried over
to the following year or years, up to a maximum of seven (7) years, and may be credited against
the taxpayer’s tax for the following year or years. For purposes of chapter 30 of this title, if the
credit allowed under this section for any taxable year exceeds the taxpayer’s tax for that year, the
amount of credit not credited in that taxable year may be carried over to the following year or years,
up to a maximum of seven (7) years, and may be credited against the taxpayer’s tax for the
following year or years.
(f)(1) With respect to property which is depreciable pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 167 and which
is disposed of or ceases to be in qualified use prior to the end of the taxable year in which the credit
is to be taken, the amount of the credit is that portion of the credit provided for in this section which
represents the ratio which the months of qualified use bear to the months of useful life. If property
on which credit has been taken is disposed of or ceases to be in qualified use prior to the end of its
useful life, the difference between the credit taken and the credit allowed for actual use must be
added back in the year of disposition. If the property is disposed of or ceases to be in qualified use
after it has been in qualified use for more than twelve (12) consecutive years, it is not necessary to
add back the credit as provided in this subdivision. The amount of credit allowed for actual use is
determined by multiplying the original credit by the ratio which the months of qualified use bear
to the months of useful life. For purposes of this subdivision, “useful life of property” is the same
as the taxpayer uses for depreciation purposes when computing his federal income tax liability.
(2) Except with respect to that property to which subdivision (3) of this subsection applies,
with respect to three (3) year property, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 168(c), which is disposed of or
ceases to be in qualified use prior to the end of the taxable year in which the credit is to be taken,
the amount of the credit shall be that portion of the credit provided for in this section which
represents the ratio which the months of qualified use bear to thirty-six (36). If property on which
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -37-)

credit has been taken is disposed of or ceases to be in qualified use prior to the end of thirty-six
(36) months, the difference between the credit taken and the credit allowed for actual use must be
added back in the year of disposition. The amount of credit allowed for actual use is determined by
multiplying the original credit by the ratio that the months of qualified use bear to thirty-six (36).
(3) With respect to any recovery property to which 26 U.S.C. § 168 applies, which is a
building or a structural component of a building and which is disposed of or ceases to be in qualified
use prior to the end of the taxable year in which the credit is to be taken, the amount of the credit
is that portion of the credit provided for in this section which represents the ratio which the months
of qualified use bear to the total number of months over which the taxpayer chooses to deduct the
property under 26 U.S.C. § 168. If property on which credit has been taken is disposed of or ceases
to be in qualified use prior to the end of the period over which the taxpayer chooses to deduct the
property under 26 U.S.C. § 168, the difference between the credit taken and the credit allowed for
actual use must be added back in the year of disposition. If the property is disposed of or ceases to
be in qualified use after it has been in qualified use for more than twelve (12) consecutive years, it
is not necessary to add back the credit as provided in this subdivision. The amount of credit allowed
for actual use is determined by multiplying the original credit by the ratio that the months of
qualified use bear to the total number of months over which the taxpayer chooses to deduct the
property under 26 U.S.C. § 168.
(g) No deduction for research and development facilities under § 44-32-1 shall be allowed
for research and development property for which the credit is allowed under this section.
(h) No investment tax credit under § 44-31-1 shall be allowed for research and development
property for which the credit is allowed under this section.
(i) The investment tax credit allowed by § 44-31-1 shall be taken into account before the
credit allowed under this section.
(j) The credit allowed under this section only allowed against the tax of that corporation
included in a consolidated return that qualifies for the credit and not against the tax of other
corporations that may join in the filing of a consolidated return.
(k) In the event that the taxpayer is a partnership, joint venture or small business
corporation, the credit shall be divided in the same manner as income.
(l) Sunset. No credits shall be allowed under this section for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026. Credits allowed for tax years ending on or before December 31, 2025, may be
carried forward into tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, in accordance with subsection
(e) of this section.
44-32-3. Credit for qualified research expenses.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -38-)

(a) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by chapters 11, 17 or 30
of this title. The amount of the credit shall be five percent (5%)(and in the case of amounts paid or
accrued after January 1, 1998, twenty-two and one-half percent (22.5%) for the first twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) worth of credit and sixteen and nine-tenths percent (16.9%) for the
amount of credit above twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)) of the excess, if any, of:
(1) The qualified research expenses for the taxable year, over
(2) The base period research expenses.
(b)(1) “Qualified research expenses” and “base period research expenses” have the same
meaning as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 41; provided, that the expenses have been incurred in this state
after July 1, 1994.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, “qualified research
expenses” also includes amounts expended for research by property and casualty insurance
companies into methods and ways of preventing or reducing losses from fire and other perils.
(c) The credit allowed under this section for any taxable year shall not reduce the tax due
for that year by more than fifty percent (50%) of the tax liability that would be payable, and in the
case of corporations, to less than the minimum fixed by § 44-11-2(e). If the amount of credit
allowable under this section for any taxable year is less than the amount of credit available to the
taxpayer any amount of credit not credited in that taxable year may be carried over to the following
year or years, up to a maximum of seven (7) years, and may be credited against the taxpayer’s tax
for that year or years. For purposes of chapter 30 of this title, if the credit allowed under this section
for any taxable year exceeds the taxpayer’s tax for that year, the amount of credit not credited in
that taxable year may be carried over to the following year or years, up to a maximum of seven (7)
years, and may be credited against the taxpayer’s tax for that year or years. For purposes of
determining the order in which carry-overs are taken into consideration, the credit allowed by § 44-
32-2 is taken into account before the credit allowed under this section.
(d) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the credit allowed under this section
for any taxable year shall not reduce the tax due for that year by more than fifty percent (50%) of
the tax liability that would be payable, and in the case of corporations, to less than the minimum
fixed by § 44-11-2(e). If the amount of credit allowable under this section for any taxable year is
less than the amount of credit available to the taxpayer any amount of credit not credited in that
taxable year may be carried over to the following year or years, up to a maximum of fifteen (15)
years, and may be credited against the taxpayer’s tax for that year or years. For purposes of chapter
30 of this title, if the credit allowed under this section for any taxable year exceeds the taxpayer’s
tax for that year, the amount of credit not credited in that taxable year may be carried over to the
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -39-)

following year or years, up to a maximum of fifteen (15) years, and may be credited against the
taxpayer’s tax for that year or years. For purposes of determining the order in which carry-overs
are taken into consideration, the credit allowed by § 44-32-2 is taken into account before the credit
allowed under this section.
(d)(e) The investment tax credit allowed by § 44-31-1 shall be taken into account before
the credit allowed under this section.
(e)(f) The credit allowed under this section shall only be allowed against the tax of that
corporation included in a consolidated return that qualifies for the credit and not against the tax of
other corporations that may join in the filing of a consolidated return.
(f)(g) In the event the taxpayer is a partnership, joint venture or small business corporation,
the credit is divided in the same manner as income.
SECTION 14. Chapter 44-39.1 of the General Laws entitled "Employment Tax Credit" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-39.1-5. Sunset.
No credits shall be allowed under this chapter for tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026.
SECTION 15. Sections 44-43-2 and 44-43-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-43 entitled
"Tax Incentives for Capital Investment in Small Businesses" are hereby amended to read as follows:
44-43-2. Deduction or modification.
(a) In the year in which a taxpayer first makes a qualifying investment in a certified venture
capital partnership or the year in which an entrepreneur first makes an investment in a qualifying
entity, the taxpayer or the entrepreneur shall be allowed:
(1) A deduction for purposes of computing net income or net worth in accordance with
chapter 11 of this title; or
(2) A deduction from gross earnings for purposes of computing the public service
corporation tax in accordance with chapter 13 of this title; or
(3) A deduction for the purposes of computing net income in accordance with chapter 14
of this title; or
(4) A deduction for the purposes of computing gross premiums in accordance with chapter
17 of this title; or
(5) A modification reducing federal adjusted gross income in accordance with chapter 30
of this title.
(b) The deduction or modification shall be in an amount equal to the taxpayer’s qualifying
investment in a certified venture capital partnership or an entrepreneur’s investment in a qualifying
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -40-)

business entity and shall be measured at the year end of the certified venture capital partnership,
the year end of the qualifying business entity, or the year end of the investing taxpayer, whichever
comes first.
(c) Sunset. No deductions or modifications shall be allowed under this section for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
44-43-3. Wage credit.
(a) There shall be allocated among the entrepreneurs of a qualifying business entity (based
on the ratio of each entrepreneur’s interest in the entity to the total interest held by all entrepreneurs)
with respect to each entity on an annual basis commencing with the calendar year in which the
entity first qualified as a qualifying business entity a credit against the tax imposed by chapter 30
of this title. The credit shall be equal to three percent (3%) of the wages (as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
3121(a)) in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) paid during each calendar year to employees
of the entity; provided, that there shall be excluded from the amount on which the credit is based
any wages:
(1) Paid to any owner of the entity;
(2) Paid more than five (5) years after the entity commenced business or five (5) years after
the purchase of the business entity by new owners, whichever occurs later; or
(3) Paid to employees who are not principally employed in Rhode Island and whose wages
are not subject to withholding pursuant to chapter 30 of this title.
(b) The credit authorized by this section shall cease in the taxable year next following after
the taxable year in which the average annual gross revenue of the business entity equals or exceeds
one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).
(c) Sunset. No credits shall be allowed under this section for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 16. Chapter 44-53 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Distraint" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-53-18. Financial institution data match system for state tax collection purposes.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Division” means the Rhode Island department of revenue, division of taxation.
(2) “Financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan association, federal or state
credit union, trust company, consumer lender, international banking facility, financial institution
holding company, benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, or any entity
authorized by the taxpayer to buy, sell, transfer, store, and/or trade monetary assets or its equivalent,
including, but not limited to, virtual currency, and any party affiliated with the financial institution.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -41-)

A financial institution includes any person or entity authorized or required to participate in a
financial institution data match system or program for child support enforcement purposes under
federal or state law.
(b) Financial institution data match system for state tax collection purposes.
(1) To assist the tax administrator in the collection of debts, the division shall develop and
operate a financial institution data match system for the purpose of identifying and seizing the non-
exempt assets of delinquent taxpayers as identified by the tax administrator. The tax administrator
is authorized to designate a third party to develop and operate this system. Any third party
designated by the tax administrator to develop and operate a financial data match system must keep
all information it obtains from both the division and the financial institution confidential, and any
employee, agent or representative of that third party is prohibited from disclosing that information
to anyone other than the division or the financial institution.
(2) Each financial institution doing business in the state shall, in conjunction with the tax
administrator or the tax administrator’s authorized designee, develop and operate a data match
system to facilitate the identification and seizure of non-exempt financial assets of delinquent
taxpayers identified by the tax administrator or the tax administrator’s authorized designee. If a
financial institution has a data match system developed or used to administer the child support
enforcement programs of this state, and if that system is approved by the tax administrator or the
tax administrator’s authorized designee, the financial institution may use that system to comply
with the provisions of this section.
(c) Each financial institution must provide identifying information at least each calendar
quarter to the division for each delinquent taxpayer identified by the division who or that maintains
an account at the institution. The identifying information must include the delinquent taxpayer’s
name, address, and social security number or other taxpayer identification number, and all account
numbers and balances in each account.
(d) A financial institution that complies with this section will not be liable under state law
to any person for the disclosure of information to the tax administrator or the tax administrator’s
authorized designee, or any other action taken in good faith to comply with this section.
(e) Both the financial institution furnishing a report to the tax administrator under this
section and the tax administrator’s authorized designee are prohibited from disclosing to the
delinquent taxpayer that the name of the delinquent taxpayer has been received from or furnished
to the tax administrator, unless authorized in writing by the tax administrator to do so. A violation
of this subsection will result in the imposition of a civil penalty equal to the greater of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or the amount in the account of the person to whom the disclosure was made for
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -42-)

each instance of unauthorized disclosure by the financial institution or the tax administrator’s
authorized designee under subsection (b)(1). That civil penalty can be assessed and collected under
this title as if that penalty were tax.
(f) A financial institution may disclose to its depositors or account holders that the division
has the authority to request certain identifying information on certain depositors or account holders
under the financial institution data match system for state tax collection purposes.
(g) This section does not prevent the division from encumbering a delinquent taxpayer’s
account with a financial institution by any other remedy available for the enforcement of tax
collection activities.
SECTION 17. Sections 45-24-31 and 45-24-37 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24
entitled "Zoning Ordinances" are hereby amended to read as follows:
45-24-31. Definitions.
Where words or terms used in this chapter are defined in § 45-22.2-4 or § 45-23-32, they
have the meanings stated in that section. In addition, the following words have the following
meanings. Additional words and phrases may be used in developing local ordinances under this
chapter; however, the words and phrases defined in this section are controlling in all local
ordinances created under this chapter:
(1) Abutter. One whose property abuts, that is, adjoins at a border, boundary, or point with
no intervening land.
(2) Accessory dwelling unit (ADU). A residential living unit on the same lot where the
principal use is a legally established single-family dwelling unit or multi-family dwelling unit. An
ADU provides complete independent living facilities for one or more persons. It may take various
forms including, but not limited to: a detached unit; a unit that is part of an accessory structure,
such as a detached garage; or a unit that is part of an expanded or remodeled primary dwelling.
(3) Accessory use. A use of land or of a building, or portion thereof, customarily incidental
and subordinate to the principal use of the land or building. An accessory use may be restricted to
the same lot as the principal use. An accessory use shall not be permitted without the principal use
to which it is related.
(4) Adaptive reuse. “Adaptive reuse,” as defined in § 42-64.22-2.
(5) Aggrieved party. An aggrieved party, for purposes of this chapter, shall be:
(i) Any person, or persons, or entity, or entities, who or that can demonstrate that his, her,
or its property will be injured by a decision of any officer or agency responsible for administering
the zoning ordinance of a city or town; or
(ii) Anyone requiring notice pursuant to this chapter.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -43-)

(6) Agricultural land. “Agricultural land,” as defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(7) Airport hazard area. “Airport hazard area,” as defined in § 1-3-2.
(8) Applicant. An owner, or authorized agent of the owner, submitting an application or
appealing an action of any official, board, or agency.
(9) Application. The completed form, or forms, and all accompanying documents, exhibits,
and fees required of an applicant by an approving authority for development review, approval, or
permitting purposes.
(10) Buffer. Land that is maintained in either a natural or landscaped state, and is used to
screen or mitigate the impacts of development on surrounding areas, properties, or rights-of-way.
(11) Building. Any structure used or intended for supporting or sheltering any use or
occupancy.
(12) Building envelope. The three-dimensional space within which a structure is permitted
to be built on a lot and that is defined by regulations governing building setbacks, maximum height,
and bulk; by other regulations; or by any combination thereof.
(13) Building height. For a vacant parcel of land, building height shall be measured from
the average, existing-grade elevation where the foundation of the structure is proposed. For an
existing structure, building height shall be measured from average grade taken from the outermost
four (4) corners of the existing foundation. In all cases, building height shall be measured to the top
of the highest point of the existing or proposed roof or structure. This distance shall exclude spires,
chimneys, flag poles, and the like. For any property or structure located in a special flood hazard
area, as shown on the official FEMA Flood Insurance Rate Maps (FIRMs), or depicted on the
Rhode Island coastal resources management council (CRMC) suggested design elevation three foot
(3′) sea level rise (CRMC SDE 3 SLR) map as being inundated during a one-hundred-year (100)
storm, the greater of the following amounts, expressed in feet, shall be excluded from the building
height calculation:
(i) The base flood elevation on the FEMA FIRM plus up to five feet (5′) of any utilized or
proposed freeboard, less the average existing grade elevation; or
(ii) The suggested design elevation as depicted on the CRMC SDE 3 SLR map during a
one-hundred-year (100) storm, less the average existing grade elevation. CRMC shall reevaluate
the appropriate suggested design elevation map for the exclusion every ten (10) years, or as
otherwise necessary.
(14) Cluster. A site-planning technique that concentrates buildings in specific areas on the
site to allow the remaining land to be used for recreation, common open space, and/or preservation
of environmentally, historically, culturally, or other sensitive features and/or structures. The
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -44-)

techniques used to concentrate buildings shall be specified in the ordinance and may include, but
are not limited to, reduction in lot areas, setback requirements, and/or bulk requirements, with the
resultant open land being devoted by deed restrictions for one or more uses. Under cluster
development, there is no increase in the number of lots that would be permitted under conventional
development except where ordinance provisions include incentive bonuses for certain types or
conditions of development.
(15) Common ownership. Either:
(i) Ownership by one or more individuals or entities in any form of ownership of two (2)
or more contiguous lots; or
(ii) Ownership by any association (ownership may also include a municipality) of one or
more lots under specific development techniques.
(16) Community residence. A home or residential facility where children and/or adults
reside in a family setting and may or may not receive supervised care. This does not include halfway
houses or substance-use-disorder-treatment facilities. This does include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) Whenever six (6) or fewer children or adults with intellectual and/or developmental
disability reside in any type of residence in the community, as licensed by the state pursuant to
chapter 24 of title 40.1. All requirements pertaining to local zoning are waived for these community
residences;
(ii) A group home providing care or supervision, or both, to not more than eight (8) persons
with disabilities, and licensed by the state pursuant to chapter 24 of title 40.1;
(iii) A residence for children providing care or supervision, or both, to not more than eight
(8) children, including those of the caregiver, and licensed by the state pursuant to chapter 72.1 of
title 42;
(iv) A community transitional residence providing care or assistance, or both, to no more
than six (6) unrelated persons or no more than three (3) families, not to exceed a total of eight (8)
persons, requiring temporary financial assistance, and/or to persons who are victims of crimes,
abuse, or neglect, and who are expected to reside in that residence not less than sixty (60) days nor
more than two (2) years. Residents will have access to, and use of, all common areas, including
eating areas and living rooms, and will receive appropriate social services for the purpose of
fostering independence, self-sufficiency, and eventual transition to a permanent living situation.
(17) Comprehensive plan. The comprehensive plan adopted and approved pursuant to
chapter 22.2 of this title and to which any zoning adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be in
compliance.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -45-)

(18) Day care — Daycare center. Any other daycare center that is not a family daycare
home.
(19) Day care — Family daycare home. Any home, other than the individual’s home, in
which day care in lieu of parental care or supervision is offered at the same time to six (6) or less
individuals who are not relatives of the caregiver, but may not contain more than a total of eight
(8) individuals receiving day care.
(20) Density, residential. The number of dwelling units per unit of land.
(21) Development. The construction, reconstruction, conversion, structural alteration,
relocation, or enlargement of any structure; any mining, excavation, landfill, or land disturbance;
or any change in use, or alteration or extension of the use, of land.
(22) Development plan review. See §§ 45-23-32 and 45-23-50.
(23) District. See “zoning use district.”
(24) Drainage system. A system for the removal of water from land by drains, grading, or
other appropriate means. These techniques may include runoff controls to minimize erosion and
sedimentation during and after construction or development; the means for preserving surface and
groundwaters; and the prevention and/or alleviation of flooding.
(25) Dwelling unit. A structure, or portion of a structure, providing complete, independent
living facilities for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating,
cooking, and sanitation, and containing a separate means of ingress and egress.
(26) Extractive industry. The extraction of minerals, including: solids, such as coal and
ores; liquids, such as crude petroleum; and gases, such as natural gases. The term also includes
quarrying; well operation; milling, such as crushing, screening, washing, and flotation; and other
preparation customarily done at the extraction site or as a part of the extractive activity.
(27) Family member. A person, or persons, related by blood, marriage, or other legal
means, including, but not limited to, a child, parent, spouse, mother-in-law, father-in-law,
grandparents, grandchildren, domestic partner, sibling, care recipient, or member of the household.
(28) Floating zone. An unmapped zoning district adopted within the ordinance that is
established on the zoning map only when an application for development, meeting the zone
requirements, is approved.
(29) Floodplains, or Flood hazard area. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(30) Freeboard. A factor of safety expressed in feet above the base flood elevation of a
flood hazard area for purposes of floodplain management. Freeboard compensates for the many
unknown factors that could contribute to flood heights, such as wave action, bridge openings, and
the hydrological effect of urbanization of the watershed.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -46-)

(31) Groundwater. “Groundwater” and associated terms, as defined in § 46-13.1-3.
(32) Halfway house. A residential facility for adults or children who have been
institutionalized for criminal conduct and who require a group setting to facilitate the transition to
a functional member of society.
(33) Hardship. See § 45-24-41.
(34) Historic district or historic site. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(35) Home occupation. Any activity customarily carried out for gain by a resident,
conducted as an accessory use in the resident’s dwelling unit. For the purposes of this chapter,
home occupation does not include remote work activities as defined in § 45-24-37.
(36) Household. One or more persons living together in a single-dwelling unit, with
common access to, and common use of, all living and eating areas and all areas and facilities for
the preparation and storage of food within the dwelling unit. The term “household unit” is
synonymous with the term “dwelling unit” for determining the number of units allowed within any
structure on any lot in a zoning district. An individual household shall consist of any one of the
following:
(i) A family, which may also include servants and employees living with the family; or
(ii) A person or group of unrelated persons living together. The maximum number may be
set by local ordinance, but this maximum shall not be less than one person per bedroom and shall
not exceed five (5) unrelated persons per dwelling. The maximum number shall not apply to
NARR-certified recovery residences.
(37) Incentive zoning. The process whereby the local authority may grant additional
development capacity in exchange for the developer’s provision of a public benefit or amenity as
specified in local ordinances.
(38) Infrastructure. Facilities and services needed to sustain residential, commercial,
industrial, institutional, and other activities.
(39) Land development project. As defined in § 45-23-32.
(40) Lot. Either:
(i) The basic development unit for determination of lot area, depth, and other dimensional
regulations; or
(ii) A parcel of land whose boundaries have been established by some legal instrument,
such as a recorded deed or recorded map, and that is recognized as a separate legal entity for
purposes of transfer of title.
(41) Lot area. The total area within the boundaries of a lot, excluding any street right-of-
way, usually reported in acres or square feet.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -47-)

(42) Lot area, minimum. The smallest land area established by the local zoning ordinance
upon which a use, building, or structure may be located in a particular zoning district.
(43) Lot building coverage. That portion of the lot that is, or may be, covered by buildings
and accessory buildings.
(44) Lot depth. The distance measured from the front lot line to the rear lot line. For lots
where the front and rear lot lines are not parallel, the lot depth is an average of the depth.
(45) Lot frontage. That portion of a lot abutting a street. A zoning ordinance shall specify
how noncontiguous frontage will be considered with regard to minimum frontage requirements.
(46) Lot line. A line of record, bounding a lot, that divides one lot from another lot or from
a public or private street or any other public or private space and shall include:
(i) Front: the lot line separating a lot from a street right-of-way. A zoning ordinance shall
specify the method to be used to determine the front lot line on lots fronting on more than one
street, for example, corner and through lots;
(ii) Rear: the lot line opposite and most distant from the front lot line, or in the case of
triangular or otherwise irregularly shaped lots, an assumed line at least ten feet (10′) in length
entirely within the lot, parallel to and at a maximum distance from, the front lot line; and
(iii) Side: any lot line other than a front or rear lot line. On a corner lot, a side lot line may
be a street lot line, depending on requirements of the local zoning ordinance.
(47) Lot size, minimum. Shall have the same meaning as “minimum lot area” defined
herein.
(48) Lot, through. A lot that fronts upon two (2) parallel streets, or that fronts upon two (2)
streets that do not intersect at the boundaries of the lot.
(49) Lot width. The horizontal distance between the side lines of a lot measured at right
angles to its depth along a straight line parallel to the front lot line at the minimum front setback
line.
(50) Manufactured home. As used in this section, a manufactured home shall have the same
definition as in 42 U.S.C. § 5402, meaning a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which,
in the traveling mode, is eight (8) body feet or more in width or forty (40) body feet or more in
length, or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty (320) or more square feet, and which is
built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with a permanent foundation
connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and
electrical systems contained therein; except that such term shall include any structure that meets all
the requirements of this definition except the size requirements and with respect to which the
manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary of Housing
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -48-)

and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under chapter 70 of Title 42
of the United States Code; and except that such term shall not include any self-propelled
recreational vehicle.
(51) Mere inconvenience. See § 45-24-41.
(52) Mixed use. A mixture of land uses within a single development, building, or tract.
(53) Modification. Permission granted and administered by the zoning enforcement officer
of the city or town, and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to grant a dimensional variance
other than lot area requirements from the zoning ordinance to a limited degree as determined by
the zoning ordinance of the city or town, but not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of each of
the applicable dimensional requirements.
(54) Nonconformance. A building, structure, or parcel of land, or use thereof, lawfully
existing at the time of the adoption or amendment of a zoning ordinance and not in conformity with
the provisions of that ordinance or amendment. Nonconformance is of only two (2) types:
(i) Nonconforming by use: a lawfully established use of land, building, or structure that is
not a permitted use in that zoning district. A building or structure containing more dwelling units
than are permitted by the use regulations of a zoning ordinance is nonconformity by use; or
(ii) Nonconforming by dimension: a building, structure, or parcel of land not in compliance
with the dimensional regulations of the zoning ordinance. Dimensional regulations include all
regulations of the zoning ordinance, other than those pertaining to the permitted uses. A building
or structure containing more dwelling units than are permitted by the use regulations of a zoning
ordinance is nonconforming by use; a building or structure containing a permitted number of
dwelling units by the use regulations of the zoning ordinance, but not meeting the lot area per
dwelling unit regulations, is nonconforming by dimension.
(55) Overlay district. A district established in a zoning ordinance that is superimposed on
one or more districts or parts of districts. The standards and requirements associated with an overlay
district may be more or less restrictive than those in the underlying districts consistent with other
applicable state and federal laws.
(56) Performance standards. A set of criteria or limits relating to elements that a particular
use or process must either meet or may not exceed.
(57) Permitted use. A use by right that is specifically authorized in a particular zoning
district.
(58) Planned development. A “land development project,” as defined in subsection (39),
and developed according to plan as a single entity and containing one or more structures or uses
with appurtenant common areas.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -49-)

(59) Plant agriculture. The growing of plants for food or fiber, to sell or consume.
(60) Preapplication conference. A review meeting of a proposed development held between
applicants and reviewing agencies as permitted by law and municipal ordinance, before formal
submission of an application for a permit or for development approval.
(61) Setback line or lines. A line, or lines, parallel to a lot line at the minimum distance of
the required setback for the zoning district in which the lot is located that establishes the area within
which the principal structure must be erected or placed.
(62) Site plan. The development plan for one or more lots on which is shown the existing
and/or the proposed conditions of the lot.
(63) Slope of land. The grade, pitch, rise, or incline of the topographic landform or surface
of the ground.
(64) Special use. A regulated use that is permitted pursuant to the special-use permit issued
by the authorized governmental entity, pursuant to § 45-24-42. Formerly referred to as a special
exception.
(65) Structure. A combination of materials to form a construction for use, occupancy, or
ornamentation, whether installed on, above, or below the surface of land or water.
(66) Substandard lot of record. Any lot lawfully existing at the time of adoption or
amendment of a zoning ordinance and not in conformance with the dimensional or area provisions
of that ordinance.
(67) Use. The purpose or activity for which land or buildings are designed, arranged, or
intended, or for which land or buildings are occupied or maintained.
(68) Variance. Permission to depart from the literal requirements of a zoning ordinance.
An authorization for the construction or maintenance of a building or structure, or for the
establishment or maintenance of a use of land, that is prohibited by a zoning ordinance. There are
only two (2) categories of variance, a use variance or a dimensional variance.
(i) Use variance. Permission to depart from the use requirements of a zoning ordinance
where the applicant for the requested variance has shown by evidence upon the record that the
subject land or structure cannot yield any beneficial use if it is to conform to the provisions of the
zoning ordinance.
(ii) Dimensional variance. Permission to depart from the dimensional requirements of a
zoning ordinance under the applicable standards set forth in § 45-24-41.
(69) Waters. As defined in § 46-12-1(23).
(70) Wetland, coastal. As defined in § 45-22.2-4.
(71) Wetland, freshwater. As defined in § 2-1-20.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -50-)

(72) Zoning certificate. A document signed by the zoning enforcement officer, as required
in the zoning ordinance, that acknowledges that a use, structure, building, or lot either complies
with, or is legally nonconforming to, the provisions of the municipal zoning ordinance or is an
authorized variance or modification therefrom.
(73) Zoning map. The map, or maps, that are a part of the zoning ordinance and that
delineate the boundaries of all mapped zoning districts within the physical boundary of the city or
town.
(74) Zoning ordinance. An ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city or town
pursuant to this chapter and in the manner providing for the adoption of ordinances in the city or
town’s legislative or home rule charter, if any, that establish regulations and standards relating to
the nature and extent of uses of land and structures; that is consistent with the comprehensive plan
of the city or town as defined in chapter 22.2 of this title; that includes a zoning map; and that
complies with the provisions of this chapter.
(75) Zoning use district. The basic unit in zoning, either mapped or unmapped, to which a
uniform set of regulations applies, or a uniform set of regulations for a specified use. Zoning use
districts include, but are not limited to: agricultural, commercial, industrial, institutional, open
space, and residential. Each district may include sub-districts. Districts may be combined.
45-24-37. General provisions — Permitted uses.
(a) The zoning ordinance shall provide a listing of all land uses and/or performance
standards for uses that are permitted within the zoning use districts of the municipality. The
ordinance may provide for a procedure under which a proposed land use that is not specifically
listed may be presented by the property owner to the zoning board of review or to a local official
or agency charged with administration and enforcement of the ordinance for an evaluation and
determination of whether the proposed use is of a similar type, character, and intensity as a listed
permitted use. Upon such determination, the proposed use may be considered to be a permitted use.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following uses are permitted
uses within all residential zoning use districts of a municipality and all industrial and commercial
zoning use districts except where residential use is prohibited for public health or safety reasons:
(1) Households;
(2) Community residences; and
(3) Family daycare homes; and
(4) Remote work, defined as a work flexibility arrangement under which a W-2 employee
or full-time contractor routinely performs the duties and responsibilities of such employee’s
position from an approved worksite other than the location from which the employee would
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -51-)

otherwise work.
(i) Remote work shall not include any activities that:
(A) Relate to the sale of unlawful goods and services;
(B) Generate on-street parking or a substantial increase in traffic through the residential
area;
(C) Occur outside of the residential dwelling;
(D) Occur in the yard; or
(E) Are visible from the street.
(c) Any time a building or other structure used for residential purposes, or a portion of a
building containing residential units, is rendered uninhabitable by virtue of a casualty such as fire
or flood, the owner of the property is allowed to park, temporarily, mobile and manufactured home,
or homes, as the need may be, elsewhere upon the land, for use and occupancy of the former
occupants for a period of up to twelve (12) months, or until the building or structure is rehabilitated
and otherwise made fit for occupancy. The property owner, or a properly designated agent of the
owner, is only allowed to cause the mobile and manufactured home, or homes, to remain
temporarily upon the land by making timely application to the local building official for the
purposes of obtaining the necessary permits to repair or rebuild the structure.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, appropriate access for people with
disabilities to residential structures is allowed as a reasonable accommodation for any person(s)
residing, or intending to reside, in the residential structure.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an accessory dwelling unit
(“ADU”) that meets the requirements of §§ 45-24-31 and 45-24-73(a) shall be a permitted use in
all residential zoning districts. An ADU that meets the requirements of §§ 45-24-31 and 45-24-
73(a) shall be permitted through an administrative building permit process only.
(f) When used in this section the terms “people with disabilities” or “member, or members,
with disabilities” means a person(s) who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially
limits one or more major life activities, as defined in 42-87-1(5).
(g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, plant agriculture is a permitted
use within all zoning districts of a municipality, including all industrial and commercial zoning
districts, except where prohibited for public health or safety reasons or the protection of wildlife
habitat.
(h) Adaptive reuse. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, adaptive reuse
for the conversion of any commercial building, including offices, schools, religious facilities,
medical buildings, and malls into residential units or mixed-use developments which include the
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -52-)

development of at least fifty percent (50%) of the existing gross floor area into residential units,
shall be a permitted use and allowed by specific and objective provisions of a zoning ordinance,
except where such is prohibited by environmental land use restrictions recorded on the property by
the state of Rhode Island department of environmental management or the United States
Environmental Protection Agency preventing the conversion to residential use.
(1) The specific zoning ordinance provisions for adaptive reuse shall exempt adaptive reuse
developments from off-street parking requirements of over one space per dwelling unit.
(2) Density.
(i) For projects that meet the following criteria, zoning ordinances shall allow for high
density development and shall not limit the density to less than fifteen (15) dwelling units per acre:
(A) Where the project is limited to the existing footprint, except that the footprint is allowed
to be expanded to accommodate upgrades related to the building and fire codes and utilities; and
(B) The development includes at least twenty percent (20%) low- and moderate-income
housing; and
(C) The development has access to public sewer and water service or has access to adequate
private water, such as a well and and/or wastewater treatment system(s) approved by the relevant
state agency for the entire development as applicable.
(ii) For all other adaptive reuse projects, the residential density permitted in the converted
structure shall be the maximum allowed that otherwise meets all standards of minimum housing
and has access to public sewer and water service or has access to adequate private water, such as a
well, and wastewater treatment system(s) approved by the relevant state agency for the entire
development, as applicable. The density proposed shall be determined to meet all public health and
safety standards.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, for adaptive reuse projects,
existing building setbacks shall remain and shall be considered legal nonconforming, but no
additional encroachments shall be permitted into any nonconforming setback, unless otherwise
allowed by zoning ordinance or relief is granted by the applicable authority.
(4) For adaptive reuse projects, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
height of the existing structure, if it exceeds the maximum height of the zoning district, may remain
and shall be considered legal nonconforming, and any rooftop construction shall be included within
the height exemption.
(i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, all towns and cities may allow
manufactured homes that comply with § 23-27.3-109.1.3 as a type of single-family home on any
lot zoned for single-family use. Such home shall comply with all dimensional requirements of a
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -53-)

single-family home in the district or seek relief for the same under the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 18. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 72
NON-OWNER OCCUPIED PROPERTY TAX ACT
44-72-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Non-Owner Occupied Property Tax
Act".
44-72-2. Purpose.
(a) The state funds cities and towns pursuant to chapter 13 of title 45.
(b) There is a compelling state interest in protecting the tax base of its cities and towns.
(c) There are numerous non-owner occupied residential properties throughout the cities
and towns of Rhode Island assessed at values over one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(d) The existence of such properties within a city or town has an impact on the value of
real property within the cities and towns and the tax base within these cities and towns.
(e) Non-owner occupied properties sometimes place a greater demand on essential state,
city or town services such as police and fire protection than do occupied properties comparably
assessed for real estate tax purposes.
(f) The residents of non-owner occupied properties are not vested with a motive to maintain
such properties.
(g) The owners of non-owner occupied properties do not always contribute a fair share of
the costs of providing the foregoing essential state, city or town services financed in part by real
estate tax revenues, which revenues are solely based on the assessed value of properties.
(h) Some properties are deliberately left vacant by their owners in the hope that real estate
values will increase, thereby enabling the owners to sell these properties at a substantial profit
without making any of the necessary repairs or improvements to the property.
(i) The non-owner occupation of such property whether for profit speculation, tax benefit,
or any other purposes is the making use of that property and as such, is a privilege incident to the
ownership of the property.
(j) Owners of non-owner occupied properties must be encouraged to use the properties in
a positive manner to stop the spread of deterioration, to increase the stock of viable real estate
within a city or town, and to maintain real estate values within communities.
(k) Owners of non-owner occupied properties must be required, through a state’s power to
tax, to pay a fair share of the cost of providing certain essential state services to protect the public
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -54-)

health, safety, and welfare.
(l) For all of the reasons stated within this section, the purpose of this chapter is to impose
a statewide tax upon non-owner occupied residential property assessed at a value of one million
dollars ($1,000,000) or more.
44-72-3. Definitions.
The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the following meanings:
(1) “Administrator” means the tax administrator within the department of revenue.
(2) “Assessed value” means the assessed value of the real estate as of December 31 of the
corresponding taxable year in accordance with § 44-5-12.
(3) “Non-owner occupied” means that the residential property does not serve as the owner’s
primary residence and is not occupied by the owner of the property for a majority of days during a
given taxable year.
(4) “Non-owner occupied tax” means the assessment imposed upon the non-owner
occupied residential property assessed at one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more pursuant to this
chapter and as adjusted pursuant to § 44-72-6.
(5) “Person” means any individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, joint
stock association, and the legal successor thereof or any other entity or group organization against
which a tax may be assessed.
(6) “Taxable year” means July 1 through June 30.
44-72-4. Imposition and proceeds of tax.
(a) For taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, a tax is imposed upon the privilege
of utilizing property as non-owner occupied residential property within the state during any taxable
year. The non-owner occupied tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general
or public laws.
(b) With respect to the tax imposed, by this chapter, the tax administrator shall contribute
the entire tax to the low-income housing tax credit fund established pursuant to § 44-71-11.
44-72-5. Exemptions.
This chapter does not supersede any applicable exemption in the general or public laws.
In no case shall this chapter apply to, or any tax therefrom be assessed against, any properties or
buildings that are rented or were rented for a period of more than one hundred and eighty three
(183) days during the prior taxable year and subject to the provisions of chapter 18 of title 34 or
any properties or buildings that are rented or were rented and are subject to tax pursuant to chapter
18 of title 44.
44-72-6. Rate of tax.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -55-)

The tax authorized by this chapter shall be measured by the assessed value of the real estate
at the rate of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for each five hundred dollars ($500) or fractional
part of the assessed value in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000). For tax years beginning on
or after July 1, 2027, the assessed value threshold of one million dollars ($1,000,000) provided
pursuant to this section shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index
for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics
determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar years. Said adjustment shall be compounded
annually and shall be rounded up to the nearest five-dollar ($5.00) increment. In no event shall the
assessed value threshold in any tax year be less than the prior tax year.
44-72-7. Returns.
(a) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be due and payable in four (4) equal installments.
The first installment shall be paid on or before September 15 of the taxable year, the second
installment shall be paid on or before December 15 of the taxable year, the third installment shall
be paid on or before March 15 of the taxable year, and the fourth installment shall be paid on or
before June 15 of the taxable year.
(b) The tax administrator is authorized to adopt rules, pursuant to this chapter, relative to
the form of the return and the data that it shall contain for the correct computation of the imposed
tax. All returns shall be signed by the taxpayer or by its authorized representative, subject to the
pains and penalties of perjury. If a return shows an overpayment of the tax due, the tax administrator
shall refund or credit the overpayment to the taxpayer.
(c) The tax administrator, for good cause shown, may extend the time within which a
taxpayer is required to file a return. If the return is filed during the period of extension, no penalty
or late filing charge shall be imposed for failure to file the return at the time required by this chapter;
however, the taxpayer shall be liable for interest as prescribed in this chapter. Failure to file the
return during the period for the extension shall void the extension.
44-72-8. Set-off for delinquent payment of tax.
If a taxpayer shall fail to pay a tax within thirty (30) days of its due date, the tax
administrator may request any agency of state government making payments to the taxpayer to set-
off the amount of the delinquency against any payment due the taxpayer from the agency of state
government and remit the sum to the tax administrator. Upon receipt of the set-off request from the
tax administrator, any agency of state government is authorized and empowered to set-off the
amount of the delinquency against any payment or amounts due the taxpayer. The amount of set-
off shall be credited against the tax due from the taxpayer.
44-72-9. Tax on available information – Interest on delinquencies – Penalties –
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -56-)

Collection powers.
If any taxpayer shall fail to file a return within the time required by this chapter, or shall
file an insufficient or incorrect return, or shall not pay the tax imposed by this chapter when it is
due, the tax administrator shall assess the tax upon the information as may be available, which shall
be payable upon demand and shall bear interest at the annual rate provided by § 44-1-7, from the
date when the tax should have been paid. If any part of the tax not paid is due to negligence or
intentional disregard of the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount
of the determination shall be added to the tax. The tax administrator shall collect the tax with
interest in the same manner and with the same powers as are prescribed for collection of taxes in
this title.
44-72-10. Claims for refund - Hearing upon denial.
(a) Any taxpayer subject to the provisions of this chapter, may file a claim for refund with
the tax administrator at any time within two (2) years after the tax has been paid. If the tax
administrator determines that the tax has been overpaid, the administrator shall make a refund with
interest from the date of overpayment.
(b) Any taxpayer whose claim for refund has been denied may, within thirty (30) days from
the date of the mailing by the administrator of the notice of the decision, request a hearing and the
administrator shall, as soon as practicable, set a time and place for the hearing and shall notify the
taxpayer.
44-72-11. Hearing by tax administrator on application.
Any taxpayer aggrieved by the action of the tax administrator in determining the amount
of any tax or penalty imposed under the provisions of this chapter may apply to the tax
administrator, within thirty (30) days after the notice of the action is mailed to the taxpayer, for a
hearing relative to the tax or penalty. The tax administrator shall fix a time and place for the hearing
and shall so notify the taxpayer. Upon the hearing, the tax administrator shall correct manifest
errors, if any, disclosed at the hearing and thereupon assess and collect the amount lawfully due
together with any penalty or interest thereon.
44-72-12. Appeals.
(a) In any appeal from the imposition of the tax set forth in this chapter, the tax
administrator shall find in favor of an appellant who shows that the property assessed:
(1) Was actively occupied by the owner during the taxable year for more than six (6)
months; or
(2) Was exempt pursuant to the general laws or public laws from the imposition of the tax
set forth in this chapter.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -57-)

(b) Appeals from administrative orders or decisions made pursuant to any provisions of
this chapter shall be to the sixth division district court pursuant to chapter 8 of title 8. The taxpayer’s
right to appeal under this section shall be expressly made conditional upon prepayment of all taxes,
interest, and penalties unless the taxpayer moves for and is granted an exemption from the
prepayment requirement pursuant to § 8-8-26. If the court, after appeal, holds that the taxpayer is
entitled to a refund, the taxpayer shall also be paid interest on the amount at the rate provided in §
44-1-7.1.
44-72-13. Taxpayer records.
Every taxpayer shall:
(1) Keep records as may be necessary to determine the amount of its liability under this
chapter, including, but not limited to: rental agreements, payments for rent, bank statements for
payment of residential expenses, utility bills, and any other records establishing residency or non-
residency.
(2) Preserve those records for the period of three (3) years following the date of filing of
any return required by this chapter, or until any litigation or prosecution under this chapter is finally
determined.
(3) Make those records available for inspection by the administrator or authorized agents,
upon demand, at reasonable times during regular business hours.
44-72-14. Rules and regulations.
The tax administrator is authorized to make and promulgate rules, regulations, and
procedures not inconsistent with state law and fiscal procedures as the administrator deems
necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and to carry out the provisions, policies, and
purposes of this chapter.
44-72-15. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the
chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable. It is declared to be the legislative intent that
this chapter would have been adopted had those provisions not been included or that person,
circumstance, or time period been expressly excluded from its coverage.
SECTION 19. Sections 3, 4, 5, 12 and 16 through 18 shall take effect upon passage.
Sections 1, 6 and 8 through 10 shall take effect on October 1, 2025. Sections 2, 7, 11 and 13 through
15 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
Art5
RELATING TO TAXES AND FEES
(Page -58-)

=======
art.006/6/006/5/006/4/006/3/006/2/006/1
=======
ARTICLE 6 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 1. Sections 5-23-2 and 5-23-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-23 entitled
"Holiday Business" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-23-2. Licenses for holiday business.
(a) A retail establishment may be open on any day of the year except as specifically
prohibited herein. A retail establishment shall not be open on a holiday unless licensed by the
appropriate town council pursuant to this section. The city or town council of any city or town shall
grant holiday licenses for the sale by retail establishments. No license shall be issued on December
25 of any year or on Thanksgiving Day, except to:
(1) Pharmacies licensed under chapter 19.1 of this title; provided, however, that no drug
(as defined in § 5-19.1-2) or controlled substance (as defined in § 5-19.1-2) requiring a prescription
(as defined in § 5-19.1-2) shall be dispensed or sold unless a licensed pharmacist-in-charge (as
defined in § 5-19.1-2) is available on the premises;
(2) Retail establishments that principally sell food products as defined in § 44-18-30(9) and
that employ fewer than six (6) employees per shift at any one location;
(3) Retail establishments principally engaged in the sale of cut flowers, floral products,
plants, shrubs, trees, fertilizers, seeds, bulbs, and garden accessories;
(4) Retail establishments principally engaged in the sale and/or rental of video cassette
tapes; and
(5)(4) Retail establishments principally engaged in the preparation or sale of bakery
products.
(b) Retail establishments licensed pursuant to this section may be permitted to open for
business during holidays on their normal business working hours.
(c) Retail establishments licensed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the
provisions of chapter 1 of title 25, entitled “Holidays and Days of Special Observance,” and those
establishments may sell any and all items sold in the ordinary course of business with the exception
of alcoholic beverages.
(d) All employees engaged in work during Sundays or holidays pursuant to the provisions
of this section shall receive from their employer no less than time and a half for the work so

performed and shall be guaranteed at least a minimum of four (4) hours employment; except those
employees referred to in § 28-12-4.3(a)(4), provided that the work performed by the employee is
strictly voluntary and refusal to work for any retail establishment on a Sunday or holiday is not a
ground for discrimination, dismissal, or discharge or any other penalty upon the employee. The city
or town council may fix and cause to be paid into the city or town treasury for each license issued
pursuant to this section a fee not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) and may fix the
time or times when the license granted terminates; provided, that the city or town council shall not
charge a licensing fee to any charitable, benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, patriotic,
social service, civic, fraternal, police, fire, labor, or religious organization that is not operated for
profit.
(e) Retail establishments engaged principally in the preparation or sale of bakery products
and pharmacies shall be licensed prior to the sale of those products in accordance with this section;
provided, that the time and one half and voluntary work provisions do not apply.
(f)(c) Each city or town council shall fix, limit, and specify those rules, regulations, and
conditions relating to the granting, holding, and exercising those licenses as it deems necessary or
advisable and as are not inconsistent with law, and may suspend or revoke any license granted by
it for more than two (2) violations of those rules, regulations, and conditions during a calendar year.
(g)(d) Each city or town shall grant Class A licenses authorizing retail establishments that
sell alcoholic beverages for consumption off of the premises within its jurisdiction to sell on
Sundays, alcoholic beverages in accordance with the terms of this chapter and that of title 3;
provided that it shall not permit such sale prior to the hour of twelve noon (12:00 p.m.) or on
Christmas day, if Christmas shall occur on a Sunday; provided, further, that no employee shall be
required to work and refusal to work on a Sunday shall not be the grounds for discrimination,
dismissal, discharge, deduction of hours, or any other penalty.
5-23-6. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) Upon complaint filed with the director of labor and training by any employee or any
consumer, or if a minor, by his or her parent or guardian, or by the lawful collective bargaining
representative of an employee, that a licensee under this chapter person, firm, or corporation has
violated the terms of § 5-23-2, the director shall cause the complaint to be investigated, and if
satisfied that a probable violation has occurred, shall issue a complaint against the licensee person,
firm, or corporation with a notice for a hearing. The hearing shall be held before a hearing officer
of the department of labor and training. If the director concludes on the basis of the hearing record
that a violation has occurred, he or she shall issue a cease and desist order to the licensee person,
firm, or corporation, or he or she shall refer the complaint to the attorney general for appropriate
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -2-)

action as provided in subsection (c) of this section. The director shall issue regulations in
conformity with law and preserving the rights of due process of all parties to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(b) Every licensed or unlicensed person, firm, or corporation, including its officers and
officials, who or that violates any of the provisions of his, her, or its license or the provisions of
this chapter, except as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, shall be fined not exceeding five
hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for
each additional offense.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, suit for violation
of the provisions of this chapter, praying for criminal or civil injunctive or other relief, may be
instituted in the superior court by any city or town or by the attorney general.
(d) The penalty for opening and operating a business on December 25th of any year or on
Thanksgiving Day, unless excepted, is, in addition to subsection (b) of this section, a fine not
exceeding thirty percent (30%) of the sales or proceeds for that day.
SECTION 2. Sections 5-23-3, 5-23-4 and 5-23-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-23
entitled "Holiday Business" are hereby repealed.
5-23-3. Works of necessity for which license not required.
A license is not required for the sale upon a holiday of gasoline, oil, grease, automotive
parts, automotive servicing, or automotive accessories, or for the conducting on that day by any
farmers’ cooperative association of a wholesale auction market of fruit, vegetables, and farm
products, all of which are declared to be works of necessity.
5-23-4. Terms and conditions of license — Revocation.
Any city or town council in each case of granting the license shall fix, limit, and specify in
the license the hours of the day during which the licensee or licensees may operate and may make
those rules, regulations, and conditions relative to the granting, holding, and exercising those
licenses that it deems necessary or advisable and that are not inconsistent with law, and may at any
time at its pleasure suspend or revoke the license that it granted. The license shall be displayed in
a conspicuous place on the premises licensed.
5-23-5. Place of operation — Delivery carts.
The license shall not authorize any sale, rental, or operation at any place not specified in
the license. The license is deemed to include permission to deliver by means of or sell from any
cart or other vehicle, ice, milk, or newspapers; provided the number of carts or vehicles to be used
for that purpose shall be specified in the license and there shall be displayed on each cart or vehicle
while in that use any evidence that the city or town council prescribes that it is being used pursuant
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -3-)

to that license.
SECTION 3. Section 5-50-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-50 entitled "Health Clubs"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-50-4. Contract contents — Notice to buyer of right to cancel contract — Right of contract
cancellation — Refund.
(a) A copy of every health club contract shall be delivered to the buyer at the time the
contract is signed.
(b)(1) All health club contracts must be in writing signed by the buyer; must designate the
date on which the buyer actually signs the contract; and must contain a statement of the buyer’s
rights that substantially complies with this section.
(2) The statement must appear in the contract under the conspicuous caption “BUYER’S
RIGHT TO CANCEL,” and read as follows:
“If you wish to cancel this contract, you may cancel in person, by electronic mail or by
mail to the seller. You must give notice, in writing, that you do not wish to be bound by the contract.
This notice must be delivered, electronically transmitted, or mailed before midnight of the tenth
(10th) business day after the date of the contract so entered into. All cancellations must be delivered,
electronically transmitted, or mailed to:(Insert name, electronic mail address, and mailing address
of health club).”
(3) Proof of in-person cancellation shall be effectuated by writing “cancellation” and the
date of cancellation across the contract.
(4) The buyer shall receive a copy of the contract.
(5) The signature of the person employed by the health club who registers the cancellation
must also appear on the contract.
(c) Every contract for health club services shall provide that the contract may be cancelled
before midnight of the tenth (10th) day after the date of the contract so entered into. The notice of
the buyer’s cancellation of his or her contract shall be in writing and shall be made in person or by
electronic mail to the seller at an electronic mail address that shall be specified in the contract or
by mail to the seller at the address specified in the contract.
(d) Every contract for health club services shall provide clearly and conspicuously, in
writing, that after the expiration of the ten-day (10) period for cancellation as provided in subsection
(b)(2):
(1) The buyer shall be relieved from any and all obligations under the contract, and shall
be entitled to a refund of any prepaid membership under the contract if:
(i) A buyer relocates further than fifteen (15) miles from a comparable health club facility
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -4-)

operated by the seller;
(ii) If a health club facility relocates further than fifteen (15) miles from its current location,
or the seller does not maintain a health club service within a fifteen (15) mile radius from its current
location; or
(iii) If the health club services or facilities are not available to the buyer because the seller
fails to open a planned health club or location, permanently discontinues operation of the health
club or location, or substantially changes the operation;
(2) If a buyer becomes significantly physically or medically disabled for a period in excess
of three (3) months during the membership term, he or she has the option:
(i) To be relieved of liability for payment on that portion of the contract term for which the
purchaser is disabled and receive a full refund of any prepaid membership on the contract; or
(ii) To extend the duration of the contract at no additional cost for a period equal to the
duration of the disability. The health club may require that a doctor’s certificate be submitted as
verification of the disability;
(3) In the event of the buyer’s death, his or her estate shall be relieved of any further
obligation for payment under the contract and shall be entitled to a refund for any prepaid
membership for the unused portion of the contract. The health club may require verification of
death;
(4) In the event of a sale of health club ownership, the contract is voidable at the option of
the buyer.
(e) A health club contract that does not comply with the provisions of this chapter is
voidable at the option of the buyer.
(f) Upon cancellation pursuant to this section, the buyer shall be free of any and all
obligations under the contract, and any prepaid monies pursuant to this contract shall be refunded
within fifteen (15) business days of receipt of the notice of cancellation. The right of cancellation
shall not be affected by the terms of the contract and may not be waived or surrendered.
(g) Notice of the buyer’s right to cancel and the method of cancellation under this section
shall also be posted clearly and conspicuously on the premises of the health club.
SECTION 4. Section 5-78-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-78 entitled "Dating
Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-78-2. Contract requirements.
(a) Each contract for social referral services shall provide that such contract may be
cancelled at any time up until midnight of the third (3rd) business day after the date of receipt by
the buyer of a copy of the written contract, by written notice, delivered by electronic mail to the
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -5-)

seller at an electronic mail address that shall be specified in the contract or by certified or registered
United States mail to the seller at an address that shall be specified in the contract.
(b)(1) In every contract for social referral services, the seller shall furnish to the buyer a
fully completed copy of the contract at the time of its execution, which shows the date of the
transaction and contains the name, electronic mail address, and address of the seller, and in the
immediate proximity to the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer and in not
less than ten-point (10) boldface type, a statement in substantially the following form:
“You, the buyer, may cancel this contract at any time prior to midnight of the third business
day after your receipt of this contract. See the attached notice of cancellation for an explanation of
this right.”
(2) At the time the buyer signs the social referral services contract, a statement captioned
"Notice of Cancellation" shall be contained in the contract and shall contain, in not less than ten-
point (10) boldface type, the following information and statements:
“Notice of Cancellation”
“________________________________________ (Date of Transaction)
You may cancel this contract, without any penalty or obligation, at any time prior to
midnight of the third business day after your receipt of this contract by mailing this signed and
dated notice of cancellation by certified or registered United States mail to the seller at the following
address: __________________________. You may also cancel this contract, without any penalty
or obligation, at any time prior to midnight of the third business day after your receipt of this
contract by electronically transmitting this contract by electronic mail to the seller at the following
electronic mail address:________________________________________________. If you cancel,
any payments made by you under the contract will be returned within ten (10) business days
following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice.”
(3) All moneys paid pursuant to any contract for social referral services shall be refunded
within ten (10) business days of receipt of the notice of cancellation.
(c) The consumer’s right of rescission shall not be waived, sold, or abrogated in any way
or manner.
SECTION 5. Sections 42-64.20-5 and 42-64.20-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-
64.20 entitled "Rebuild Rhode Island Tax Credit" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.20-5. Tax credits.
(a) An applicant meeting the requirements of this chapter may be allowed a credit as set
forth hereinafter against taxes imposed upon such person under applicable provisions of title 44 of
the general laws for a qualified development project.
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -6-)

(b) To be eligible as a qualified development project entitled to tax credits, an applicant’s
chief executive officer or equivalent officer shall demonstrate to the commerce corporation, at the
time of application, that:
(1) The applicant has committed a capital investment or owner equity of not less than
twenty percent (20%) of the total project cost;
(2) There is a project financing gap in which after taking into account all available private
and public funding sources, the project is not likely to be accomplished by private enterprise
without the tax credits described in this chapter; and
(3) The project fulfills the state’s policy and planning objectives and priorities in that:
(i) The applicant will, at the discretion of the commerce corporation, obtain a tax
stabilization agreement from the municipality in which the real estate project is located on such
terms as the commerce corporation deems acceptable;
(ii) It (A) Is a commercial development consisting of at least 25,000 square feet occupied
by at least one business employing at least 25 full-time employees after construction or such
additional full-time employees as the commerce corporation may determine; (B) Is a multi-family
residential development in a new, adaptive reuse, certified historic structure, or recognized
historical structure consisting of at least 20,000 square feet and having at least 20 residential units
in a hope community; or (C) Is a mixed-use development in a new, adaptive reuse, certified historic
structure, or recognized historical structure consisting of at least 25,000 square feet occupied by at
least one business, subject to further definition through rules and regulations promulgated by the
commerce corporation; and
(iii) Involves a total project cost of not less than $5,000,000, except for a qualified
development project located in a hope community or redevelopment area designated under § 45-
32-4 in which event the commerce corporation shall have the discretion to modify the minimum
project cost requirement.
(4) Until July 1, 2025, pursuant to P. L. 2022 ch. 271 and P. L. 2022 ch. 272, for
construction projects in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), all construction workers shall
be paid in accordance with the wages and benefits required pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 with
all contractors and subcontractors required to file certified payrolls on a monthly basis for all work
completed in the preceding month on a uniform form prescribed by the director of labor and
training. Failure to follow the requirements pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 shall constitute a
material violation and a material breach of the agreement with the state. The commerce corporation,
in consultation with the director of labor and training and the tax administrator, shall promulgate
such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the enforcement of this subsection. The
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -7-)

provisions of this subsection shall expire and sunset on July 1, 2025.
(5) Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, for
construction projects awarded a tax credit agreement on or after July 1, 2025, and involving a
budget of direct hard construction costs (as defined in § 44-33.6-2) in excess of twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000), all construction workers shall be paid in accordance with the wages and
benefits required pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 with all contractors and subcontractors required
to file certified payrolls on a monthly basis for all work completed in the preceding month on a
uniform form prescribed by the director of labor and training. Failure to follow the requirements
pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 shall constitute a material violation and a material breach of the
agreement with the state. The commerce corporation, in consultation with the director of labor and
training and the tax administrator, shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the enforcement of this subsection.
(c) The commerce corporation shall develop separate, streamlined application processes
for the issuance of rebuild RI tax credits for each of the following:
(1) Qualified development projects that involve certified historic structures;
(2) Qualified development projects that involve recognized historical structures;
(3) Qualified development projects that involve at least one manufacturer; and
(4) Qualified development projects that include affordable housing or workforce housing.
(d) Applications made for a historic structure or recognized historic structure tax credit
under chapter 33.6 of title 44 shall be considered for tax credits under this chapter. The division of
taxation, at the expense of the commerce corporation, shall provide communications from the
commerce corporation to those who have applied for and are in the queue awaiting the offer of tax
credits pursuant to chapter 33.6 of title 44 regarding their potential eligibility for the rebuild RI tax
credit program.
(e) Applicants (1) Who have received the notice referenced in subsection (d) above and
who may be eligible for a tax credit pursuant to chapter 33.6 of title 44; (2) Whose application
involves a certified historic structure or recognized historical structure; or (3) Whose project is
occupied by at least one manufacturer shall be exempt from the requirements of subsections
(b)(3)(ii) and (b)(3)(iii). The following procedure shall apply to such applicants:
(i) The division of taxation shall remain responsible for determining the eligibility of an
applicant for tax credits awarded under chapter 33.6 of title 44;
(ii) The commerce corporation shall retain sole authority for determining the eligibility of
an applicant for tax credits awarded under this chapter; and
(iii) The commerce corporation shall not award in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -8-)

annual amount authorized in any fiscal year to applicants seeking tax credits pursuant to this
subsection (e); and
(iv) No tax credits shall be awarded under this chapter unless the commerce corporation
receives confirmation from the department of labor and training that there has been compliance
with the prevailing wage requirements set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) Maximum project credit.
(1) For qualified development projects, the maximum tax credit allowed under this chapter
shall be the lesser of (i) Thirty percent (30%) of the total project cost; or (ii) The amount needed to
close a project financing gap (after taking into account all other private and public funding sources
available to the project), as determined by the commerce corporation.
(2) The credit allowed pursuant to this chapter, inclusive of any sales and use tax
exemptions allowed pursuant to this chapter, shall not exceed fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000)
for any qualified development project under this chapter; except as provided in subsection (f)(3) of
this section; provided however, any qualified development project that exceeds the project cap upon
passage of this act shall be deemed not to exceed the cap, shall not be reduced, nor shall it be further
increased. No building or qualified development project to be completed in phases or in multiple
projects shall exceed the maximum project credit of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for all
phases or projects involved in the rehabilitation of the building. Provided, however, that for
purposes of this subsection and no more than once in a given fiscal year, the commerce corporation
may consider the development of land and buildings by a developer on the “I-195 land” as defined
in § 42-64.24-3(6) as a separate, qualified development project from a qualified development
project by a tenant or owner of a commercial condominium or similar legal interest including
leasehold improvement, fit out, and capital investment. Such qualified development project by a
tenant or owner of a commercial condominium or similar legal interest on the I-195 land may be
exempted from subsection (f)(1)(i) of this section.
(3) The credit allowed pursuant to this chapter, inclusive of any sales and use tax
exemptions allowed pursuant to this chapter, shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) for the project for which the I-195 redevelopment district was authorized to enter
into a purchase and sale agreement for parcels 42 and P4 on December 19, 2018, provided that
project is approved for credits pursuant to this chapter by the commerce corporation.
(4) For qualified development projects involving the development of housing and mixed
use projects involving housing which are restricted to require at least twenty percent (20%) of the
housing units being affordable housing or workforce housing development for residents making no
more than between eighty percent (80%) and one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -9-)

median income (AMI) shall be allowed sales and use tax exemptions of up to thirty percent (30%)
of the maximum project credit in addition to the maximum project credit of fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000) pursuant to this chapter. Any sales and use tax exemptions allowed in addition to the
maximum project credit shall be for purchases made by June 30, 2028.
(g) Credits available under this chapter shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the project
cost, provided, however, that the applicant shall be eligible for additional tax credits of not more
than ten percent (10%) of the project cost, if the qualified development project meets any of the
following criteria or other additional criteria determined by the commerce corporation from time
to time in response to evolving economic or market conditions:
(1) The project includes adaptive reuse or development of a recognized historical structure;
(2) The project is undertaken by or for a targeted industry;
(3) The project is located in a transit-oriented development area;
(4) The project includes residential development of which at least twenty percent (20%) of
the residential units are designated as affordable housing or workforce housing;
(5) The project includes the adaptive reuse of property subject to the requirements of the
industrial property remediation and reuse act, § 23-19.14-1 et seq.; or
(6) The project includes commercial facilities constructed in accordance with the minimum
environmental and sustainability standards, as certified by the commerce corporation pursuant to
Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design or other equivalent standards.
(h) Maximum aggregate credits. The aggregate sum authorized pursuant to this chapter,
inclusive of any sales and use tax exemptions allowed pursuant to this chapter, shall not exceed
two hundred twenty-five million dollars ($225,000,000), excluding any tax credits allowed
pursuant to subsection (f)(3) of this section.
(i) Tax credits shall not be allowed under this chapter prior to the taxable year in which the
project is placed in service.
(j) The amount of a tax credit allowed under this chapter shall be allowable to the taxpayer
in up to five, annual increments; no more than thirty percent (30%) and no less than fifteen percent
(15%) of the total credits allowed to a taxpayer under this chapter may be allowable for any taxable
year.
(k) If the portion of the tax credit allowed under this chapter exceeds the taxpayer’s total
tax liability for the year in which the relevant portion of the credit is allowed, the amount that
exceeds the taxpayer’s tax liability may be carried forward for credit against the taxes imposed for
the succeeding four (4) years, or until the full credit is used, whichever occurs first. Credits allowed
to a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership, or multiple owners of property
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -10-)

shall be passed through to the persons designated as partners, members, or owners respectively pro
rata or pursuant to an executed agreement among persons designated as partners, members, or
owners documenting an alternate distribution method without regard to their sharing of other tax
or economic attributes of such entity.
(l) The commerce corporation, in consultation with the division of taxation, shall establish,
by regulation, the process for the assignment, transfer, or conveyance of tax credits.
(m) For purposes of this chapter, any assignment or sales proceeds received by the taxpayer
for its assignment or sale of the tax credits allowed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from
taxation under title 44. If a tax credit is subsequently revoked or adjusted, the seller’s tax calculation
for the year of revocation or adjustment shall be increased by the total amount of the sales proceeds,
without proration, as a modification under chapter 30 of title 44. In the event that the seller is not a
natural person, the seller’s tax calculation under chapter 11, 13, 14, or 17 of title 44, as applicable,
for the year of revocation, or adjustment, shall be increased by including the total amount of the
sales proceeds without proration.
(n) The tax credit allowed under this chapter may be used as a credit against corporate
income taxes imposed under chapter 11, 13, 14, or 17 of title 44, or may be used as a credit against
personal income taxes imposed under chapter 30 of title 44 for owners of pass-through entities such
as a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership, or multiple owners of property.
(o) In the case of a corporation, this credit is only allowed against the tax of a corporation
included in a consolidated return that qualifies for the credit and not against the tax of other
corporations that may join in the filing of a consolidated tax return.
(p) Upon request of a taxpayer and subject to annual appropriation, the state shall redeem
this credit, in whole or in part, for ninety percent (90%) of the value of the tax credit. The division
of taxation, in consultation with the commerce corporation, shall establish by regulation a
redemption process for tax credits.
(q) Projects eligible to receive a tax credit under this chapter may, at the discretion of the
commerce corporation, be exempt from sales and use taxes imposed on the purchase of the
following classes of personal property only to the extent utilized directly and exclusively in the
project: (1) Furniture, fixtures, and equipment, except automobiles, trucks, or other motor vehicles;
or (2) Other materials, including construction materials and supplies, that are depreciable and have
a useful life of one year or more and are essential to the project.
(r) The commerce corporation shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration
and certification of additional tax credit under subsection (g), including criteria for the eligibility,
evaluation, prioritization, and approval of projects that qualify for such additional tax credit.
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -11-)

(s) The commerce corporation shall not have any obligation to make any award or grant
any benefits under this chapter.
42-64.20-10. Sunset.
No credits shall be authorized to be reserved pursuant to this chapter after December 31,
2025 2026.
SECTION 6. Section 42-64.21-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.21 entitled "Rhode
Island Tax Increment Financing" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.21-9. Sunset.
The commerce corporation shall enter into no agreement under this chapter after December
31, 2025 2026.
SECTION 7. Section 42-64.22-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.22 entitled "Tax
Stabilization Incentive" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.22-15. Sunset.
The commerce corporation shall enter into no agreement under this chapter after December
31, 2025 2026.
SECTION 8. Section 42-64.23-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.23 entitled "First
Wave Closing Fund" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.23-8. Sunset.
No financing shall be authorized to be reserved pursuant to this chapter after December 31,
2025 2026.
SECTION 9. Section 42-64.24-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.24 entitled "I-195
Redevelopment Project Fund" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.24-8. Sunset.
No funding, credits, or incentives shall be authorized or authorized to be reserved pursuant
to this chapter after December 31, 2025 2026.
SECTION 10. Section 42-64.25-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.25 entitled
"Small Business Assistance Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.25-14. Sunset.
No grants, funding, or incentives shall be authorized pursuant to this chapter after
December 31, 2025 2028.
SECTION 11. Section 42-64.26-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.26 entitled "Stay
Invested in RI Wavemaker Fellowships" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.26-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -12-)

(1) “Applicant” means an eligible graduate who applies for a tax credit for education loan
repayment expenses under this chapter.
(2) “Award” means a tax credit awarded by the commerce corporation to an applicant as
provided under this chapter.
(3) “Commerce corporation” means the Rhode Island commerce corporation established
pursuant to chapter 64 of this title.
(4) “Eligibility period” means a term of up to four (4) consecutive service periods
beginning with the date that an eligible graduate receives initial notice of award under this chapter
and expiring at the conclusion of the fourth service period after such date specified.
(5) “Eligibility requirements” means the following qualifications or criteria required for an
applicant to claim an award under this chapter:
(i) That the applicant shall have graduated from an accredited two-year (2), four-year (4),
or graduate postsecondary institution of higher learning with an associate’s, bachelor’s, graduate,
or post-graduate degree and at which the applicant incurred education loan repayment expenses;
(ii) That the applicant shall be a full-time employee with a Rhode Island-based employer
located in this state throughout the eligibility period, whose employment is:
(A) For work in one or more of the following covered fields: life, natural or environmental
sciences; computer, information or software technology; advanced mathematics or finance;
engineering; industrial design or other commercially related design field; or medicine or medical
device technology;
(B) As a teacher; or
(C) As a healthcare applicant.
(6) “Eligible expenses” or “education loan repayment expenses” means annual higher
education loan repayment expenses, including, without limitation, principal, interest and fees, as
may be applicable, incurred by an eligible graduate and which the eligible graduate is obligated to
repay for attendance at a postsecondary institution of higher learning.
(7) “Eligible graduate” means an individual who meets the eligibility requirements under
this chapter.
(8) “Full-time employee” means:
(i) A a person who is employed by a business for consideration for a minimum of at least
thirty-five (35) hours per week, or who renders any other standard of service generally accepted by
custom or practice as full-time employment, or who is employed by a professional employer
organization pursuant to an employee leasing agreement between the business and the professional
employer organization for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week, or who renders any other
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -13-)

standard of service generally accepted by custom or practice as full-time employment, and whose
wages are subject to withholding; or
(ii) A healthcare applicant, as defined pursuant to the provisions of this section, who works
or professionally provides healthcare services for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week as
a sole proprietor, as a partner in a healthcare service partnership, or as a member in a single member
limited liability company ("LLC") to include any healthcare applicant who has completed an
application pursuant to the provisions of § 42-64.26-5 on or after July 1, 2022.
(9) “Fund” refers to the “Stay Invested in RI Wavemaker Fellowship Fund” established
pursuant to § 42-64.26-4(a).
(10) “Healthcare applicant” means any applicant who meets the eligibility requirements
and works as a full-time employee or in a capacity as defined in subsection 8(ii) of this section, as
a high-demand healthcare practitioner or mental health professional, including, but not limited to,
clinical social workers and mental health counselors licensed by the department of health, and as
defined in regulations to be promulgated by the commerce corporation, in consultation with the
executive office of health and human services, pursuant to chapter 35 of this title.
(11) “Primary care” means healthcare services that cover a range of prevention, wellness,
and treatment for common illnesses and injuries. Primary care includes patients making an initial
approach to a healthcare professional for treatment as well as long-term relationships established
between a patient and a healthcare professional and may include family medicine or medical care,
general internal medicine or medical care, and general medical practice.
(12) “Rhode Island-based employer” means: (i) An employer having a principal place of
business or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of its employees located in this state; or (ii) An employer
registered to conduct business in this state that reported Rhode Island tax liability in the previous
tax year.
(13) “Service period” means a twelve-month (12) period beginning on the date that an
eligible graduate receives initial notice of award under this chapter.
(14) “Student loan” means a loan to an individual by a public authority or private lender to
assist the individual to pay for tuition, books, and living expenses in order to attend a postsecondary
institution of higher learning.
(15) “Taxpayer” means an applicant who receives a tax credit under this chapter.
(16) “Teacher” shall have the meaning prescribed to it in rules and regulations to be
promulgated by the commerce corporation in consultation with the Rhode Island department of
elementary and secondary education.
SECTION 12. Section 42-64.26-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.26 entitled "Stay
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -14-)

Invested in RI Wavemaker Fellowships" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.26-12. Sunset.
No incentives or credits shall be authorized pursuant to this chapter after December 31,
2025 2026.
SECTION 13. Section 42-64.27-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.27 entitled "Main
Street Rhode Island Streetscape Improvement Fund" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.27-6. Sunset.
No incentives shall be authorized pursuant to this chapter after December 31, 2025 2026.
SECTION 14. Section 42-64.28-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64.28 entitled
"Innovation Initiative" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64.28-10. Sunset.
No vouchers, grants, or incentives shall be authorized pursuant to this chapter after
December 31, 2025 2026.
SECTION 15. Section 44-33.6-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-33.6 entitled "Historic
Preservation Tax Credits 2013" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-33.6-3. Tax credit.
(a) Subject to the maximum credit provisions set forth in subsections (c) and (d) below,
any person, firm, partnership, trust, estate, limited liability company, corporation (whether for
profit or nonprofit) or other business entity that incurs qualified rehabilitation expenditures for the
substantial rehabilitation of a certified historic structure, provided the rehabilitation meets standards
consistent with the standards of the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior for
rehabilitation as certified by the commission and said person, firm, partnership, trust, estate, limited
liability company, corporation or other business entity is not a social club as defined in § 44-33.6-
2, shall be entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed on such person or entity pursuant to chapter
11, 12, 13, 14, 17, or 30 of this title in an amount equal to the following:
(1) Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures; or
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures provided that
either:
(i) At least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total rentable area of the certified historic
structure will be made available for a trade or business; or
(ii) The entire rentable area located on the first floor of the certified historic structure will
be made available for a trade or business.
(b) Tax credits allowed pursuant to this chapter shall be allowed for the taxable year in
which such certified historic structure or an identifiable portion of the structure is placed in service
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -15-)

provided that the substantial rehabilitation test is met for such year.
(c) Maximum project credit. The credit allowed pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed
five million dollars ($5,000,000) for any certified rehabilitation project under this chapter. No
building to be completed in phases or in multiple projects shall exceed the maximum project credit
of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for all phases or projects involved in the rehabilitation of such
building.
(d) Maximum aggregate credits. The aggregate credits authorized to be reserved pursuant
to this chapter shall not exceed sums estimated to be available in the historic preservation tax credit
trust fund pursuant to this chapter.
(e) Subject to the exception provided in subsection (g) of this section, if the amount of the
tax credit exceeds the taxpayer’s total tax liability for the year in which the substantially
rehabilitated property is placed in service, the amount that exceeds the taxpayer’s tax liability may
be carried forward for credit against the taxes imposed for the succeeding ten (10) years, or until
the full credit is used, whichever occurs first for the tax credits. Credits allowed to a partnership, a
limited liability company taxed as a partnership, or multiple owners of property shall be passed
through to the persons designated as partners, members, or owners respectively pro rata or pursuant
to an executed agreement among such persons designated as partners, members, or owners
documenting an alternate distribution method without regard to their sharing of other tax or
economic attributes of such entity. Credits may be allocated to partners, members, or owners that
are exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3), section (c)(4) or section 501(c)(6) of the U.S.
Code and these partners, members, or owners must be treated as taxpayers for purposes of this
section.
(f) If the taxpayer has not claimed the tax credits in whole or part, taxpayers eligible for
the tax credits may assign, transfer, or convey the credits, in whole or in part, by sale or otherwise
to any individual or entity, including, but not limited to, condominium owners in the event the
certified historic structure is converted into condominiums and assignees of the credits that have
not claimed the tax credits in whole or part may assign, transfer, or convey the credits, in whole or
in part, by sale or otherwise to any individual or entity. The assignee of the tax credits may use
acquired credits to offset up to one hundred percent (100%) of the tax liabilities otherwise imposed
pursuant to chapter 11, 12, 13 (other than the tax imposed under § 44-13-13), 14, 17, or 30 of this
title. The assignee may apply the tax credit against taxes imposed on the assignee until the end of
the tenth calendar year after the year in which the substantially rehabilitated property is placed in
service or until the full credit assigned is used, whichever occurs first. Fiscal year assignees may
claim the credit until the expiration of the fiscal year that ends within the tenth year after the year
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -16-)

in which the substantially rehabilitated property is placed in service. The assignor shall perfect the
transfer by notifying the state of Rhode Island division of taxation, in writing, within thirty (30)
calendar days following the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any information as may
be required by the division of taxation to administer and carry out the provisions of this section.
For purposes of this chapter, any assignment or sales proceeds received by the taxpayer for
its assignment or sale of the tax credits allowed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from this
title. If a tax credit is subsequently recaptured under this chapter, revoked, or adjusted, the seller’s
tax calculation for the year of revocation, recapture, or adjustment shall be increased by the total
amount of the sales proceeds, without proration, as a modification under chapter 30 of this title. In
the event that the seller is not a natural person, the seller’s tax calculation under chapter 11, 12, 13
(other than with respect to the tax imposed under § 44-13-13), 14, 17, or 30 of this title, as
applicable, for the year of revocation, recapture, or adjustment, shall be increased by including the
total amount of the sales proceeds without proration.
(g) Credits allowed to partners, members, or owners that are exempt from taxation under
section 501(c)(3), section (c)(4) or section 501(c)(6) of the U.S. Code, and only said credits, shall
be fully refundable.
(h) Substantial rehabilitation of property that either:
(1) Is exempt from real property tax;
(2) Is a social club; or
(3) Consists of a single-family home or a property that contains less than three (3)
residential apartments or condominiums shall be ineligible for the tax credits authorized under this
chapter; provided, however, a scattered site development with five (5) or more residential units in
the aggregate (which may include single-family homes) shall be eligible for tax credit. In the event
a certified historic structure undergoes a substantial rehabilitation pursuant to this chapter and
within twenty-four (24) months after issuance of a certificate of completed work the property
becomes exempt from real property tax, the taxpayer’s tax for the year shall be increased by the
total amount of credit actually used against the tax.
(i) In the case of a corporation, this credit is only allowed against the tax of a corporation
included in a consolidated return that qualifies for the credit and not against the tax of other
corporations that may join in the filing of a consolidated tax return.
(j) For construction projects awarded a tax credit agreement on or after July 1, 2025, and
involving a budget of direct hard construction costs (as defined in § 44-33.6-2) in excess of ten
million dollars ($10,000,000) twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), all construction workers
shall be paid in accordance with the wages and benefits required pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -17-)

and all contractors and subcontractors shall file certified payrolls on a monthly basis for all work
completed in the preceding month on a uniform form prescribed by the director of labor and
training. Failure to follow the requirements pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 shall constitute a
material violation and a material breach of the agreement with the state. The tax administrator, in
consultation with the director of labor and training, shall promulgate such rules and regulations as
are necessary to implement the enforcement of this subsection.
(k) No tax credits shall be awarded under this chapter unless the division of taxation
receives confirmation from the department of labor and training that there has been compliance
with the prevailing wage requirements set forth in subsection (j) of this section.
SECTION 16. Section 44-48.3-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-48.3 entitled "Rhode
Island New Qualified Jobs Incentive Act 2015" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-48.3-14. Sunset.
No credits shall be authorized to be reserved pursuant to this chapter after December 31,
2025 2026.
SECTION 17. All sections of this article shall take effect upon passage, except Section 1
and Section 2, which shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
Art6
RELATING TO ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(Page -18-)

=======
art.007/4/007/3/007/2/007/1
=======
ARTICLE 7 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO EDUCATION
SECTION 1. Section 16-7-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7 entitled "Foundation
Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7-22. Determination of average daily membership.
Each community shall be paid pursuant to the provisions of § 16-7-17 an amount based
upon the following provisions:
(1) On or before September 1 of each year the average daily membership of each city and
town for the reference year shall be determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education from data supplied by the school committee in each community in the following manner:
The aggregate number of days of membership of all pupils enrolled full time in grade twelve (12)
and below, except that pupils below grade one who are not full time shall be counted on a full-time
equivalent basis: (i) Increased by the aggregate number of days of membership of pupils residing
in the particular city or town whose tuition in schools approved by the department of elementary
and secondary education in other cities and towns is paid by the particular city or town; and (ii)
Decreased by the aggregate number of days of membership of nonresident pupils enrolled in the
public schools of the particular city or town and further decreased by the aggregate number of days
of membership equal to the number of group home beds calculated for the purposes of
reimbursement pursuant to § 16-64-1.1; and (iii) Decreased further, in the case of a city or town
that is a member of a regional school district during the first year of operation of the regional school
district by the aggregate number of days of membership of pupils residing in the city or town who
would have attended the public schools in the regional school district if the regional school district
had been operating during the previous year, divided by the number of days during which the
schools were officially in session during the reference year. The resulting figures shall be the
average daily membership for the city or town for the reference year. For purposes of calculating
the permanent foundation education aid as described in § 16-7.2-3(1) and (2), the average daily
membership for school districts shall exclude charter school and state school students, and
beginning in school year 2014-2015, include an estimate to ensure that districts converting from a
half-day to a full-day kindergarten program pursuant to § 16-99-4 are credited on a full-time basis

beginning in the first year of enrollment and are funded notwithstanding the transition plan pursuant
to § 16-7.2-7.
(2) The average daily membership of pupils attending public schools shall apply for the
purposes of determining the percentage of the state’s share under the provisions of §§ 16-7-16(3),
16-7-16(10), 16-7-18, 16-7-19, 16-7-20, 16-7-21, and 16-7.2-4.
(3) In the case of regional school districts, the aggregate number of days of membership by
which each city or town is decreased in subsection (1)(iii) of this section, divided by the number of
days during which the schools attended by the pupils were officially in session, shall determine the
average daily membership for the regional school district during the first year of operation. After
the first year of operation, the average daily membership of each regional school district, except
the Chariho regional high school district, shall be determined by the commissioner of elementary
and secondary education from data supplied by the school committee of each regional school
district for the reference year in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) For all fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2024, notwithstanding subsection (1)(ii)
above, the decrease for group home beds shall not apply to residential facility “beds” located or
associated with the CRAFT program pursuant to § 16-64-1.1.
SECTION 2. Sections 16-7.2-3 and 16-7.2-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.2 entitled
"The Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.2-3. Permanent foundation education aid established.
(a) Beginning in the 2012 fiscal year, the following foundation education-aid formula shall
take effect. The foundation education aid for each district shall be the sum of the core instruction
amount in subsection (a)(1) of this section and the amount to support high-need students in
subsection (a)(2) of this section, which shall be multiplied by the district state-share ratio calculated
pursuant to § 16-7.2-4 to determine the foundation aid.
(1) The core instruction amount shall be an amount equal to a statewide, per-pupil core
instruction amount as established by the department of elementary and secondary education,
derived from the average of northeast regional expenditure data for the states of Rhode Island,
Massachusetts, Connecticut, and New Hampshire from the National Center for Education Statistics
(NCES) that will adequately fund the student instructional needs as described in the basic education
program and multiplied by the district average daily membership as defined in § 16-7-22.
Expenditure data in the following categories: instruction and support services for students,
instruction, general administration, school administration, and other support services from the
National Public Education Financial Survey, as published by NCES, and enrollment data from the
Common Core of Data, also published by NCES, will be used when determining the core
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -2-)

instruction amount. The core instruction amount will be updated annually. For the purpose of
calculating this formula, school districts’ resident average daily membership shall exclude charter
school and state-operated school students.
(2) The amount to support high-need students beyond the core instruction amount shall be
determined by:
(i) Multiplying a student success factor of forty percent (40%) by the core instruction per-
pupil amount described in subsection (a)(1) of this section and applying that amount for each
resident child whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of
federal poverty guidelines, hereinafter referred to as “poverty status.” By October 1, 2022, as part
of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to state fiscal year 2024 and thereafter, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and utilize a poverty measure that
in the department’s assessment most accurately serves as a proxy for the poverty status referenced
in this subsection and does not rely on the administration of school nutrition programs. The
department shall utilize this measure in calculations pursuant to this subsection related to the
application of the student success factor, in calculations pursuant to § 16-7.2-4 related to the
calculation of the state share ratio, and in the formulation of estimates pursuant to subsection (b)
below. The department may also include any recommendations which seek to mitigate any
disruptions associated with the implementation of this new poverty measure or improve the
accuracy of its calculation. Beginning with the FY 2024 calculation, students whose family income
is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines will be
determined by participation in the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP). The number
of students directly certified through the department of human services shall be multiplied by a
factor of 1.6; and
(ii) Multiplying a multilingual learner (MLL) factor of twenty percent (20%) by the core
instruction per-pupil amount described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, applying that amount
for each resident child identified in the three lowest proficiency categories using widely adopted,
independent standards and assessments in accordance with subsection (f)(1) of this section and as
identified by the commissioner and defined by regulations of the council on elementary and
secondary education. Local education agencies shall report annually to the department of
elementary and secondary education by September 1, outlining the planned and prior year use of
all funding pursuant to this subsection to provide services to MLL students in accordance with
requirements set forth by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The
department shall review the use of funds to ensure consistency with established best practices.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide an estimate of the
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -3-)

foundation education aid cost as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4. The estimate
shall include the most recent data available as well as an adjustment for average daily membership
growth or decline based on the prior year experience.
(c) In addition, the department shall report updated figures based on the average daily
membership as of October 1 by December 1.
(d) Local education agencies may set aside a portion of funds received under subsection
(a) to expand learning opportunities such as after school and summer programs, full-day
kindergarten and/or multiple pathway programs, provided that the basic education program and all
other approved programs required in law are funded.
(e) The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate such
regulations as are necessary to implement fully the purposes of this chapter.
(f)(1) By October 1, 2023, as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to
state fiscal year 2025, the department of elementary and secondary education shall evaluate the
number of students by district who qualify as multilingual learner (MLL) students and MLL
students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal
poverty guidelines. The submission shall also include segmentation of these populations by levels
as dictated by the WIDA multilingual learner assessment tool used as an objective benchmark for
English proficiency. The department shall also prepare and produce expense data sourced from the
uniform chart of accounts to recommend funding levels required to support students at the various
levels of proficiency as determined by the WIDA assessment tool. Utilizing this information, the
department shall recommend a funding solution to meet the needs of multilingual learners; this may
include but not be limited to inclusion of MLL needs within the core foundation formula amount
through one or multiple weights to distinguish different students of need or through categorical
means.
(2) By October 1, 2024, as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to
state fiscal year 2026, the department of elementary and secondary education shall develop
alternatives to identify students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
(185%) of federal poverty guidelines through participation in state-administered programs,
including, but not limited to, the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP), and RIteCare
and other programs that include the collection of required supporting documentation. The
department may also include any recommendations that seek to mitigate any disruptions associated
with implementation of this new poverty measure or improve the accuracy of its calculation.
(3) The department shall also report with its annual budget request information regarding
local contributions to education aid and compliance with §§ 16-7-23 and 16-7-24. The report shall
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -4-)

also compare these local contributions to state foundation education aid by community. The
department shall also report compliance to each city or town school committee and city or town
council.
(4) By October 1, 2025, as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to
state fiscal year 2027, the department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a report
developed in coordination with the department of administration and the Rhode Island longitudinal
data system within the office of the postsecondary commissioner. The report shall provide an
overview of the process for matching the department of human services program participation data
to the department of elementary and secondary education student enrollment records for use in the
education funding formula and recommend methods to ensure consistency and accuracy in future
matching processes.
(5) As part of its FY 2027 budget submission, the department shall also submit an estimate
of foundation education aid that uses expanded direct certification with Medicaid matching in
consultation with the Rhode Island longitudinal data system and the executive office of health and
human services to identify students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five
percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines, in addition to an estimate under the current law
poverty determination.
(6) By December 31, 2025, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
also develop and submit a report to the governor, speaker of the house, and senate president on
current and recommended processes to ensure the consistency and validity of submitted high-cost
special education data from local education agencies.
16-7.2-5. Charter public schools, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical
High School, and the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center.
(a) Charter public schools, as defined in chapter 77 of this title, the William M. Davies, Jr.
Career and Technical High School (Davies), and the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical
Center (the Met Center) shall be funded pursuant to § 16-7.2-3. If the October 1 actual enrollment
data for any charter public school shows a ten percent (10%) or greater change from the prior year
enrollment that is used as the reference year average daily membership, the last six (6) monthly
payments to the charter public school will be adjusted to reflect actual enrollment. The state share
of the permanent foundation education aid shall be paid by the state directly to the charter public
schools, Davies, and the Met Center pursuant to § 16-7.2-9 and shall be calculated using the state-
share ratio of the district of residence of the student as set forth in § 16-7.2-4. The department of
elementary and secondary education shall provide the general assembly with the calculation of the
state share of permanent foundation education aid for charter public schools delineated by school
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -5-)

district.
(b) The local share of education funding shall be paid to the charter public school, Davies,
and the Met Center by the district of residence of the student and shall be the local, per-pupil cost
calculated by dividing the local appropriation to education from property taxes, net of debt service,
and capital projects, as defined in the uniform chart of accounts by the average daily membership
for each city and town, pursuant to § 16-7-22, for the reference year.
(c) Beginning in FY 2017, there shall be a reduction to the local per-pupil funding paid by
the district of residence to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center. This reduction shall
be equal to the greater (i) Of seven percent (7%) of the local, per-pupil funding of the district of
residence pursuant to subsection (b) or (ii) The per-pupil value of the district’s costs for non-public
textbooks, transportation for non-public students, retiree health benefits, out-of-district special-
education tuition and transportation, services for students age eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21)
years old, pre-school screening and intervention, and career and technical education, tuition and
transportation costs, debt service and rental costs minus the average expenses incurred by charter
schools for those same categories of expenses as reported in the uniform chart of accounts for the
prior preceding fiscal year pursuant to § 16-7-16(11) and verified by the department of elementary
and secondary education. In the case where audited financials result in a change in the calculation
after the first tuition payment is made, the remaining payments shall be based on the most recent
audited data. For those districts whose greater reduction occurs under the calculation of (ii), there
shall be an additional reduction to payments to mayoral academies with teachers who do not
participate in the state teacher’s retirement system under chapter 8 of title 36 equal to the per-pupil
value of teacher retirement costs attributable to unfunded liability as calculated by the state’s
actuary for the prior preceding fiscal year. Notwithstanding the foregoing, beginning with FY 2026,
the reduction to the local per-pupil funding shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).
(d) Local district payments to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center for each
district’s students enrolled in these schools shall be made on a quarterly basis in July, October,
January, and April; however, the first local-district payment shall be made by August 15, instead
of July. Failure of the community to make the local-district payment for its student(s) enrolled in a
charter public school, Davies, and/or the Met Center may result in the withholding of state
education aid pursuant to § 16-7-31.
(e) Beginning in FY 2017, school districts with charter public school, Davies, and the Met
Center enrollment, that, combined, comprise five percent (5%) or more of the average daily
membership as defined in § 16-7-22, shall receive additional aid for a period of three (3) years. Aid
in FY 2017 shall be equal to the number of charter public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies,
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -6-)

or the Met Center students as of the reference year as defined in § 16-7-16 times a per-pupil amount
of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175). Aid in FY 2018 shall be equal to the number of charter
public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies, or the Met Center students as of the reference year
as defined in § 16-7-16 times a per-pupil amount of one hundred dollars ($100). Aid in FY 2019
shall be equal to the number of charter public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies, or the Met
Center students as of the reference year as defined in § 16-7-16 times a per-pupil amount of fifty
dollars ($50.00). The additional aid shall be used to offset the adjusted fixed costs retained by the
districts of residence.
(f) [Deleted by P.L. 2023, ch. 79, art. 8, § 2.]
SECTION 3. Section 16-64-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-64 entitled "Residence
of Children for School Purposes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-64-1.1. Payment and reimbursement for educational costs of children placed in
foster care, group homes, or other residential facility by a Rhode Island state agency.
(a) Children placed in foster care by a Rhode Island-licensed child-placing agency or a
Rhode Island governmental agency shall be entitled to the same free, appropriate public education
provided to all other residents of the city or town where the child is placed. The city or town shall
pay the cost of the education of the child during the time the child is in foster care in the city or
town.
(b) Children placed by the department of children, youth and families (DCYF) in a group
home or other residential facility that does not include the delivery of educational services are to
be educated by the community in which the group home or other residential facility is located, and
those children shall be entitled to the same free, appropriate public education provided to all other
residents of the city or town where the child is placed. For purposes of payment and reimbursement
for educational costs under this chapter, the term “group home or other residential facility” shall
not include independent-living programs or the Children's Residential and Family Treatment
(CRAFT) program located on the East Providence campus of Bradley Hospital. Each city and town
that contains one or more group homes or other residential facilities that do not include delivery of
educational services will receive funds as part of state aid to education in accordance with the
following provisions:
(1) On December 31 of each year, the DCYF shall provide the department of elementary
and secondary education with a precise count of how many group home or other residential facility
“beds” exist in each Rhode Island city or town, counting only those “beds” in facilities that do not
include the delivery of educational services. The number of “beds” in each group home or other
residential facility shall be equal to the maximum number of children who may be placed in that
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -7-)

group home or other residential facility on any given night according to the applicable licensure
standards of the DCYF.
(2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, if the number of beds certified by DCYF for
a school district by December 31, 2007, is greater than the number certified March 14, 2007, upon
which the education aid for FY 2008 was appropriated, the education aid for that district will be
increased by the number of increased beds multiplied by fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, the education aid for all
group home or other residential facility “beds” located or associated with the Children’s Residential
and Family Treatment (CRAFT) program located on the East Providence campus of Bradley
Hospital shall be twenty-two thousand dollars ($22,000) per bed. The Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education shall include the additional aid in equal payments in March, April, May,
and June, and the Governor’s budget recommendations pursuant to § 35-3-8 shall include the
amounts required to provide the increased aid.
For all fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2016, education aid for each school district
shall include seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) for each bed certified by DCYF by the preceding
December 31. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, the
education aid for all group home or other residential facility “beds” located or associated with the
Children’s Residential and Family Treatment (CRAFT) program located on the East Providence
campus of Bradley Hospital shall be twenty-six thousand dollars ($26,000) per bed. For all fiscal
years beginning after June 30, 2008, whenever the number of beds certified by DCYF for a school
district by December 31 is greater than the number certified the prior December 31 upon which the
education aid for that fiscal year was appropriated, the education aid for that district as enacted by
the assembly during the prior legislative session for that fiscal year will be increased by the number
of increased beds multiplied by the amount per bed authorized for that fiscal year. The Department
of Elementary and Secondary Education shall include the additional aid in equal payments in
March, April, May, and June, and the Governor’s budget recommendations pursuant to § 35-3-8
shall include the amounts required to provide the increased aid.
(c) Children placed by DCYF in a residential-treatment program, group home, or other
residential facility, whether or not located in the state of Rhode Island, which includes the delivery
of educational services provided by that facility (excluding facilities where students are taught on
grounds for periods of time by teaching staff provided by the school district in which the facility is
located), shall have the cost of their education paid for as provided for in subsection (d) and § 16-
64-1.2. The city or town determined to be responsible to DCYF for a per-pupil special-education
cost pursuant to § 16-64-1.2 shall pay its share of the cost of educational services to DCYF or to
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -8-)

the facility providing educational services.
(d) Children placed by DCYF in group homes, child-caring facilities, community
residences, or other residential facilities shall have the entire cost of their education paid for by
DCYF if:
(1) The facility is operated by the state of Rhode Island or the facility has a contract with
DCYF to fund a pre-determined number of placements or part of the facility’s program;
(2) The facility is state licensed; and
(3) The facility operates an approved, on-grounds educational program, whether or not the
child attends the on-grounds program.
(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other law, effective June 30, 2025, neither the
East Providence public schools nor the city of East Providence shall be responsible to provide any
educational or related services or instruction or have any financial responsibility for any student
attending the CRAFT program unless East Providence is that student's district of origin. The school
district of origin shall be responsible to provide any pay for such services and instruction consistent
with applicable state law and regulation. For purposes of this section, "school district of origin"
means the school district in which the student was last registered to attend prior to admission to the
CRAFT program. The East Providence school district shall not be paid reimbursement as provided
in this statute for such students.
SECTION 4. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art7
RELATING TO EDUCATION
(Page -9-)

=======
art.008/6/008/5/008/4/008/3/008/2/008/1
=======
ARTICLE 8 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
SECTION 1. Section 23-17-38.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17 entitled "Licensing
of Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17-38.1. Hospitals — Licensing fee.
(a) There is imposed a hospital licensing fee for state fiscal year 2023 against each hospital
in the state. The hospital licensing fee is equal to five and forty-two hundredths percent (5.42%) of
the net patient-services revenue of every hospital for the hospital’s first fiscal year ending on or
after January 1, 2021, except that the license fee for all hospitals located in Washington County,
Rhode Island shall be discounted by thirty-seven percent (37%). The discount for Washington
County hospitals is subject to approval by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and
Human Services of a state plan amendment submitted by the executive office of health and human
services for the purpose of pursuing a waiver of the uniformity requirement for the hospital license
fee. This licensing fee shall be administered and collected by the tax administrator, division of
taxation within the department of revenue, and all the administration, collection, and other
provisions of chapter 51 of title 44 shall apply. Every hospital shall pay the licensing fee to the tax
administrator on or before June 30, 2023, and payments shall be made by electronic transfer of
monies to the general treasurer and deposited to the general fund. Every hospital shall, on or before
May 25, 2023, make a return to the tax administrator containing the correct computation of net
patient-services revenue for the hospital fiscal year ending September 30, 2021, and the licensing
fee due upon that amount. All returns shall be signed by the hospital’s authorized representative,
subject to the pains and penalties of perjury.
(b)(a) There is also imposed a hospital licensing fee described in subsections (c) through
(f) for state fiscal years 2024 and 2025 against net patient-services revenue of every non-
government owned hospital as defined herein for the hospital’s first fiscal year ending on or after
January 1, 2022. The hospital licensing fee shall have three (3) tiers with differing fees based on
inpatient and outpatient net patient-services revenue. The executive office of health and human
services, in consultation with the tax administrator, shall identify the hospitals in each tier, subject
to the definitions in this section, by July 15, 2023, and shall notify each hospital of its tier by August
1, 2023.

(b) There is also imposed a hospital licensing fee described in subsections (c) through (f)
for state fiscal year 2026 against net patient-services revenue of every non-government owned
hospital as defined herein for the hospital’s first fiscal year ending on or after January 1, 2023. The
hospital licensing fee shall have three (3) tiers with differing fees based on inpatient and outpatient
net patient-services revenue. The executive office of health and human services, in consultation
with the tax administrator, shall identify the hospitals in each tier, subject to the definitions in this
section, by July 15, 2025, and shall notify each hospital of its assigned tier by August 1, 2025.
(c) Tier 1 is composed of hospitals that do not meet the description of either Tier 2 or Tier
3.
(1) The inpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 1 is equal to thirteen and twelve hundredths
percent (13.12%) of the inpatient net patient-services revenue derived from inpatient net patient-
services revenue of every Tier 1 hospital.
(2) The outpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 1 is equal to thirteen and thirty hundredths
percent (13.30%) of the net patient-services revenue derived from outpatient net patient-services
revenue of every Tier 1 hospital.
(d) Tier 2 is composed of high Medicaid/uninsured cost hospitals and independent
hospitals.
(1) The inpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 2 is equal to two and sixty-three hundredths
percent (2.63%) of the inpatient net patient-services revenue derived from inpatient net patient-
services revenue of every Tier 2 hospital.
(2) The outpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 2 is equal to two and sixty-six hundredths
percent (2.66%) of the outpatient net patient-services revenue derived from outpatient net patient-
services revenue of every Tier 2 hospital.
(e) Tier 3 is composed of hospitals that are Medicare-designated low-volume hospitals and
rehabilitative hospitals.
(1) The inpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 3 is equal to one and thirty-one hundredths
percent (1.31%) of the inpatient net patient-services revenue derived from inpatient net patient-
services revenue of every Tier 3 hospital.
(2) The outpatient hospital licensing fee for Tier 3 is equal to one and thirty-three
hundredths percent (1.33%) of the outpatient net patient-services revenue derived from outpatient
net patient-services revenue of every Tier 3 hospital.
(f) There is also imposed a hospital licensing fee for state fiscal year 2024 against state-
government owned and operated hospitals in the state as defined herein. The hospital licensing fee
is equal to five and twenty-five hundredths percent (5.25%) of the net patient-services revenue of
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -2-)

every hospital for the hospital’s first fiscal year ending on or after January 1, 2022. There is also
imposed a hospital licensing fee for state fiscal year years 2025 and 2026 against state-government
owned and operated hospitals in the state as defined herein equal to five and twenty-five hundredths
percent (5.25%) of the net patient-services revenue of every hospital for the hospital’s first fiscal
year ending on or after January 1, 2023.
(g) The hospital licensing fee described in subsections (b) through (f) is subject to U.S.
Department of Health and Human Services approval of a request to waive the requirement that
healthcare-related taxes be imposed uniformly as contained in 42 C.F.R. § 433.68(d).
(h) This hospital licensing fee shall be administered and collected by the tax administrator,
division of taxation within the department of revenue, and all the administration, collection, and
other provisions of chapter 51 of title 44 shall apply. Every hospital shall pay the licensing fee to
the tax administrator before June 30 June 25 of each fiscal year, and payments shall be made by
electronic transfer of monies to the tax administrator and deposited to the general fund. Every
hospital shall, on or before August 1, 2023 of each fiscal year, make a return to the tax administrator
containing the correct computation of inpatient and outpatient net patient-services revenue for the
hospital fiscal year ending in 2022 data referenced in subsection (a) and or (b), and the licensing
fee due upon that amount. All returns shall be signed by the hospital’s authorized representative,
subject to the pains and penalties of perjury.
(i) For purposes of this section the following words and phrases have the following
meanings:
(1) “Gross patient-services revenue” means the gross revenue related to patient care
services.
(2) “High Medicaid/uninsured cost hospital” means a hospital for which the hospital’s total
uncompensated care, as calculated pursuant to § 40-8.3-2(4), divided by the hospital’s total net
patient-services revenues, is equal to six percent (6.0%) or greater.
(3) “Hospital” means the actual facilities and buildings in existence in Rhode Island,
licensed pursuant to § 23-17-1 et seq. on June 30, 2010, and thereafter any premises included on
that license, regardless of changes in licensure status pursuant to chapter 17.14 of this title (hospital
conversions) and § 23-17-6(b) (change in effective control), that provides short-term acute inpatient
and/or outpatient care to persons who require definitive diagnosis and treatment for injury, illness,
disabilities, or pregnancy. Notwithstanding the preceding language, the negotiated Medicaid
managed care payment rates for a court-approved purchaser that acquires a hospital through
receivership, special mastership, or other similar state insolvency proceedings (which court-
approved purchaser is issued a hospital license after January 1, 2013) shall be based upon the newly
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -3-)

negotiated rates between the court-approved purchaser and the health plan, and such rates shall be
effective as of the date that the court-approved purchaser and the health plan execute the initial
agreement containing the newly negotiated rate. The rate-setting methodology for inpatient hospital
payments and outpatient hospital payments set forth in §§ 40-8-13.4(b) and 40-8-13.4(b)(2),
respectively, shall thereafter apply to negotiated increases for each annual twelve-month (12)
period as of July 1 following the completion of the first full year of the court-approved purchaser’s
initial Medicaid managed care contract.
(4) “Independent hospitals” means a hospital not part of a multi-hospital system.
(5) “Inpatient net patient-services revenue” means the charges related to inpatient care
services less (i) Charges attributable to charity care; (ii) Bad debt expenses; and (iii) Contractual
allowances.
(6) “Medicare-designated low-volume hospital” means a hospital that qualifies under 42
C.F.R. 412.101(b)(2) for additional Medicare payments to qualifying hospitals for the higher
incremental costs associated with a low volume of discharges.
(7) “Net patient-services revenue” means the charges related to patient care services less
(i) Charges attributable to charity care; (ii) Bad debt expenses; and (iii) Contractual allowances.
(8) “Non-government owned hospitals” means a hospital not owned and operated by the
state of Rhode Island.
(9) “Outpatient net patient-services revenue” means the charges related to outpatient care
services less (i) Charges attributable to charity care; (ii) Bad debt expenses; and (iii) Contractual
allowances.
(10) “Rehabilitative hospital” means Rehabilitation Hospital Center licensed by the Rhode
Island department of health.
(11) “State-government owned and operated hospitals” means a hospital facility licensed
by the Rhode Island department of health, owned and operated by the state of Rhode Island.
(j) The tax administrator in consultation with the executive office of health and human
services shall make and promulgate any rules, regulations, and procedures not inconsistent with
state law and fiscal procedures that he or she deems necessary for the proper administration of this
section and to carry out the provisions, policy, and purposes of this section.
(k) The licensing fee imposed by subsection subsections (a) through (f) shall apply to
hospitals as defined herein that are duly licensed on July 1, 2022 2024, and shall be in addition to
the inspection fee imposed by § 23-17-38 and to any licensing fees previously imposed in
accordance with this section.
(l) The licensing fees imposed by subsections (b) through (f) shall apply to hospitals as
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -4-)

defined herein that are duly licensed on July 1, 2023, and shall be in addition to the inspection fee
imposed by § 23-17-38 and to any licensing fees previously imposed in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 2. Section 35-17-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-17 entitled "Medical
Assistance and Public Assistance Caseload Estimating Conferences" is hereby amended to read as
follows:
35-17-1. Purpose and membership.
(a) In order to provide for a more stable and accurate method of financial planning and
budgeting, it is hereby declared the intention of the legislature that there be a procedure for the
determination of official estimates of anticipated medical assistance expenditures and public
assistance caseloads, upon which the executive budget shall be based and for which appropriations
by the general assembly shall be made.
(b) The state budget officer, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor shall
meet in regularly scheduled caseload estimating conferences (C.E.C.). These conferences shall be
open public meetings.
(c) The chairpersonship of each regularly scheduled C.E.C. will rotate among the state
budget officer, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor, hereinafter referred to as
principals. The schedule shall be arranged so that no chairperson shall preside over two (2)
successive regularly scheduled conferences on the same subject.
(d) Representatives of all state agencies are to participate in all conferences for which their
input is germane.
(e) The department of human services shall provide monthly data to the members of the
caseload estimating conference by the fifteenth day of the following month. Monthly data shall
include, but is not limited to, actual caseloads and expenditures for the following case assistance
programs: Rhode Island Works, SSI state program, general public assistance, and child care. For
individuals eligible to receive the payment under § 40-6-27(a)(1)(vi) [repealed], the report shall
include the number of individuals enrolled in a managed care plan receiving long-term care services
and supports and the number receiving fee-for-service benefits. The executive office of health and
human services shall report relevant caseload information and expenditures for the following
medical assistance categories: hospitals, long-term care, managed care, pharmacy, and other
medical services. In the category of managed care, caseload information and expenditures for the
following populations shall be separately identified and reported: children with disabilities,
children in foster care, and children receiving adoption assistance and RIte Share enrollees under §
40-8.4-12(j). The information shall include the number of Medicaid recipients whose estate may
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -5-)

be subject to a recovery and the anticipated amount to be collected from those subject to recovery,
the total recoveries collected each month and number of estates attached to the collections and each
month, the number of open cases and the number of cases that have been open longer than three
months. The executive office will also report separately the amount that the Medicaid expenditures
have been reduced by third-party liability payments to providers, supplemental income verification
tools, the department of administration's office of internal audit and program integrity unit, and
recoveries from ABLE accounts.
(f) Beginning July 1, 2021, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals shall provide monthly data to the members of the caseload estimating
conference by the twenty-fifth day of the following month. Monthly data shall include, but is not
limited to, actual caseloads and expenditures for the private community developmental disabilities
services program. Information shall include, but not be limited to: the number of cases and
expenditures from the beginning of the fiscal year at the beginning of the prior month; cases added
and denied during the prior month; expenditures made; and the number of cases and expenditures
at the end of the month. The information concerning cases added and denied shall include summary
information and profiles of the service-demand request for eligible adults meeting the state statutory
definition for services from the division of developmental disabilities as determined by the division,
including age, Medicaid eligibility and agency selection placement with a list of the services
provided, and the reasons for the determinations of ineligibility for those cases denied. The
department shall also provide, monthly, the number of individuals in a shared-living arrangement
and how many may have returned to a twenty-four-hour (24) residential placement in that month.
The department shall also report, monthly, any and all information for the consent decree that has
been submitted to the federal court as well as the number of unduplicated individuals employed;
the place of employment; and the number of hours working. The department shall also provide the
amount of funding allocated to individuals above the assigned resource levels; the number of
individuals and the assigned resource level; and the reasons for the approved additional resources.
The department will also collect and forward to the house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor,
and the state budget officer, by November 1 of each year, the annual cost reports for each
community-based provider for the prior fiscal year. The department shall also provide the amount
of patient liability to be collected and the amount collected as well as the number of individuals
who have a financial obligation. The department will also provide a list of community-based
providers awarded an advanced payment for residential and community-based day programs; the
address for each property; and the value of the advancement. If the property is sold, the department
must report the final sale, including the purchaser, the value of the sale, and the name of the agency
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -6-)

that operated the facility. If residential property, the department must provide the number of
individuals residing in the home at the time of sale and identify the type of residential placement
that the individual(s) will be moving to. The department must report if the property will continue
to be licensed as a residential facility. The department will also report any newly licensed twenty-
four-hour (24) group home; the provider operating the facility; and the number of individuals
residing in the facility. Prior to December 1, 2017, the department will provide the authorizations
for community-based and day programs, including the unique number of individuals eligible to
receive the services and at the end of each month the unique number of individuals who participated
in the programs and claims processed.
(g) The executive office of health and human services shall provide direct assistance to the
department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to facilitate
compliance with the monthly reporting requirements in addition to preparation for the caseload
estimating conferences.
SECTION 3. Section 40-6-9.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-6 entitled "Public
Assistance Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-6-9.1. Data matching — Healthcare coverages.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term “medical assistance program” shall mean medical
assistance provided in whole or in part by the department of human services executive office of
health and human services pursuant to chapters 5.1, 8, 8.4 of this title, 12.3 of title 42 and/or Title
XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. and 42 U.S.C.
§ 1397aa et seq., respectively. Any references to the department office shall be to the department
of human services executive office of health and human services.
(b) In furtherance of the assignment of rights to medical support to the department of
human services executive office of health and human services under § 40-6-9(b), (c), (d), and (e),
and in order to determine the availability of other sources of healthcare insurance or coverage for
beneficiaries of the medical assistance program, and to determine potential third-party liability for
medical assistance paid out by the department office, all health insurers, health-maintenance
organizations, including managed care organizations, and third-party administrators, self-insured
plans, pharmacy benefit managers (PBM), and other parties that are by statute, contract, or
agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item of service doing
business in the state of Rhode Island shall permit and participate in data matching with the
department of human services executive office of health and human services, as provided in this
section, to assist the department office to identify medical assistance program applicants,
beneficiaries, and/or persons responsible for providing medical support for applicants and
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -7-)

beneficiaries who may also have healthcare insurance or coverage in addition to that provided, or
to be provided, by the medical assistance program and to determine any third-party liability in
accordance with this section.
The department office shall take all reasonable measures to determine the legal liability of
all third parties (including health insurers, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in §
607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service
benefit plans, health-maintenance organizations, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit
managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for
payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service), to pay for care and services on behalf of a
medical assistance recipient, including collecting sufficient information to enable the department
office to pursue claims against such third parties.
In any case where such a legal liability is found to exist and medical assistance has been
made available on behalf of the individual (beneficiary), the department office shall seek
reimbursement for the assistance to the extent of the legal liability and in accordance with the
assignment described in § 40-6-9.
To the extent that payment has been made by the department office for medical assistance
to a beneficiary in any case where a third party has a legal liability to make payment for the
assistance, and to the extent that payment has been made by the department office for medical
assistance for healthcare items or services furnished to an individual, the department office (state)
is considered to have acquired the rights of the individual to payment by any other party for the
healthcare items or services in accordance with § 40-6-9.
Any health insurer (including a group health plan, as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)], a self-insured plan, a service-
benefit plan, a managed care organization, a pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by
statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or
service), in enrolling an individual, or in making any payments for benefits to the individual or on
the individual’s behalf, is prohibited from taking into account that the individual is eligible for, or
is provided, medical assistance under a plan under 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. for this state, or any
other state.
(c) All health insurers or liable third parties, including, but not limited to, health-
maintenance organizations, third-party administrators, nonprofit medical-service corporations,
nonprofit hospital-service corporations, subject to the provisions of chapters 18, 19, 20, and 41 of
title 27, as well as, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service-benefit plans, managed
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -8-)

care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or
agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service) doing
business in this state shall:
(1) Provide member information within fourteen (14) calendar days of the request to the
department office to enable the medical assistance program to identify medical assistance program
recipients, applicants and/or persons responsible for providing medical support for those recipients
and applicants who are, or could be, enrollees or beneficiaries under any individual or group health
insurance contract, plan, or policy available or in force and effect in the state;
(2) With respect to individuals who are eligible for, or are provided, medical assistance by
the department office, upon the request of the department office, provide member information
within fourteen (14) calendar days of the request to determine during what period the individual or
his or her spouse or dependents may be (or may have been) covered by a health insurer and the
nature of the coverage that is, or was provided by the health insurer (including the name, address,
and identifying number of the plan);
(3) Accept the state’s right of recovery and the assignment to the state of any right of an
individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has
been made by the department office;
(4) Respond to any inquiry by the department office regarding a claim for payment for any
healthcare item or service that is submitted not later than three (3) years after the date of the
provision of the healthcare item or service; and
(5) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state based solely on procedural reasons,
such as on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form,
failure to obtain a prior authorization, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-
sale that is the basis of the claim, if—
(i) The claim is submitted by the state within the three-year (3) period beginning on the
date on which the item or service was furnished; and
(ii) Any action by the state to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced
within six (6) years of the state’s submission of such claim.
(6) Agree to respond to any inquiry regarding claims within sixty (60) business days after
receipt of the written documentation by the Medicaid recipient.
(7) Agree to not deny a claim for failure to obtain prior authorization for an item or service.
In the case of a responsible third party that requires prior authorization for an item or service
furnished to an individual eligible to receive medical assistance under the state Medicaid program,
the third-party health insurer shall accept authorization provided by state medical assistance
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -9-)

program that the item or service is covered by Medicaid as if that authorization is a prior
authorization made by the third-party health insurer for the item or service.
(d) This information shall be made available by these insurers and health-maintenance
organizations and used by the department of human services executive office of health and human
services only for the purposes of, and to the extent necessary for, identifying these persons,
determining the scope and terms of coverage, and ascertaining third-party liability. The department
of human services executive office of health and human services shall provide information to the
health insurers, including health insurers, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in §
607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service-
benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by
statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or
service) only for the purposes described herein.
(e) No health insurer, health-maintenance organization, or third-party administrator that
provides, or makes arrangements to provide, information pursuant to this section shall be liable in
any civil or criminal action or proceeding brought by beneficiaries or members on account of this
action for the purposes of violating confidentiality obligations under the law.
(f) The department office shall submit any appropriate and necessary state plan provisions.
(g) The department of human services executive office of health and human services is
authorized and directed to promulgate regulations necessary to ensure the effectiveness of this
section.
SECTION 4. Section 40-8-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-8 entitled "Medical
Assistance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-8-19. Rates of payment to nursing facilities.
(a) Rate reform.
(1) The rates to be paid by the state to nursing facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 17 of
title 23, and certified to participate in Title XIX of the Social Security Act for services rendered to
Medicaid-eligible residents, shall be reasonable and adequate to meet the costs that must be
incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities in accordance with 42 U.S.C. §
1396a(a)(13). The executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) shall
promulgate or modify the principles of reimbursement for nursing facilities in effect as of July 1,
2011, to be consistent with the provisions of this section and Title XIX, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.,
of the Social Security Act.
(2) The executive office shall review the current methodology for providing Medicaid
payments to nursing facilities, including other long-term care services providers, and is authorized
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -10-)

to modify the principles of reimbursement to replace the current cost-based methodology rates with
rates based on a price-based methodology to be paid to all facilities with recognition of the acuity
of patients and the relative Medicaid occupancy, and to include the following elements to be
developed by the executive office:
(i) A direct-care rate adjusted for resident acuity;
(ii) An indirect-care and other direct-care rate comprised of a base per diem for all facilities;
(iii) Revision of rates as necessary based on increases in direct and indirect costs beginning
October 2024 utilizing data from the most recent finalized year of facility cost report. The per diem
rate components deferred in subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be adjusted
accordingly to reflect changes in direct and indirect care costs since the previous rate review;
(iv) Application of a fair-rental value system;
(v) Application of a pass-through system; and
(vi) Adjustment of rates by the change in a recognized national nursing home inflation
index to be applied on October 1 of each year, beginning October 1, 2012. This adjustment will not
occur on October 1, 2013, October 1, 2014, or October 1, 2015, but will occur on April 1, 2015.
The adjustment of rates will also not occur on October 1, 2017, October 1, 2018, October 1, 2019,
and October 2022. Effective July 1, 2018, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2017, both fee-for-
service and managed care, will be increased by one and one-half percent (1.5%) and further
increased by one percent (1%) on October 1, 2018, and further increased by one percent (1%) on
October 1, 2019. Effective October 1, 2022, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2021, both fee-for-
service and managed care, will be increased by three percent (3%). In addition to the annual nursing
home inflation index adjustment, there shall be a base rate staffing adjustment of one-half percent
(0.5%) on October 1, 2021, one percent (1.0%) on October 1, 2022, and one and one-half percent
(1.5%) on October 1, 2023. For the twelve (12) month period beginning October 1, 2025, rates paid
to nursing facilities from the rates approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
and in effect on October 1, 2024, both fee-for-service and managed care, will be increased by two
and three-tenths percent (2.3%) There shall also be a base rate staffing adjustment of three percent
(3%) effective October 1, 2025. Not less than one hundred percent (100%) of this base-rate staffing
adjustment shall be expended by each nursing facility to increase compensation, wages, benefits,
and related employer costs, for eligible direct-care staff, including the cost of hiring additional
eligible direct-care positions, as defined in subsection (a)(2)(vi). The inflation index shall be
applied without regard for the transition factors in subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2). For purposes of
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -11-)

October 1, 2016, adjustment only, any rate increase that results from application of the inflation
index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) shall be dedicated to increase compensation for direct-
care workers in the following manner: Not less than 85% of this aggregate amount shall be
expended to fund an increase in wages, benefits, or related employer costs of direct-care staff of
nursing homes. For purposes of this section, direct-care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs),
licensed practical nurses (LPNs), certified nursing assistants (CNAs), certified medical technicians,
housekeeping staff, laundry staff, dietary staff, or other similar employees providing direct-care
services; provided, however, that this definition of direct-care staff shall not include: (i) RNs and
LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees” under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29
U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or (ii) CNAs, certified medical technicians, RNs, or LPNs who are contracted,
or subcontracted, through a third-party vendor or staffing agency. By July 31, 2017, nursing
facilities shall submit to the secretary, or designee, a certification that they have complied with the
provisions of this subsection (a)(2)(vi) with respect to the inflation index applied on October 1,
2016. Any facility that does not comply with the terms of such certification shall be subjected to a
clawback, paid by the nursing facility to the state, in the amount of increased reimbursement subject
to this provision that was not expended in compliance with that certification.
(3) Commencing on October 1, 2021, eighty percent (80%) of any rate increase that results
from application of the inflation index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be
dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the following manner on
October 1, of each year.
(i) For purposes of this subsection, compensation increases shall include base salary or
hourly wage increases, benefits, other compensation, and associated payroll tax increases for
eligible direct-care workers. This application of the inflation index shall apply for Medicaid
reimbursement in nursing facilities for both managed care and fee-for-service. For purposes of this
subsection, direct-care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs),
certified nursing assistants (CNAs), certified medication technicians, licensed physical therapists,
licensed occupational therapists, licensed speech-language pathologists, mental health workers
who are also certified nurse assistants, physical therapist assistants, social worker, or any nurse aide
with a valid license, even if it is probationary, housekeeping staff, laundry staff, dietary staff, or
other similar employees providing direct-care services; provided, however that this definition of
direct-care staff shall not include:
(A) RNs and LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees” under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or
(B) CNAs, certified medication technicians, RNs, or LPNs who are contracted or
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -12-)

subcontracted through a third-party vendor or staffing agency.
(4)(i) By July 31, 2021, and July 31 of each year thereafter, nursing facilities shall submit
to the secretary or designee a certification that they have complied with the provisions of subsection
(a)(3) of this section with respect to the inflation index applied on October 1. The executive office
of health and human services (EOHHS) shall create the certification form nursing facilities must
complete with information on how each individual eligible employee’s compensation increased,
including information regarding hourly wages prior to the increase and after the compensation
increase, hours paid after the compensation increase, and associated increased payroll taxes. A
collective bargaining agreement can be used in lieu of the certification form for represented
employees. All data reported on the compliance form is subject to review and audit by EOHHS.
The audits may include field or desk audits, and facilities may be required to provide additional
supporting documents including, but not limited to, payroll records.
(ii) Any facility that does not comply with the terms of certification shall be subjected to a
clawback and twenty-five percent (25%) penalty of the unspent or impermissibly spent funds, paid
by the nursing facility to the state, in the amount of increased reimbursement subject to this
provision that was not expended in compliance with that certification.
(iii) In any calendar year where no inflationary index is applied, eighty percent (80%) of
the base rate staffing adjustment in that calendar year pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(vi) of this
section shall be dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the
manner referenced in subsections (a)(3)(i), (a)(3)(i)(A), and (a)(3)(i)(B) of this section.
(b) Transition to full implementation of rate reform. For no less than four (4) years after
the initial application of the price-based methodology described in subsection (a)(2) to payment
rates, the executive office of health and human services shall implement a transition plan to
moderate the impact of the rate reform on individual nursing facilities. The transition shall include
the following components:
(1) No nursing facility shall receive reimbursement for direct-care costs that is less than
the rate of reimbursement for direct-care costs received under the methodology in effect at the time
of passage of this act; for the year beginning October 1, 2017, the reimbursement for direct-care
costs under this provision will be phased out in twenty-five-percent (25%) increments each year
until October 1, 2021, when the reimbursement will no longer be in effect; and
(2) No facility shall lose or gain more than five dollars ($5.00) in its total, per diem rate the
first year of the transition. An adjustment to the per diem loss or gain may be phased out by twenty-
five percent (25%) each year; except, however, for the years beginning October 1, 2015, there shall
be no adjustment to the per diem gain or loss, but the phase out shall resume thereafter; and
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -13-)

(3) The transition plan and/or period may be modified upon full implementation of facility
per diem rate increases for quality of care-related measures. Said modifications shall be submitted
in a report to the general assembly at least six (6) months prior to implementation.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the twelve-month (12) period beginning
July 1, 2015, Medicaid payment rates for nursing facilities established pursuant to this section shall
not exceed ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rates in effect on April 1, 2015. Consistent with the
other provisions of this chapter, nothing in this provision shall require the executive office to restore
the rates to those in effect on April 1, 2015, at the end of this twelve-month (12) period.
SECTION 5. Sections 40-8.3-2 and 40-8.3-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-8.3 entitled
"Uncompensated Care" are hereby amended to read as follows:
40-8.3-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Base year” means, for the purpose of calculating a disproportionate share payment for
any fiscal year ending after September 30, 2023 2024, the period from October 1, 2021 2022,
through September 30, 2022 2023, and for any fiscal year ending after September 30, 2024 2025,
the period from October 1, 2022 2023, through September 30, 2023 2024.
(2) “Medicaid inpatient utilization rate for a hospital” means a fraction (expressed as a
percentage), the numerator of which is the hospital’s number of inpatient days during the base year
attributable to patients who were eligible for medical assistance during the base year and the
denominator of which is the total number of the hospital’s inpatient days in the base year.
(3) “Participating hospital” means any nongovernment and nonpsychiatric hospital that:
(i) Was licensed as a hospital in accordance with chapter 17 of title 23 during the base year
and shall mean the actual facilities and buildings in existence in Rhode Island, licensed pursuant to
§ 23-17-1 et seq. on June 30, 2010, and thereafter any premises included on that license, regardless
of changes in licensure status pursuant to chapter 17.14 of title 23 (hospital conversions) and § 23-
17-6(b) (change in effective control), that provides short-term, acute inpatient and/or outpatient
care to persons who require definitive diagnosis and treatment for injury, illness, disabilities, or
pregnancy. Notwithstanding the preceding language, the negotiated Medicaid managed care
payment rates for a court-approved purchaser that acquires a hospital through receivership, special
mastership, or other similar state insolvency proceedings (which court-approved purchaser is issued
a hospital license after January 1, 2013), shall be based upon the newly negotiated rates between
the court-approved purchaser and the health plan, and the rates shall be effective as of the date that
the court-approved purchaser and the health plan execute the initial agreement containing the newly
negotiated rate. The rate-setting methodology for inpatient hospital payments and outpatient
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -14-)

hospital payments set forth in §§ 40-8-13.4(b)(1)(ii)(C) and 40-8-13.4(b)(2), respectively, shall
thereafter apply to negotiated increases for each annual twelve-month (12) period as of July 1
following the completion of the first full year of the court-approved purchaser’s initial Medicaid
managed care contract;
(ii) Achieved a medical assistance inpatient utilization rate of at least one percent (1%)
during the base year; and
(iii) Continues to be licensed as a hospital in accordance with chapter 17 of title 23 during
the payment year.
(4) “Uncompensated-care costs” means, as to any hospital, the sum of: (i) The cost incurred
by the hospital during the base year for inpatient or outpatient services attributable to charity care
(free care and bad debts) for which the patient has no health insurance or other third-party coverage
less payments, if any, received directly from such patients; (ii) The cost incurred by the hospital
during the base year for inpatient or outpatient services attributable to Medicaid beneficiaries less
any Medicaid reimbursement received therefor; and (iii) the sum of subsections (4)(i) and (4)(ii) of
this section shall be offset by the estimated hospital’s commercial equivalent rates state directed
payment for the current SFY in which the disproportionate share hospital (DSH) payment is made.
The sum of subsections (4)(i), (4)(ii), and (4)(iii) of this section shall be multiplied by the
uncompensated care index.
(5) “Uncompensated-care index” means the annual percentage increase for hospitals
established pursuant to § 27-19-14 [repealed] for each year after the base year, up to and including
the payment year; provided, however, that the uncompensated-care index for the payment year
ending September 30, 2007, shall be deemed to be five and thirty-eight hundredths percent (5.38%),
and that the uncompensated-care index for the payment year ending September 30, 2008, shall be
deemed to be five and forty-seven hundredths percent (5.47%), and that the uncompensated-care
index for the payment year ending September 30, 2009, shall be deemed to be five and thirty-eight
hundredths percent (5.38%), and that the uncompensated-care index for the payment years ending
September 30, 2010, September 30, 2011, September 30, 2012, September 30, 2013, September
30, 2014, September 30, 2015, September 30, 2016, September 30, 2017, September 30, 2018,
September 30, 2019, September 30, 2020, September 30, 2021, September 30, 2022, September
30, 2023, September 30, 2024, and September 30, 2025, and September 30, 2026, shall be deemed
to be five and thirty hundredths percent (5.30%).
40-8.3-3. Implementation.
(a) For federal fiscal year 2023, commencing on October 1, 2022, and ending September
30, 2023, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -15-)

United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode
Island Medicaid DSH Plan to provide:
(1) That the DSH Plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of
$159.0 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool
D component of the DSH Plan; and
(2) That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index for all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 15, 2023, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2023, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or his or her authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary
to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2023 for
the disproportionate share payments.
(b)(a) For federal fiscal year 2024, commencing on October 1, 2023, and ending September
30, 2024, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode
Island Medicaid DSH Plan to provide:
(1) That the DSH Plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of
$14.8 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool
D component of the DSH Plan; and
(2) That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index for all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2024, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2024, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or his or her authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary
to secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2024 for
the disproportionate share payments.
(c)(b) For federal fiscal year 2025, commencing on October 1, 2024, and ending September
30, 2025, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode
Island Medicaid DSH plan to provide:
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -16-)

(1) The creation of Pool C which allots no more than nineteen million nine hundred
thousand dollars ($19,900,000) twelve million nine hundred thousand dollars ($12,900,000) to
Medicaid eligible government-owned hospitals;
(2) That the DSH plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of
$34.7 $27.7 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the
Pool C and D components of the DSH plan;
(3) That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index of all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2025, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2025, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or their authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to
secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2025 for the
disproportionate share payments; and
(4) That the Pool C allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care cost for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index of all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2025, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2025, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or their authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to
secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2025 for the
disproportionate share payments.
(c) For federal fiscal year 2026, commencing on October 1, 2025, and ending September
30, 2026, the executive office of health and human services shall submit to the Secretary of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services a state plan amendment to the Rhode
Island Medicaid DSH plan to provide:
(1) That the DSH plan to all participating hospitals, not to exceed an aggregate limit of
$13.9 million, shall be allocated by the executive office of health and human services to the Pool
C and D components of the DSH plan. Pool C shall not exceed an aggregate limit of $12.9 million.
Pool D shall not exceed an aggregate limit of $1.0 million.
(2) That the Pool C allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -17-)

inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care cost for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index of all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2026, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2026, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or their authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to
secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2026 for the
disproportionate share payments; and
(3) That the Pool D allotment shall be distributed among the participating hospitals in direct
proportion to the individual participating hospital’s uncompensated-care costs for the base year,
inflated by the uncompensated-care index to the total uncompensated-care costs for the base year
inflated by the uncompensated-care index of all participating hospitals. The disproportionate share
payments shall be made on or before June 30, 2026, and are expressly conditioned upon approval
on or before June 23, 2026, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or their authorized representative, of all Medicaid state plan amendments necessary to
secure for the state the benefit of federal financial participation in federal fiscal year 2026 for the
disproportionate share payments.
(d) No provision is made pursuant to this chapter for disproportionate-share hospital
payments to participating hospitals for uncompensated-care costs related to graduate medical
education programs.
(e) The executive office of health and human services is directed, on at least a monthly
basis, to collect patient-level uninsured information, including, but not limited to, demographics,
services rendered, and reason for uninsured status from all hospitals licensed in Rhode Island.
(f) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 6.]
SECTION 6. Section 40-8.9-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-8.9 entitled "Medical
Assistance — Long-Term Care Service and Finance Reform" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-8.9-9. Long-term-care rebalancing system reform goal.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the executive office of health and
human services is authorized and directed to apply for, and obtain, any necessary waiver(s), waiver
amendment(s), and/or state-plan amendments from the Secretary of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, and to promulgate rules necessary to adopt an affirmative plan of
program design and implementation that addresses the goal of allocating a minimum of fifty percent
(50%) of Medicaid long-term-care funding for persons aged sixty-five (65) and over and adults
with disabilities, in addition to services for persons with developmental disabilities, to home- and
community-based care; provided, further, the executive office shall report annually as part of its
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -18-)

budget submission, the percentage distribution between institutional care and home- and
community-based care by population and shall report current and projected waiting lists for long-
term-care and home- and community-based care services. The executive office is further authorized
and directed to prioritize investments in home- and community-based care and to maintain the
integrity and financial viability of all current long-term-care services while pursuing this goal.
(b) The reformed long-term-care system rebalancing goal is person-centered and
encourages individual self-determination, family involvement, interagency collaboration, and
individual choice through the provision of highly specialized and individually tailored home-based
services. Additionally, individuals with severe behavioral, physical, or developmental disabilities
must have the opportunity to live safe and healthful lives through access to a wide range of
supportive services in an array of community-based settings, regardless of the complexity of their
medical condition, the severity of their disability, or the challenges of their behavior. Delivery of
services and supports in less-costly and less-restrictive community settings will enable children,
adolescents, and adults to be able to curtail, delay, or avoid lengthy stays in long-term-care
institutions, such as behavioral health residential-treatment facilities, long-term-care hospitals,
intermediate-care facilities, and/or skilled nursing facilities.
(c) Pursuant to federal authority procured under § 42-7.2-16, the executive office of health
and human services is directed and authorized to adopt a tiered set of criteria to be used to determine
eligibility for services. The criteria shall be developed in collaboration with the state’s health and
human services departments and, to the extent feasible, any consumer group, advisory board, or
other entity designated for these purposes, and shall encompass eligibility determinations for long-
term-care services in nursing facilities, hospitals, and intermediate-care facilities for persons with
intellectual disabilities, as well as home- and community-based alternatives, and shall provide a
common standard of income eligibility for both institutional and home- and community-based care.
The executive office is authorized to adopt clinical and/or functional criteria for admission to a
nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities that
are more stringent than those employed for access to home- and community-based services. The
executive office is also authorized to promulgate rules that define the frequency of re-assessments
for services provided for under this section. Levels of care may be applied in accordance with the
following:
(1) The executive office shall continue to apply the level-of-care criteria in effect on April
1, 2021, for any recipient determined eligible for and receiving Medicaid-funded long-term services
and supports in a nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual
disabilities on or before that date, unless:
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -19-)

(i) The recipient transitions to home- and community-based services because he or she
would no longer meet the level-of-care criteria in effect on April 1, 2021; or
(ii) The recipient chooses home- and community-based services over the nursing facility,
hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities. For the purposes of
this section, a failed community placement, as defined in regulations promulgated by the executive
office, shall be considered a condition of clinical eligibility for the highest level of care. The
executive office shall confer with the long-term-care ombudsperson with respect to the
determination of a failed placement under the ombudsperson’s jurisdiction. Should any Medicaid
recipient eligible for a nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with
intellectual disabilities as of April 1, 2021, receive a determination of a failed community
placement, the recipient shall have access to the highest level of care; furthermore, a recipient who
has experienced a failed community placement shall be transitioned back into his or her former
nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities
whenever possible. Additionally, residents shall only be moved from a nursing home, hospital, or
intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities in a manner consistent with
applicable state and federal laws.
(2) Any Medicaid recipient eligible for the highest level of care who voluntarily leaves a
nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities shall
not be subject to any wait list for home- and community-based services.
(3) No nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual
disabilities shall be denied payment for services rendered to a Medicaid recipient on the grounds
that the recipient does not meet level-of-care criteria unless and until the executive office has:
(i) Performed an individual assessment of the recipient at issue and provided written notice
to the nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities
that the recipient does not meet level-of-care criteria; and
(ii) The recipient has either appealed that level-of-care determination and been
unsuccessful, or any appeal period available to the recipient regarding that level-of-care
determination has expired.
(d) The executive office is further authorized to consolidate all home- and community-
based services currently provided pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396n into a single system of home- and
community-based services that include options for consumer direction and shared living. The
resulting single home- and community-based services system shall replace and supersede all 42
U.S.C. § 1396n programs when fully implemented. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the resulting
single program home- and community-based services system shall include the continued funding
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -20-)

of assisted-living services at any assisted-living facility financed by the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation prior to January 1, 2006, and shall be in accordance with chapter 66.8
of title 42 as long as assisted-living services are a covered Medicaid benefit.
(e) The executive office is authorized to promulgate rules that permit certain optional
services including, but not limited to, homemaker services, home modifications, respite, and
physical therapy evaluations to be offered to persons at risk for Medicaid-funded long-term care
subject to availability of state-appropriated funding for these purposes.
(f) To promote the expansion of home- and community-based service capacity, the
executive office is authorized to pursue payment methodology reforms that increase access to
homemaker, personal care (home health aide), assisted living, adult supportive-care homes, and
adult day services, as follows:
(1) Development of revised or new Medicaid certification standards that increase access to
service specialization and scheduling accommodations by using payment strategies designed to
achieve specific quality and health outcomes.
(2) Development of Medicaid certification standards for state-authorized providers of adult
day services, excluding providers of services authorized under § 40.1-24-1(3), assisted living, and
adult supportive care (as defined under chapter 17.24 of title 23) that establish for each, an acuity-
based, tiered service and payment methodology tied to: licensure authority; level of beneficiary
needs; the scope of services and supports provided; and specific quality and outcome measures.
The standards for adult day services for persons eligible for Medicaid-funded long-term
services may differ from those who do not meet the clinical/functional criteria set forth in § 40-
8.10-3.
(3) As the state’s Medicaid program seeks to assist more beneficiaries requiring long-term
services and supports in home- and community-based settings, the demand for home-care workers
has increased, and wages for these workers has not kept pace with neighboring states, leading to
high turnover and vacancy rates in the state’s home-care industry, the executive office shall institute
a one-time increase in the base-payment rates for FY 2019, as described below, for home-care
service providers to promote increased access to and an adequate supply of highly trained home-
healthcare professionals, in amount to be determined by the appropriations process, for the purpose
of raising wages for personal care attendants and home health aides to be implemented by such
providers.
(i) A prospective base adjustment, effective not later than July 1, 2018, of ten percent (10%)
of the current base rate for home-care providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice
providers contracted with the executive office of health and human services and its subordinate
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -21-)

agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service personal care attendant services.
(ii) A prospective base adjustment, effective not later than July 1, 2018, of twenty percent
(20%) of the current base rate for home-care providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice
providers contracted with the executive office of health and human services and its subordinate
agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service skilled nursing and therapeutic services and hospice
care.
(iii) Effective upon passage of this section, hospice provider reimbursement, exclusively
for room and board expenses for individuals residing in a skilled nursing facility, shall revert to the
rate methodology in effect on June 30, 2018, and these room and board expenses shall be exempted
from any and all annual rate increases to hospice providers as provided for in this section.
(iv) On the first of July in each year, beginning on July 1, 2019, the executive office of
health and human services will initiate an annual inflation increase to the base rate for home-care
providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice providers contracted with the executive office
and its subordinate agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service personal care attendant services,
skilled nursing and therapeutic services and hospice care. The base rate increase shall be a
percentage amount equal to the New England Consumer Price Index card as determined by the
United States Department of Labor for medical care and for compliance with all federal and state
laws, regulations, and rules, and all national accreditation program requirements., except as of July
1, 2025, and thereafter, when no annual inflation increase shall occur for these rates.
(g) As the state’s Medicaid program seeks to assist more beneficiaries requiring long-term
services and supports in home- and community-based settings, the demand for home-care workers
has increased, and wages for these workers has not kept pace with neighboring states, leading to
high turnover and vacancy rates in the state’s home-care industry. To promote increased access to
and an adequate supply of direct-care workers, the executive office shall institute a payment
methodology change, in Medicaid fee-for-service and managed care, for FY 2022, that shall be
passed through directly to the direct-care workers’ wages who are employed by home nursing care
and home-care providers licensed by the Rhode Island department of health, as described below:
(1) Effective July 1, 2021, increase the existing shift differential modifier by $0.19 per
fifteen (15) minutes for personal care and combined personal care/homemaker.
(i) Employers must pass on one hundred percent (100%) of the shift differential modifier
increase per fifteen-minute (15) unit of service to the CNAs who rendered such services. This
compensation shall be provided in addition to the rate of compensation that the employee was
receiving as of June 30, 2021. For an employee hired after June 30, 2021, the agency shall use not
less than the lowest compensation paid to an employee of similar functions and duties as of June
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -22-)

30, 2021, as the base compensation to which the increase is applied.
(ii) Employers must provide to EOHHS an annual compliance statement showing wages
as of June 30, 2021, amounts received from the increases outlined herein, and compliance with this
section by July 1, 2022. EOHHS may adopt any additional necessary regulations and processes to
oversee this subsection.
(2) Effective January 1, 2022, establish a new behavioral healthcare enhancement of $0.39
per fifteen (15) minutes for personal care, combined personal care/homemaker, and homemaker
only for providers who have at least thirty percent (30%) of their direct-care workers (which
includes certified nursing assistants (CNA) and homemakers) certified in behavioral healthcare
training.
(i) Employers must pass on one hundred percent (100%) of the behavioral healthcare
enhancement per fifteen (15) minute unit of service rendered by only those CNAs and homemakers
who have completed the thirty (30) hour behavioral health certificate training program offered by
Rhode Island College, or a training program that is prospectively determined to be compliant per
EOHHS, to those CNAs and homemakers. This compensation shall be provided in addition to the
rate of compensation that the employee was receiving as of December 31, 2021. For an employee
hired after December 31, 2021, the agency shall use not less than the lowest compensation paid to
an employee of similar functions and duties as of December 31, 2021, as the base compensation to
which the increase is applied.
(ii) By January 1, 2023, employers must provide to EOHHS an annual compliance
statement showing wages as of December 31, 2021, amounts received from the increases outlined
herein, and compliance with this section, including which behavioral healthcare training programs
were utilized. EOHHS may adopt any additional necessary regulations and processes to oversee
this subsection.
(h) The executive office shall implement a long-term-care-options counseling program to
provide individuals, or their representatives, or both, with long-term-care consultations that shall
include, at a minimum, information about: long-term-care options, sources, and methods of both
public and private payment for long-term-care services and an assessment of an individual’s
functional capabilities and opportunities for maximizing independence. Each individual admitted
to, or seeking admission to, a long-term-care facility, regardless of the payment source, shall be
informed by the facility of the availability of the long-term-care-options counseling program and
shall be provided with long-term-care-options consultation if they so request. Each individual who
applies for Medicaid long-term-care services shall be provided with a long-term-care consultation.
(i) The executive office shall implement, no later than January 1, 2024, a statewide network
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -23-)

and rate methodology for conflict-free case management for individuals receiving Medicaid-funded
home and community-based services. The executive office shall coordinate implementation with
the state’s health and human services departments and divisions authorized to deliver Medicaid-
funded home and community-based service programs, including the department of behavioral
healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; the department of human services; and the
office of healthy aging. It is in the best interest of the Rhode Islanders eligible to receive Medicaid
home and community-based services under this chapter, title 40.1, title 42, or any other general
laws to provide equitable access to conflict-free case management that shall include person-
centered planning, service arranging, and quality monitoring in the amount, duration, and scope
required by federal law and regulations. It is necessary to ensure that there is a robust network of
qualified conflict-free case management entities with the capacity to serve all participants on a
statewide basis and in a manner that promotes choice, self-reliance, and community integration.
The executive office, as the designated single state Medicaid authority and agency responsible for
coordinating policy and planning for health and human services under § 42-7.2-1 et seq., is directed
to establish a statewide conflict-free case management network under the management of the
executive office and to seek any Medicaid waivers, state plan amendments, and changes in rules,
regulations, and procedures that may be necessary to ensure that recipients of Medicaid home and
community-based services have access to conflict-free case management in a timely manner and in
accordance with the federal requirements that must be met to preserve financial participation.
(j) The executive office is also authorized, subject to availability of appropriation of
funding, and federal, Medicaid-matching funds, to pay for certain services and supports necessary
to transition or divert beneficiaries from institutional or restrictive settings and optimize their health
and safety when receiving care in a home or the community. The secretary is authorized to obtain
any state plan or waiver authorities required to maximize the federal funds available to support
expanded access to home- and community-transition and stabilization services; provided, however,
payments shall not exceed an annual or per-person amount.
(k) To ensure persons with long-term-care needs who remain living at home have adequate
resources to deal with housing maintenance and unanticipated housing-related costs, the secretary
is authorized to develop higher resource eligibility limits for persons or obtain any state plan or
waiver authorities necessary to change the financial eligibility criteria for long-term services and
supports to enable beneficiaries receiving home and community waiver services to have the
resources to continue living in their own homes or rental units or other home-based settings.
(l) The executive office shall implement, no later than January 1, 2016, the following home-
and community-based service and payment reforms:
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -24-)

(1) [Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 6.]
(2) Adult day services level of need criteria and acuity-based, tiered-payment
methodology; and
(3) Payment reforms that encourage home- and community-based providers to provide the
specialized services and accommodations beneficiaries need to avoid or delay institutional care.
(m) The secretary is authorized to seek any Medicaid section 1115 waiver or state-plan
amendments and take any administrative actions necessary to ensure timely adoption of any new
or amended rules, regulations, policies, or procedures and any system enhancements or changes,
for which appropriations have been authorized, that are necessary to facilitate implementation of
the requirements of this section by the dates established. The secretary shall reserve the discretion
to exercise the authority established under §§ 42-7.2-5(6)(v) and 42-7.2-6.1, in consultation with
the governor, to meet the legislative directives established herein.
SECTION 7. Sections 40-8.10-2, 40-8.10-3 and 40-8.10-4 of the General Laws in Chapter
40-8.10 entitled "Long-Term Care Service Reform for Medicaid Eligible Individuals" are hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-8.10-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Core services” mean homemaker services, environmental modifications (home
accessibility adaptations, special medical equipment (minor assistive devices), meals on wheels
(home delivered meals), personal emergency response (PERS), licensed practical nurse services,
community transition services, residential supports, day supports, supported employment,
supported living arrangements, private duty nursing, supports for consumer direction (supports
facilitation), participant directed goods and services, case management, senior companion services,
assisted living, personal care assistance services and respite.
(2) “Preventive services” mean homemaker services, minor environmental modifications,
physical therapy evaluation and services, and respite services.
40-8.10-3. Levels of care.
(a) The secretary of the executive office of health and human services shall coordinate
responsibilities for long-term-care assessment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Importance shall be placed upon the proper and consistent determination of levels of care across
the state departments for each long-term-care setting, including behavioral health residential
treatment facilities, long-term-care hospitals, intermediate-care facilities, and/or skilled nursing
facilities. Specialized plans of care that meet the needs of the individual Medicaid recipients shall
be coordinated and consistent across all state departments. The development of care plans shall be
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -25-)

person-centered and shall support individual self-determination, family involvement, when
appropriate, individual choice, and interdepartmental collaboration.
(b) Levels of care for long-term-care institutions (behavioral health residential treatment
facilities, long-term-care hospitals, intermediate-care facilities and/or skilled nursing facilities), for
which alternative community-based services and supports are available, shall be established
pursuant to § 40-8.9-9. The structure of the three (3) two (2) levels of care is as follows:
(1) Highest level of care. Individuals who are determined, based on medical need, to require
the institutional level of care will have the choice to receive services in a long-term-care institution
or in a home- and community-based setting.
(2) High level of care. Individuals who are determined, based on medical need, to benefit
from home- and community-based services.
(3) Preventive level of care. Individuals who do not presently need an institutional level of
care but who need services targeted at preventing admission, re-admissions, or reducing lengths of
stay in an institution.
(c) Determinations of levels of care and the provision of long-term-care health services
shall be determined in accordance with this section and shall be in accordance with the applicable
provisions of § 40-8.9-9.
40-8.10-4. Long-term care assessment and coordination.
(a) The executive office of health and human services shall implement a long-term-care-
options counseling program to provide individuals or their representative, or both, with long-term-
care consultations that shall include, at a minimum, information about long-term-care options,
sources and methods of both public and private payment for long-term-care services; information
on caregiver support services, including respite care; and an assessment of an individual’s
functional capabilities and opportunities for maximizing independence. Each individual admitted
to or seeking admission to a long-term-care facility, regardless of the payment source, shall be
informed by the facility of the availability of the long-term-care-options counseling program and
shall be provided with a long-term-care-options consultation, if he or she so requests. Each
individual who applies for Medicaid long-term-care services shall be provided with a long-term-
care consultation.
(b) Core and preventative home- and community-based services defined and delineated in
§ 40-8.10-2 shall be provided only to those individuals who meet one of the levels of care provided
for in this chapter. Other long-term-care services authorized by the federal government, such as
medication management, may also be provided to Medicaid-eligible recipients who have
established the requisite need.
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -26-)

(c) The assessments for individuals conducted in accordance with this section shall serve
as the basis for individual budgets for those medical assistance recipients eligible to receive services
utilizing a self-directed delivery system.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the secretary of the executive office of health and
human services, or the directors of that office’s departments from utilizing community agencies or
contractors when appropriate to perform assessment functions outlined in this chapter.
SECTION 8. Section 42-7.2-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.2 entitled "Office of
Health and Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.2-5. Duties of the secretary.
The secretary shall be subject to the direction and supervision of the governor for the
oversight, coordination, and cohesive direction of state-administered health and human services
and in ensuring the laws are faithfully executed, notwithstanding any law to the contrary. In this
capacity, the secretary of the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall be
authorized to:
(1) Coordinate the administration and financing of healthcare benefits, human services, and
programs including those authorized by the state’s Medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver
and, as applicable, the Medicaid state plan under Title XIX of the U.S. Social Security Act.
However, nothing in this section shall be construed as transferring to the secretary the powers,
duties, or functions conferred upon the departments by Rhode Island public and general laws for
the administration of federal/state programs financed in whole or in part with Medicaid funds or
the administrative responsibility for the preparation and submission of any state plans, state plan
amendments, or authorized federal waiver applications, once approved by the secretary.
(2) Serve as the governor’s chief advisor and liaison to federal policymakers on Medicaid
reform issues as well as the principal point of contact in the state on any such related matters.
(3)(i) Review and ensure the coordination of the state’s Medicaid section 1115
demonstration waiver requests and renewals as well as any initiatives and proposals requiring
amendments to the Medicaid state plan or formal amendment changes, as described in the special
terms and conditions of the state’s Medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver with the potential
to affect the scope, amount, or duration of publicly funded healthcare services, provider payments
or reimbursements, or access to or the availability of benefits and services as provided by Rhode
Island general and public laws. The secretary shall consider whether any such changes are legally
and fiscally sound and consistent with the state’s policy and budget priorities. The secretary shall
also assess whether a proposed change is capable of obtaining the necessary approvals from federal
officials and achieving the expected positive consumer outcomes. Department directors shall,
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -27-)

within the timelines specified, provide any information and resources the secretary deems necessary
in order to perform the reviews authorized in this section.
(ii) Direct the development and implementation of any Medicaid policies, procedures, or
systems that may be required to assure successful operation of the state’s health and human services
integrated eligibility system and coordination with HealthSource RI, the state’s health insurance
marketplace.
(iii) Beginning in 2015, conduct on a biennial basis a comprehensive review of the
Medicaid eligibility criteria for one or more of the populations covered under the state plan or a
waiver to ensure consistency with federal and state laws and policies, coordinate and align systems,
and identify areas for improving quality assurance, fair and equitable access to services, and
opportunities for additional financial participation.
(iv) Implement service organization and delivery reforms that facilitate service integration,
increase value, and improve quality and health outcomes.
(4) Beginning in 2020, prepare and submit to the governor, the chairpersons of the house
and senate finance committees, the caseload estimating conference, and to the joint legislative
committee for health-care oversight, by no later than September 15 of each year, a comprehensive
overview of all Medicaid expenditures outcomes, administrative costs, and utilization rates. The
overview shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(i) Expenditures under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended;
(ii) Expenditures, outcomes, and utilization rates by population and sub-population served
(e.g., families with children, persons with disabilities, children in foster care, children receiving
adoption assistance, adults ages nineteen (19) to sixty-four (64), and elders);
(iii) Expenditures, outcomes, and utilization rates by each state department or other
municipal or public entity receiving federal reimbursement under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social
Security Act, as amended;
(iv) Expenditures, outcomes, and utilization rates by type of service and/or service
provider;
(v) Expenditures by mandatory population receiving mandatory services and, reported
separately, optional services, as well as optional populations receiving mandatory services and,
reported separately, optional services for each state agency receiving Title XIX and XXI funds; and
(vi) Information submitted to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services for the
mandatory annual state reporting of the Core Set of Children’s Health Care Quality Measures for
Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program, behavioral health measures on the Core Set of
Adult Health Care Quality Measures for Medicaid and the Core Sets of Health Home Quality
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -28-)

Measures for Medicaid to ensure compliance with the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018, Pub. L. No.
115-123.
The directors of the departments, as well as local governments and school departments,
shall assist and cooperate with the secretary in fulfilling this responsibility by providing whatever
resources, information and support shall be necessary.
(5) Resolve administrative, jurisdictional, operational, program, or policy conflicts among
departments and their executive staffs and make necessary recommendations to the governor.
(6) Ensure continued progress toward improving the quality, the economy, the
accountability, and the efficiency of state-administered health and human services. In this capacity,
the secretary shall:
(i) Direct implementation of reforms in the human resources practices of the executive
office and the departments that streamline and upgrade services, achieve greater economies of scale
and establish the coordinated system of the staff education, cross-training, and career development
services necessary to recruit and retain a highly-skilled, responsive, and engaged health and human
services workforce;
(ii) Encourage EOHHS-wide consumer-centered approaches to service design and delivery
that expand their capacity to respond efficiently and responsibly to the diverse and changing needs
of the people and communities they serve;
(iii) Develop all opportunities to maximize resources by leveraging the state’s purchasing
power, centralizing fiscal service functions related to budget, finance, and procurement,
centralizing communication, policy analysis and planning, and information systems and data
management, pursuing alternative funding sources through grants, awards, and partnerships and
securing all available federal financial participation for programs and services provided EOHHS-
wide;
(iv) Improve the coordination and efficiency of health and human services legal functions
by centralizing adjudicative and legal services and overseeing their timely and judicious
administration;
(v) Facilitate the rebalancing of the long-term system by creating an assessment and
coordination organization or unit for the expressed purpose of developing and implementing
procedures EOHHS-wide that ensure that the appropriate publicly funded health services are
provided at the right time and in the most appropriate and least restrictive setting;
(vi) Strengthen health and human services program integrity, quality control and
collections, and recovery activities by consolidating functions within the office in a single unit that
ensures all affected parties pay their fair share of the cost of services and are aware of alternative
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -29-)

financing;
(vii) Assure protective services are available to vulnerable elders and adults with
developmental and other disabilities by reorganizing existing services, establishing new services
where gaps exist, and centralizing administrative responsibility for oversight of all related
initiatives and programs.
(7) Prepare and integrate comprehensive budgets for the health and human services
departments and any other functions and duties assigned to the office. The budgets shall be
submitted to the state budget office by the secretary, for consideration by the governor, on behalf
of the state’s health and human services agencies in accordance with the provisions set forth in §
35-3-4.
(8) Utilize objective data to evaluate health and human services policy goals, resource use
and outcome evaluation and to perform short and long-term policy planning and development.
(9) Establishment of an integrated approach to interdepartmental information and data
management that complements and furthers the goals of the unified health infrastructure project
initiative and that will facilitate the transition to a consumer-centered integrated system of state-
administered health and human services.
(10) At the direction of the governor or the general assembly, conduct independent reviews
of state-administered health and human services programs, policies and related agency actions and
activities and assist the department directors in identifying strategies to address any issues or areas
of concern that may emerge thereof. The department directors shall provide any information and
assistance deemed necessary by the secretary when undertaking such independent reviews.
(11) Provide regular and timely reports to the governor and make recommendations with
respect to the state’s health and human services agenda.
(12) Employ such personnel and contract for such consulting services as may be required
to perform the powers and duties lawfully conferred upon the secretary.
(13) Assume responsibility for complying with the provisions of any general or public law
or regulation related to the disclosure, confidentiality, and privacy of any information or records,
in the possession or under the control of the executive office or the departments assigned to the
executive office, that may be developed or acquired or transferred at the direction of the governor
or the secretary for purposes directly connected with the secretary’s duties set forth herein.
(14) Hold the director of each health and human services department accountable for their
administrative, fiscal, and program actions in the conduct of the respective powers and duties of
their agencies.
(15) Identify opportunities for inclusion with the EOHHS’ October 1, 2023 budget
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -30-)

,submission, to remove fixed eligibility thresholds for programs under its purview by establishing
sliding scale decreases in benefits commensurate with income increases up to four hundred fifty
percent (450%) of the federal poverty level. These shall include but not be limited to, medical
assistance, childcare assistance, and food assistance.
(16) The secretary shall convene, in consultation with the governor, an advisory working
group to assist in the review and analysis of potential impacts of any adopted federal actions related
to Medicaid programs. The working group shall develop options for administrative action or
general assembly consideration that may be needed to address any federal funding changes that
impact Rhode Island's Medicaid programs.
(i) The advisory working group may include, but not be limited to, the secretary of health
and human services, director of management and budget, and designees from the following: state
agencies, businesses, healthcare, public sector unions, and advocates.
(ii) As soon as practicable after the enactment federal budget for fiscal year 2026, but no
later than October 31, 2025, the advisory working group shall forward a report to the governor,
speaker of the house, and president of the senate containing the findings, recommendations and
options for consideration to become compliant with federal changes prior to the governor's budget
submission pursuant to § 35-3-7.
SECTION 9. Sections 42-14.5-2.1 and 42-14.5-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-14.5
entitled "The Rhode Island Health Care Reform Act of 2004 — Health Insurance Oversight" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
42-14.5-2.1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Accountability standards” means measures including service processes, client and
population outcomes, practice standard compliance and fiscal integrity of social and human service
providers on the individual contractual level and service type for all state contacts of the state or
any subdivision or agency to include, but not limited to, the department of children, youth and
families (DCYF), the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals
(BHDDH), the department of human services (DHS), the department of health (DOH), and
Medicaid. This may include mandatory reporting, consolidated, standardized reporting, audits
regardless of organizational tax status, and accountability dashboards of aforementioned state
departments or subdivisions that are regularly shared with the public.
(2) “Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS)” means the department
that serves as “principal agency of the executive branch of state government” (§ 42-7.2-2)
responsible for managing the departments and offices of: health (RIDOH), human services (DHS),
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -31-)

healthy aging (OHA), veterans services (VETS), children, youth and families (DCYF), and
behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH). EOHHS is also
designated as the single state agency with authority to administer the Medicaid program in Rhode
Island.
(3) "Primary care services" means, for the purposes of reporting required under § 42-14.5-
3(t), professional services rendered by primary care providers at a primary care site of care,
including care management services performed in the context of team-based primary care.
(3)(4) “Rate review” means the process of reviewing and reporting of specific trending
factors that influence the cost of service that informs rate setting.
(4)(5) “Rate setting” means the process of establishing rates for social and human service
programs that are based on a thorough rate review process.
(5)(6) “Social and human service program” means a social, mental health, developmental
disability, child welfare, juvenile justice, prevention services, habilitative, rehabilitative, substance
use disorder treatment, residential care, adult or adolescent day services, vocational, employment
and training, or aging service program or accommodations purchased by the state.
(6)(7) “Social and human service provider” means a provider of social and human service
programs pursuant to a contract with the state or any subdivision or agency to include, but not be
limited to, the department of children, youth and families (DCYF), the department of behavioral
healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH), the department of human services
(DHS), the department of health (DOH), and Medicaid.
(7)(8) “State government and the provider network” refers to the contractual relationship
between a state agency or subdivision of a state agency and private companies the state contracts
with to provide the network of mandated and discretionary social and human services.
42-14.5-3. Powers and duties.
The health insurance commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) To conduct quarterly public meetings throughout the state, separate and distinct from
rate hearings pursuant to § 42-62-13, regarding the rates, services, and operations of insurers
licensed to provide health insurance in the state; the effects of such rates, services, and operations
on consumers, medical care providers, patients, and the market environment in which the insurers
operate; and efforts to bring new health insurers into the Rhode Island market. Notice of not less
than ten (10) days of the hearing(s) shall go to the general assembly, the governor, the Rhode Island
Medical Society, the Hospital Association of Rhode Island, the director of health, the attorney
general, and the chambers of commerce. Public notice shall be posted on the department’s website
and given in the newspaper of general circulation, and to any entity in writing requesting notice.
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -32-)

(b) To make recommendations to the governor and the house of representatives and senate
finance committees regarding healthcare insurance and the regulations, rates, services,
administrative expenses, reserve requirements, and operations of insurers providing health
insurance in the state, and to prepare or comment on, upon the request of the governor or
chairpersons of the house or senate finance committees, draft legislation to improve the regulation
of health insurance. In making the recommendations, the commissioner shall recognize that it is
the intent of the legislature that the maximum disclosure be provided regarding the reasonableness
of individual administrative expenditures as well as total administrative costs. The commissioner
shall make recommendations on the levels of reserves, including consideration of: targeted reserve
levels; trends in the increase or decrease of reserve levels; and insurer plans for distributing excess
reserves.
(c) To establish a consumer/business/labor/medical advisory council to obtain information
and present concerns of consumers, business, and medical providers affected by health insurance
decisions. The council shall develop proposals to allow the market for small business health
insurance to be affordable and fairer. The council shall be involved in the planning and conduct of
the quarterly public meetings in accordance with subsection (a). The advisory council shall develop
measures to inform small businesses of an insurance complaint process to ensure that small
businesses that experience rate increases in a given year may request and receive a formal review
by the department. The advisory council shall assess views of the health provider community
relative to insurance rates of reimbursement, billing, and reimbursement procedures, and the
insurers’ role in promoting efficient and high-quality health care. The advisory council shall issue
an annual report of findings and recommendations to the governor and the general assembly and
present its findings at hearings before the house and senate finance committees. The advisory
council is to be diverse in interests and shall include representatives of community consumer
organizations; small businesses, other than those involved in the sale of insurance products; and
hospital, medical, and other health provider organizations. Such representatives shall be nominated
by their respective organizations. The advisory council shall be co-chaired by the health insurance
commissioner and a community consumer organization or small business member to be elected by
the full advisory council.
(d) To establish and provide guidance and assistance to a subcommittee (“the professional-
provider-health-plan work group”) of the advisory council created pursuant to subsection (c),
composed of healthcare providers and Rhode Island licensed health plans. This subcommittee shall
include in its annual report and presentation before the house and senate finance committees the
following information:
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -33-)

(1) A method whereby health plans shall disclose to contracted providers the fee schedules
used to provide payment to those providers for services rendered to covered patients;
(2) A standardized provider application and credentials verification process, for the
purpose of verifying professional qualifications of participating healthcare providers;
(3) The uniform health plan claim form utilized by participating providers;
(4) Methods for health maintenance organizations, as defined by § 27-41-2, and nonprofit
hospital or medical service corporations, as defined by chapters 19 and 20 of title 27, to make
facility-specific data and other medical service-specific data available in reasonably consistent
formats to patients regarding quality and costs. This information would help consumers make
informed choices regarding the facilities and clinicians or physician practices at which to seek care.
Among the items considered would be the unique health services and other public goods provided
by facilities and clinicians or physician practices in establishing the most appropriate cost
comparisons;
(5) All activities related to contractual disclosure to participating providers of the
mechanisms for resolving health plan/provider disputes;
(6) The uniform process being utilized for confirming, in real time, patient insurance
enrollment status, benefits coverage, including copays and deductibles;
(7) Information related to temporary credentialing of providers seeking to participate in the
plan’s network and the impact of the activity on health plan accreditation;
(8) The feasibility of regular contract renegotiations between plans and the providers in
their networks; and
(9) Efforts conducted related to reviewing impact of silent PPOs on physician practices.
(e) To enforce the provisions of title 27 and title 42 as set forth in § 42-14-5(d).
(f) To provide analysis of the Rhode Island affordable health plan reinsurance fund. The
fund shall be used to effectuate the provisions of §§ 27-18.5-9 and 27-50-17.
(g) To analyze the impact of changing the rating guidelines and/or merging the individual
health insurance market, as defined in chapter 18.5 of title 27, and the small-employer health
insurance market, as defined in chapter 50 of title 27, in accordance with the following:
(1) The analysis shall forecast the likely rate increases required to effect the changes
recommended pursuant to the preceding subsection (g) in the direct-pay market and small-employer
health insurance market over the next five (5) years, based on the current rating structure and
current products.
(2) The analysis shall include examining the impact of merging the individual and small-
employer markets on premiums charged to individuals and small-employer groups.
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -34-)

(3) The analysis shall include examining the impact on rates in each of the individual and
small-employer health insurance markets and the number of insureds in the context of possible
changes to the rating guidelines used for small-employer groups, including: community rating
principles; expanding small-employer rate bonds beyond the current range; increasing the employer
group size in the small-group market; and/or adding rating factors for broker and/or tobacco use.
(4) The analysis shall include examining the adequacy of current statutory and regulatory
oversight of the rating process and factors employed by the participants in the proposed, new
merged market.
(5) The analysis shall include assessment of possible reinsurance mechanisms and/or
federal high-risk pool structures and funding to support the health insurance market in Rhode Island
by reducing the risk of adverse selection and the incremental insurance premiums charged for this
risk, and/or by making health insurance affordable for a selected at-risk population.
(6) The health insurance commissioner shall work with an insurance market merger task
force to assist with the analysis. The task force shall be chaired by the health insurance
commissioner and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of the general assembly, the
business community, small-employer carriers as defined in § 27-50-3, carriers offering coverage in
the individual market in Rhode Island, health insurance brokers, and members of the general public.
(7) For the purposes of conducting this analysis, the commissioner may contract with an
outside organization with expertise in fiscal analysis of the private insurance market. In conducting
its study, the organization shall, to the extent possible, obtain and use actual health plan data. Said
data shall be subject to state and federal laws and regulations governing confidentiality of health
care and proprietary information.
(8) The task force shall meet as necessary and include its findings in the annual report, and
the commissioner shall include the information in the annual presentation before the house and
senate finance committees.
(h) To establish and convene a workgroup representing healthcare providers and health
insurers for the purpose of coordinating the development of processes, guidelines, and standards to
streamline healthcare administration that are to be adopted by payors and providers of healthcare
services operating in the state. This workgroup shall include representatives with expertise who
would contribute to the streamlining of healthcare administration and who are selected from
hospitals, physician practices, community behavioral health organizations, each health insurer, and
other affected entities. The workgroup shall also include at least one designee each from the Rhode
Island Medical Society, Rhode Island Council of Community Mental Health Organizations, the
Rhode Island Health Center Association, and the Hospital Association of Rhode Island. In any year
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -35-)

that the workgroup meets and submits recommendations to the office of the health insurance
commissioner, the office of the health insurance commissioner shall submit such recommendations
to the health and human services committees of the Rhode Island house of representatives and the
Rhode Island senate prior to the implementation of any such recommendations and subsequently
shall submit a report to the general assembly by June 30, 2024. The report shall include the
recommendations the commissioner may implement, with supporting rationale. The workgroup
shall consider and make recommendations for:
(1) Establishing a consistent standard for electronic eligibility and coverage verification.
Such standard shall:
(i) Include standards for eligibility inquiry and response and, wherever possible, be
consistent with the standards adopted by nationally recognized organizations, such as the Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services;
(ii) Enable providers and payors to exchange eligibility requests and responses on a system-
to-system basis or using a payor-supported web browser;
(iii) Provide reasonably detailed information on a consumer’s eligibility for healthcare
coverage; scope of benefits; limitations and exclusions provided under that coverage; cost-sharing
requirements for specific services at the specific time of the inquiry; current deductible amounts;
accumulated or limited benefits; out-of-pocket maximums; any maximum policy amounts; and
other information required for the provider to collect the patient’s portion of the bill;
(iv) Reflect the necessary limitations imposed on payors by the originator of the eligibility
and benefits information;
(v) Recommend a standard or common process to protect all providers from the costs of
services to patients who are ineligible for insurance coverage in circumstances where a payor
provides eligibility verification based on best information available to the payor at the date of the
request of eligibility.
(2) Developing implementation guidelines and promoting adoption of the guidelines for:
(i) The use of the National Correct Coding Initiative code-edit policy by payors and
providers in the state;
(ii) Publishing any variations from codes and mutually exclusive codes by payors in a
manner that makes for simple retrieval and implementation by providers;
(iii) Use of Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act standard group codes,
reason codes, and remark codes by payors in electronic remittances sent to providers;
(iv) Uniformity in the processing of claims by payors; and the processing of corrections to
claims by providers and payors;
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -36-)

(v) A standard payor-denial review process for providers when they request a
reconsideration of a denial of a claim that results from differences in clinical edits where no single,
common-standards body or process exists and multiple conflicting sources are in use by payors and
providers.
(vi) Nothing in this section, nor in the guidelines developed, shall inhibit an individual
payor’s ability to employ, and not disclose to providers, temporary code edits for the purpose of
detecting and deterring fraudulent billing activities. The guidelines shall require that each payor
disclose to the provider its adjudication decision on a claim that was denied or adjusted based on
the application of such edits and that the provider have access to the payor’s review and appeal
process to challenge the payor’s adjudication decision.
(vii) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to modify the rights or obligations of
payors or providers with respect to procedures relating to the investigation, reporting, appeal, or
prosecution under applicable law of potentially fraudulent billing activities.
(3) Developing and promoting widespread adoption by payors and providers of guidelines
to:
(i) Ensure payors do not automatically deny claims for services when extenuating
circumstances make it impossible for the provider to obtain a preauthorization before services are
performed or notify a payor within an appropriate standardized timeline of a patient’s admission;
(ii) Require payors to use common and consistent processes and time frames when
responding to provider requests for medical management approvals. Whenever possible, such time
frames shall be consistent with those established by leading national organizations and be based
upon the acuity of the patient’s need for care or treatment. For the purposes of this section, medical
management includes prior authorization of services, preauthorization of services, precertification
of services, post-service review, medical-necessity review, and benefits advisory;
(iii) Develop, maintain, and promote widespread adoption of a single, common website
where providers can obtain payors’ preauthorization, benefits advisory, and preadmission
requirements;
(iv) Establish guidelines for payors to develop and maintain a website that providers can
use to request a preauthorization, including a prospective clinical necessity review; receive an
authorization number; and transmit an admission notification;
(v) Develop and implement the use of programs that implement selective prior
authorization requirements, based on stratification of healthcare providers’ performance and
adherence to evidence-based medicine with the input of contracted healthcare providers and/or
provider organizations. Such criteria shall be transparent and easily accessible to contracted
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -37-)

providers. Such selective prior authorization programs shall be available when healthcare providers
participate directly with the insurer in risk-based payment contracts and may be available to
providers who do not participate in risk-based contracts;
(vi) Require the review of medical services, including behavioral health services, and
prescription drugs, subject to prior authorization on at least an annual basis, with the input of
contracted healthcare providers and/or provider organizations. Any changes to the list of medical
services, including behavioral health services, and prescription drugs requiring prior authorization,
shall be shared via provider-accessible websites;
(vii) Improve communication channels between health plans, healthcare providers, and
patients by:
(A) Requiring transparency and easy accessibility of prior authorization requirements,
criteria, rationale, and program changes to contracted healthcare providers and patients/health plan
enrollees which may be satisfied by posting to provider-accessible and member-accessible
websites; and
(B) Supporting:
(I) Timely submission by healthcare providers of the complete information necessary to
make a prior authorization determination, as early in the process as possible; and
(II) Timely notification of prior authorization determinations by health plans to impacted
health plan enrollees, and healthcare providers, including, but not limited to, ordering providers,
and/or rendering providers, and dispensing pharmacists which may be satisfied by posting to
provider-accessible websites or similar electronic portals or services;
(viii) Increase and strengthen continuity of patient care by:
(A) Defining protections for continuity of care during a transition period for patients
undergoing an active course of treatment, when there is a formulary or treatment coverage change
or change of health plan that may disrupt their current course of treatment and when the treating
physician determines that a transition may place the patient at risk; and for prescription medication
by allowing a grace period of coverage to allow consideration of referred health plan options or
establishment of medical necessity of the current course of treatment;
(B) Requiring continuity of care for medical services, including behavioral health services,
and prescription medications for patients on appropriate, chronic, stable therapy through
minimizing repetitive prior authorization requirements; and which for prescription medication shall
be allowed only on an annual review, with exception for labeled limitation, to establish continued
benefit of treatment; and
(C) Requiring communication between healthcare providers, health plans, and patients to
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -38-)

facilitate continuity of care and minimize disruptions in needed treatment which may be satisfied
by posting to provider-accessible websites or similar electronic portals or services;
(D) Continuity of care for formulary or drug coverage shall distinguish between FDA
designated interchangeable products and proprietary or marketed versions of a medication;
(ix) Encourage healthcare providers and/or provider organizations and health plans to
accelerate use of electronic prior authorization technology, including adoption of national standards
where applicable; and
(x) For the purposes of subsections (h)(3)(v) through (h)(3)(x) of this section, the
workgroup meeting may be conducted in part or whole through electronic methods.
(4) To provide a report to the house and senate, on or before January 1, 2017, with
recommendations for establishing guidelines and regulations for systems that give patients
electronic access to their claims information, particularly to information regarding their obligations
to pay for received medical services, pursuant to 45 C.F.R. § 164.524.
(5) No provision of this subsection (h) shall preclude the ongoing work of the office of
health insurance commissioner’s administrative simplification task force, which includes meetings
with key stakeholders in order to improve, and provide recommendations regarding, the prior
authorization process.
(i) To issue an anti-cancer medication report. Not later than June 30, 2014, and annually
thereafter, the office of the health insurance commissioner (OHIC) shall provide the senate
committee on health and human services, and the house committee on corporations, with: (1)
Information on the availability in the commercial market of coverage for anti-cancer medication
options; (2) For the state employee’s health benefit plan, the costs of various cancer-treatment
options; (3) The changes in drug prices over the prior thirty-six (36) months; and (4) Member
utilization and cost-sharing expense.
(j) To monitor the adequacy of each health plan’s compliance with the provisions of the
federal Mental Health Parity Act, including a review of related claims processing and
reimbursement procedures. Findings, recommendations, and assessments shall be made available
to the public.
(k) To monitor the transition from fee-for-service and toward global and other alternative
payment methodologies for the payment for healthcare services. Alternative payment
methodologies should be assessed for their likelihood to promote access to affordable health
insurance, health outcomes, and performance.
(l) To report annually, no later than July 1, 2014, then biannually thereafter, on hospital
payment variation, including findings and recommendations, subject to available resources.
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -39-)

(m) Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws or regulation to the
contrary, provide a report with findings and recommendations to the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house, on or before April 1, 2014, including, but not limited to, the following
information:
(1) The impact of the current, mandated healthcare benefits as defined in §§ 27-18-48.1,
27-18-60, 27-18-62, 27-18-64, similar provisions in chapters 19, 20 and 41 of title 27, and §§ 27-
18-3(c), 27-38.2-1 et seq., or others as determined by the commissioner, on the cost of health
insurance for fully insured employers, subject to available resources;
(2) Current provider and insurer mandates that are unnecessary and/or duplicative due to
the existing standards of care and/or delivery of services in the healthcare system;
(3) A state-by-state comparison of health insurance mandates and the extent to which
Rhode Island mandates exceed other states benefits; and
(4) Recommendations for amendments to existing mandated benefits based on the findings
in (m)(1), (m)(2), and (m)(3) above.
(n) On or before July 1, 2014, the office of the health insurance commissioner, in
collaboration with the director of health and lieutenant governor’s office, shall submit a report to
the general assembly and the governor to inform the design of accountable care organizations
(ACOs) in Rhode Island as unique structures for comprehensive healthcare delivery and value-
based payment arrangements, that shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Utilization review;
(2) Contracting; and
(3) Licensing and regulation.
(o) On or before February 3, 2015, the office of the health insurance commissioner shall
submit a report to the general assembly and the governor that describes, analyzes, and proposes
recommendations to improve compliance of insurers with the provisions of § 27-18-76 with regard
to patients with mental health and substance use disorders.
(p) To work to ensure the health insurance coverage of behavioral health care under the
same terms and conditions as other health care, and to integrate behavioral health parity
requirements into the office of the health insurance commissioner insurance oversight and
healthcare transformation efforts.
(q) To work with other state agencies to seek delivery system improvements that enhance
access to a continuum of mental health and substance use disorder treatment in the state; and
integrate that treatment with primary and other medical care to the fullest extent possible.
(r) To direct insurers toward policies and practices that address the behavioral health needs
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -40-)

of the public and greater integration of physical and behavioral healthcare delivery.
(s) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall conduct an analysis of the impact
of the provisions of § 27-38.2-1(i) on health insurance premiums and access in Rhode Island and
submit a report of its findings to the general assembly on or before June 1, 2023.
(t) To undertake the analyses, reports, and studies contained in this section:
(1) The office shall hire the necessary staff and prepare a request for proposal for a qualified
and competent firm or firms to undertake the following analyses, reports, and studies:
(i) The firm shall undertake a comprehensive review of all social and human service
programs having a contract with or licensed by the state or any subdivision of the department of
children, youth and families (DCYF), the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH), the department of human services (DHS), the department of
health (DOH), and Medicaid for the purposes of:
(A) Establishing a baseline of the eligibility factors for receiving services;
(B) Establishing a baseline of the service offering through each agency for those
determined eligible;
(C) Establishing a baseline understanding of reimbursement rates for all social and human
service programs including rates currently being paid, the date of the last increase, and a proposed
model that the state may use to conduct future studies and analyses;
(D) Ensuring accurate and adequate reimbursement to social and human service providers
that facilitate the availability of high-quality services to individuals receiving home and
community-based long-term services and supports provided by social and human service providers;
(E) Ensuring the general assembly is provided accurate financial projections on social and
human service program costs, demand for services, and workforce needs to ensure access to entitled
beneficiaries and services;
(F) Establishing a baseline and determining the relationship between state government and
the provider network including functions, responsibilities, and duties;
(G) Determining a set of measures and accountability standards to be used by EOHHS and
the general assembly to measure the outcomes of the provision of services including budgetary
reporting requirements, transparency portals, and other methods; and
(H) Reporting the findings of human services analyses and reports to the speaker of the
house, senate president, chairs of the house and senate finance committees, chairs of the house and
senate health and human services committees, and the governor.
(2) The analyses, reports, and studies required pursuant to this section shall be
accomplished and published as follows and shall provide:
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -41-)

(i) An assessment and detailed reporting on all social and human service program rates to
be completed by January 1, 2023, including rates currently being paid and the date of the last
increase;
(ii) An assessment and detailed reporting on eligibility standards and processes of all
mandatory and discretionary social and human service programs to be completed by January 1,
2023;
(iii) An assessment and detailed reporting on utilization trends from the period of January
1, 2017, through December 31, 2021, for social and human service programs to be completed by
January 1, 2023;
(iv) An assessment and detailed reporting on the structure of the state government as it
relates to the provision of services by social and human service providers including eligibility and
functions of the provider network to be completed by January 1, 2023;
(v) An assessment and detailed reporting on accountability standards for services for social
and human service programs to be completed by January 1, 2023;
(vi) An assessment and detailed reporting by April 1, 2023, on all professional licensed
and unlicensed personnel requirements for established rates for social and human service programs
pursuant to a contract or established fee schedule;
(vii) An assessment and reporting on access to social and human service programs, to
include any wait lists and length of time on wait lists, in each service category by April 1, 2023;
(viii) An assessment and reporting of national and regional Medicaid rates in comparison
to Rhode Island social and human service provider rates by April 1, 2023;
(ix) An assessment and reporting on usual and customary rates paid by private insurers and
private pay for similar social and human service providers, both nationally and regionally, by April
1, 2023; and
(x) Completion of the development of an assessment and review process that includes the
following components: eligibility; scope of services; relationship of social and human service
provider and the state; national and regional rate comparisons and accountability standards that
result in recommended rate adjustments; and this process shall be completed by September 1, 2023,
and conducted biennially hereafter. The biennial rate setting shall be consistent with payment
requirements established in § 1902(a)(30)(A) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §
1396a(a)(30)(A), and all federal and state law, regulations, and quality and safety standards. The
results and findings of this process shall be transparent, and public meetings shall be conducted to
allow providers, recipients, and other interested parties an opportunity to ask questions and provide
comment beginning in September 2023 and biennially thereafter; and
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -42-)

(xi) On or before September 1, 2026, the office shall publish and submit to the general
assembly and the governor a one-time report making and justifying recommendations for
adjustments to primary care services reimbursement and financing. The report shall include
consideration of Medicaid, Medicare, commercial, and alternative contracted payments.
(3) In fulfillment of the responsibilities defined in subsection (t), the office of the health
insurance commissioner shall consult with the Executive Office of Health and Human Services.
(u) Annually, each department (namely, EOHHS, DCYF, DOH, DHS, and BHDDH) shall
include the corresponding components of the assessment and review (i.e., eligibility; scope of
services; relationship of social and human service provider and the state; and national and regional
rate comparisons and accountability standards including any changes or substantive issues between
biennial reviews) including the recommended rates from the most recent assessment and review
with their annual budget submission to the office of management and budget and provide a detailed
explanation and impact statement if any rate variances exist between submitted recommended
budget and the corresponding recommended rate from the most recent assessment and review
process starting October 1, 2023, and biennially thereafter.
(v) The general assembly shall appropriate adequate funding as it deems necessary to
undertake the analyses, reports, and studies contained in this section relating to the powers and
duties of the office of the health insurance commissioner.
SECTION 10. Rhode Island Medicaid Reform Act of 2008 Resolution.
WHEREAS, The General Assembly enacted Chapter 12.4 of Title 42 entitled “The Rhode
Island Medicaid Reform Act of 2008”; and
WHEREAS, A legislative enactment is required pursuant to Rhode Island General Laws
section 42-12.4-1, et seq.; and
WHEREAS, Rhode Island General Laws section 42-7.2-5(3)(i) provides that the secretary
of the executive office of health and human Services is responsible for the review and coordination
of any Medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver requests and renewals as well as any initiatives
and proposals requiring amendments to the Medicaid state plan or category II or III changes as
described in the demonstration, “with potential to affect the scope, amount, or duration of publicly-
funded health care services, provider payments or reimbursements, or access to or the availability
of benefits and services provided by Rhode Island general and public laws”; and
WHEREAS, In pursuit of a more cost-effective consumer choice system of care that is
fiscally sound and sustainable, the secretary requests legislative approval of the following proposals
to amend the demonstration; and
WHEREAS, Implementation of adjustments may require amendments to the Rhode
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -43-)

Island’s Medicaid state plan and/or section 1115 waiver under the terms and conditions of the
demonstration. Further, adoption of new or amended rules, regulations and procedures may also be
required:
(a) Nursing Facility Rate Increase Alignment with State Revenue Growth. The executive
office of health and human services will pursue and implement any state plan amendments needed
to limit rate increases for nursing facilities in SFY 2026 to the anticipated rate of growth of state
tax revenue, estimated to be 2.3 percent.
(b) Home Care Rates. The secretary of the executive office of health and human services
will pursue and implement any state plan amendments needed to eliminate annual rate increases
for home care services.
(c) Establishment of interprofessional consultation program. The secretary of the executive
office of health and human services will pursue and implement any state plan amendments needed
to establish an interprofessional consultation program in Medicaid effective October 1, 2025.
(d) Long-term Behavioral Healthcare Beds. The secretary of the executive office of health
and human services will pursue and implement any state plan amendments needed to establish a
rate methodology in support of long-term care behavioral health inpatient units for non-
governmental owned hospitals.
(e) Mobile Response and Stabilization Services (MRSS). The secretary of the executive
office of health and human services will pursue and implement any state plan amendments needed
to establish a rate of methodology for twenty-four-hour mobile response and stabilization services
for children and youth ages two through twenty-one. This program shall convert the existing pilot
Mobile Response and Stabilization Services program into a Medicaid-covered benefit to establish
MRSS as the state-sanctioned crisis system for children's behavioral health that adheres to
nationally recognized fidelity standard. The request for a state plan amendment shall be submitted
no later than October 1, 2025, for a start date no later than October 1, 2026.
(f) 340 B Program. The secretary of the executive office of health and human services will
pursue and implement any state plan or 1115 waiver amendments needed to effectuate a 340 B
program is authorized to pursue and implement any state plan or 1115 waiver amendments that
may be needed, and to make any changes to the department's rules, regulations, and procedures that
may be needed, to prohibit discrimination against 340B covered entities for drugs reimbursed by
the Medicaid program.
The following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "340B drug" means a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices by a
manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -44-)

U.S.C. § 256b(a)(4);
(2) “340B-contract pharmacy” means a pharmacy, as defined in § 5-19.1-2, that dispenses
340B drugs on behalf of a 340B-covered entity;
(3) "340B covered entity" means an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
federal 340B drug discount program on behalf of a 340B-covered entity under contract;
(4) "Medicaid" means the Rhode Island Medicaid program;
(5) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" means any person or entity that manufactures,
distributes, or sells prescription drugs, directly or through another person or entity, in this state;
(6) "Pharmacy benefit manager” or “PBMs" means an entity doing business in the state
that contracts to administer or manage prescription-drug benefits on behalf of Medicaid that
provides prescription-drug benefits to Medicaid members;
The executive office will prohibit certain discriminatory actions by Medicaid, including
managed care organizations or PMBs contracted with Medicaid, related to reimbursement of 340B
covered entities and 340B contract pharmacies as follows:
(a) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B covered entity for 340B drugs, a health
insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, manufacturer, other third-party payor, or its agent Medicaid, a
managed care organization contracted with Medicaid, a PBM contracted with Medicaid, a Medicaid
managed care organization or an agent of any of the above shall not do any of the following:
(1) Reimburse Establish a lower reimbursement rate for a 340B covered entity or contract
pharmacy for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid the established reimbursement rate for the
same drug or service to for a non- 340B pharmacy; based solely on the pharmacy's or the drug's
340B status.
(2) Impose fees, chargebacks, adjustments, or conditions on reimbursement to 340B
covered entity, that differs from such terms or conditions applied to a non-340B entity, based on
340B status and participation in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C. §
256b including, without limitation, any of the following:
(3) Deny or limit participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks based on 340B
status;
(4) Impose requirements relating to the frequency or scope of audits of inventory
management systems inconsistent with the federal 340B drug pricing program;
(5) Require submission of claims-level data or documentation that identifies 340B drugs
as a condition of reimbursement or pricing, unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services;
(6) Require a 340B covered entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -45-)

adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related to
340B drug pricing;
(7)(4) Interfere with, or limit, a 340B covered entity’s choice to use a contract pharmacy
for drug distribution or dispensing;
(8) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurer, pharmacy benefit
manager, manufacturer, or other third-party payor and a 340B covered entity that differ from the
terms and conditions applied to entities that are not 340B covered entities, that discriminates against
the 340B covered entity or prevents or interferes with an individual's choice to receive a
prescription drug from a 340B covered entity, including the administration of such drugs in person
or via direct delivery, mail, or other form of shipment, or create a restriction or additional charge
on a patient who chooses to receive drugs from a 340B covered entity;
(9)(5) Place a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive 340B
drugs from a 340B covered entity if such restriction or additional charge differs from the terms and
conditions applied where patients choose to receive drugs that are not 340B drugs from an entity
that is not a 340B covered entity or from a pharmacy that is not a 340B contract pharmacy;
(10)(6) Exclude any 340B covered entity from a health insurer, pharmacy benefit manager,
or other third-party payor network or refuse to contract with a 340B covered entity for reasons other
than those that apply equally to a non-340B entity;
(11)(7) Impose any other restrictions, requirements, practices, or policies that are not
imposed on a non- 340B entity;
(b) Nothing in this section is intended to limit Medicaid fee-for-service or managed care
program's or pharmacy benefit manager’s ability to use preferred pharmacies or develop preferred
networks so long as participation is not based on an entity’s status as a 340B covered entity and
participation in the network is subject to the same terms and conditions as a non-340B covered
entity;
(c) Annually on or before April 1, each 340B covered entity participating in the federal
340B drug pricing program established by 42 U.S.C. §256b shall submit to the office of the
Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and Auditor
General a report detailing the 340B covered entity’s participation in the program during the
previous calendar year, which report shall be posted on the state Auditor General’s website and
which shall contain at least the following information:
(1) the aggregated acquisition cost for all prescription drugs that the 340B covered entity
obtained through the 340B program during the previous calendar year;
(2) the aggregated payment amount that the 340B covered entity received for drugs, under
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -46-)

the 340B program and dispensed or administered to patients enrolled in commercial and Medicare
Supplemental plans;
(3) the aggregated payment amount that the 340B covered entity made:
(i) to contract pharmacies to dispense drugs to its patients under the 340B program during
the previous calendar year;
(ii) to any other outside vendor for managing, administering, or facilitating any aspect of
the 340B covered entity’s drug program during the previous calendar year; and
(iii) for all other expenses related to administering the 340B program, including staffing,
operational, and administrative expenses, during the previous calendar year;
(4) The names of all vendors, including split billing vendors, and contract pharmacies, with
which the 340B covered entity contracted to provide services associated with the covered entity’s
340B program participation during the previous calendar year;
(5) The number of claims for all prescription drugs the 340B covered entity obtained
through the 340B program during the previous calendar year, including the total number of claims
and the number of claims reported by commercial and Medicare Supplemental plans; and be it
further.
(g) Primary Care Rates. The secretary of the executive office of health and human services
is authorized to pursue and implement any waiver amendments, state plan amendments, and/or
changes to the department’s rules, regulations, and procedures to set Medicaid reimbursement rates
for primary care services, as defined by the executive office, equal to one hundred percent (100%)
of the Medicare reimbursement rates for primary care services in effect as of October 1, 2025. The
reimbursement rates will be annually updated to reflect one hundred percent (100%) of the
Medicare reimbursement rates for primary care.
(h) Medicare Savings Programs. The secretary of the executive office of health and human
services is authorized to pursue and implement any waiver amendments, state plan amendments,
and/or changes to the applicable department's rules, regulations, and procedures required to
implement income disregards for the Qualified Medicare Savings Program to increase eligibility
up to one hundred and twenty-five percent (125%) of federal poverty and the Qualified Individual
Medicare Savings Program up to one hundred and sixty-eight percent (168%) of federal poverty
effective January 1, 2026. Premium payments for the Qualified Individuals will be one hundred
percent (100%) federally funded up to the amount of the federal allotment and the Secretary shall
discontinue enrollment in the Qualified Individual program when the Part B premiums meet the
federal allotment.
(i) Prior Authorization Pilot Program. The secretary of the executive office of health and
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -47-)

human services will pursue and implement any state plan or 1115 waiver amendments needed to
effectuate a prior authorization pilot program. The executive office of health and human services
will conduct a three-year pilot within Medicaid fee-for-service and managed care program, that
eliminates prior authorization requirements for any service, treatment, or procedure ordered by a
primary care provider in the normal course of providing primary care treatment, which shall take
effect on October 1, 2025, and sunset on October 1, 2028.
For purposes of the pilot program, a primary care provider means a provider within the
practice type of family medicine, geriatric medicine, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology,
or pediatrics with the following professional credentials: a doctor of medicine or doctor of
osteopathic medicine, a nurse practitioner, or a physician assistant, and who is credentialed with
Medicaid fee-for-service or managed care organization. Prior authorization means the pre-service
assessment for purposes of utilization review that a Primary Care Provider is required by Medicaid
fee-for-service or managed care organization to undergo before a covered healthcare service is
approved for a patient.
The executive office of health and human services will provide an annual report to the
Speaker of the House, the Senate President, the Office of the Governor and the Office of the Health
Insurance Commissioner that includes recommendations on the further simplification and reduction
of administrative burdens related to the utilization of prior authorizations in primary care and data
and analytics demonstrating the impact the pilot program is having on utilization and patient, cost,
quality and access to care.
RESOLVED, That EOHHS will conduct a three (3) year pilot within Medicaid fee-for-
service and managed care program, that eliminates Prior Authorization requirements for any
service, treatment, or procedure ordered by a Primary Care Provider in the normal course of
providing primary care treatment, which however, this provision shall not apply to any
pharmaceutical drugs and/or pharmaceutical products, and shall take effect on October I, 2025, and
sunset on October 1, 2028; and be it further
RESOLVED, That for purposes of this pilot a "Primary Care Provider" means a provider
within the practice type of family medicine, geriatric medicine, internal medicine, obstetrics and
gynecology, or pediatrics with the following professional credentials: a doctor of medicine or
doctor of osteopathic medicine, a nurse practitioner, or a physician assistant, and who is
credentialed with Medicaid fee-for-service or managed care organization; and be it further
RESOLVED, That for purposes of this pilot "Prior Authorization" means the pre-service
assessment for purposes of utilization review that a Primary Care Provider is required by Medicaid
fee-for-service or managed care organization to undergo before a covered healthcare service is
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -48-)

approved for a patient; and be it further
RESOLVED, That EOHHS will provide an annual report to the Speaker of the House, the
Senate President, the Office of the Governor and the Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner
that includes recommendations on the further simplification and reduction of administrative
burdens related to the utilization of prior authorizations in primary care and data and analytics
demonstrating the impact the pilot program is having on utilization and patient care, cost, quality
and access to care; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the General Assembly hereby approves the above-referenced Medicaid
pilot proposals; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the Secretary of the EOHHS is hereby ordered and directed to pursue
and implement any state plan or 1115 waiver amendments needed to effectuate this pilot program.
Now, therefore, be it:
RESOLVED, That the General Assembly hereby approves the above-referenced proposals;
and be it further;
RESOLVED, That the secretary of the executive office of health and human services is
authorized to pursue and implement any waiver amendments, state plan amendments, and/or
changes to the applicable department’s rules, regulations and procedures approved herein and as
authorized by Rhode Island General Laws section 42-12.4; and be it further;
RESOLVED, That this Joint Resolution shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 11. This article shall take effect upon passage, except Section 10 which shall
take effect as of July 1, 2025.
Art8
RELATING TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
(Page -49-)

=======
art.009/2/011/3/011/2
=======
ARTICLE 9 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO HOUSING
SECTION 1. Sections 23-24.6-6, 23-24.6-15 and 23-24.6-20 of the General Laws in
Chapter 23-24.6 entitled "Lead Poisoning Prevention Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-24.6-6. Interagency coordinating council on environmental lead.
(a) There is established an interagency coordinating council on environmental lead within
the department of health consisting of six (6) five (5) members.
(b) The purpose of the council shall be as follows:
(1) To coordinate the activities of its member agencies with respect to: (i) environmental
lead policy; (ii) the development of educational materials; (iii) drafting regulations which have as
their purpose reducing or preventing lead poisoning; and (iv) enforcement of laws, regulations, and
ordinances pertaining to lead poisoning and lead poisoning prevention.
(2) To recommend the adoption of policies with regard to the detection and elimination of
the hazards to the public posed by exposure to lead in the environment;
(3) To recommend the adoption of policies with regard to the screening and treatment of
individuals suffering from elevated exposures to environmental lead; and
(4) To report on or before March 1 of each year to the governor, speaker of the house and
the president of the senate on both the progress of the comprehensive environmental lead program
and recommendations for any needed changes in legislation, which report shall at a minimum: (i)
provide by city and town, the incidence and levels of lead poisoning; (ii) describe educational
programs; (iii) summarize regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter
128.1 of title 42, and state the number of enforcement actions pursuant to this chapter initiated, the
number completed or closed due to successful remediation of lead hazards, the number completed
or closed for other reasons (which reasons shall be explained), and the number that remain open
(including information on how long such actions have been open and the reasons they have not
been completed).
(c) The members of the council shall be as follows:
(1) There shall be five (5) four (4) ex officio members: the director, the director of
environmental management, the director of human services, and the attorney general, and the
executive director of the housing resources commission or their designees.

(2) There shall be one local government official, who shall have knowledge of lead hazard
reduction programs at the local level, appointed by the president of the Rhode Island League of
Cities and Towns.
(3) [Deleted by P.L. 2002, ch. 187, § 2 and by P.L. 2002, ch. 188, § 2.]
(d) The members shall elect from among their members a chairperson, a vice chairperson,
and secretary.
(e) The council shall meet at the call of the chairperson, but not less than quarterly. The
director shall provide any meeting and hearing rooms and secretarial staff that the council may
require.
23-24.6-15. Inspections of rental property.
(a) The director shall, in conjunction with the housing resources commission, promulgate
regulations permitting state inspectors to conduct such lead inspections as may be appropriate in
response to any complaint to the department or the housing resources commission, by an occupant
or the parent or guardian of any child under the age of six (6) years who is an occupant renting or
leasing a dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises of the existence of a lead exposure hazard for a child
under the age of six (6) years in that dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises. These regulations will
allow for response to the complaints to be prioritized based upon the age of the structure and the
nature and degree of hazard present.
(b) Whenever a comprehensive environmental lead inspection has been performed either
pursuant to a complaint or otherwise, the owner and/or any real estate agent or property manager
involved in renting or leasing the dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises shall provide the results of
the inspection to occupants pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department, as follows:
(1) Those persons occupying the dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises at the time the
inspection is performed shall be notified of the results within five (5) business days after the owner
receives the results;
(2) All persons who are prospective occupants shall be notified of the inspection results if
a significant lead hazard exists, before any lease is signed or before occupancy begins in cases
where no lease is signed;
(3) This notice provision terminates with the performance of the necessary lead reduction
actions required to reach at least the "lead safe" level. The department shall provide the owner with
a certification of lead reduction for the dwelling.
(c) Failure to provide inspection results and/or educational materials pursuant to this
chapter shall subject the lessor or his or her agent to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -2-)

23-24.6-20. Licensure of environmental lead inspectors and lead contractors,
supervisors, and workers.
(a) The department shall provide for the certification of training programs for
environmental lead inspectors and for lead contractors, supervisors, workers, and other persons
engaged in environmental lead-hazard reduction pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The
department shall establish standards and specifications for training courses including, at a
minimum, the required length of different training programs, mandatory topics of instruction, and
required qualifications for training programs and instructors. Hands on instruction shall be a
component of the required training.
(b) The department shall establish procedures and issue regulations requiring the licensure
of environmental lead inspectors, lead contractors, supervisors, workers, and other persons engaged
in environmental lead inspection and/or hazard reduction pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
These regulations:
(1) Shall prescribe the requirements for licensure and the conditions and restrictions
governing the renewal, revocation, and suspension of licenses. Requirements for licensure and for
renewal of licensure shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) Compliance with the lead-hazard reduction regulations in § 23-24.6-17; and
(ii) Required training of environmental lead inspectors and of lead contractors, supervisors,
workers, and other persons engaged in environmental lead-hazard reduction in subjects including,
but not limited to, safe work practices, instruction in health risks, precautionary measures,
protective equipment, and other practices, including practices to prevent contamination of the
residential premises, ambient discharges and ground contamination, respiratory protection, new
lead-hazard reduction techniques and technologies, applicable federal and state regulation, and
hands-on instruction for equipment and techniques to be used; a minimum of twenty (20) hours of
training shall be required as a condition of licensure for workers; additional hours of training shall
be required for supervisors and contractors; a refresher training course shall also be required;
(2) May provide for Rhode Island to reciprocally license persons certified and/or licensed
by other states with comparable requirements.
(c) No person shall enter into, engage in, or conduct comprehensive environmental lead
inspections or environmental lead-hazard reduction activities covered by department regulations
without having successfully completed a certified training program and without having been
licensed by the department. Each trained and licensed person shall be issued a photo identity card.
(d) The department shall, in conjunction with the housing resources commission, develop
and periodically update lists of all licensed inspectors, contractors, supervisors, workers', and other
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -3-)

persons who perform environmental lead-hazard reduction in Rhode Island and make those lists
available to interested parties and the public.
(e)(1) The department shall enforce the provisions of this section as appropriate and shall
have all necessary powers for enforcement.
(2) The department may revoke, suspend, cancel, or deny any license, at any time, in
accordance with chapter 35 of title 42 if it believes that the terms or conditions of these are being
violated, or that the holder of, or applicant for, license has violated any regulation of the department
or any other state law or regulation. Any person aggrieved by a determination by the department to
issue, deny, revoke, or suspend any license may request an adjudicatory hearing.
(3) When any person violates the terms or conditions of any license issued under this
section or any state law or regulation, the director shall have the power by written notice to order
the violator to cease and desist immediately. The department may file a written complaint with the
district court in the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. Punishment by an administrative
fine pursuant to § 23-24.6-27 may be in addition to the suspension of any license.
(4) Any state inspector may issue an immediate cease-work order to any person who
violates the terms or conditions of any license issued under this section, or any provision of this
chapter, or any regulation or order issued under this chapter, if the violation will endanger or
materially impair the health or well-being of any occupant, any environmental lead inspector, or
any contractor, supervisor, worker, or other person engaged in environmental lead-hazard
reduction.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the department of
health, the department of labor and training, or the department of environmental management under
the provisions of any other law.
SECTION 2. Chapter 40-17 of the General Laws entitled "Support of Homeless" is hereby
repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 40-17
Support of Homeless
40-17-1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly hereby finds that there exists in this state undetermined numbers of
homeless persons, many of whom suffer from chronic mental illness and disability, and that this
condition exists among families and among individuals of all age groups without regard to ethnic
or racial heritage or sex. The existence of this condition is declared to be detrimental to the health,
safety, and welfare of the homeless individuals themselves and to the state.
40-17-2. Agency established.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -4-)

(a) There is hereby created a permanent council to be called the "interagency council on
homelessness" consisting of eighteen (18) members and two (2) ex-officio members:
(1) One of whom shall be the chief of the office of housing and community development,
or his or her designee, who shall chair the interagency council on homelessness;
(2) One of whom shall be the director of the department of administration, or his or her
designee;
(3) One of whom shall be the chair of the housing resources commission, or his or her
designee;
(4) One of whom shall be the director of the department of human services, or his or her
designee;
(5) One of whom shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee;
(6) One of whom shall be the director of the department of children, youth and families, or
his or her designee;
(7) One of whom shall be the director of the office of healthy aging, or his or her designee;
(8) One of whom shall be the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities
and hospitals, or his or her designee;
(9) One of whom shall be director of the department of labor and training, or his or her
designee;
(10) One of whom shall be the director of the department of corrections, or his or her
designee;
(11) One of whom shall be the commissioner of the department of elementary and
secondary education, or his or her designee;
(12) One of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation, or his or her designee;
(13) One of whom shall be the director of the emergency management agency, or his or
her designee;
(14) One of whom shall be a representative from the Rhode Island office of veterans
services, or his or her designee;
(15) One of whom shall be the public defender, or his or her designee;
(16) One of whom shall be the Medicaid director within the department of human services,
or his or her designee;
(17) One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services, or his or her designee;
(18) One of whom shall be the lieutenant governor, or his or her designee;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -5-)

(19) One of whom shall be an ex-officio member who shall be from the Providence
Veterans Administration Medical Center who specializes in health care for homeless veterans; and
(20) One of whom shall be an ex-officio member who shall be the chair, or his or her
designee, of the interagency council on homelessness advisory council as described in this chapter
herein.
(b) Forthwith upon the effective date of this chapter, the members of the commission shall
meet at the call of the chair and organize. Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in like manner
as the original appointment.
(c) The department of administration is hereby directed to provide suitable quarters and
staff for the commission.
(d) All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish advice and information,
documentary, and otherwise to the commission and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable
by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.
40-17-3. Duties and responsibilities of council.
The duties and responsibilities of the council shall be:
(1) To participate in the process of developing a strategic plan to end homelessness aligned
with the federal strategic plan to end homelessness that will serve to reduce the number of homeless
individuals and families in Rhode Island;
(2) To coordinate services for the homeless among state agencies and instrumentalities,
community-based organizations, faith-based organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy
groups, and businesses;
(3) To coordinate services not specifically for the homeless, but from which the homeless
may benefit, among state agencies and instrumentalities, community-based organizations, faith-
based organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy groups, and businesses; and
(4) To identify and seek to remedy gaps in services, specifically in the area of making
provisions for the availability, use, and permanent funding stream for permanent supportive
housing.
40-17-4. Meeting and reporting requirements.
Meeting and reporting requirements are as follows:
(1) The council shall meet regularly;
(2) The council, in conjunction with the housing resources commission, shall provide the
strategic plan and specific recommendations to prevent and end homelessness to the governor,
senate president, speaker of the house, the senate committee on housing and municipal government,
and the house corporations committee by February 1, 2012;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -6-)

(3) The council shall provide a report on funding available during calendar year 2011 for
services, facilities, programs, or otherwise for people who are homeless. Said report shall be
provided to the senate president, speaker of the house, senate fiscal advisor, and house fiscal advisor
by January 31, 2012;
(4) The council shall report annually to the governor and the general assembly, no later
than March 2013, and annually thereafter, on the progress made in achieving the goals and
objectives set forth in the strategic plan; on the current number of homeless individuals, families,
and children; and any other pertinent information.
40-17-5. Advisory council established.
(a) There is hereby created a permanent advisory council to the interagency council on
homelessness containing representation of advocates; service providers; members of the veteran
community, including housing providers and a current or former homeless veteran; current and/or
former members of the homeless community; as well as representatives specifically affiliated with
youth homelessness. All new members shall be chosen and approved by majority vote of the
members present at an official meeting. At no time shall there be less than three (3) representatives
of the homeless community, current or former. The chair shall be elected by a majority of the
members.
(b) The purpose of the council is to inform the interagency council on homelessness on the
current status and issues facing the homeless throughout Rhode Island.
SECTION 3. Sections 42-55-4, 42-55-5.4 and 42-55-24.1 of the General Laws in Chapter
42-55 entitled "Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation" are hereby amended to
read as follows:
42-55-4. Creation of corporation — Composition — Personnel — Compensation.
(a) There is authorized the creation and establishment of a public corporation of the state,
having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of the state
government, with the politic and corporate powers as are set forth in this chapter to be known as
the "Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation" to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. The corporation is constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential
governmental functions, and the exercise by the corporation of the powers conferred by this chapter
shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the state.
It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to authorize the incorporation
of a public corporation and instrumentality and agency of the state for the purpose of carrying on
the activities authorized by this chapter, and to vest the corporation with all of the powers, authority,
rights, privileges, and titles that may be necessary to enable it to accomplish these purposes. This
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -7-)

chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the purpose expressed.
(b) The powers of the corporation shall be vested in seven (7) commissioners consisting of
the secretary of housing, who shall serve as chair of the corporation, or the secretary's designee; the
director of administration, or the director's designee; the general treasurer, or the general treasurer's
designee; the director of business regulation, or the director's designee; and four (4) members to be
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate who shall among them be
experienced in all aspects of housing design, development, finance, management, and state and
municipal finance. On or before July 1, 1973, the governor shall appoint one member to serve until
the first day of July, 1974, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, one member to
serve until the first day of July, 1975, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, one
member to serve until the first day of July, 1976, and until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified, one member to serve until the first day of July, 1977, and until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified. During the month of June, 1974, and during the month of June annually
thereafter, the governor shall appoint a member to succeed the member whose term will then next
expire to serve for a term of four (4) years commencing on the first day of July then next following
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. A vacancy in the office of a commissioner,
other than by expiration, shall be filled in like manner as an original appointment, but only for the
unexpired portion of the term. If a vacancy occurs when the senate is not in session, the governor
shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy, but only until the senate shall next convene and give its
advice and consent to a new appointment. A member shall be eligible to succeed him or herself.
The governor shall designate a member of the corporation to serve as chairperson. Any member of
the corporation may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect
of duty.
(c) The commissioners shall elect from among their number a vice-chairperson annually
and those other officers as they may determine. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chairperson
or whenever two (2) commissioners so request. Four (4) commissioners of the corporation shall
constitute a quorum and any action taken by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter
may be authorized by resolution approved by a majority but not less than three (3) of the
commissioners present at any regular or special meeting. No vacancy in the membership of the
corporation shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the
duties of the corporation.
(d) Commissioners shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties, but
each commissioner shall be reimbursed for the commissioner's reasonable expenses incurred in
carrying out the commissioner's duties under this chapter.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -8-)

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of the state
shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his or her office or employment by reason of his
or her acceptance of membership of the corporation or his or her service to the corporation.
(f) The commissioners shall employ an executive director who shall also be the secretary
and who shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business of the corporation, subject to
the policies, control, and direction of the commissioners. The commissioners may employ technical
experts and other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, and fix their
qualifications, duties, and compensation. These employed persons shall not be subject to the
provisions of the classified service. The commissioners may delegate to one or more of their agents
or employees those administrative duties they may deem proper.
(g) The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of the corporation and shall be
custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the corporation and of its minute book and
seal. The secretary, or the secretary's designee, or the designee of the board of commissioners, shall
have authority to cause to be made copies of all minutes and other records and documents of the
corporation and to give certificates under the seal of the corporation to the effect that the copies are
true copies and all persons dealing with the corporation may rely upon the certificates.
(h) Before entering into his or her duties, each commissioner of the corporation shall
execute a surety bond in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and the executive director
shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or, in lieu
of this, the chairperson of the corporation shall execute a blanket bond covering each commissioner,
the executive director and the employees or other officers of the corporation, each surety bond to
be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office or offices covered, to be
executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state as surety and to be
approved by the attorney general and filed in the office of the secretary of state. The cost of each
bond shall be paid by the corporation.
(i) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it shall not be or constitute a conflict of
interest for a director, officer, or employee of any financial institution, investment banking firm,
brokerage firm, commercial bank or trust company, architecture firm, insurance company, or any
other firm, person, or corporation to serve as a member of the corporation. If any commissioner,
officer, or employee of the corporation shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be a
director, officer, or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested
directly or indirectly in any contract with the corporation, including any loan to any housing
sponsor or healthcare sponsor, that interest shall be disclosed to the corporation and shall be set
forth in the minutes of the corporation and the commissioner, officer, or employee having an
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -9-)

interest therein shall not participate on behalf of the corporation in the authorization of this contract.
42-55-5.4. Renewable energy in housing developments.
On or before July 1, 2009, the corporation shall establish, in appropriate housing
development programs it administers, criteria for priority consideration of housing development
proposals which include renewable energy features which are demonstrated to be cost-effective
and can be implemented in a reasonable period of time. Effective January 1 2026, the executive
office of housing, in collaboration with the corporation, shall develop criteria.
42-55-24.1. Allocation of tax credits.
The corporation shall be the sole and exclusive agent for the allocation of all federal tax
credits for low-income housing under 26 U.S.C. § 42. The corporation shall have all of the powers
necessary to effectuate those allocations, including without limitation, the power to adopt rules,
regulations, and policies regarding those allocations. Notwithstanding the foregoing and any other
provision of law, effective January 1, 2026, the qualified allocation plan required by 26 U.S.C. §
42 shall be developed by the executive office of housing in consultation with the corporation.
SECTION 4. Section 42-55-22.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-55 entitled "Rhode
Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation" is hereby repealed.
42-55-22.3. Emergency housing assistance.
The department of human services shall administer the emergency housing assistance
program in accordance with the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation rules and
regulations and contracts with community action program agencies, as those rules and regulations
may be currently in force and effect. In so far as the board of directors may authorize funds for the
support of this program, the receipt of those funds shall be deposited as general revenues and
appropriated to the department of human services for the support of the program.
SECTION 5. Chapter 42-64.34 of the General Laws entitled "The Department of Housing"
is hereby repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 42-64.34
The Department of Housing
42-64.34-1. Department established.
Effective January 1, 2023, there is hereby established within the executive branch of the
state government a department of housing. The head of the department shall be the secretary of
housing, who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The
position of secretary is hereby created in the unclassified service. The secretary shall hold office at
the pleasure of the governor. Before entering upon the discharge of duties, the secretary shall take
an oath to faithfully execute the duties of the office. The secretary of housing shall:
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -10-)

(i) Prior to hiring, have completed and earned a minimum of a master's graduate degree in
the field of urban planning, economics, or a related field of study or possess a juris doctor law
degree. Preference shall be provided to candidates having earned an advanced degree consisting of
an L.L.M. law degree or Ph.D. in urban planning or economics. Qualified candidates must have
documented five (5) years' full-time experience employed in the administration of housing policy
and/or development;
(ii) Be responsible for overseeing all housing initiatives in the state of Rhode Island and
developing a housing plan, including, but not limited to, the development of affordable housing
opportunities to assist in building strong community efforts and revitalizing neighborhoods;
(iii) Coordinate with all agencies directly related to any housing initiatives and participate
in the promulgation of any regulation having an impact on housing including, but not limited to,
the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the coastal resources management
council (CRMC), and state departments including, but not limited to: the department of
environmental management (DEM), the department of business regulation (DBR), the department
of transportation (DOT) and statewide planning, and the Rhode Island housing resources
commission;
(iv) Coordinate with the housing resources commission to formulate an integrated housing
report to include findings and recommendations to the governor, speaker of the house, senate
president, each chamber's finance committee, and any committee whose purview is reasonably
related to, including, but not limited to, issues of housing, municipal government, and health on or
before April 15, 2025, and annually thereafter. This report shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(A) The total number of housing units in the state with per community counts;
(B) Every three (3) years, beginning in 2026 and contingent upon funding for data
collection, an assessment of the suitability of existing housing stock in meeting accessibility needs
of residents;
(C) The occupancy and vacancy rate of the units referenced in subsection (a)(4)(iv)(A);
(D) The change in the number of units referenced in subsection (a)(4)(iv)(A), for each of
the prior three (3) years in figures and as a percentage;
(E) The number of net new units in development and number of units completed in the
previous calendar year;
(F) For each municipality the number of single-family, two-family (2), and three-family
(3) units, and multi-unit housing delineated sufficiently to provide the lay reader a useful
description of current conditions, including a statewide sum of each unit type;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -11-)

(G) Every three (3) years, beginning in 2026, a projection of the number of units required
to meet estimated population growth and based upon household formation rates;
(H) A comparison of regional and other similarly situated state funding sources that support
housing development including a percentage of private, federal, and public support;
(I) A reporting of unit types by number of bedrooms for rental properties including an
accounting of all:
(I) Single-family units;
(II) Accessory dwelling units;
(III) Two-family (2) units;
(IV) Three-family (3) units;
(V) Multi-unit sufficiently delineated units;
(VI) Mixed use sufficiently delineated units; and
(VII) Occupancy and vacancy rates for the prior three (3) years;
(J) A reporting of unit types by ownership including an accounting of all:
(I) Single-family units;
(II) Accessory dwelling units;
(III) Two-family (2) units;
(IV) Three-family (3) units;
(V) Multi-unit sufficiently delineated units;
(VI) Mixed use sufficiently delineated units; and
(VII) Occupancy and vacancy rates for the prior three (3) years;
(K) A reporting of the number of applications submitted or filed for each community
according to unit type and an accounting of action taken with respect to each application to include,
approved, denied, appealed, approved upon appeal, and if approved, the justification for each
appeal approval;
(L) A reporting of permits for each community according to affordability level that were
sought, approved, denied, appealed, approved upon appeal, and if approved, the justification for
each approval;
(M) A reporting of affordability that shall include the following:
(I) The percent and number of units of extremely low-, very low-, low-, moderate-, fair-
market rate, and above moderate-income; including the average and median costs of those units;
(II) The percent and number of units of extremely low-, very low-, low-, and moderate-
income housing units by municipality required to satisfy the ten percent (10%) requirement
pursuant to chapter 24 of title 45; including the average and median costs of those units;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -12-)

(III) The percent and number of units for the affordability levels above moderate-income
housing, including a comparison to fair-market rent; including the average and median costs of
those units;
(IV) The percentage of cost burden by municipality with population equivalent;
(V) The percentage and number of home financing sources, including all private, federal,
state, or other public support;
(VI) The disparities in mortgage loan financing by race and ethnicity based on Home
Mortgage Disclosure Act data by available geographies;
(VII) The annual median gross rent growth for each of the previous five (5) years by
municipality; and
(VIII) The annual growth in median owner-occupied home values for each of the previous
five (5) years by municipality;
(N) A reporting of municipal healthy housing stock by unit type and number of bedrooms
and providing an assessment of the state's existing housing stock and enumerating any risks to the
public health from that housing stock, including, but not limited to: the presence of lead, mold, safe
drinking water, disease vectors (insects and vermin), and other conditions that are an identifiable
health detriment. Additionally, the report shall provide the percentage of the prevalence of health
risks by age of the stock for each community by unit type and number of bedrooms; and
(O) A recommendation shall be included with the report required under this section that
shall provide consideration to any and all populations, ethnicities, income levels, and other relevant
demographic criteria determined by the secretary, and with regard to any and all of the criteria
enumerated elsewhere in the report separately or in combination, provide recommendations to
resolve any issues that provide an impediment to the development of housing, including specific
data and evidence in support of the recommendation. All data and methodologies used to present
evidence are subject to review and approval of the chief of revenue analysis, and that approval shall
include an attestation of approval by the chief to be included in the report;
(P) Municipal governments shall provide the department of housing's requested data
relevant to this report on or before February 15, 2025, and annually thereafter;
(v) Have direct oversight over the office of housing and community development (OHCD);
(vi) On or before November 1, 2022, and on or before December 31, 2024, develop a
housing organizational plan to be provided to the general assembly that includes a review, analysis,
and assessment of functions related to housing of all state departments, quasi-public agencies,
boards, and commissions. Provided, further, the secretary, with the input from each department,
agency, board, and commission, shall include in the plan comprehensive options, including the
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -13-)

advantages and disadvantages of each option and recommendations relating to the functions and
structure of the department of housing, including suggested statutory revisions;
(vii) Establish rules and regulations as set forth in § 45-24-77.
42-64.34-2. Powers and duties.
(a) The department of housing shall be the state's lead agency for housing, homelessness,
and community development in the state of Rhode Island.
(b) The secretary of housing shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) All powers and duties pursuant to this chapter;
(2) To supervise the work of the department of housing and to act as its chief administrative
officer;
(3) To coordinate the administration and financing of various departments or offices within
the department of housing;
(4) To serve as the governor's chief advisor and liaison to federal policymakers on housing,
homelessness, and community development as well as the principal point of contact on any such
related matters;
(5) To coordinate the housing, homelessness, and community development programs of
the state of Rhode Island and its departments, agencies, commissions, corporations, and
subdivisions;
(6) To employ such personnel and contracts for such consulting services as may be required
to perform the powers and duties conferred upon the secretary of housing;
(7) To oversee and direct the administration of funds that may be appropriated from time
to time to the department of housing; and
(8) Creation of a written guide for consumers relating to the rights and duties of landlords
and tenants pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34, which the secretary shall update at minimum on an
biennial basis. The guide shall be posted on the website of the department of housing and shall be
published in both English and Spanish.
(c) In addition to such other powers as may otherwise be delegated elsewhere to the
department of housing, the department is hereby expressly authorized, by and through the secretary
of housing:
(1) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and
otherwise deal in and with, real or personal property, or any interest in real or personal property,
wherever situated;
(2) To accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in
any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government,
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -14-)

or from the state or any agency or instrumentality of the state, or from any other source and to
comply, subject to the provisions of this chapter, with the terms and conditions of the gifts, grants,
or loans;
(3) Subject to the provisions of § 37-2-1 et seq., to negotiate and to enter into contracts,
agreements, and cooperative agreements with agencies and political subdivisions of the state, not-
for-profit corporations, for-profit corporations, and other partnerships, associations, and persons
for any lawful purpose necessary and desirable to effectuate the purposes of the department of
housing; and
(4) To carry out this chapter and perform the duties of the general laws and public laws
insofar as those provisions relate to any regulatory areas within the jurisdiction of the department
of housing.
42-64.34-3. Rules and regulations.
The secretary of housing may promulgate such rules and regulations in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 35 of this title as are necessary and proper to carry out the duties assigned
to the secretary or to the department of housing by this title or any other provision of law.
42-64.34-4. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter; which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 6. Sections 42-128-1, 42-128-2, 42-128-2.1, 42-128-3, 42-128-6, 42-128-7, 42-
128-8.1, 42-128-11, 42-128-13, 42-128-14 and 42-128-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-128
entitled "Rhode Island Housing Resources Act of 1998" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-128-1. Findings.
(a) Rhode Island has an older housing stock that contributes invaluably to community
character, and in order to maintain the stability of neighborhoods and to sustain health communities,
it is necessary to have programs for housing and community development and revitalization.
(b) Rhode Island has an active private sector that is engaged in supplying housing.
(c) Rhode Island has an active nonprofit housing sector, which can, if provided adequate
support, assist low and moderate income persons and works to improve conditions in
neighborhoods and communities.
(d) Housing that is not adequately maintained is a source of blight in communities and a
cause of public health problems. Public health and safety are impaired by poor housing conditions;
poisoning from lead paint and respiratory disease (asthma) are significant housing-related health
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -15-)

problems in Rhode Island.
(e) There is an increasing need for supported living arrangements for the elderly and a
continuing need for supported living arrangements for persons who are disabled and/or homeless.
(f) Fair housing, and the potential of unequal treatment of individuals based on race,
ethnicity, age, disability, and family, must be given continuing attention.
(g) Housing costs consume a disproportionate share of income for many Rhode Islanders;
housing affordability is a continuing problem, especially for first-time home buyers and lower and
moderate income renters; the high cost of housing adversely affects the expansion of Rhode Island's
economy. Housing affordability and availability affect conditions of homelessness. The high cost
of housing and the lack of affordable, decent housing for low income households is a source of
hardship for very low income persons and families in Rhode Island.
(h) The Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, which has provided more
than two decades of assistance in addressing issues of both the affordability of home ownership
and rental housing and the preservation of the housing stock for low and moderate income persons,
is facing future funding shortfalls and must either increase revenues or reduce programs in order to
remain viable.
(i)(h) The federal government has been reducing its commitment to housing since 1981,
and there is no indication that earlier levels of federal support for housing will be restored.
(j)(i) Public housing authorities, which rely on federal support that is being reconsidered,
have been and continue to be an important housing resource for low income families and the
elderly.
(k) Rhode Island, unlike most other states, does not have an agency or department of state
government with comprehensive responsibility for housing.
(l)(j) It is necessary and desirable in order to protect that public health and to promote the
public welfare, to establish a housing resources agency and a housing resources commission an
executive office of housing and an advisory council on housing and homelessness for the purposes
of advising the executive office of housing on improving housing conditions, promoting housing
affordability, engaging in community development activities, preventing and ending homelessness,
and assisting the urban, suburban, and rural communities of the state.
42-128-2. Rhode Island housing resources agency created Rhode Island housing
resources and homelessness restricted receipt account created.
There is created within the executive department a housing resources agency with the
following purposes, organization, and powers:
(1) Purposes.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -16-)

(i) To provide coherence to the housing programs of the state of Rhode Island and its
departments, agencies, commissions, corporations, and subdivisions.
(ii) To provide for the integration and coordination of the activities of the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation and the Rhode Island housing resources commission.
(2) Coordinating committee — Created — Purposes and powers.
(i) The coordinating committee of the housing resources agency shall be comprised of the
chairperson of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation; the chairperson of the
Rhode Island housing resources commission; the director of the department of administration, or
the designee of the director; and the executive director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage
finance corporation. The chairperson of the Rhode Island housing resources commission shall be
chairperson of the coordinating committee.
(ii) The coordinating committee:
(A) Shall develop and implement, with the approval of the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation and the Rhode Island housing resources commission, a memorandum
of agreement describing the fiscal and operational relationship between the Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation and the Rhode Island housing resources commission and shall
define which programs of federal assistance will be applied for on behalf of the state by the Rhode
Island housing and mortgage finance corporation and the Rhode Island housing resources
commission.
(B) Is authorized and empowered to negotiate and to enter into contracts and cooperative
agreements with agencies and political subdivisions of the state, not-for-profit corporations, for-
profit corporations, and other partnerships, associations, and persons for any lawful purpose
necessary and desirable to effect the purposes of this chapter, subject to the provisions of chapter 2
of title 37 as applicable.
(3) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account within the general fund of the
state known as the Housing Resources and Homelessness restricted receipt account. Funds from
this account shall be administered by the department executive office of housing through the
housing resources commission until such time as subsection (4) of this section takes effect and shall
be used to provide for housing and homelessness initiatives including housing production, lead
hazard abatement, housing rental subsidy, housing retention assistance, and homelessness services
and prevention assistance with priority to veterans. The executive office of housing will consider
input from the advisory council on housing and homelessness on the use of the restricted receipt
funds.
(4) Effective December 31, 2024, or after fulfillment of the reporting requirements
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -17-)

established under § 42-64.34-1(vi), whichever is later, the restricted receipt account established
under subsection (3) of this section shall be administered by the department of housing in
consultation with the housing resources commission. Funds in this account will be used in
accordance with the uses established in subsection (3) of this section.
42-128-2.1. Housing Production Fund.
(a) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account within the general fund of the
state, to be known as the housing production fund. Funds from this account shall be administered
by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, subject to executive office of
housing. The executive office of housing will adopt program and reporting guidelines, and consider
the input of the advisory council on housing and homelessness, adopted by the coordinating
committee of the Rhode Island housing resources commission for housing production initiatives,
including:
(1) Financial assistance by loan, grant, or otherwise, for the planning, production, or
preservation of affordable housing in Rhode Island for households earning not more than eighty
percent (80%) of area median income; and
(2) Technical and financial assistance for cities and towns to support increased local
housing production, including by reducing regulatory barriers and through the housing incentives
for municipalities program.
(b) In administering the housing production fund, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage
finance corporation executive office of housing shall give priority to households either exiting
homelessness or earning not more than thirty percent (30%) of area median income.
42-128-3. Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation.
The Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation established by chapter 55 of
this title shall remain an independent corporation and shall serve as the housing finance and
development division of the Rhode Island housing resources agency entity for the state.
42-128-6. Commission — Membership and terms — Officers — Expenses —
Meetings Rhode Island advisory council on housing and homelessness -- Membership and
terms -- Officers -- Meetings.
(a) There hereby is created the advisory council on housing and homelessness which shall
have the powers and duties set forth in this chapter.
(a)(1)(b) Membership. The commission advisory council on housing and homelessness
shall have twenty-eight (28) up to twenty (20) members as follows: the directors of the departments
of administration, business regulation, healthy aging, health, human services, behavioral
healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the chairperson of the Rhode Island housing
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -18-)

and mortgage finance corporation, and the attorney general, shall be ex officio members; the
president of the Rhode Island Bankers Association, or the designee of the president; the president
of the Rhode Island Mortgage Banker's Association, or the designee of the president; the president
of the Rhode Island Realtors Association, or the designee of the president; the executive director
of the Rhode Island Housing Network; the executive director of the Rhode Island Coalition for the
Homeless; the president of the Rhode Island Association of Executive Directors for Housing, or
the designee of the president; the executive director of operation stand down; and thirteen (13)
members appointed by the governor who have knowledge of, and have a demonstrated interest in,
housing issues as they affect low- and moderate-income people, appointed by the governor with
the advice and consent of the senate: one of whom shall be the chairperson, one of whom shall be
the representative of the homeless; one of whom shall be a representative of a community
development corporation; one of whom shall be the representative of an agency addressing lead
poisoning issues; one of whom shall be a local planner; one of whom shall be a local building
official; one of whom shall be a representative of fair housing interests; one of whom shall be
representative of an agency advocating the interest of racial minorities; one of whom shall be a
representative of the Rhode Island Builders Association; one of whom shall be a representative of
a Rhode Island city or town with a population below twenty-five thousand (25,000) people
according to data from the United States Census Bureau; one of whom shall be a representative of
a community development intermediary that provides financing and technical assistance to housing
nonprofits; one of whom shall be a nonprofit developer; and one of whom shall be a senior housing
advocate and people experiencing homelessness. The members will collectively represent a broad
and diverse range of perspectives including, but not limited to, people with lived experience of
homelessness, tenants, landlords, nonprofit developers, for-profit developers, homelessness
services providers, public housing authorities, representatives of municipalities, builders, building
officials, fair housing interests, and community development intermediaries.
(2)(1) The terms of appointed members shall be three (3) years, except for the original
appointments, the term of four (4) of whom shall be one year and the term of four (4) of whom
shall be two (2) years; no. No member may serve more than two (2) successive terms.
(b)(c) Officers. The governor shall appoint the chairperson of the commission, who shall
not be an ex officio member, with the advice and consent of the senate council. The commission
council shall elect annually a vice-chairperson, who shall be empowered to preside at meetings in
the absence of the chairperson, and a secretary.
(c)(d) Expenses. The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for their reasonable actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -19-)

their duties.
(d)(e) Meetings. Meetings of the commission council shall be held upon the call of the
chairperson, or five (5) members of the commission, or according to a schedule that may be
annually established by the commission; provided, however, that the commission shall meet at least
once quarterly at least quarterly, or more frequently upon the request of the secretary of housing.
A majority of members of the commission council, not including vacancies, shall constitute a
quorum, and no vacancy in the membership of the commission council shall impair the right of a
quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all of the duties of the commission council.
42-128-7. General powers Powers and duties of the advisory council on housing and
homelessness.
The commission shall have the following powers, together with all powers incidental to or
necessary for the performance of those set forth in this chapter:
(1) To sue and be sued.
(2) To negotiate and to enter into contracts, agreements, and cooperative agreements with
agencies and political subdivisions of the state, not-for-profit corporations, for-profit corporations,
and other partnerships, associations, and persons for any lawful purpose necessary and desirable to
effect the purposes of this chapter.
(3) To adopt bylaws and rules for the management of its affairs and for the exercise of its
powers and duties, and to establish the committees, workgroups, and advisory bodies that from
time to time may be deemed necessary.
(4) To receive and accept grants or loans as may be made by the federal government, and
grants, donations, contributions, and payments from other public and private sources.
(5) To grant or loan funds to agencies and political subdivisions of the state or to private
groups to effect the purposes of this chapter; provided that, in each funding round, there must be a
material award that benefits a Rhode Island city or town with a population below twenty-five
thousand (25,000) people according to data from the United States Census Bureau.
(6) To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies,
and of the agencies and political subdivisions of this state in the work of the commission.
(7) To establish, charge, and collect fees and payments for its services.
(a) The advisory council on housing and homelessness shall have the power and duty:
(1) To consider and make recommendations on all matters submitted to the council by the
executive office of housing, the interagency council on housing production and preservation, or the
interagency council on homelessness.
(2) To advise and make recommendations to the executive office of housing on the
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -20-)

preparation and promulgation of guidelines, rules and regulations.
(3) To advise on the development of state housing and homelessness strategic plans and
review updates on progress in achieving the goals of the strategic plans.
(4) To assemble subcommittees or task forces, at the request of the secretary of the
executive office of housing, to review emerging or priority needs and make relevant
recommendations to the executive office of housing, the interagency council on housing production
and preservation, or the interagency council on homelessness.
42-128-8.1. Housing production and rehabilitation.
(a) Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Comprehensive
Housing Production and Rehabilitation Act of 2004."
(b) Findings. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The state must maintain a comprehensive housing strategy applicable to all cities and
towns that addresses the housing needs of different populations including, but not limited to,
workers and their families who earn less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of median
income, older citizens, students attending institutions of higher education, low- and very-low
income individuals and families, and vulnerable populations including, but not limited to, persons
with disabilities, homeless individuals and families, and individuals released from correctional
institutions.
(2) Efforts and programs to increase the production of housing must be sensitive to the
distinctive characteristics of cities and towns, neighborhoods, and areas and the need to manage
growth and to pace and phase development, especially in high-growth areas.
(3) The state in partnership with local communities must remove barriers to housing
development and update and maintain zoning and building regulations to facilitate the construction,
rehabilitation of properties and retrofitting of buildings for use as safe affordable housing.
(4) Creative funding mechanisms are needed at the local and state levels that provide
additional resources for housing development, because there is an inadequate amount of federal
and state subsidies to support the affordable housing needs of Rhode Island's current and projected
population.
(5) Innovative community planning tools, including, but not limited to, density bonuses
and permitted accessory dwelling units, are needed to offset escalating land costs and project
financing costs that contribute to the overall cost of housing and tend to restrict the development
and preservation of housing affordable to very-low income, low-income, and moderate-income
persons.
(6) The gap between the annual increase in personal income and the annual increase in the
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -21-)

median sales price of a single-family home is growing, therefore, the construction, rehabilitation
and maintenance of affordable, multi-family housing needs to increase to provide more rental
housing options to individuals and families, especially those who are unable to afford
homeownership of a single-family home.
(7) The state needs to foster the formation of cooperative partnerships between
communities and institutions of higher education to significantly increase the amount of residential
housing options for students.
(8) The production of housing for older citizens as well as urban populations must keep
pace with the next twenty-year (20) projected increases in those populations of the state.
(9) Efforts must be made to balance the needs of Rhode Island residents with the ability of
the residents of surrounding states to enter into Rhode Island's housing market with much higher
annual incomes at their disposal.
(c) Strategic plan. The commission executive office of housing, in conjunction with the
statewide planning program, shall develop by July 1, 2006 every five (5) years, a five-year (5)
strategic plan for housing, which plan shall be adopted as an element of the state guide plan, and
which shall include quantified goals, measurable intermediate steps toward the accomplishment of
the goals, implementation activities, and standards for the production and/or rehabilitation of year-
round housing to meet the housing needs including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Older Rhode Islanders, including senior citizens, appropriate, affordable housing
options;
(2) Workers, housing affordable at their income level;
(3) Students, dormitory, student housing and other residential options;
(4) Low-income and very-low income households, rental housing;
(5) Persons with disabilities, appropriate housing; and
(6) Vulnerable individuals and families, permanent housing, single-room occupancy units,
transitional housing and shelters.
(d) As used in this section and for the purposes of the preparation of affordable housing
plans as specified in chapter 22.2 of title 45, words and terms shall have the meaning set forth in
chapter 22.2 of title 45, chapter 53 of title 45, and/or § 42-11-10, unless this section provides a
different meaning or unless the context indicates a different meaning or intent.
(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that has a sales price or rental amount
that is within the means of a household that is of moderate income or less. In the case of dwelling
units for sale, housing that is affordable means housing in which principal, interest, taxes, which
may be adjusted by state and local programs for property tax relief, and insurance constitute no
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -22-)

more than thirty percent (30%) of the gross household income for a household with less than one
hundred and twenty percent (120%) of area median income, adjusted for family size. Provided,
however, that exclusively for the residents of New Shoreham, their affordable housing eligibility
standards shall include households whose adjusted gross income is less than one hundred forty
percent (140%) of their residents' median income, adjusted for family size. In the case of dwelling
units for rent, housing that is affordable means housing for which the rent, heat, and utilities other
than telephone constitute no more than thirty percent (30%) of the gross annual household income
for a household with eighty percent (80%) or less of area median income, adjusted for family size.
(i) Affordable housing shall include all types of year-round housing, including, but not
limited to: manufactured housing; housing originally constructed for workers and their families;
accessory dwelling units; housing accepting utilizing rental vouchers and/or tenant-based
certificates under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended; and assisted
living housing, where the sales or rental amount of such housing, adjusted for any federal, state, or
municipal government subsidy, is less than or equal to thirty percent (30%) of the gross household
income of the low and/or moderate income occupants of the housing.
(ii) Mobile and manufactured homes shall be included as affordable housing if such home
constitutes a primary residence of the occupant or occupants; and such home is located within a
community owned by the residents or the land containing the home is owned by the occupant or
occupants; and such home was constructed after June 15, 1976; and such home complies with the
Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards of the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(iii) In that New Shoreham has reached its ten percent (10%) low- and moderate-income
housing goal, and for so long as they maintain at least ten percent (10%) of their year-round housing
stock as low- and moderate-income housing as defined in § 45-53-3(5)(ii), and inasmuch as there
are provable economic impacts related to the municipalities' substantial offshore location,
residential housing units produced for sale in which principal, interest, taxes, which may be
adjusted by state and local programs for property tax relief, and insurance constitute no more than
thirty percent (30%) of the gross household income for a household with less than one hundred
forty percent (140%) of the area median income, adjusted for family size, shall be counted towards
the municipalities' low- and moderate-income housing inventory as defined in § 45-53-3(9).
(2) "Affordable housing plan" means a plan prepared and adopted by a town or city either
to meet the requirements of chapter 53 of title 45 or to meet the requirements of § 45-22.2-10(f),
which require that comprehensive plans and the elements thereof be revised to conform with
amendments to the state guide plan.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -23-)

(3) "Approved affordable housing plan" means an affordable housing plan that has been
reviewed and approved in accordance with § 45-22.2-9.
(4) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together whose adjusted gross income is more than eighty percent (80%) but less than one
hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area median income, adjusted for family size.
(5) "Seasonal housing" means housing that is intended to be occupied during limited
portions of the year.
(6) "Year-round housing" means housing that is intended to be occupied by people as their
usual residence and/or vacant units that are intended by their owner for occupancy at all times of
the year; occupied rooms or suites of rooms in hotels are year-round housing only when occupied
by permanent residents as their usual place of residence.
(e) The strategic plan shall be updated and/or amended as necessary, but not less than once
every five (5) years.
(f) Upon the adoption of the strategic plan as an element of the state guide plan, towns and
cities shall bring their comprehensive plans into conformity with its requirements, in accordance
with the timetable set forth in § 45-22.2-10(f); provided, however, that any town that has adopted
an affordable housing plan in order to comply with the provisions of chapter 53 of title 45, which
has been approved for consistency pursuant to § 45-22.2-9, shall be deemed to satisfy the
requirements of the strategic plan for low- and moderate-income housing until such time as the
town must complete its next required comprehensive community plan update.
(g) Guidelines. The commission executive office of housing shall advise the state planning
council and the state planning council, with the approval of the secretary of housing, shall
promulgate and adopt not later no less than July 1, 2006 every five (5) years, guidelines for higher
density development, including, but not limited to: (1) Inclusionary zoning provisions for low- and
moderate-income housing with appropriate density bonuses and other subsidies that make the
development financially feasible; and (2) Mixed-use development that includes residential
development, which guidelines shall take into account infrastructure availability; soil type and land
capacity; environmental protection; water supply protection; and agricultural, open space, historical
preservation, and community development pattern constraints.
(h) The statewide planning program shall maintain a geographic information system map
that identifies, to the extent feasible, areas throughout the state suitable for higher density
residential development consistent with the guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (g).
42-128-11. Executive director — Employees Administrative support.
The governor shall appoint from qualified candidates, with the advice of the coordinating
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -24-)

committee, an executive director, who shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 4 of title 36,
and who shall serve as the state housing commissioner and may also serve in the executive office
of commerce as the deputy secretary of housing. The commission shall also cause to be employed
staff and technical and professional consultants as may be required to carry out the powers and
duties set forth in this chapter. All staff, including the executive director, may be secured through
a memorandum of agreement with the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, or
any other agency or political subdivision of the state with the approval of the relevant agency or
political subdivision, as provided for in § 42-128-2(2)(ii). Any person who is in the civil service
and is transferred to the commission may retain civil service status executive office of housing shall
provide administrative support and staffing for the advisory council on housing and homelessness
to carry out its responsibilities.
42-128-13. Open meetings law.
The housing resources agency, the coordinating committee, and the housing resources
commission advisory council on housing and homelessness and any committee, council, or
advisory body created by the commission council shall conform to the provisions of chapter 46 of
this title.
42-128-14. Public records law.
The housing resources agency, the coordinating committee, and the housing resources
commission advisory council on housing homelessness and any committee, council, or advisory
body created by the commission council shall conform to the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38.
42-128-17. Severability and liberal construction.
If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the
chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable. The provisions of this chapter shall be
construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes of the chapter, and where any specific power
is given to the commission executive office of housing or the advisory council on housing and
homelessness, the statement shall not be deemed to exclude or impair any power otherwise in this
chapter conferred upon the commission executive office of housing or the advisory council on
housing and homelessness.
SECTION 7. Sections 42-128-4, 42-128-5, 42-128-8, 42-128-9, 42-128-10, 42-128-12, 42-
128-15 and 42-128-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-128 entitled "Rhode Island Housing
Resources Act of 1998" are hereby repealed.
42-128-4. Rhode Island housing resources commission.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -25-)

The Rhode Island housing resources commission shall be an agency within the executive
department with responsibility for developing plans, policies, standards, and programs and
providing technical assistance for housing.
42-128-5. Purposes.
The purposes of the commission shall be:
(1) To develop and promulgate state policies, and plans, for housing and housing
production and performance measures for housing programs established pursuant to state law.
(2) To coordinate activities among state agencies and political subdivisions pertaining to
housing.
(3) To promote the stability of and quality of life in communities and neighborhoods.
(4) To provide opportunities for safe, sanitary, decent, adequate, and affordable housing in
Rhode Island.
(5) To encourage public-private partnerships that foster the production, rehabilitation,
development, maintenance, and improvement of housing and housing conditions, especially for
low and moderate income people.
(6) To foster and support nonprofit organizations, including community development
corporations, and their associations and intermediaries, that are engaged in providing housing-
related services.
(7) To encourage and support partnerships between institutions of higher education and
neighborhoods to develop and retain quality, healthy housing and sustainable communities.
(8) To facilitate private for-profit production and rehabilitation of housing for diverse
populations and income groups.
(9) To provide, facilitate, and/or support the provisions of technical assistance.
42-128-8. Powers and duties.
In order to provide housing opportunities for all Rhode Islanders, to maintain the quality
of housing in Rhode Island, and to coordinate and make effective the housing responsibilities of
the agencies and subdivisions of the state, the commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Policy, planning, and coordination of state housing functions. The commission shall
have the power and duty:
(i) To prepare and adopt the state's plans for housing; provided, however, that this provision
shall not be interpreted to contravene the prerogative of the state planning council to adopt a state
guide plan for housing.
(ii) To prepare, adopt, and issue the state's housing policy.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -26-)

(iii) To conduct research on and make reports regarding housing issues in the state.
(iv) To advise the governor and general assembly on housing issues and to coordinate
housing activities among government agencies and agencies created by state law or providing
housing services under government programs.
(2) Establish, implement, and monitor state performance measures and guidelines for
housing programs. The commission shall have the power and the duty:
(i) To promulgate performance measures and guidelines for housing programs conducted
under state law.
(ii) To monitor and evaluate housing responsibilities established by state law, and to
establish a process for annual reporting on the outcomes of the programs and investments of the
state in housing for low- and moderate-income people.
(iii) To hear and resolve disputes pertaining to housing issues.
(3) Administer the programs pertaining to housing resources that may be assigned by state
law. The commission shall have the power and duty to administer programs for housing, housing
services, and community development, including, but not limited to, programs pertaining to:
(i) Abandoned properties and the remediation of blighting conditions.
(ii) Lead abatement and to manage a lead hazard abatement program in cooperation with
the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation.
(iii) Services for the homeless.
(iv) Rental assistance.
(v) Community development.
(vi) Outreach, education and technical assistance services.
(vii) Assistance, including financial support, to nonprofit organizations and community
development corporations.
(viii) Tax credits that assist in the provision of housing or foster community development
or that result in support to nonprofit organizations performing functions to accomplish the purposes
of this chapter.
(ix) The Supportive Services Program, the purpose of which is to help prevent and end
homelessness among those who have experienced long-term homelessness and for whom certain
services in addition to housing are essential. State funding for this program may leverage other
resources for the purpose of providing supportive services. Services provided pursuant to this
subsection may include, but not be limited to: assistance with budgeting and paying rent; access to
employment; encouraging tenant involvement in facility management and policies; medication
monitoring and management; daily living skills related to food, housekeeping, and socialization;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -27-)

counseling to support self-identified goals; referrals to mainstream health, mental health, and
treatment programs; and conflict resolution.
In the administration of the programs in this subsection, the commission shall award, in
each funding round, a material award that benefits a Rhode Island city or town with a population
below twenty-five thousand (25,000) people according to data from the United States Census
Bureau.
42-128-9. Offices within the commission.
There shall be, as a minimum, the following offices within the commission: the office of
policy and planning, the office of housing program performance and evaluation, the office of
homelessness services and emergency assistance, and the office of community development,
programs and technical assistance. The commission may establish by rule such other offices,
operating entities, and committees as it may deem appropriate.
42-128-10. Appropriations.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums it may deem necessary to enable
the commission to carry out its assigned purposes; and the state controller is authorized and directed
to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sums appropriated or so
much as may be from time to time required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved
by the chairperson or the executive director.
42-128-12. Coordination with other state agencies.
State agencies, departments, authorities, corporations, boards, commissions, and political
subdivisions shall cooperate with the commission in the conduct of its activities, and specifically:
the Rhode Island historical preservation and heritage commission shall advise the commission on
issues of historical preservation standards as they pertain to housing and the use of historical
preservation programs to improve housing and to enhance community character; the statewide
planning program, created pursuant to § 42-11-10, shall advise the commission on issues of
planning in general and land use controls and shall revise the state guide plan, as necessary, to
achieve consistency with official state plans and policies for housing adopted by the commission,
and the department of business regulation shall advise the commission on issues of business
regulation affecting housing, shall review its regulations and practices to determine any
amendments, changes, or additions that might be appropriate to advance the purposes of this
chapter, and shall designate an official within the department to serve as liaison to, and the contact
person for, the commission on issues related to housing.
42-128-15. Administrative procedures act.
The commission may adopt any rules, including measurable standards, in accordance with
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -28-)

the provisions of chapter 35 of this title that may be necessary to the purposes of this chapter.
42-128-16. Annual report.
The commission shall submit for each calendar year by March 1 of the next year a report
to the governor and the general assembly on its activities and its findings and recommendations
regarding housing issues, which report by census tract, shall include the number and dollar amount
of its programs and an assessment of health-related housing issues, including the incidence of lead
poisoning.
SECTION 8. Sections 42-128.1-4, 42-128.1-5, 42-128.1-6, 42-128.1-7, 42-128.1-8, 42-
128.1-9 and 42-128.1-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-128.1 entitled "Lead Hazard
Mitigation" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-128.1-4. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in the interpretation and enforcement of this chapter:
(1) "At-risk occupant" means a person under six (6) years of age, or a pregnant woman,
who has been a legal inhabitant in a dwelling unit for at least thirty (30) days; provided, however,
that a guest of any age shall not be considered an occupant for the purposes of this chapter.
(2) "Designated person" means either: (i) A property owner, or the agent of the property
owner, who has completed a housing resources commission department of health approved
awareness seminar on lead hazards and their control; or (ii) A person trained and certified as either
a lead hazard mitigation inspector, an environmental lead inspector, or a lead hazard inspection
technician.
(3) "Dwelling" or "dwelling unit" means an enclosed space used for living and sleeping by
human occupants as a place of residence, including, but not limited to: a house, an apartment, or
condominium, but, for the purpose of this chapter, shall not include hotels or "temporary housing."
(4) "Elderly housing" means a federal, state, or local program that is specifically designed
and operated to assist elderly persons, sixty-two (62) years of age, or older, as set forth in a
regulatory agreement or zoning ordinance.
(5) "Environmental lead-poisoning level" means a confirmed, venous blood lead level as
defined pursuant to § 23-24.6-4.
(6) "Lead abated" means a dwelling and premises that are lead free or lead safe, as those
terms are defined in chapter 24.6 of title 23.
(7) "Lead free" means that a dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises contains no lead, or
contains lead in amounts less than the maximum-acceptable environmental lead levels established
by regulation by the Rhode Island department of health.
(8) "Lead hazard mitigation compliance" means an independent clearance inspection and
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -29-)

certificate, as specified in this subsection (8), undertaken to determine whether the lead hazard
mitigation measures have been completed. Said inspection shall be valid for two (2) years, or until
the next turnover of the dwelling unit, whichever period is longer. The requirements for a clearance
review inspection shall be met either by an independent clearance inspection or a visual inspection
as set forth in this subsection (8):
(i) An "independent clearance inspection" means an inspection performed by a person who
is not the property owner or an employee of the property owner and who is authorized by the
housing resources commission department of health to conduct independent clearance inspections,
which shall include: (A) A visual inspection to determine that the lead hazard controls have been
met, and (B) Dust testing in accordance with rules established by the department of health and
consistent with federal standards. A certificate of conformance shall be issued by the person who
conducted the inspection on the passage of the visual inspection and the required dust testing. An
independent clearance inspection shall be required at unit turnover or once in a twenty-four-month
(24) period, whichever period is the longer. If the tenancy of an occupant is two (2) years or greater,
the certificate of conformance shall be maintained by a visual inspection as set forth in subsection
(8)(ii) of this section.
(ii) A "visual inspection" means a visual inspection by a property owner or designated
person to determine that the lead hazard controls have been met. If the designated person concluded
that the lead hazard controls specified in this chapter have been met, the designated person may
complete an Affidavit of Completion of Visual Inspection. The affidavit shall be valid upon its
being notarized within thirty (30) days after the completion of the visual inspection and shall set
forth:
(A) The date and location that the designated person took the lead-hazard-control
awareness seminar;
(B) The date and findings of the lead hazard evaluation;
(C) The date and description of the lead hazard control measures undertaken;
(D) The date of the visual inspection; and
(E) The name and signature of the designated person and date of the Affidavit of
Completion of Visual Inspection.
An Affidavit of Completion of Visual Inspection shall be valid for two (2) years after the
date it was notarized, or until unit turnover, whichever time period is the longer, and shall be kept
by the property owner for a minimum of five (5) years.
(iii) Presumptive compliance. A property owner of ten (10) or more dwelling units shall be
eligible to obtain a certificate of presumptive compliance from the housing resources commission
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -30-)

department of health provided that the following conditions are met: (A) The dwelling units were
constructed after 1960 or after 1950 on federally owned or leased lands; (B) There are no major,
outstanding minimum-housing violations on the premises; (C) The property owner has no history
of repeated lead poisonings; and (D) Independent clearance inspections have been conducted on at
least five percent (5%) of the dwelling units, not less than two (2) dwelling units and at least ninety
percent (90%) of the independent clearance inspections were passed. "Repeated lead poisoning,"
for purposes of this paragraph, shall mean a lead poisoning rate of less than one-half percent (.5%)
per dwelling-unit year, with dwelling-unit years being calculated by multiplying the number of
dwelling units owned by the property owner by the number of years of ownership since 1992. Major
minimum housing violations shall be defined by rule by the housing resources commission
department of health. The housing resources commission department of health shall not arbitrarily
withhold its approval of applications for presumptive compliance. A certificate of presumptive
compliance shall be deemed to be satisfactory for purposes of demonstrating compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. If a unit qualifies for a presumptive compliance certificate, by itself
having passed an independent clearance inspection at least once, that unit's compliance may be
maintained by a visual inspection as set forth in this chapter.
(9) "Lead hazard mitigation inspector" means either a person approved by the housing
resources commission department of health to perform independent clearance inspections under
this chapter or inspections required by 24 C.F.R., Part 35, Subpart M [24 C.F.R. § 35.1200 et seq.],
or approved by the department of health to conduct inspections pursuant to chapter 24.6 of title 23.
Lead hazard mitigation inspectors performing independent clearance inspections shall not
have any interest, financial or otherwise, direct or indirect, or engage in any business or
employment with regards to:
(i) The dwelling unit that is the subject of an independent clearance inspection; or
(ii) The contractor performing lead hazard control work in the dwelling unit; or
(iii) The laboratory that is used to analyze environmental lead samples for the independent
clearance inspection unless the lead hazard mitigation inspector discloses the inspector's
relationship with the laboratory to the person requesting the inspection and on the inspection report.
Employees of public agencies and quasi-public agencies that hold a financial interest in the
property may perform independent clearance inspections.
(10) "Lead hazard mitigation standards" means standards adopted by the housing resources
commission department of health for a dwelling unit and associated common areas that provide
for:
(i) A continuing and ongoing responsibility for lead hazard control that includes: (A)
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -31-)

Repair of deteriorated paint; (B) Correction of dust-generating conditions, such as friction or impact
areas; (C) Provision of cleanable surfaces to eliminate harmful dust loading; (D) Correction of soil
lead hazards; (E) Safe work practices;
(ii) At unit turnover: (A) The provision of information on lead hazards and their avoidance
and control to tenants; (B) Documentation of lead hazard mitigation compliance; (C) An explicit
process for notification by tenants to property owners of instances of deterioration in conditions
effecting lead hazards; and
(iii) Maintenance of "lead hazard control." "Lead hazard control" means those portions of
the lead hazard mitigation standard pertaining to repair of deteriorating paint; correction of dust-
generating conditions; provision of cleanable surfaces; and correction of soil lead hazards that can
be identified by visual inspection as provided for in subsection (8)(ii) or through inspections
conducted in accordance with chapter 24.2 of title 45, "Minimum Housing Standards," and chapter
24.3 of title 45, "Housing Maintenance and Occupancy Code."
(11) "Lead poisoned" means a confirmed venous blood lead level established by the
department of health pursuant to § 23-24.6-4(3).
(12) "Lead safe" means that a dwelling, dwelling unit, or premises has undergone
sufficient, lead-hazard reduction to ensure that no significant, environment lead hazard is present
and includes, but is not limited to, covering and encapsulation and is evidenced by a lead-safe
certificate issued by the department of health.
(13) "Property owner" means any person who, alone or jointly or severally with others:
(i) Shall have legal title to any dwelling, dwelling unit, or structure, with or without
accompanying actual possession of it; or
(ii) Shall have charge, care, or control of any dwelling, dwelling unit, or structure as owner
or agent of the owner, or an executor, administrator, trustee, or guardian of the estate of the owner.
Any person representing the actual owner shall be bound to comply with the provisions of this
chapter, and of rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, to the same extent as if that
person were the owner.
(iii) Notwithstanding the foregoing, no holder of a mortgage or other lien holder who, in
enforcing a security interest, acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure shall be
considered a property owner for purposes of this chapter, if the holder transfers the title within one
year after the date the title is acquired; provided, however, if the mortgagee or lien holder,
subsequent to acquiring title, is notified of a lead hazard under chapter 24.6 of title 23 or § 42-
128.1-8(a)(5), then and in that event, the mortgagee or lien holder shall take any steps to reduce the
lead hazard that shall be required under the provisions of chapter 24.6 of title 23 or this chapter, as
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -32-)

applicable.
(14) "Temporary housing" means any seasonal place of residence that is rented for no more
than one hundred (100) days per calendar year to the same tenant, where no lease renewal or
extension can occur, and any emergency shelter intended for night-to-night accommodation.
(15) "Tenant turnover" means the time at which all existing occupants vacate a unit and all
new occupants move into the unit.
42-128.1-5. Housing resources commission — Powers and duties with respect to lead
hazard mitigation Department of health -- Powers and duties with respect to lead hazard
mitigation.
(a) General powers and duties. The housing resources commission department of health
shall implement and put into full force and effect the powers, duties, and responsibilities assigned
to it by this chapter, and shall serve as the lead state agency for lead hazard mitigation, planning,
education, technical assistance, and coordination of state projects and state financial assistance to
property owners for lead hazard mitigation.
(b) Regulatory guidelines. In developing and promulgating rules and regulations as
provided for in this chapter, the housing resources commission department of health shall consider,
among other things: (1) the effect on efforts to reduce the incidence of lead poisoning, (2) the ease
and cost of implementation, (3) the impact on the ability to conduct real estate transactions fairly
and expeditiously, (4) consistency with federal standards, such that the differences between basic
federal standards and Rhode Island standards for lead hazard mitigation are, to the extent
practicable, minimized, and (5) the direction of effort to locations and housing types, which due to
age, condition, and prior history of lead poisoning are more likely to be the location of lead
poisoning. Said regulations shall include a definition of "turnover" of a dwelling unit and a means
for tenants to voluntarily notify property owners of the legal tenancy of an "at-risk" occupant.
(c) Comprehensive strategic plan. In order to establish clear goals for increasing the
availability of housing in which lead hazards have been mitigated, to provide performance
measures by which to assess progress toward achieving the purposes of this chapter, and to facilitate
coordination among state agencies and political subdivisions with responsibilities for housing and
housing quality for lead poisoning reduction and for the availability of insurance coverage
described in this chapter, the housing resources commission established by chapter 128 of this title
shall adopt by April 1, 2003, a four-year (4), comprehensive strategic plan for reducing the
incidence of childhood lead poisoning, for increasing the supply of lead-safe housing, and for
assuring that pre-1978 in rental housing throughout the state lead hazards have been mitigated.
Effective July 1, 2025, the department of health will assume responsibility for the comprehensive
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -33-)

strategic plan.
(1) Plan elements. The plan as a minimum shall include elements pertaining to:
(i) Educating people with regard to lead hazards and how they can be avoided, mitigated,
and/or abated;
(ii) Programs to assist low and moderate income owners of property to eliminate lead
hazards and to achieve lead-safe conditions;
(iii) Coordination of the enforcement of laws pertaining to lead hazard control, mitigation,
and abatement including the Lead Poisoning Prevention Act, chapter 24.6 of title 23, and minimum
housing codes and standards;
(iv) Coordination of efforts with local governments and other agencies to improve housing
conditions;
(v) Financing lead abatement efforts in Rhode Island, including, but not limited to,
assistance to low and moderate income property owners, education and outreach, and enforcement
by state and local officials;
(vi) An assessment of the availability of insurance for lead hazard liability, which shall be
designed and implemented in cooperation with the department of business regulation.
(2) Implementation program. The comprehensive strategic plan shall include an
implementation program, which shall include performance measurers and a program of specific
activities that are proposed to be undertaken to accomplish the purposes of this chapter and to
achieve goals and elements set forth by the plan. The implementation program shall be updated
annually according to a schedule set forth in the plan.
(3) Reporting. The commission department of health shall report annually to the governor
and the general assembly, no later than March of each year, on the progress made in achieving the
goals and objectives set forth in the plan, which report may be integrated with or issued in
conjunction with the report of the council on environmental lead submitted pursuant to § 23-24.6-
6.
42-128.1-6. Education.
(a) In order to achieve the purposes of this chapter, a statewide, multifaceted, ongoing
educational program designed to meet the needs of tenants, property owners, realtors and real estate
agents, insurers and insurance agents, local building officials, and health providers and caregivers
is hereby established.
(b) The governor, in conjunction with the department of health and the housing resources
commission, shall sponsor a series of public service announcements on radio, television, and print
media about the nature of lead hazards, the importance of lead hazard control and mitigation, and
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -34-)

the purposes and responsibilities set forth in this chapter. In developing and coordinating this public
information initiative the sponsors shall seek the participation and involvement of private industry
organizations, including those involved in real estate, insurance, mortgage banking, and pediatrics.
(c) Within sixty (60) days after the regulations set forth in § 42-128.1-7 for lead hazard
control and mitigation go into effect, the housing resources commission in conjunction with the
The department of health shall:
(1) Create culturally and linguistically appropriate material outlining the rights and
responsibilities of parties affected by this chapter;
(2) Establish guidelines and a trainer's manual for a not more than three (3) hours lead
hazard control awareness seminar for rental property owners or designated persons, which shall be
forwarded to all public and private colleges and universities in Rhode Island, to other professional
training facilities, and to professional associations and community organizations with a training
capacity, with the stipulation this seminar be offered for a maximum fee of fifty dollars ($50.00)
per participant. The housing resources commission department of health shall approve the
proposals to offer the seminar from institutions, provided those proposals are consistent with the
guidelines. An electronic version of this awareness seminar shall be created and approved by the
housing resources commission department of health for computer internet access. Said awareness
seminar shall also be produced and made available in both VHS and DVD format for rental or
purchase at a reasonable cost not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) for the rental version and fifteen
dollars ($15.00) for the purchased version. Said seminar shall be available to tenants, property
owners, and other interested parties.
(3) Adopt rules for the dissemination of information about the requirements of this chapter
to all prospective owners of pre-1978 dwellings during the real estate transaction, settlement, or
closing;
(4) Solicit requests, to the extent that these partnerships are not already established, to enter
into ongoing, funded partnerships, to provide specific counseling information services to tenants
and affected parties on their rights and responsibilities with regard to lead hazards and lead
poisoning.
(d) The department of business regulation shall, with regard to its responsibilities for the
profession of real estate brokers and salespersons, adopt rules, with the concurrence of the housing
resources commission and the department of health which shall be effective not later than June 30,
2004: (1) requiring proof of reasonable familiarity with the knowledge of duties and responsibilities
under the provisions of the Lead Poisoning Prevention Act, chapter 24.6 of title 23, and this chapter,
for the licensure or renewal of licenses of real estate brokers and salespersons in accordance with
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -35-)

§ 5-20.5-6 after July 1, 2004; and (2) providing, pursuant to § 5-20.5-18, an educational program
for real estate brokers and salespersons regarding such duties and responsibilities.
(e) The housing resources commission, in conjunction with the department of health,
department of health is hereby authorized to develop, offer, engage in, contract for, and/or provide
any other educational or informational programs that they may deem necessary to accomplish the
purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to: programs to assist families to find housing
that is lead free, lead safe, or lead hazard mitigated or abated; and to train lead hazard mitigation
inspectors and local building officials and persons engaged in renovating and/or improving housing
about controlling or mitigating lead hazards in pre-1978 housing. Said programs shall provide
information about lead hazard mitigation requirements at retail hardware and paint stores and
home-improvement centers, including, as a minimum, signs of sufficient size with large enough
lettering to be easily seen and read, which contains the following language:
WARNING
Use of abrasive material (sandpaper, steel wool, drill disks and pads, etc.) in your home to
remove paint may increase the risk of childhood lead poisoning. For more information please
contact the Rhode Island housing resources commission or department of health.
42-128.1-7. Lead hazard mitigation rules.
The housing resources commission shall adopt, no later than April 1, 2003, rules:
(1) For housing constructed prior to 1978, which require property owners to certify at the
time of transfer that the dwelling and/or premises meet the requirements for lead hazard mitigation
or lead hazard abatement, or that the party or parties acquiring the property are notified of the
potential lead hazards, and at the time of rental of units that the requirements for meeting the
appropriate standards have been met;
(2) For a lead hazard mitigation standard;
(3) For any training, certification, or licensing necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter;
(4) For a process to receive, investigate, and decide whether the correction of a lead hazard,
pursuant to § 42-128.1-8(a)(3) and (d) was satisfactory. These rules shall establish an expeditious
procedure to determine whether the allegation of unsatisfactory correction has merit. The process
may be integrated with or make use of the technical assistance service provided for in § 42-128.1-
13; and
(5) For a process to grant a variance to § 42-128.1-8(a)(3), (a)(5), and (b), where there
exists a hardship as to financing lead hazard mitigation, or where materials, personnel, or weather
delays the mitigation completion; and
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -36-)

(6) Effective July 1, 2025, the department of health will assume responsibility for § 42-
128.1-7. The rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall remain in full force and effect and
shall be enforced by the department of health until such time as the rules are properly transferred
to the department of health's title within the Rhode Island code of regulations.
42-128.1-8. Duties of property owners of pre-1978 rental dwellings.
(a) Property owners of pre-1978 rental dwellings, which have not been made lead safe or
have not been lead hazard abated shall comply with all the following requirements:
(1) Learn about lead hazards by taking a lead hazard awareness seminar, himself or herself
or through a designated person;
(2) Evaluate the dwelling unit and premises for lead hazards consistent with the
requirements for a lead hazard control evaluation;
(3) Correct identified lead hazards by meeting and maintaining the lead hazard mitigation
standard;
(4) Provide tenants: (i) Basic information about lead hazard control; (ii) A copy of the
independent clearance inspection; and (iii) Information about how to give notice of deteriorating
conditions;
(5) Correct lead hazards within thirty (30) days after notification from the tenant of a
dwelling unit with an at-risk occupant, or as provided for by § 34-18-22.
(b) New property owners of a pre-1978 rental dwelling that is occupied by an at-risk
occupant shall have up to sixty (60) days to meet requirements for lead hazard mitigation, if those
requirements were not met by the previous owner at the time of transfer, provided that the new
property owner has the property visually inspected within thirty (30) business days after assuming
ownership to determine conformity with the lead hazard control standard.
(c) The requirements for lead hazard mitigation shall apply to the first change in ownership
or tenancy after November 1, 2005; provided further, that unless requested and agreed to by an at-
risk occupant, meeting the lead hazard mitigation standard shall not be construed to authorize a
property owner to compel or cause a person, who is in tenancy on January 1, 2004, and remains in
tenancy continuously thereafter, to vacate a rental unit temporarily or otherwise.
(d) If the tenant receives no response to the notification to the property owner of
deteriorating conditions affecting lead hazards, if the response is in the tenant's opinion
unsatisfactory, or if the remedy performed is in the tenant's opinion unsatisfactory, the tenant may
request a review of the matter by the housing resources commission department of health. After its
review of the matter, the housing resources commission department of health shall either send
notice to the property owner in which notice shall be issued in a manner substantially similar to a
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -37-)

notice of violation issued by the director pursuant to the Housing Maintenance Code, chapter 24.3
of title 45, or promptly inform the tenant of the reasons why the notice is not being issued.
(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to common
areas in condominium complexes that are owned and operated by condominium associations, or to
pre-1978 rental dwelling units that are:
(1) Lead-safe or lead free;
(2) Temporary housing; or
(3) Elderly housing.
(4) [Deleted by P.L. 2023, ch. 103, § 1 and P.L. 2023, ch. 104, § 1.]
(f) The department of health shall report to the legislature annually on the number of
children who are lead poisoned in any of the exempted dwelling units as referred to in subsection
(e) of this section.
(g) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent an owner who is seeking to
obtain lead liability insurance coverage in the policy from complying with the provisions of this
chapter, by securing and maintaining a valid and in force letter of compliance or conformance in
force.
42-128.1-9. Insurance coverage.
(a) The department of business regulation shall, by January 1, 2003, establish a uniform
policy with regard to exclusion for lead poisoning and shall adopt any rules and requirements that
may be necessary to assure the availability of insurance coverage for losses and damages caused
by lead poisoning, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, which policy and rules shall
apply to liability coverage available to property owners. The department of business regulation
shall have the authority and is empowered, consistent with the requirements of chapter 35 of this
title, to promulgate rules and regulations, which shall enable it to compile and analyze data and to
make determinations with regard to the availability of and rates for lead liability coverage.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, no insurance company licensed or
permitted by the department of business regulation to provide liability coverage to rental property
owners shall exclude, after October 31, 2005, coverage for losses or damages caused by lead
poisoning. The department of business regulation shall not permit, authorize, or approve any
exclusion for lead poisoning, except as specifically provided for by this chapter, that was not in
effect as of January 1, 2000, and all previously approved exclusions shall terminate October 31,
2005. As of November 1, 2005, coverage for lead poisoning shall be included in the policy or
offered by endorsement, as set forth in this section.
(c) All insurers issuing commercial lines insurance policies and personal lines insurance
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -38-)

policies covering pre-1978 rental housing in compliance with: (i) the requirements of this chapter
for lead hazard mitigation; (ii) with the requirements of chapter 24.6 of title 23 for lead safe
housing, within the state of Rhode Island; or (iii) relying on a valid certificate of compliance or
conformance shall, effective November 1, 2005, include in the policy coverage for liability for
injury, damage, or death resulting from occurrences of lead poisoning in an amount equal to and
no less than the underlying policy limits for personal injury/bodily injury coverage provided under
the policy so issued to a residential rental property owner. The property owner shall, if requested
by the insurer, present to the insurance company, either: (1) proof of certificate of compliance of
an independent clearance inspection and of any affidavit of visual inspection required to maintain
the validity of the independent clearance inspection; (2) proof of meeting the mitigation standard
in the form of a clearance exam showing that lead hazards are mitigated; or (3) proof of abatement.
This proof shall be prima facie evidence of compliance with the requirements of this chapter. In
any subsequent renewal, the insurer may require any continuing proof whenever the certificate is
expiring, has expired, or is otherwise invalidated.
(d) For residential rental properties that have not been brought into compliance with the
requirements for lead hazard mitigation pursuant to this chapter or for lead hazard reduction
pursuant to chapter 24.6 of title 23 or that do not have a valid certificate of compliance or
conformance, effective November 1, 2005, for residential rental property owners who own or
owned a substantial legal or equitable interest in one property and have had no more than one un-
remediated dwelling unit at which a child was poisoned prior to November 1, 2005, and for
residential property owners who own or owned more than one property and have had no more than
two (2) un-remediated dwelling units at which a child was poisoned prior to November 1, 2005, an
insurance company, which provides liability insurance to a residential rental property owner, shall
either offer lead liability coverage for bodily injury, which shall be equal to the underlying limits
of liability coverage for the property, by endorsement, or shall assist the insured in placing lead
liability coverage through the program commonly known as the Rhode Island FAIR Plan either
directly or through one of the insurance company's agents or brokers, and the Rhode Island FAIR
Plan shall make available liability coverage for damages caused by lead poisoning to the class of
property owners described in this subsection. If the insured seeks lead liability coverage with the
FAIR Plan, the FAIR Plan may use reasonable underwriting guidelines, as approved by the
department of business regulation, to underwrite the property. Any property owner who fails to
remediate a property, after a notice of violation subsequent to October 31, 2005, and any property
that is not remediated after notice of a violation subsequent to October 31, 2005, shall not be eligible
to receive an offer of coverage and shall be subject to cancellation and nonrenewal of that coverage
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -39-)

if the property is not found to be in compliance with the lead law within ninety (90) days of the
date of issuance of the notice by the director, or the housing resources commission, as applicable.
(e) Rates for lead poisoning liability coverage, as specified in subsections (c) and (d) of
this section, shall be approved by the department of business regulation, notwithstanding any limits
on rate approval authority established by the provisions of chapter 65 of title 27 and subject to the
provisions of §§ 27-44-6 and 27-44-7, using the following standards:
(1) That they are not excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory;
(2) That consideration is given to:
(i) Past and prospective loss experience within the state of Rhode Island;
(ii) A reasonable margin for profits and contingencies;
(iii) Past and prospective expenses specifically applicable to the state of Rhode Island:
(iv) Any other data, including data compiled in other states, especially regarding
experience data for lead liability coverage, that the department may deem necessary; and
(v) Past history of the owner with regard to lead poisoning or any associated violations.
(f) The department of business regulation shall have the authority and is empowered,
consistent with the requirements of chapter 35 of this title, to promulgate rules and regulations to
enable it to compile and analyze data and to make determinations with regard to the availability of
and rates for lead liability coverage. In order to effect the purposes of this section insurers shall file,
on or before October 1, 2004, the proposed language of endorsements for lead liability coverage
and the proposed rates for that coverage with the department.
(g) All endorsements, rates, forms, and rules for lead liability coverage approved by the
department of business regulation to be effective on or after July 1, 2004, are hereby extended to
be effective November 1, 2005. Prior to November 1, 2005, insurers and advisory organizations
shall continue to utilize all endorsements, rates, forms, and rules in effect on June 30, 2004, for lead
liability coverage. The department shall not approve any new endorsements, rates, forms, or rules
for lead liability coverage in pre-1978 residential rental properties unless the filings are submitted
in accordance with the provisions of this act. The department is hereby authorized to promulgate
reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
42-128.1-13. Rhode Island lead hazard technical assistance service.
(a) Establishment and purposes.
(1) The Rhode Island housing resources commission department of health shall establish a
"Rhode Island lead hazard technical assistance service" program for the purposes of providing
technical assistance to property owners to achieve compliance with this chapter and the Lead
Poisoning Prevention Act, chapter 24.6 of title 23.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -40-)

(2) The services of the program shall subject to appropriation, include, but shall not be
limited to: evaluation of the need for lead hazard mitigation in a dwelling; review of independent
inspection results; identification of and arranging funding for conducting lead hazard abatement
and mitigation, and supplying any materials, assistance, and services that may be needed by
property owners to achieve compliance with this chapter and the Lead Poisoning Prevention Act in
an affordable manner.
(b) Historic properties. On or before November 1, 2005, the housing resources commission
The department of health, in conjunction with the historical preservation and heritage commission,
shall initiate the following activities to assist owners of historic properties to comply with the
provisions of this chapter: (i) provide technical assistance; (ii) identify financial resources available
for compliance; and (iii) seek additional resources for this purpose.
(c) Cooperation with Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation. The housing
resources commission department of health is hereby authorized to cooperate with the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation in putting the provisions of this section into effect, and
the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation is hereby authorized to exercise its
powers under § 42-55-5.1 to provide for the implementation of this section.
(d) Exercise of powers. The housing resources commission is hereby expressly authorized
to exercise any or all of its general powers set forth in § 42-128-7 to accomplish the purpose of this
section.
SECTION 9. Sections 42-128.2-1, 42-128.2-3, 42-128.2-4, 42-128.2-6 and 42-128.2-8 of
the General Laws in Chapter 42-128.2 entitled "Expedited Permitting for Affordable Housing" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
42-128.2-1. Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The availability of affordable housing is a critical concern to the current well-being and
the future prosperity of the people of Rhode Island;
(2) All towns in Rhode Island, with an obligation to do so, have adopted affordable housing
plans as required by P.L. 2004, ch. 286 and 324; and
(3) The housing resources commission in conjunction with the statewide planning program
has adopted a strategic plan for affordable housing as required by "The Comprehensive Housing
Production and Rehabilitation Act of 2004";
(4) The people of Rhode Island in 2006 approved a bond issue to support the development
of affordable housing in the state; and
(5)(3) The slowness and uncertainty of securing permits and regulatory approval from state
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -41-)

agencies can impair the viability of affordable housing development, make such development more
expensive, and can jeopardize federal and other monies.
42-128.2-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words
and phrases shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Affordable housing plan" means a component of a housing element, as defined in
subsection 45-22.2-4(33), to meet housing needs in a city or town that is prepared in accordance
with guidelines adopted by the state planning council, and/or to meet the provisions of § 45-53-
4(e)(1) and (f).
(2) "Associate director" means the associate director of the department of administration
for planning.
(3) "Chairperson" means the chairperson of the housing resources commission.
(4)(3) "Comprehensive plan" means a comprehensive plan adopted and approved by a city
or town pursuant to chapters 22.2 and 22.3 of title 45.
(5)(4) "Determination of probable consistency" means a determination by the associate
director that an eligible affordable housing project appears to be consistent with applicable
provisions of state plans pertaining to affordable housing development; a determination of probable
consistency shall not be deemed to be a conclusive, final, or biding determination of conformity
with such plans or with any specific requirements adopted pursuant to such plans.
(6)(5) "Eligible affordable housing project" means low or moderate income housing or
housing development in which at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the dwelling units are low or
moderate income housing whether built or operated by any public agency or any nonprofit
organization or by any limited equity housing cooperative or any private developer, that is
subsidized by a federal, state, or municipal government subsidy under any program to assist the
construction or rehabilitation of housing affordable to low or moderate income households, as
defined in the applicable federal or state statute, or local ordinance and that will remain affordable
through a land lease and/or deed restriction for ninety-nine (99) years or such other period that is
either agreed to by the applicant and town or prescribed by the federal, state, or municipal
government subsidy program but that is not less than thirty (30) years from initial occupancy.
(6) "Executive office of housing" means the executive office of housing established by
chapter 167 of this title.
(7) "Housing project of critical concern" means an eligible affordable housing project
designated by the housing resources commission executive office of housing to be significant, in
its operational stage, by its ability to advance affordable goals set forth in duly approved plans for
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -42-)

affordable housing and to help alleviate affordable housing shortages in Rhode Island.
(8) "Housing resources commission" means the housing resources commission established
by chapter 128 of this title.
(9)(8) "Person" means any natural person, company, corporation, partnership, or any type
of business entity.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of housing established by chapter 167 of this title.
(10) "State agency" means any office, department, board, commission, bureau, division,
authority, public corporation, agency, or instrumentality of the state; the term "state agency" shall
not be deemed to include any department, office, or agency of a city or town.
(11) "Statewide planning" means the statewide planning program established by § 42-11-
10.
42-128.2-4. Request for status as a housing project of critical concern.
A person may apply to the Rhode Island housing resources commission executive office
of housing and request that a project be classified as a project of critical housing concern. Said
request shall contain a description of how the project is consistent with applicable provisions of
state plans pertaining to affordable housing developments. Not more than five (5) days after the
receipt of such request, the chairperson, or the executive director acting on behalf of the
chairperson, secretary shall refer the request to statewide planning for review of the probable
consistency of the project with the applicable provisions of the state guide plan. The associate
director shall issue a determination of probable consistency to the chairperson secretary within
twenty (20) days. If the associate director has made a determination of probable consistency, the
Rhode Island housing resources commission executive office of housing shall render a written
decision on the request within sixty (60) days of the filing and receipt of the request. If the project
is found to be a housing project of critical concern, the Rhode Island housing resources commission
executive office of housing may issue a certificate of critical housing concern. A certificate of
critical housing concern shall expire two (2) years from the date of issuance.
42-128.2-6. Action by state agency.
(a) Within three (3) months of the submission of a substantially complete application, the
state agency must render a written report on the status of the application. The report shall contain
information, which will enable the person to make a sound business decision as to whether or not
to pursue the application. The report shall be sent to the applicant.
(b) If the application is not granted, then the state agency shall on the fourth (4th), fifth
(5th), and sixth (6th) months of the anniversary of submission render a written report on the status
of the application. If at the end of the sixth (6th) month, a decision has not been rendered on the
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -43-)

application, then, in addition to the applicant, a copy of the written report shall be rendered monthly
thereafter to the associate director of the department of administration for planning and the Rhode
Island housing resources commission secretary until a decision to accept or reject the application
has been made.
42-128.2-8. Rulemaking.
The housing resources commission, at a regular quarterly meeting executive office of
housing shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with chapter 35 of this title to
implement this chapter, including, but not limited to, provisions to define an application and criteria
to determine the significance of any application in meeting the purposes of this act.
SECTION 10. Sections 42-128.3-3, 42-128.3-4, 42-128.3-5, 42-128.3-6, 42-128.3-7, 42-
128.3-8 and 42-128.3-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-128.3 entitled "Housing Incentives for
Municipalities" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-128.3-3. Purposes.
The coordinating committee executive office of housing is authorized and empowered to
carry out the program for the following purposes:
(1) To foster and maintain strong collaborations with municipalities in the state.
(2) To support and assist municipalities in promoting housing production that adequately
meets the needs of Rhode Island's current and future residents.
(3) To make diverse, high-quality, and accessible housing options readily available to
residents within their local communities.
(4) To enable residents to live near convenient public transit and other commercial and
cultural resources.
(5) To make development decisions fair, predictable, and cost-effective.
(6) To foster distinctive, attractive, and resilient communities, while preserving the state's
open space, farmland, and natural beauty.
42-128.3-4. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Coordinating committee" means the Rhode Island housing resources coordinating
committee established pursuant to § 42-128-2(2).
(2)(1) "Eligible locations" means an area designated by the coordinating committee
executive office of housing as a suitable site for a housing incentive district by virtue of its
infrastructure, existing underutilized facilities, or other advantageous qualities, including (i)
Proximity to public transit centers, including commuter rail, bus, and ferry terminals; or (ii)
Proximity to areas of concentrated development, including town and city centers or other existing
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -44-)

commercial districts.
(3)(2) "Eligible student" means an individual who (i) Lives in a newly constructed dwelling
unit within a housing incentive district, to the extent that the unit could not have been realized under
the underlying zoning; and (ii) Attends a school in the city or town.
(3) "Executive office of housing" means the executive office of housing established
pursuant to § 42-167-1.
(4) "Housing incentive district" means an overlay district adopted by a city or town
pursuant to this chapter. A housing incentive district is intended to encourage residential
development and must permit minimum residential uses. A housing incentive district may
accommodate uses complementary to the primary residential uses, as deemed appropriate by the
adopting city or town; however, the majority of development on lots within a housing incentive
district must be residential. Land development plans within a housing incentive district shall be
treated as minor land development plans, as defined by § 45-23-32, unless otherwise specified by
ordinance.
(5) "School impact offset payments" means a payment to a city or town to help offset
increased municipal costs of educating eligible students.
42-128.3-5. Adoption of housing incentive districts.
(a) In its zoning ordinance, a city or town may adopt a housing incentive district in any
eligible location.
(b) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of such ordinance shall be in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 24 of title 45.
(c) A housing incentive district shall comply with this chapter and any minimum
requirements established by the coordinating committee executive office of housing.
(d) The zoning ordinance for each housing incentive district shall specify the procedure for
land development and subdivision review within the district in accordance with this chapter and
the regulations of the coordinating committee executive office of housing.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall affect a city or town's authority to amend its zoning
ordinances under chapter 24 of title 45.
42-128.3-6. Assistance to municipalities.
The coordinating committee executive office of housing is authorized and empowered, at
its discretion, to provide all manner of support and assistance to municipalities in connection with
fostering local housing production, including, but not limited to:
(1) Providing technical assistance for the preparation, adoption, or implementation of laws,
regulations, or processes related to residential development; and
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -45-)

(2) Authorizing the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to issue school
impact offset payments to participating municipalities; and
(3) Coordinating state provided technical assistance and supports for municipalities for all
matters related to housing development and housing preservation.
42-128.3-7. Rules and regulations — Reports.
(a) The coordinating committee executive office of housing is hereby authorized to
promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, including,
but not limited to, provisions relating to: application criteria; eligible locations for housing
incentive districts; minimum requirements for housing incentive districts; eligible students for the
calculation of school impact offset payments; and the amount and method of payment to cities and
towns for school impact offset payments.
(b) The coordinating committee executive office of housing shall include in its annual
report shall be provided to the governor, the secretary of commerce, speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president of the senate.
42-128.3-8. Program integrity.
Program integrity being of paramount importance, the coordinating committee executive
office of housing shall establish procedures to ensure ongoing compliance with the terms and
conditions of the program established herein, including procedures to safeguard the expenditure of
public funds and to ensure that the funds further the purposes of the program.
42-128.3-9. Cooperation.
Any department, agency, council, board, or other public instrumentality of the state shall
cooperate with the coordinating committee executive office of housing in relation to the
implementation, execution, and administration of the program created under this chapter.
SECTION 11. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING
42-167-1. Executive office of housing established.
Effective January 1, 2023, there is hereby established within the executive branch of the
state government an executive office of housing with the responsibility for developing plans,
policies, standards, programs, interagency coordination, and providing technical assistance for
housing and homelessness. The executive office of housing shall be the state's lead agency for
addressing issues related to housing, homelessness, and community development in the state of
Rhode Island.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -46-)

42-167-2. Purposes.
(a) The purposes of the executive office of housing shall be:
(1) To develop and promulgate state policies, and plans, for housing and housing
production and performance measures for housing programs established pursuant to state law.
(2) To coordinate activities among state agencies and political subdivisions pertaining to
housing.
(3) To promote the stability of and quality of life in communities and neighborhoods.
(4) To provide opportunities for safe, sanitary, decent, adequate, and affordable housing in
Rhode Island.
(5) To encourage public-private partnerships that foster the production, rehabilitation,
development, maintenance, and improvement of housing and housing conditions, especially for
low- and moderate-income people.
(6) To foster and support nonprofit organizations, including community development
corporations, and their associations and intermediaries, that are engaged in providing housing-
related services.
(7) To encourage and support partnerships between institutions of higher education and
neighborhoods to develop and retain quality, healthy housing and sustainable communities.
(8) To facilitate private for-profit production and rehabilitation of housing for diverse
populations and income groups.
(9) To provide, facilitate, and/or support the provisions of technical assistance.
42-167-3. Powers and duties of the executive office of housing.
In order to provide housing opportunities for all Rhode Islanders, to maintain the quality
of housing in Rhode Island, and to coordinate and make effective the housing responsibilities of
the agencies and subdivisions of the state, the executive office of housing shall have the following
powers and duties:
(1) Policy, planning, and coordination of state housing functions:
(i) To prepare and adopt the state's plans for housing, including but not limited to, any
statewide housing and homelessness plan; provided, however, that this provision shall not be
interpreted to contravene the prerogative of the state planning council to adopt a state guide plan
for housing;
(ii) To prepare, adopt, and issue the state's housing and homelessness policy;
(iii) To conduct research on and make reports regarding housing issues in the state; and
(iv) To advise the governor and general assembly on housing issues and to coordinate
housing activities among government agencies and agencies created by state law or providing
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -47-)

housing services under government programs;
(2) Establish, implement, and monitor state performance measures and guidelines for
housing programs:
(i) To promulgate performance measures and guidelines for housing programs conducted
under state law;
(ii) To monitor and evaluate housing responsibilities established by state law, and to
establish a process for annual reporting on the outcomes of the programs and investments of the
state in housing for low- and moderate-income people; and
(iii) To hear and resolve disputes pertaining to housing issues;
(3) Administer the programs pertaining to housing resources that may be assigned by state
law. The executive office of housing shall have the power and duty to administer programs for
housing, housing services, and community development including, but not limited to, programs
pertaining to:
(i) Abandoned properties and the remediation of blighting conditions;
(ii) Services for the homeless;
(iii) Rental assistance;
(iv) Community development;
(v) Outreach, education and technical assistance services;
(vi) Assistance, including financial support, to nonprofit organizations and community
development corporations;
(vii) Tax credits that assist in the provision of housing or foster community development
or that result in support to nonprofit organizations performing functions to accomplish the purposes
of this chapter; and
(viii) The supportive services program, the purpose of which is to help prevent and end
homelessness among those who have experienced long-term homelessness and for whom certain
services in addition to housing are essential. State funding for this program may leverage other
resources for the purpose of providing supportive services. Services provided pursuant to this
subsection may include, but not be limited to: assistance with budgeting and paying rent; access to
employment; encouraging tenant involvement in facility management and policies; medication
monitoring and management; daily living skills related to food, housekeeping, and socialization;
counseling to support self-identified goals; referrals to mainstream health, mental health, and
treatment programs; and conflict resolution;
(4) Lead abatement and management. The executive office of housing will provide funding
to support the administration of a lead hazard abatement program managed by the Rhode Island
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -48-)

department of health in cooperation with the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation.
(5) The regulations promulgated under title 860 of the Rhode Island code of regulations
will remain in full force and effect and shall be enforced by the executive office of housing until
such a time as the rules are properly transferred to the executive office of housing's title within the
Rhode Island code of regulations, notwithstanding any other transfers authorized under § 42-128.1-
7.
42-167-4. Secretary of housing.
The head of the executive office of housing shall be the secretary of housing, who shall be
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The position of secretary of
housing is hereby created in the unclassified service. The secretary of housing shall hold office at
the pleasure of the governor. Before entering upon the discharge of duties, the secretary shall take
an oath to faithfully execute the duties of the office. The secretary of housing shall:
(1) Prior to hiring, have completed and earned a minimum of a master's graduate degree in
the field of urban planning, economics, or a related field of study or possess a juris doctor law
degree. Preference shall be provided to candidates having earned an advanced degree consisting of
an L.L.M. law degree or Ph.D. in urban planning or economics. Qualified candidates must have
documented five (5) years' full-time experience employed in the administration of housing policy
and/or development;
(2) Be responsible for overseeing all housing and homelessness policy and planning
initiatives in the state of Rhode Island and developing a housing plan, including, but not limited to,
the development of affordable housing opportunities to assist in building strong community efforts
and revitalizing neighborhoods;
(3) Coordinate with all agencies directly related to any housing and homelessness
initiatives and participate in the promulgation of any regulation having an impact on housing and
homelessness including, but not limited to, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation, the coastal resources management council (CRMC), and state departments including,
but not limited to: the department of environmental management (DEM), the department of
business regulation (DBR), the department of transportation (DOT) and statewide planning;
(4) Formulate an integrated housing report to include findings and recommendations to the
governor, speaker of the house, senate president, each chamber's finance committee, and any
committee whose purview is reasonably related to, including, but not limited to, issues of housing,
municipal government, and health on or before April 15th annually. This report shall include, but
not be limited to, the following:
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -49-)

(i) The total number of housing units in the state with per community counts;
(ii) Every three (3) years, beginning in 2026 and contingent upon funding for data
collection, an assessment of the suitability of existing housing stock in meeting accessibility needs
of residents;
(iii) The occupancy and vacancy rate of the units referenced in subsection (4)(i);
(iv) The change in the number of units referenced in subsection (4)(i), for each of the prior
three (3) years in figures and as a percentage;
(v) The number of net new units in development and number of units completed in the
previous calendar year;
(vi) For each municipality the number of single-family, two-family (2), and three-family
(3) units, and multi-unit housing delineated sufficiently to provide the lay reader a useful
description of current conditions, including a statewide sum of each unit type;
(vii) Every three (3) years, beginning in 2026, a projection of the number of units required
to meet estimated population growth and based upon household formation rates;
(viii) A comparison of regional and other similarly situated state funding sources that
support housing development including a percentage of private, federal, and public support;
(ix) A reporting of unit types by number of bedrooms for rental properties including an
accounting of all:
(I) Single-family units;
(II) Accessory dwelling units;
(III) Two-family (2) units;
(IV) Three-family (3) units;
(V) Multi-unit sufficiently delineated units;
(VI) Mixed use sufficiently delineated units; and
(VII) Occupancy and vacancy rates for the prior three (3) years;
(x) A reporting of unit types by ownership including an accounting of all:
(I) Single-family units;
(II) Accessory dwelling units;
(III) Two-family (2) units;
(IV) Three-family (3) units;
(V) Multi-unit sufficiently delineated units;
(VI) Mixed use sufficiently delineated units; and
(VII) Occupancy and vacancy rates for the prior three (3) years;
(xi) A reporting of the number of applications submitted or filed for each community
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -50-)

according to unit type and an accounting of action taken with respect to each application to include,
approved, denied, appealed, approved upon appeal, and if approved, the justification for each
appeal approval;
(xii) A reporting of permits for each community according to affordability level that were
sought, approved, denied, appealed, approved upon appeal, and if approved, the justification for
each approval;
(xiii) A reporting of affordability that shall include the following:
(I) The percent and number of units of extremely low-, very low-, low-, moderate-, fair-
market rate, and above moderate-income; including the average and median costs of those units;
(II) The percent and number of units of extremely low-, very low-, low-, and moderate-
income housing units by municipality required to satisfy the ten percent (10%) requirement
pursuant to chapter 24 of title 45; including the average and median costs of those units;
(III) The percent and number of units for the affordability levels above moderate-income
housing, including a comparison to fair-market rent; including the average and median costs of
those units;
(IV) The percentage of cost burden by municipality with population equivalent;
(V) The percentage and number of home financing sources, including all private, federal,
state, or other public support;
(VI) The disparities in mortgage loan financing by race and ethnicity based on Home
Mortgage Disclosure Act data by available geographies;
(VII) The annual median gross rent growth for each of the previous five (5) years by
municipality; and
(VIII) The annual growth in median owner-occupied home values for each of the previous
five (5) years by municipality;
(xiv) A reporting of municipal healthy housing stock by unit type and number of bedrooms
and providing an assessment of the state's existing housing stock and enumerating any risks to the
public health from that housing stock, including, but not limited to: the presence of lead, mold, safe
drinking water, disease vectors (insects and vermin), and other conditions that are an identifiable
health detriment. Additionally, the report shall provide the percentage of the prevalence of health
risks by age of the stock for each community by unit type and number of bedrooms;
(xv) A recommendation shall be included with the report required under this section that
shall provide consideration to any and all populations, ethnicities, income levels, and other relevant
demographic criteria determined by the secretary, and with regard to any and all of the criteria
enumerated elsewhere in the report separately or in combination, provide recommendations to
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -51-)

resolve any issues that provide an impediment to the development of housing, including specific
data and evidence in support of the recommendation. All data and methodologies used to present
evidence are subject to review and approval of the chief of revenue analysis, and that approval shall
include an attestation of approval by the chief to be included in the report; and
(xvi) Municipal governments shall provide the executive office of housing's requested data
relevant to this report on or before February 15th annually;
(5) Establish rules and regulations as set forth in § 45-24-77;
(6) On or before July 1, 2026 and every three years thereafter, create a statewide strategic
plan to prevent, address, and end homelessness, considering input from the advisory council on
housing and homelessness, the interagency council on homelessness, and the Rhode Island
continuum of care created pursuant to Part 578 of Subchapter C of Chapter V of Subtitle B of Title
24 of the Code of Federal Regulations;
(7) Coordinate with the Rhode Island continuum of care on funding and programming to
address homelessness; and
(8) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, develop a calculation of the
percentage of low and moderate income housing units, for each city and town to accurately reflect
the percentage of low and moderate income housing units in each city and town, and publish a chart
showing the number of eligible units for each city and town, the basis for the determination of each
type of unit and any other information the secretary of the executive office of housing deems
relevant. The chart shall then be forwarded to the respective city or town, which shall have thirty
(30) days to suggest modifications or revisions. Thereafter, and after review of any proposed
modifications, the secretary of housing shall, in writing, certify the chart for that year. The chart,
together with supporting documentation, shall be kept in the possession of the executive office of
housing, and shall be available for public inspection and copying.
42-167-5. Powers and duties of the secretary of housing.
(a) The secretary of housing shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) All powers and duties pursuant to § 42-167-3 and § 42-167-4;
(2) To supervise the work of the executive office of housing and to act as its chief
administrative officer;
(3) To coordinate the administration and financing of various departments or offices within
the executive office of housing;
(4) To serve as the governor's chief advisor and liaison to federal policymakers on housing,
homelessness, and community development as well as the principal point of contact on any such
related matters;
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -52-)

(5) To coordinate the housing, homelessness, and community development programs of
the state of Rhode Island and its departments, agencies, commissions, corporations, and
subdivisions. All departments, agencies, commissions, corporations, and subdivisions shall
cooperate with the executive office of housing to facilitate the purposes of this chapter;
(6) To employ such personnel and contracts for such consulting services as may be required
to perform the powers and duties conferred upon the secretary of the executive office of housing;
(7) To oversee and direct the administration of funds that may be appropriated from time
to time to the executive office of housing;
(8) Creation of a written guide for consumers relating to the rights and duties of landlords
and tenants pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34, which the secretary shall update at minimum on a
biennial basis. The guide shall be posted on the website of the executive office of housing and shall
be published in both English and Spanish; and
(9) To chair the Rhode Island housing mortgage and finance corporation; to chair the
interagency council on homelessness; and to chair the interagency council on housing production
and preservation.
(b) In addition to such other powers as may otherwise be delegated elsewhere to the
executive office of housing, the executive office of housing is hereby expressly authorized, by and
through the secretary of housing:
(1) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and
otherwise deal in and with, real or personal property, or any interest in real or personal property,
wherever situated;
(2) To accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in
any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government,
or from the state or any agency or instrumentality of the state, or from any other source and to
comply, subject to the provisions of this chapter, with the terms and conditions of the gifts, grants,
or loans;
(3) Subject to the provisions of § 37-2-1 et seq., to negotiate and to enter into contracts,
agreements, and cooperative agreements with agencies and political subdivisions of the state, not-
for-profit corporations, for-profit corporations, and other partnerships, associations, and persons
for any lawful purpose necessary and desirable to effectuate the purposes of the executive office of
housing; and
(4) To carry out this chapter and perform the duties of the general laws and public laws
insofar as those provisions relate to any regulatory areas within the jurisdiction of the executive
office of housing.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -53-)

42-167-6. Rules and regulations.
The secretary of the executive office of housing may promulgate such rules and regulations
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of this title as are necessary and proper to carry out
the duties assigned to the secretary of the executive office of housing or to the executive office of
housing by this title or any other provision of law.
42-167-7. Coordination with other state agencies.
State agencies, departments, authorities, corporations, boards, commissions, and political
subdivisions shall cooperate with the executive office of housing in the conduct of its activities,
and specifically: the Rhode Island historical preservation and heritage commission shall advise the
executive office of housing on issues of historical preservation standards as they pertain to housing
and the use of historical preservation programs to improve housing and to enhance community
character; the statewide planning program, created pursuant to § 42-11-10, shall advise the
executive office of housing on issues of planning in general and land use controls and shall revise
the state guide plan, as necessary, to achieve consistency with official state plans and policies for
housing adopted by the executive office on housing, and the department of business regulation shall
advise the executive office of housing on issues of business regulation affecting housing, shall
review its regulations and practices to determine any amendments, changes, or additions that might
be appropriate to advance the purposes of this chapter.
42-167-8. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter; which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
42-167-9. Renaming.
Wherever in the general or public laws, or any rule or regulation, any reference to the
"office of housing and community development" or "department of housing" shall appear, it shall
mean the executive office of housing created pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 12. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167.1
INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON HOMELESSNESS
42-167.1-1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly hereby finds that there exists in this state undetermined numbers of
homeless persons, many of whom suffer from chronic mental illness and disability, and that this
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -54-)

condition exists among families and among individuals of all age groups without regard to ethnic
or racial heritage or sex. The existence of this condition is declared to be detrimental to the health,
safety, and welfare of the homeless individuals themselves and to the state.
42-167.1-2. Establishment of Council.
(a) There is hereby created a permanent council to be called the "Interagency Council on
Homelessness" consisting of seventeen (17) members:
(1) One of whom shall be the secretary of housing, or his or her designee, who shall chair
the council;
(2) One of whom shall be the director of the department of human services, or his or her
designee;
(3) One of whom shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee;
(4) One of whom shall be the director of the department of children, youth and families, or
his or her designee;
(5) One of whom shall be the director of the office of healthy aging, or his or her designee;
(6) One of whom shall be the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities
and hospitals, or his or her designee;
(7) One of whom shall be director of the department of labor and training, or his or her
designee;
(8) One of whom shall be the director of the department of corrections, or his or her
designee;
(9) One of whom shall be the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary
education, or his or her designee;
(10) One of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation, or his or her designee;
(11) One of whom shall be the director of the emergency management agency, or his or
her designee;
(12) One of whom shall be a representative from the office of veterans' affairs, or his or
her designee;
(13) One of whom shall be the public defender, or his or her designee;
(14) One of whom shall be the Medicaid director within the executive office of health and
human services, or his or her designee;
(15) One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services, or his or her designee;
(16) One of whom shall be the chair of the continuum of care created pursuant to Part 578
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -55-)

of Subchapter C of Chapter V of Subtitle B of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or his
or her designee; and
(17) One of whom shall be the lieutenant governor, or his or her designee.
(b) Forthwith upon the effective date of this chapter, the members of the council shall meet
at the call of the chair and organize. Vacancies in the council shall be filled in like manner as the
original appointment. A majority of seats filled shall constitute a quorum.
(c) The executive office of housing is hereby directed to provide administrative support for
the council.
(d) All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish advice and information,
documentary, and otherwise to the council and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by
the council to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.
42-167.1-3. Duties and responsibilities of council.
The duties and responsibilities of the council shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Advise on and participate in the process led by the executive office of housing pursuant
to § 42-167-1 to develop a strategic plan to end homelessness that will serve to reduce the number
of homeless individuals and families in Rhode Island;
(2) Coordinate services for the homeless among state agencies and instrumentalities,
community-based organizations, faith-based organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy
groups, and businesses;
(3) Coordinate services not specifically for the homeless, but from which the homeless may
benefit, among state agencies and instrumentalities, community-based organizations, faith-based
organizations, volunteer organizations, advocacy groups, and businesses;
(4) Identify and seek to remedy gaps in services, specifically in the area of making
provisions for the availability, use, and permanent funding stream for permanent supportive
housing;
(5) Identify gaps in services that contribute to the occurrence and persistence of
homelessness, with the aim of addressing such gaps in a timely and effective manner;
(6) Work to reduce the inflow of individuals and families into the homeless emergency
response system through proactive, preventative measures;
(7) Align policies and programs across governmental agencies to maximize available
resources, remove barriers to accessing supports, and improve the effectiveness of homelessness
prevention and response systems; and
(8) Provide recommendations for addressing the unique needs of homeless individuals
during emergency situations, including but not limited to, extreme winter weather, pandemics, or
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -56-)

natural disasters, ensuring timely and appropriate responses to such events.
42-167.1-4. Meeting and reporting requirements.
Meeting and reporting requirements are as follows:
(1) The council shall meet at least quarterly upon the call of the chair to fulfill its duties
and responsibilities. The frequency of meetings may be adjusted based on the needs of the council;
(2) The council shall report annually to the governor and the general assembly, no later
than March of each year, on the progress made in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in
the strategic plan; on the current number of homeless individuals, families, and children; and any
other pertinent information; and
(3) The council shall conform to the provisions of chapter 46 of this title.
42-167.1-5. Advisory council.
The Interagency Council on Homelessness will be advised by the Advisory Council on
Housing and Homelessness.
SECTION 13. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167.2
INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON HOUSING PRODUCTION AND PRESERVATION
42-167.2-1. Establishment of the interagency council on housing production and
preservation.
(a) There is hereby created a permanent council to be called the "Interagency Council on
Housing Production and Preservation" consisting of twelve (12) members:
(1) One of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation, or his or her designee;
(2) One of whom shall be the director of the department of business regulation, or his or
her designee;
(3) One of whom shall be the director of the department of environmental management, or
his or her designee;
(4) One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of commerce, or his or her
designee;
(5) One of whom shall be the director of the department of labor and training, or his or her
designee;
(6) One of whom shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee;
(7) One of whom shall be the director of the office of healthy aging; or his or her designee;
(8) One of whom shall be the director of the office of veterans services, or his or her
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -57-)

designee;
(9) One of whom shall be the director of the department of behavioral health,
developmental disabilities, and hospitals, or his or her designee;
(10) One of whom shall be the executive director of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank,
or his or her designee;
(11) One of whom shall be the director of the department of administration, or his or her
designee; and
(12) One of whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of housing, or his or her
designee, who shall be the chair of the council.
(b) The council may invite additional entities to participate as necessary in meetings in a
non-voting capacity, including but not limited to:
(1) The public finance management board;
(2) The historical preservation and heritage commission; and
(3) The office of postsecondary commissioner.
(c) The executive office of housing will provide administrative support to the council.
42-167.2-2. Purpose.
The purpose of the council is to work collaboratively across state departments and agencies
to promote the development and preservation of housing across affordability levels, including low
and moderate income (LMI) and market-rate housing, and tenure, including rental and
homeownership opportunities.
42-167.2-3. Duties and responsibilities.
(a) The council's responsibilities shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Reducing barriers to the development of housing and streamlining the process to
facilitate housing production;
(2) Aligning state policies and programs to address the short- and long-term housing needs
of all Rhode Islanders, and ensuring that actions taken support the state housing plan's goals;
(3) Addressing housing preservation efforts by identifying and implementing strategies to
maintain and rehabilitate existing housing stock, particularly affordable housing;
(4) Collaborating on initiatives related to healthy homes, ensuring that housing production
and preservation efforts contribute to safe and healthy living environments;
(5) Projecting future housing needs within the state, with a particular focus on identifying
and prioritizing the types of housing required to meet the needs of priority populations, including
but not limited to low-income families, seniors, veterans, and individuals with disabilities;
(6) Strategizing on how to support economic development, job creation, and community
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -58-)

development through housing opportunities; and
(7) Identifying opportunities to promote homeownership, particularly for first-generation
homebuyers.
42-167.2-4. Advisory recommendations.
The council will be advised by the Advisory Council on Housing and Homelessness.
42-167.2-5. Meeting requirements.
(a) The council shall meet at least quarterly to fulfill its duties and responsibilities. The
frequency of meetings may be adjusted based on the needs of the council.
(b) Forthwith upon the effective date of this chapter, the members of the council shall meet
at the call of the chair and organize. A majority of seats filled shall constitute a quorum.
(c) The council shall conform to the provisions of chapter 46 of this title.
SECTION 14. Section 44-5.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5.1 entitled "Real Estate
Nonutilization Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5.1-3. Imposition of tax.
(a) Providence. The city of Providence is empowered to impose a tax upon the privilege of
utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the city during any privilege year
commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 1984, and every privilege year thereafter.
The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
(b) Pawtucket. The city of Pawtucket is empowered to impose a tax upon the privilege of
utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the city during any privilege year
commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 1997, and every privilege year thereafter.
The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
(c) Cranston. The city of Cranston is empowered to impose a tax upon the privilege of
utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the city during any privilege year
commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 1997, and every privilege year thereafter.
The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
(d) North Providence. The town of North Providence is empowered to impose a tax upon
the privilege of utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the town during any
privilege year commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 2001, and every privilege
year thereafter. The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public
laws.
(e) East Providence. The city of East Providence is empowered to impose a tax upon the
privilege of utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the city during any privilege
year commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 2000, and every privilege year
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -59-)

thereafter. The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
(f) Woonsocket. The city of Woonsocket is empowered to impose a tax upon the privilege
of utilizing property as vacant and abandoned property within the city during any privilege year
commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 2000, and every privilege year thereafter.
The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
(g) Cities and towns. Any city or town not previously empowered is empowered to impose
a tax upon the privilege of utilizing vacant and abandoned property within the city or town during
any privilege year commencing with the privilege year beginning January 1, 2002, and every
privilege year thereafter. The tax shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general
or public laws.
(h) Implementing ordinance. Cities and towns that are empowered to impose this tax and
who choose to impose this tax shall adopt an implementing ordinance. The ordinance shall:
(1) Designate a municipal entity responsible for determining which properties are vacant
and abandoned;
(2) Establish the mechanism by which the tax is imposed and how the tax is removed from
the property once the property has been rehabilitated;
(3) Designate a reviewing entity to review and approve a development plan submitted by
a nonprofit housing organization or an abutter;
(4) Empower the tax assessor to abate the tax if it is imposed in error or if a nonprofit
housing organization or an abutter acquires the property for rehabilitation and submits a
development plan that complies with the provisions of subdivision (i)(2) of this section;
(i) Exemptions.
(1) The non-utilization tax authorized by this chapter shall not be imposed on property
owned by an abutter or a nonprofit housing organization if:
(i) The abutter or nonprofit housing organization submits a proposed development plan
which has been approved by the Rhode Island housing resources commission executive office of
housing or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to the reviewing entity;
(ii) The proposed development plan contains a reasonable timetable for the development
or reuse of the property; and
(iii) The reviewing entity determines that the proposed development plan is in accordance
with the approved comprehensive plan of the city or town and approves it.
(2) The reviewing entity shall deliver a copy of the approved development plan to the tax
assessor who shall certify the property as exempt from the non-utilization tax.
(3) Failure of the nonprofit housing organization or abutter, without good cause, to carry
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -60-)

out the development or reuse of the property in accordance with the timetable set forth in the
approved development plan shall result in the property being subject to the non-utilization tax as
of the first date of assessment following the expiration of the timetable in the approved development
plan.
(4) The decision of the reviewing entity denying approval of a development plan may be
appealed as provided in § 44-5.1-6.
SECTION 15. Section 44-30.3-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-30.3 entitled
"Residential Lead Abatement Income Tax Credit" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-30.3-1. Residential lead abatement tax relief — Limitation.
(a) Appropriations from the general fund for property tax relief provided by this chapter
are in the amount of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the year commencing
on July 1, 2004, and for each subsequent fiscal year.
(b) A claimant shall be entitled to tax relief for residential lead removal or lead hazard
reduction when he or she: (1) obtains a housing resources commission department of health
regulated certificate of conformance for mitigation, pursuant to chapter 24.6 of title 23; or (2)
obtains a department of health regulated lead safe certificate for abatement, pursuant to chapter
24.6 of title 23. The lead paint tax relief shall only apply to residential premises. Residential
premises shall include single-family homes, individual condominiums, and individual units in
either apartment buildings or multi-family homes.
(c) The tax relief shall be equal to the amount actually paid for the required lead abatement
or lead hazard mitigation up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per
dwelling unit for mitigation and up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per dwelling unit for
abatement, as specified under subsection (b) above. In the event that: (1) multiple owners of the
dwelling unit; or (2) owner(s) along with the renter(s)/lessee(s) of the dwelling unit have jointly
incurred costs and paid for the lead abatement/lead hazard mitigation, each individual must apply
for relief as a separate claimant, and must include all required proof of payment and certifications,
based on their respective contributions to the cost of lead abatement/lead hazard mitigation.
SECTION 16. Section 45-24-46.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24 entitled "Zoning
Ordinances" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-24-46.1. Inclusionary zoning. [Effective January 1, 2025.]
(a) A zoning ordinance requiring the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a
development shall provide that the housing will be affordable housing, as defined in § 42-128-
8.1(d)(1); that the affordable housing will constitute not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total
units proposed for the development; and that the units will remain affordable for a period of not
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -61-)

less than thirty (30) years from initial occupancy enforced through a land lease and/or deed
restriction enforceable by the municipality and the state of Rhode Island. A zoning ordinance that
requires the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a development shall specify the threshold in
which the inclusion of affordable housing is required, but in no event shall a minimum threshold
triggering the inclusion of affordable housing be higher than ten (10) dwelling units. The total
number of units for the development may include less than fifteen percent (15%) affordable units
after the density bonus described in subsection (c) of this section is determined.
(b) A zoning ordinance that includes inclusionary zoning may provide that the affordable
housing must be built on-site or it may allow for one or more alternative methods of production,
including, but not limited to: off-site construction or rehabilitation; donation of land suitable for
development of the required affordable units; and/or the payment of a fee in lieu of the construction
or provision of affordable housing units.
(c) Density bonus, zoning incentives, and municipal subsidies. For all projects subject
to inclusionary zoning, subject to applicable setback, lot width, or frontage requirements or the
granting of relief from the same, a municipality shall allow the addition of one market rate unit for
each affordable unit required and the minimum lot area per dwelling unit normally required in the
applicable zoning district shall be reduced by that amount necessary to accommodate the
development. Larger density bonuses for the provision of an increased percentage of affordable
housing in a development may be provided by a municipality in the zoning ordinance. The total
number of units for the development shall equal the number originally proposed, including the
required affordable units, plus the additional units that constitute the density bonus. Local
regulations shall provide for reasonable relief from dimensional requirements to accommodate the
bonus density under this section. A municipality shall provide, and an applicant may request,
additional zoning incentives and/or municipal government subsidies as defined in § 45-53-3 to
offset differential costs of affordable units. Available zoning incentives and municipal government
subsidies may be listed in the zoning ordinance, but shall not be an exclusive list.
(d) Fee-in-lieu. To the extent a municipality provides an option for the payment of a fee-
in-lieu of the construction or provision of affordable housing, and an application seeks to utilize
fee-in-lieu, the use of such fee shall be the choice of the developer or builder applied on a per-unit
basis and may be used for new developments, purchasing property and/or homes, rehabilitating
properties, or any other manner that creates additional low- or moderate-income housing as defined
in § 45-53-3(9).
(1) Eligibility for density bonus. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, an
application that utilizes a fee-in-lieu, off-site construction or rehabilitation, or donation of land
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -62-)

suitable for development of the required affordable units shall not be eligible for the density bonus
outlined in this section.
(2) An application that seeks to utilize a fee-in-lieu of the construction or provision of
affordable housing must be reviewed by the planning board or commission and is not eligible for
administrative review under the Rhode Island Land Development and Subdivision Review
Enabling Act of 1992, codified at §§ 45-23-25 — 45-23-74.
(3) Amount of fee-in-lieu. For affordable single-family homes and condominium units, the
per-unit fee shall be the difference between the maximum affordable sales price for a family of four
(4) earning eighty percent (80%) of the area median income as determined annually by the U.S.
Department of Housing and Urban Development and the average cost of developing a single unit
of affordable housing. The average cost of developing a single unit of affordable housing shall be
determined annually based on the average, per-unit development cost of affordable homes financed
by Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation (RIHMFC) over the previous three (3)
years, excluding existing units that received preservation financing.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(3) of this section, in no case shall the per-unit fee for
affordable single family homes and condominium units be less than forty thousand dollars
($40,000).
(4) Use of fee-in-lieu. The municipality shall deposit all in-lieu payments into restricted
accounts that shall be allocated and spent only for the creation and development of affordable
housing within the municipality serving individuals or families at or below eighty percent (80%)
of the area median income. The municipality shall maintain a local affordable housing board to
oversee the funds in the restricted accounts and shall allocate the funds within three (3) years of
collection. The municipality shall include in the housing element of their local comprehensive plan
and shall pass by ordinance, the process it will use to allocate the funds.
(e) As an alternative to the provisions of subsection (d), the municipality may elect to
transfer in-lieu payments promptly upon receipt or within the three-year (3) period after receipt. A
municipality shall transfer all fee-in-lieu payments that are not allocated within three (3) years of
collection, including funds held as of July 1, 2024 2025, to RIHMFC the executive office of housing
for the purpose of developing affordable housing within that community. Funds shall be deposited
into the Housing Production Fund established pursuant to § 42-128-2.1.
(f) Both the municipalities and RIHMFC shall report annually with the first report due
December 31, 2024, to the general assembly, the secretary of housing, and the housing resources
commission the amount of fees in lieu collected by community, the projects that were provided
funding with the fees, the dollar amounts allocated to the projects, and the number of units created.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -63-)

SECTION 17. Sections 45-53-3, 45-53-3.2, 45-53-11, 45-53-12 and 45-53-15 of the
General Laws in Chapter 45-53 entitled "Low and Moderate Income Housing" are hereby amended
to read as follows:
45-53-3. Definitions.
The following words, wherever used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly
appears from the context, have the following meanings:
(1) "Adjustment(s)" means a request or requests by the applicant to seek relief from the
literal use and dimensional requirements of the municipal zoning ordinance and/or the design
standards or requirements of the municipal land development and subdivision regulations. The
standard for the local review board's consideration of adjustments is set forth in § 45-53-
4(d)(2)(iii)(E)(II).
(2) "Affordable housing plan" means a component of a housing element, as defined in §
45-22.2-4(1), that addresses housing needs in a city or town that is prepared in accordance with
guidelines adopted by the state planning council, and/or to meet the provisions of § 45-53-4(e)(1)
and (f).
(3) "Approved affordable housing plan" means an affordable housing plan that has been
approved by the director of administration as meeting the guidelines for the local comprehensive
plan as promulgated by the state planning council; provided, however, that state review and
approval, for plans submitted by December 31, 2004, shall not be contingent on the city or town
having completed, adopted, or amended its comprehensive plan as provided for in § 45-22.2-8, §
45-22.2-9, or § 45-22.2-12.
(4) "Comprehensive plan" means a comprehensive plan adopted and approved by a city or
town pursuant to chapters 22.2 and 22.3 of this title.
(5) "Consistent with local needs" means reasonable in view of the state need for low- and
moderate-income housing, considered with the number of low-income persons in the city or town
affected and the need to protect the health and safety of the occupants of the proposed housing or
of the residents of the city or town, to promote better site and building design in relation to the
surroundings, or to preserve open spaces, and if the local zoning or land use ordinances,
requirements, and regulations are applied as equally as possible to both subsidized and
unsubsidized housing. Local zoning and land use ordinances, requirements, or regulations are
consistent with local needs when imposed by a city or town council after a comprehensive hearing
in a city or town where:
(i) Low- or moderate-income housing exists which is: (A) In the case of an urban city or
town which has at least 5,000 occupied year-round rental units and the units, as reported in the
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -64-)

latest decennial census of the city or town, comprise twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the year-
round housing units, and is in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the total occupied year-round
rental units; or (B) In the case of all other cities or towns, is in excess of ten percent (10%) of the
year-round housing units reported in the census.
(ii) The city or town has promulgated zoning or land use ordinances, requirements, and
regulations to implement a comprehensive plan that has been adopted and approved pursuant to
chapters 22.2 and 22.3 of this title, and the housing element of the comprehensive plan provides
for low- and moderate-income housing in excess of either ten percent (10%) of the year-round
housing units or fifteen percent (15%) of the occupied year-round rental housing units as provided
in subsection (5)(i).
(iii) Multi-family rental units built under a comprehensive permit may be calculated
towards meeting the requirements of a municipality's low- or moderate-income housing inventory,
as long as the units meet and are in compliance with the provisions of § 45-53-3.1.
(6) "Infeasible" means any condition brought about by any single factor or combination of
factors, as a result of limitations imposed on the development by conditions attached to the approval
of the comprehensive permit, to the extent that it makes it financially or logistically impracticable
for any applicant to proceed in building or operating low- or moderate-income housing within the
limitations set by the subsidizing agency of government or local review board, on the size or
character of the development, on the amount or nature of the subsidy, or on the tenants, rentals, and
income permissible, and without substantially changing the rent levels and unit sizes proposed by
the applicant.
(7) "Letter of eligibility" means a letter issued by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage
finance corporation in accordance with § 42-55-5.3(a).
(8) "Local review board" means the planning board as defined by § 45-22.2-4.
(9) "Low- or moderate-income housing" shall be synonymous with "affordable housing"
as defined in § 42-128-8.1, and further means any type of housing whether built or operated by any
public agency or any nonprofit organization or by any limited equity housing cooperative or any
private developer, that is subsidized by a federal, state, or municipal government subsidy under any
program to assist the construction or rehabilitation of affordable housing and that will remain
affordable through a land lease and/or deed restriction for ninety-nine (99) years or such other
period that is either agreed to by the applicant and town or prescribed by the federal, state, or
municipal government subsidy program but that is not less than thirty (30) years from initial
occupancy.
(i) Any housing unit that qualifies under this subsection (9) and under § 42-128-8.1 shall
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -65-)

be counted as one whole unit toward the municipality's requirement for low- or moderate-income
housing.
(ii) Any mobile or manufactured home(s) that meet the requirements of § 42-128-
8.1(d)(1)(ii) but are not subsidized by a federal, state, or municipal government subsidy and/or do
not have a deed restriction or land lease as described in this subsection (9), shall count as one-half
(½) of one unit for the purpose of the calculation of the total of low- or moderate-income year-
round housing within a city or town, as long as a municipality contracts with a monitoring agent to
verify that the requirements of § 42-128-8.1(d)(1)(ii) are met for these units. Such units shall not
be required to meet the income verification requirements of § 42-128-8.1. The monitoring agent
shall provide a listing of the eligible units to Rhode Island Housing, who shall provide a report as
to the qualifying mobile or manufactured homes under this subsection (9) to the governor, speaker
of the house of representatives, senate president, and secretary of housing on an annual basis,
beginning on or before December 31, 2025.
(iii) Low- or moderate-income housing also includes rental property located within a
municipality that is secured with a federal government rental assistance voucher.
(iv) For the period beginning on or after July 1, 2024, any housing unit that qualifies as
low- or moderate-income housing under this subsection (9) and under § 42-128-8.1 and any rental
property secured with a federal government rental assistance voucher that does not otherwise meet
the other requirements to qualify as low- or moderate-income housing under this section shall be
counted as one whole unit toward the municipality's requirement for low- or moderate-income
housing, as long as a municipality confirms with the issuing authority that the voucher is in good
standing and active.
(10) "Meeting local housing needs" means as a result of the adoption of the implementation
program of an approved affordable housing plan, the absence of unreasonable denial of applications
that are made pursuant to an approved affordable housing plan in order to accomplish the purposes
and expectations of the approved affordable housing plan, and a showing that at least twenty percent
(20%) of the total residential units approved by a local review board or any other municipal board
in a calendar year are for low- and moderate-income housing as defined in § 42-128-8.1.
(11) "Monitoring agents" means those monitoring agents appointed by the Rhode Island
housing resources commission executive office of housing pursuant to § 45-53-3.2 and to provide
the monitoring and oversight set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, §§ 45-53-3.2
and 45-53-4.
(12) "Municipal government subsidy" means assistance that is made available through a
city or town program sufficient to make housing affordable, as affordable housing is defined in §
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -66-)

42-128-8.1(d)(1); such assistance shall include a combination of, but is not limited to, direct
financial support, abatement of taxes, waiver of fees and charges, and approval of density bonuses
and/or internal subsidies, zoning incentives, and adjustments as defined in this section and any
combination of forms of assistance.
45-53-3.2. Approved monitoring agent program.
(a) There is hereby established an approved monitoring agent program (the "program").
Effective July 1, 2022, the Rhode Island housing resources commission (the "commission")
established pursuant to chapter 128 of title 42 shall appoint and oversee approved monitoring agents
as part of this program.
(b) On or before July 1, 2023, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures") for the implementation of the
program, which shall include a process for the selection and approval of monitoring agents. These
rules and regulations shall be prepared to ensure the selection and appointment of organizations
that shall be capable of monitoring and ensuring that municipally subsidized housing developments
remain affordable, and that income-eligible buyers and tenants are occupying these units. The
commission shall appoint these monitoring agents, who shall serve for terms of not more than five
(5) consecutive years; provided that, the term of an approved monitoring agent may be renewed by
the commission.
(c) As used in this section, the term "LMI" means low- and moderate-income housing and
includes area median-income levels as established by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development ("HUD").
(d) Specific duties of approved monitoring agents shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) To oversee, monitor, and ensure that tenants in LMI rental units meet income limits
annually and that monthly rental rates are consistent with the low- and moderate-income guidelines
and the recorded deed restrictions;
(2) To oversee, monitor, and ensure that LMI homeownership units continue to serve as
the owners' year-round principal residences; monitor and ensure that any proposed refinance of a
LMI unit during the period in which a deed restriction is in effect is in compliance with program
requirements: in the case of the resale of any LMI unit during the period in which a deed restriction
is in effect, the maximum sales price is consistent with the recorded deed restriction and that the
proposed buyer of the LMI unit meets the income limits as defined within the recorded deed
restriction;
(3) To oversee, monitor and ensure any LMI accessory dwelling unit being counted is in
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -67-)

compliance with the following requirements:
(i) An annual lease; and
(ii) The accessory dwelling unit is occupied by a household whose income does not exceed
eighty percent (80%) of the area median income (AMI), adjusted for family size; and
(iii) The cost of rent, heat, and utilities other than telephone, cable, and internet, based on
the number of the bedrooms in the unit does not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the gross annual
household income for a household with eighty percent (80%) or less of area median income,
adjusted for family size as certified by the selected approved monitoring agent;
(4) Any other provision contained in chapter 24 of this title that reasonably relates to
affordable housing compliance and enforcement; and
(5) Such other duties as the commission sets forth in its rules and regulations for the
monitoring agents.
(e) The commission shall also promulgate rules and regulations providing for the terms of
engagement of the approved monitoring agents, standards for approval and recertification of the
approved monitoring agents, and establish reporting requirements for the approved monitoring
agents to the commission.
(f) Commencing on or before January 1, 2023, and on or before January 1 thereafter, the
commission shall prepare a report on the approved monitoring agent program to the governor, the
speaker of the house, the president of the senate, and the secretary of housing. Effective July 1,
2025, all responsibilities of the commission related to the program shall be transferred to the
executive office of housing.
45-53-11. Annual comprehensive permit report.
(a) The department executive office of housing ("executive office") shall maintain records
and shall prepare a report ("report") on an annual basis to be submitted to the speaker of the house,
and the president of the senate, and the housing resources commission. The report shall also be
made available on the department's executive office's website for a period of at least three (3) years,
and shall also be deemed to be a public record. The report shall be due on or before March 15, of
each year, commencing in calendar year 2023.
(b) The report required by this section shall contain the following for the preceding twelve-
month (12) calendar period covered by the report:
(1) The number of letters of eligibility issued for low- and moderate-income housing for
applications made pursuant to this chapter and § 42-55-5.3, the federal, state, and municipal subsidy
programs under which they were eligible, and the number of proposed subsidized units involved,
by city and town, during the preceding calendar year, as provided by the Rhode Island housing
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -68-)

corporation.
(2) The status of each comprehensive permit application for which a letter of eligibility
was issued disaggregated by municipality.
(3) The number of comprehensive permit applications that have had building permits
issued, including the number of market rate housing units, the number of low- and moderate-
income housing units, and the AMI restrictions associated both pursuant to § 45-53-4, aggregated
by the total number of such applications in the state and disaggregated by each municipality in the
state.
(4) The number of comprehensive permit applications that have had certificates of
occupancy issued, aggregated by the total number of such applications in the state and
disaggregated by each municipality in the state.
(c) Each municipality shall annually provide to the department executive office the
information on comprehensive permit activity described in subsection (b) of this section by
February 1.
45-53-12. Annual report.
(a) The Rhode Island housing corporation established pursuant to chapter 55 of title 42 (the
"corporation") shall collect data on the number of Section 8 Housing Choice Vouchers, as
authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 1437(f) ("vouchers"), that are received and utilized by the public housing
authorities (PHA) and agencies.
(b)(a) The office of housing and community development (OHCD) executive office of
housing shall prepare a report ("report") on an annual basis to the general assembly, the housing
resources commission, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, and the
division of statewide planning, and the secretary of housing. The report required by this section
shall be made available on the OHCD executive office of housing website for a period of at least
three (3) years, and shall be deemed to be a public record. The report shall be due on or before
March 1 April 15 of each year, commencing in the calendar year 2023.
(c)(b) The annual report required by this section shall contain the following information
for the twelve-month (12) calendar period covered by the report commencing January 1, 2022,
through December 31, 2022, and annually thereafter on an aggregated and disaggregated basis by
each public housing authority:
(1) The total amount of fees in lieu collected by each municipality from developers in lieu
of development of low- and moderate-income housing as defined in § 45-24-46.1, the projects that
were provided funding by the fees, the amounts allocated to the projects, and the number of units
created. The information required by this subsection shall be provided by all municipalities directly
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -69-)

to the executive office of housing.
(2) The number of unfunded vouchers that result either due to cost of rent or due to an
unavailability of housing units amount of "leasing potential" as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development. The information required by this subsection shall
be provided by all public housing authorities or agencies directly to the office of housing and
community development (OHCD) executive office of housing.
(3) The total number of vouchers received and utilized by all public housing authorities in
the state during the preceding calendar year.
(4) The administrative fees received and utilized by the public housing authorities to
administer the vouchers.
(d)(c) As used herein, the term "public housing authority and agency" means and includes
any public housing authority or agency established under chapter 25 of this title or chapter 26 of
this title.
45-53-15. Annual reports.
(a) The Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation established pursuant to §
42-55-4 (the "corporation") shall provide the annual reports pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of
this section to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the housing resources
commission, the division of statewide planning, and the secretary of housing. Reports shall be made
available on the corporation's website for a period of at least three (3) years, and shall be deemed
to be a public record. Reports shall be due on or before March 15, of each year, commencing in the
calendar year 2023.
(b) Report on Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation housing
development and preservation activity. This report shall include the following information:
(1) The identity of projects that have been provided funding by the corporation for housing
development or preservation and that closed on that financing by December 31 of the previous
calendar year;
(2) The total aggregate of funds, in dollar amounts, that have been provided to projects by
the corporation for housing development or preservation and that closed on that financing by
December 31, of the previous calendar year, as well as those amounts disaggregated by each
project; and
(3) The number of housing units that received funding from the corporation for housing
development or preservation that received a certificate of occupancy in the previous calendar year,
both in total and disaggregated by project.
(c) Report on tax payments made by affordable housing developments to municipalities
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -70-)

pursuant to § 44-5-13.11. This report shall include data aggregated by all the municipalities and
disaggregated by each individual municipality on the total amount of fees collected in the previous
calendar year by municipalities on any assessment and taxation made pursuant to § 44-5-13.11.
(d) With regard to the report in subsection (c) of this section, all municipalities in the state
shall annually submit to the corporation by January 15, of each year, the total amount of fees
collected in the previous calendar year by the municipality on any assessment and taxation made
pursuant to § 44-5-13.11 disaggregated by individual development.
SECTION 18. Section 45-53-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-53 entitled "Low and
Moderate Income Housing" is hereby repealed.
45-53-13. Annual status report on appeals.
(a) The Rhode Island housing resources commission established pursuant to chapter 128
of title 42 (the "commission") shall maintain accurate records and shall prepare an annual status
report ("status report") on all active cases and appeals pending before the state housing appeals
board (the "board"). The status report shall be forwarded to the secretary of housing, the speaker of
the house, and the president of the senate. Each report shall also be made available on the
commission's website for a period of at least three (3) years, and shall also be deemed to be a public
record. The report shall be due on or before March 15 of each year, commencing in the calendar
year 2023.
(b) The report required by this section shall contain the following information for the
twelve-month (12) calendar period covered by the report:
(1) The total number of appeals pending before the board;
(2) The number of appeals for which a decision has been rendered, have been settled by
agreement, or have otherwise been disposed of during the previous calendar year;
(3) The number of board decisions which were appealed in the previous calendar year and
the status of those cases; and
(4) The length of time for the board to decide appeals in the previous calendar year
aggregated by:
(i) Appeals decided by the board within six (6) months;
(ii) Appeals decided by the board within six (6) to nine (9) months; and
(iii) Appeals decided by the board in more than nine (9) months.
SECTION 19. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art9
RELATING TO HOUSING
(Page -71-)

=======
art.010/6/010/5/010/4/010/3/010/2/010/1
=======
ARTICLE 10

RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 1. Sections 23-14.1-2, 23-14.1-3, 23-14.1-4, 23-14.1-5, 23-14.1-6, 23-14.1-8
and 23-14.1-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-14.1 entitled "Health Professional Loan
Repayment Program" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-14.1-2. Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter, the following words and terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) “Board” means the health professional loan repayment board.
(2) “Commissioner” means the commissioner of postsecondary education.
(3)(2) “Community health center” means a healthcare facility as defined and licensed under
chapter 17 of this title.
(4)(3) “Division” "Department" means the Rhode Island division of higher education
assistance department of health.
(5)(4) "Director" means the director of the Rhode Island department of health.
(5) “Eligible health professional” means a physician, dentist, dental hygienist, nurse
practitioner, certified nurse midwife, physician assistant, or any other eligible healthcare
professional under § 338A of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 254l, licensed in the state
who has entered into a contract with the board to serve medically underserved populations.
(6) “Loan repayment” means an amount of money to be repaid to satisfy loan obligations
incurred to obtain a degree or certification in an eligible health profession as defined in subdivision
(5).
23-14.1-3. Health professional loan repayment program established.
There is established within the division department, to be administered by the
commissioner director, the health professional loan repayment program whose purpose shall be to
provide support the recruitment and retention of high-quality health professionals working with
underserved populations in identified health professional shortage areas (HPSAs) by providing loan
repayment to eligible health professionals to defray the cost of their professional education.
23-14.1-4. Health professional loan repayment board.
(a) There is created the health professional loan repayment board, which shall consist of

the director of the department of health and eight (8) nine (9) members appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall give due consideration to any
recommendations for nominations submitted to him or her by the department, the Rhode Island
Medical Society; the Rhode Island Dental Association; the Rhode Island Health Center
Association; the dean of the Brown University Medical School; the dean of the College of Nursing
at the University of Rhode Island; the Rhode Island State Nurses’ Association; the Hospital
Association of Rhode Island; the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance office of the
postsecondary commissioner. All appointed members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and
shall receive no compensation for their services. Board members shall be eligible to succeed
themselves.
(b) The director of the department of health shall serve as chairperson. The board shall
elect such other officers as it deems necessary from among its members. All meetings shall be
called by the chairperson.
(c) Members of the board shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions of
§ 36-1-7 and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to
capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
23-14.1-5. Duties of the board.
The board shall:
(1) Determine which areas of the state shall be eligible to participate in the loan repayment
program each year, based on health professional shortage area designations.
(2) Receive and consider all applications for loan repayment made by eligible health
professionals.
(3) Conduct a careful and full investigation of the ability, character, financial needs, and
qualifications of each applicant.
(4) Consider the intent of the applicant to practice in a health professional shortage area
and to adhere to all the requirements for participation in the loan repayment program.
(5) Submit to the commissioner director a list of those individuals eligible for loan
repayment and amount of loan repayment to be granted.
(6) Promulgate rules and regulations to ensure an effective implementation and
administration of the program.
(7) Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall approve and
submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president
of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall
provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -2-)

minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, applications considered and their disposition, rules
or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, polices and plans developed, approved, or modified,
and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and
expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a
summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance
during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis
of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the committee; a summary of
any training courses held pursuant to this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the
upcoming fiscal year, and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be
posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to
the provisions of § 42-20-8.2. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible
for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.
(8) Conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6)
months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the
board, be approved by the board, and be conducted by the chair of the board. The board may
approve the use of any board and/or staff members and/or individuals to assist with training. The
training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title
42, chapter 14 of title 36, chapter 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director
of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of June 16, 2006, prepare and
disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title
36, chapter 2 of title 38.
23-14.1-6. Duties of the commissioner Duties of the director.
The commissioner director shall:
(1) Grant loan repayments to successful applicants as determined by the board.
(2) Enter into contracts, on behalf of the division department with each successful
applicant, reflecting the purpose and intent of this chapter.
(3) Be authorized to implement legal proceedings against eligible health professionals
participating in the Rhode Island health professional loan repayment program determined by the
director to be in default or breach of contract.
23-14.1-8. Contracts required.
Prior to being granted loan repayment, each eligible health professional shall enter into a
contract with the division department agreeing to the terms and conditions upon which the loan
repayment is granted. The contract shall include any provisions that are required to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter and those deemed advisable by the commissioner director.
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -3-)

23-14.1-9. Penalty for failure to complete contract.
(a) If the recipient of a loan repayment fails, without justifiable cause, to practice pursuant
to the terms and conditions of his or her contract with the division, a penalty for the failure to
complete the contract will be imposed. If the recipient fails to complete the period of obligated
service, he or she shall be liable to the state of Rhode Island for If the eligible health professional
fails to begin or fails to complete service, they will incur a debt to the State in an amount not less
than the damages that would be owed under the National Health Service Corps Loan Repayment
Program default provisions pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 6(A), Subchapter II, Part D, Subpart iii, § 254o.
Upon determination by the director, if that the eligible health professional has failed to fulfill the
terms and conditions of the contract, and no exception has been determined under subsection (c)
the eligible health professional shall pay an amount equal to the sum of the following:
(1) An amount equal to the total paid on behalf of the recipient The total of the amounts
paid by the director on behalf of the eligible health professional for any period of obligated service
not served; and
(2) An unserved obligation penalty equal to the number of months of obligated service not
completed by the recipient multiplied by one thousand dollars ($1,000) An amount equal to the
number of months of obligated service not served, multiplied by seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($7,500); and
(3) Interest on the above amounts at the maximum legal prevailing rate, as determined by
the Treasurer of the United States, from the date of breach; except that the amount to recover will
not be less than thirty one thousand dollars ($31,000).
(b) If the recipient fails to complete one year of service, he or she shall be liable to the state
of Rhode Island for:
(1) An amount equal to the total paid on behalf of the recipient; and
(2) An unserved obligation penalty equal to the number of months in the full period
multiplied by one thousand dollars ($1,000). All payments pursuant to § 23-14.1-9 (a)(1), (a)(2),
and (a)(3) hereof shall be made to the State of Rhode Island, for the benefit of the Rhode Island
health professional loan repayment program, within one year after being notified by the director in
writing that the eligible health professional has failed to abide by the terms and conditions of their
contract. The director is authorized to recover payments and/or penalties and return the funds to the
Rhode Island health professional loan repayment program to avoid having the amounts deducted
from the department’s federal grant by the federal grant funding authority. Eligible health
professionals are considered to be in default or breach if they do not complete the period of
obligated service at an eligible site in accordance with their contract, or otherwise fail to comply
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -4-)

with the terms of their contract, even if no monies have yet been disbursed to or on behalf of the
participant.
(c) Any amount owed shall be paid to the state of Rhode Island within one year of the date
that the recipient is in breach of contract.
(d)(c) Where the commissioner director, subject to the approval of the board and/or as
defined in regulation, determines that there exists justifiable cause for the failure of a recipient to
practice pursuant to the terms and conditions of the contract, he or she may relieve the recipient of
the obligation to fulfill any or all of the terms of the contract.
SECTION 2. Sections 23-17.5-32, 23-17.5-33 and 23-17.5-34 of the General Laws in
Chapter 23-17.5 entitled "Rights of Nursing Home Patients" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17.5-32. Minimum staffing levels.
(a) Each facility shall have the necessary nursing service personnel (licensed and non-
licensed) in sufficient numbers on a twenty-four (24) hour basis, to assess the needs of residents,
to develop and implement resident care plans, to provide direct resident care services, and to
perform other related activities to maintain the health, safety, and welfare of residents. The facility
shall have a registered nurse on the premises twenty-four (24) hours a day.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) “Direct caregiver” means a person who receives monetary compensation as an
employee of the nursing facility or a subcontractor as a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse,
a medication technician, a certified nurse assistant, a licensed physical therapist, a licensed
occupational therapist, a licensed speech-language pathologist, a mental health worker who is also
a certified nurse assistant, or a physical therapist assistant, social worker, or any nurse aide with a
valid license, even if it is probationary.
(2) “Hours of direct nursing care” means the actual hours of work performed per patient
day by a direct caregiver.
(c)(i) Commencing on January 1, 2022 2026, nursing facilities shall provide a quarterly
minimum average of three and fifty-eight hundredths (3.58) hours of direct nursing care per
resident, per day, of which at least two and forty-four hundredths (2.44) hours shall be provided by
certified nurse assistants.
(ii) Commencing on January 1, 2023, nursing facilities shall provide a quarterly minimum
of three and eighty-one hundredths (3.81) hours of direct nursing care per resident, per day, of
which at least two and six-tenths (2.6) hours shall be provided by certified nurse assistants.
(d) Director of nursing hours and nursing staff hours spent on administrative duties or non-
direct caregiving tasks are excluded and may not be counted toward compliance with the minimum
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -5-)

staffing hours requirement in this section.
(e) The minimum hours of direct nursing care requirements shall be minimum standards
only. Nursing facilities shall employ and schedule additional staff as needed to ensure quality
resident care based on the needs of individual residents and to ensure compliance with all relevant
state and federal staffing requirements.
(f) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to amend the Rhode Island code
of regulations in consultation with stakeholders to implement these minimum staffing requirements
on or before October 15, 2021.
(g) On or before January 1, 2024, and every five (5) years thereafter, the department shall
consult with consumers, consumer advocates, recognized collective bargaining agents, and
providers to determine the sufficiency of the staffing standards provided in this section and may
promulgate rules and regulations to increase the minimum staffing ratios to adequate levels.
23-17.5-33. Minimum staffing level compliance and enforcement program.
(a) Compliance determination.
(1) The department shall submit proposed rules and regulations for adoption by October
15, 2021, establishing a system for determining compliance with minimum staffing requirements
set forth in § 23-17.5-32.
(2) Compliance shall be determined quarterly by comparing the number of hours provided
per resident, per day using the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ payroll-based journal
and the facility’s daily census, as self-reported by the facility to the department on a quarterly basis.
(3) The department shall use the quarterly payroll-based journal and the self-reported
census to calculate the number of hours provided per resident, per day and compare this ratio to the
minimum staffing standards required under § 23-17.5-32. Discrepancies between job titles
contained in § 23-17.5-32 and the payroll-based journal shall be addressed by rules and regulations.
(b) Monetary penalties.
(1) The department shall submit proposed rules and regulations for adoption on or before
October 15, 2021, implementing monetary penalty provisions for facilities not in compliance with
minimum staffing requirements set forth in § 23-17.5-32.
(2) Monetary penalties shall be imposed quarterly and shall be based on the latest quarter
for which the department has data.
(3) No monetary penalty may be issued for noncompliance with the increase in the standard
set forth in § 23-17.5-32(c)(ii) from January 1, 2023, to March 31, 2023. If a facility is found to be
noncompliant with the increase in the standard during the period that extends from January 1, 2023,
to March 31, 2023, the department shall provide a written notice identifying the staffing
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -6-)

deficiencies and require the facility to provide a sufficiently detailed correction plan to meet the
statutory minimum staffing levels.
(4) Monetary penalties shall be established based on a formula that calculates on a daily
basis the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours.
(5) All notices of noncompliance shall include the computations used to determine
noncompliance and establishing the variance between minimum staffing ratios and the
department’s computations.
(6) The penalty for the first offense shall be two hundred percent (200%) of the cost of
wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours. The penalty shall increase to two hundred fifty
percent (250%) of the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours for the second
offense and three hundred percent (300%) of the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing
hours for the third and all subsequent offenses.
(7) For facilities that have an offense in three (3) consecutive quarters, EOHHS shall deny
any further Medicaid Assistance payments with respect to all individuals entitled to benefits who
are admitted to the facility on or after January 1, 2022, or shall freeze admissions of new residents.
(c)(1) The penalty shall be imposed regardless of whether the facility has committed other
violations of this chapter during the same period that the staffing offense occurred.
(2) The penalty may not be waived except as provided in subsection (c)(3) of this section,
but the department shall have the discretion to determine the gravity of the violation in situations
where there is no more than a ten percent (10%) deviation from the staffing requirements and make
appropriate adjustments to the penalty.
(3) The department is granted discretion to waive the penalty when unforeseen
circumstances have occurred that resulted in call-offs of scheduled staff. This provision shall be
applied no more than two (2) times per calendar year.
(4) Nothing in this section diminishes a facility’s right to appeal pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 35 of title 42 (“administrative procedures”).
(d)(1) Pursuant to rules and regulations established by the department, funds that are
received from financial penalties shall be used for technical assistance or specialized direct care
staff training.
(2) The assessment of a penalty does not supplant the state’s investigation process or
issuance of deficiencies or citations under this title.
(3) A notice of noncompliance, whether or not the penalty is waived, and the penalty
assessment shall be prominently posted in the nursing facility and included on the department’s
website.
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -7-)

(a) Retroactive application:
(1) All fines or penalties incurred prior to January 1, 2026, are hereby forgiven, and any
enforcement actions, including fines and penalties, shall commence only for violations occurring
on or after January 1, 2026.
(b) Compliance determination:
(1) Compliance shall be determined quarterly by comparing staffing data from the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ (CMS) payroll-based journal and the facility’s daily census,
as self-reported to the department.
(2) Discrepancies between job titles and payroll-based journal entries shall be addressed
by departmental regulations.
(c) Staffing level compliance payment adjustments:
(1) Facilities failing to meet minimum staffing requirements shall face a fine in the
following quarter valued at three percent (3%) of the total of Medicaid reimbursements, calculated
based on the most recent financial period.
(d) Corrective action plan:
(1) Facilities found non-compliant will receive a thirty (30) day corrective notice.
(2) If compliance is not achieved within thirty (30) days, payment reductions shall be
enforced.
(e) Waiver provision:
(1) The department shall waive fines for facilities that demonstrate high quality care. To
qualify for a waiver, a facility must meet at least one of the following criteria:
(i) Substantial compliance: During the last three (3) consecutive survey cycles, the facility
received no substandard quality of care/immediate jeopardy deficiencies and was not placed under
compliance orders, temporary management or quality monitoring; or
(ii) Acuity criterion: A facility is considered to serve a lower-acuity resident population if
its Nursing Case-Mix Index ranks in the lowest twenty-five percent (25%) of all Medicaid-
participating nursing homes. The lowest twenty-five percent (25%) is determined by multiplying
the current total number of Medicaid-participating nursing homes by twenty-five hundredths (0.25)
and rounding up to the nearest whole number; or
(iii) If the facility achieved compliance for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of operating
days in the quarter.
(f) Recovered funds:
(1) Funds recovered through payment adjustments shall be allocated to:
(i) Workforce development programs aimed at enhancing the recruitment, training, and
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -8-)

retention of direct care staff.
(ii) Compliance assistance programs designed to provide technical support to
underperforming facilities.
(g) Implementation and oversight:
(1) The department shall issue regulations to implement these provisions, with a transition
period of six (6) months provided to allow facilities to meet the new requirements.
(2) The department shall provide public reports on facility compliance, staffing levels, and
payment adjustments on a quarterly basis.
(3) Nursing home facilities shall provide a list of all licensed staff, including name, license,
and home addresses, to the department upon renewal of the nursing home operator license or when
there is a change in effective control of the nursing home facility. Failure to provide the required
list within thirty (30) days of the renewal or change in effective control shall result in a direct
monetary fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.
(h) Audit requirements
(1) EOHHS shall conduct a financial and billing audit of any Medicaid‐participating
nursing home that, for four (4) consecutive quarters, has both:
(i) Failed to meet the state safe-staffing standard; and
(ii) Not qualified for a waiver under § 23-17.5-33(e).
(2) EOHHS shall initiate such audit within twelve (12) months following the end of the
fourth consecutive quarter of non-compliance.
(i) Public reporting.
(1) Within thirty (30) days after completing any audit under subsection (f)(1), EOHHS
shall publish on its website a report that includes, for each audited facility:
(i) The quarter(s) audited;
(ii) Key audit findings and any identified overpayments;
(iii) Amounts recovered and corrective actions taken.
23-17.5-34. Nursing staff posting requirements.
(a) Each nursing facility shall post its daily direct care nurse staff levels by shift in a public
place within the nursing facility that is readily accessible to and visible by residents, employees,
and visitors. The posting shall be accurate to the actual number of direct care nursing staff on duty
for each shift per day. The posting shall be in a format prescribed by the director, to include:
(1) The number of registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nursing assistants,
medication technicians, licensed physical therapists, licensed occupational therapists, licensed
speech-language pathologists, mental health workers who are also certified nurse assistants, and
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -9-)

physical therapist assistants, social workers, or any nurse aide with a valid license, even if it is
probationary;
(2) The number of temporary, outside agency nursing staff;
(3) The resident census as of twelve o’clock (12:00) a.m.; and
(4) Documentation of the use of unpaid eating assistants (if utilized by the nursing facility
on that date).
(b) The posting information shall be maintained on file by the nursing facility for no less
than three (3) years and shall be made available to the public upon request.
(c) Each nursing facility shall report the information compiled pursuant to section (a) of
this section and in accordance with department of health regulations to the department of health on
a quarterly basis in an electronic format prescribed by the director. The director shall make this
information available to the public on a quarterly basis on the department of health website,
accompanied by a written explanation to assist members of the public in interpreting the
information reported pursuant to this section.
(d) In addition to the daily direct nurse staffing level reports, each nursing facility shall
post the following information in a legible format and in a conspicuous place readily accessible to
and visible by residents, employees, and visitors of the nursing facility:
(1) The minimum number of nursing facility direct care staff per shift that is required to
comply with the minimum staffing level requirements in § 23-17.5-32; and
(2) The telephone number or internet website that a resident, employee, or visitor of the
nursing facility may use to report a suspected violation by the nursing facility of a regulatory
requirement concerning staffing levels and direct patient care.
(e) No nursing facility shall discharge or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against
any resident of any nursing facility, or any relative, guardian, conservator, or sponsoring agency
thereof or against any employee of any nursing facility or against any other person because the
resident, relative, guardian, conservator, sponsoring agency, employee, or other person has filed
any complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under this chapter, or has
testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of the exercise by the resident,
relative, guardian, conservator, sponsoring agency, employee, or other person on behalf of himself,
herself, or others of any right afforded by §§ 23-17.5-32, 23-17.5-33, and 23-17.5-34.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any nursing facility that violates any
provision of this section shall:
(1) Be liable to the injured party for treble damages; and
(2)(i) Reinstate the employee, if the employee was terminated from employment in
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -10-)

violation of any provision of this section; or
(ii) Restore the resident to the resident’s living situation prior to such discrimination or
retaliation, including the resident’s housing arrangement or other living conditions within the
nursing facility, as appropriate, if the resident’s living situation was changed in violation of any
provision of this section. For purposes of this section, “discriminate or retaliate” includes, but is
not limited to, the discharge, demotion, suspension, or any other detrimental change in terms or
conditions of employment or residency, or the threat of any such action.
(f)(1) The nursing facility shall prepare an annual report showing the average daily direct
care nurse staffing level for the nursing facility by shift and by category of nurse to include:
(i) Registered nurses;
(ii) Licensed practical nurses;
(iii) Certified nursing assistants;
(iv) Medication technicians;
(v) Licensed physical therapists;
(vi) Licensed occupational therapists;
(vii) Licensed speech-language pathologists;
(viii) Mental health workers who are also certified nurse assistants;
(ix) Physical therapist assistants;
(x) Social workers; or
(xi) Any nurse aide with a valid license, even if it is probationary.
(x)(xii) The use of registered and licensed practical nurses and certified nursing assistant
staff from temporary placement agencies; and
(xi)(xiii) The nurse and certified nurse assistant turnover rates.
(2) The annual report shall be submitted with the nursing facility’s renewal application and
provide data for the previous twelve (12) months and ending on or after September 30, for the year
preceding the license renewal year. Annual reports shall be submitted in a format prescribed by the
director.
(g) The information on nurse staffing shall be reviewed as part of the nursing facility’s
annual licensing survey and shall be available to the public, both in printed form and on the
department’s website, by nursing facility.
(h) The director of nurses may act as a charge nurse only when the nursing facility is
licensed for thirty (30) beds or less.
(i) Whenever the licensing agency determines, in the course of inspecting a nursing facility,
that additional staffing is necessary on any residential area to provide adequate nursing care and
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -11-)

treatment or to ensure the safety of residents, the licensing agency may require the nursing facility
to provide such additional staffing and any or all of the following actions shall be taken to enforce
compliance with the determination of the licensing agency:
(1) The nursing facility shall be cited for a deficiency and shall be required to augment its
staff within ten (10) days in accordance with the determination of the licensing agency;
(2) If failure to augment staffing is cited, the nursing facility shall be required to curtail
admission to the nursing facility;
(3) If a continued failure to augment staffing is cited, the nursing facility shall be subjected
to an immediate compliance order to increase the staffing, in accordance with § 23-1-21; or
(4) The sequence and inclusion or non-inclusion of the specific sanctions may be modified
in accordance with the severity of the deficiency in terms of its impact on the quality of resident
care.
(j) No nursing staff of any nursing facility shall be regularly scheduled for double shifts.
(k) A nursing facility that fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or any rules
or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a penalty as determined by the
department.
SECTION 3. Section 30-25-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-25 entitled "Burial of
Veterans" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-25-14. Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery.
(a) The Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery, located on the grounds of the Joseph
H. Ladd school in the town of Exeter, shall be under the management and control of the director of
the department of human services. The director of the department of human services shall appoint
an administrator for the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery who shall be an honorably
discharged veteran of the United States Armed Forces and shall have the general supervision over,
and shall prescribe rules for, the government and management of the cemetery. The administrator
shall make all needful rules and regulations governing the operation of the cemetery and generally
may do all things necessary to ensure the successful operation thereof. The director shall
promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of 38 U.S.C. § 2402, to
govern the eligibility for burial in the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. In addition to all
persons eligible for burial pursuant to rules and regulations established by the director, any person
who served in the army, navy, air force, or marine corps of the United States for a period of not
less than two (2) years and whose service was terminated honorably, shall be eligible for burial in
the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. The director shall appoint and employ all
subordinate officials and persons needed for the proper management of the cemetery. National
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -12-)

guard members who are killed in the line of duty or who are honorably discharged after completion
of at least six (6) years of service in the Rhode Island national guard and/or reserve and their spouse
shall be eligible for interment in the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. National guard
members and/or reservists who are honorably discharged after completion of at least six (6) years
of service with another state, and who are a Rhode Island resident for at least two (2) consecutive
years immediately prior to death, shall be eligible, along with their spouse, for interment in the
Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. For the purpose of computing service under this
section, honorable service in the active forces or reserves shall be considered toward the six (6)
years of national guard service. The general assembly shall make an annual appropriation to the
department of human services to provide for the operation and maintenance for the cemetery. The
director shall may charge and collect a grave liner fee per interment of the eligible spouse and/or
eligible dependents of the qualified veteran, national guard member, and/or reservist equal to the
department’s cost for the grave liner. The director may promulgate rules and regulations necessary
to fulfill the intent of this chapter.
(b) No domestic animal shall be allowed on the grounds of the Rhode Island veterans’
memorial cemetery, whether at large or under restraint, except for seeing eye guide dogs, hearing
ear signal dogs or any other service animal, as required by federal law or any personal assistance
animal, as required by chapter 9.1 of title 40. Any person who violates the provisions of this section
shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).
(c) The state of Rhode Island office of veterans services shall bear the cost of all tolls
incurred by any motor vehicles that are part of a veteran’s funeral procession, originating from
Aquidneck Island ending at the veterans’ memorial cemetery, for burial or internment. The
executive director of the turnpike and bridge authority shall assist in the administration and
coordination of this toll reimbursement program.
SECTION 4. Section 40-5.2-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-5.2-20. Childcare assistance — Families or assistance units eligible. [Effective
January 1, 2025.]
(a) The department shall provide appropriate child care to every participant who is eligible
for cash assistance and who requires child care in order to meet the work requirements in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) Low-income child care. The department shall provide child care to all other working
families with incomes at or below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal poverty
level if, and to the extent, these other families require child care in order to work at paid
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -13-)

employment as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. The department shall also provide
child care to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal
poverty level if, and to the extent, these families require child care to participate on a short-term
basis, as defined in the department’s rules and regulations, in training, apprenticeship, internship,
on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other job-readiness/job-attachment
program sponsored or funded by the human resource investment council (governor’s workforce
board) or state agencies that are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to § 42-102-11.
Effective from January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare
assistance to families with incomes below one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal poverty
level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain
enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education provided that eligibility to
receive funding is capped when expenditures reach $200,000 for this provision. Effective July 1,
2022 through December 31, 2024, the department shall also provide childcare assistance to families
with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level when such assistance
is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island
public institution of higher education. Effective January 1, 2025, the department shall also provide
childcare assistance to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the
federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or
maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.
(c) No family/assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter if
the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which
corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth
in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. Liquid resources are defined as any
interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or accounts that are readily
convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These include, but are not limited to: cash, bank, credit
union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money market accounts; certificates of
deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and other similar financial instruments
or accounts. These do not include educational savings accounts, plans, or programs; retirement
accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with another adult, not including a spouse.
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to determine the ownership and
source of the funds in the joint account.
(d) As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or
caretaker relative of the family must consent to, and must cooperate with, the department in
establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -14-)

orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in
accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker
relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care, including infant,
toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school-age, that is provided by a person or organization
qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies designated
to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth herein.
(f)(1) Families with incomes below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable federal
poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free child care. Families with incomes greater than
one hundred percent (100%) and less than two hundred percent (200%) of the applicable federal
poverty guideline shall be required to pay for some portion of the child care they receive, according
to a sliding-fee scale adopted by the department in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section.
(2) Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for
childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding two hundred sixty-one percent (261%)
of the applicable federal poverty guidelines shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance
until their incomes exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal poverty
guidelines. To be eligible, the families must continue to pay for some portion of the child care they
receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section, and in accordance with all other
eligibility standards.
(g) In determining the type of child care to be provided to a family, the department shall
take into account the cost of available childcare options; the suitability of the type of care available
for the child; and the parent’s preference as to the type of child care.
(h) For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §
40-5.2-11 means gross, earned income and unearned income, subject to the income exclusions in
§§ 40-5.2-10(g)(2) and 40-5.2-10(g)(3), and income for other families shall mean gross, earned and
unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.
(i) The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast
the expenditures for child care in accordance with the provisions of § 35-17-1.
(j) In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve
components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family
composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior
to the month of leaving for active duty. This shall continue until the individual is officially
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -15-)

discharged from active duty.
(k) Effective from August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2025 2028, the department shall
provide funding for child care for eligible childcare educators, and childcare staff, who work at
least twenty (20) hours a week in licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare homes
as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. Eligibility is limited to qualifying childcare
educators and childcare staff with family incomes up to three hundred percent (300%) of the
applicable federal poverty guidelines and will have no copayments. Qualifying participants may
select the childcare center or family childcare home for their children. The department shall
promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section, and will collect applicant and
participant data to report estimated demand for state-funded child care for eligible childcare
educators and childcare staff. The report shall be due annually to the governor and the general
assembly by November 1, 2024.
SECTION 5. Section 40-6-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-6 entitled "Public
Assistance Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-6-8. Supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP).
(a) The department shall have the responsibility to administer the food stamp program for
the state in compliance with the provisions of the federal Food Stamp Act of 1964, as amended, 7
U.S.C. § 2011 et seq. The supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) is and shall be the
new title of the program formerly known as the food stamp program. All references in the Rhode
Island general laws to food stamps shall be deemed to mean, apply to, refer to, and be interpreted
in accordance with the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP).
(b) The department is empowered and authorized to submit its plan for food stamps to the
federal government, or any agency or department of it, as follows:
(1) The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the submission and
approval of a plan, and may make any arrangement or changes in its plan not inconsistent with this
chapter that may be required by the Food Stamp Act or the rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to it to obtain and retain such approval and to secure for this state the benefits of the
provisions of the federal act relating to food stamps;
(2) The department shall make reports to the federal government, or any agency or
department of it, in the form and nature required by it, and in all respects comply with any request
or direction of the federal government, or any agency or department of it, that may be necessary to
assure the correctness and verification of the reports; and
(3) The department shall develop a plan to streamline the application, certification, and
recertification process for SNAP beneficiaries aged sixty (60) years and over.
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -16-)

(c) The department is authorized and directed to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the
state’s share of the administrative cost involved in the operation of the food stamp program.
(d) No person shall be ineligible for food stamp benefits due solely to the restricted
eligibility rules otherwise imposed by § 115(a)(2) of the Personal Responsibility and Work
Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-193), 21 U.S.C. § 862a(a)(2), and as this
section may hereafter be amended.
(e) To support a fiscally responsible and high-integrity Supplemental Nutritional
Assistance Program (SNAP), the Rhode Island department of human services (DHS), in
consultation with the department of administration, shall submit a plan with initial
recommendations to reduce the state's SNAP Payment Error Rate (PER) to below six percent (6%),
due on or before October 1, 2025, as part of the department's annual budget submission.
Starting January 18, 2026, DHS shall report monthly on implementation progress and
performance metrics as part of its existing legislative reporting framework. These updates shall be
incorporated into DHS's monthly House Oversight RIBridges Report to ensure transparency,
minimize administrative burden, and align progress tracking with the state's fiscal and policy
planning cycles. Updates will include: timeliness and accuracy indicators; status of technology
modernization efforts; staff training and readiness metrics; and the status of customer service
enhancements and any correspondence with the federal government related to Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program payment error rates and/or penalties.
SECTION 6. Section 40-6.2-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-6.2 entitled "Child
Care — State Subsidies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-6.2-1.1. Rates established.
(a) Through June 30, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth
and families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based
on the following schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the
average of the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates:
Licensed Childcare Centers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $182.00
Preschool $150.00
School-Age $135.00
Licensed Family Childcare Providers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $150.00
Preschool $150.00
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -17-)

School-Age $135.00
Effective July 1, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum
reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and
families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based on the
above schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the average of
the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates. These rates shall be increased by
ten dollars ($10.00) per week for infant/toddler care provided by licensed family childcare
providers and license-exempt providers and then the rates for all providers for all age groups shall
be increased by three percent (3%). For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, licensed childcare
centers shall be reimbursed a maximum weekly rate of one hundred ninety-three dollars and sixty-
four cents ($193.64) for infant/toddler care and one hundred sixty-one dollars and seventy-one
cents ($161.71) for preschool-age children.
(b) Effective July l, 2018, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum infant/toddler and preschool-age reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of
human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1.
(1) For infant/toddler child care, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half percent
(2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above
the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed twenty percent (20%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed thirty-three percent (33%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount.
(2) For preschool reimbursement rates, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half
percent (2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%)
above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed ten percent (10%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed twenty-one percent (21%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount.
(c) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 4.]
(d) By June 30, 2004, and biennially through June 30, 2014, the department of labor and
training shall conduct an independent survey or certify an independent survey of the then-current
weekly market rates for child care in Rhode Island and shall forward the weekly market rate survey
to the department of human services. The next survey shall be conducted by June 30, 2016, and
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -18-)

triennially thereafter. The departments of human services and labor and training will jointly
determine the survey criteria including, but not limited to, rate categories and sub-categories.
(e) In order to expand the accessibility and availability of quality child care, the department
of human services is authorized to establish, by regulation, alternative or incentive rates of
reimbursement for quality enhancements, innovative or specialized child care, and alternative
methodologies of childcare delivery, including nontraditional delivery systems and collaborations.
(f) Effective January 1, 2007, all childcare providers have the option to be paid every two
(2) weeks and have the option of automatic direct deposit and/or electronic funds transfer of
reimbursement payments.
(g) Effective July 1, 2019, the maximum infant/toddler reimbursement rates to be paid by
the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed family childcare
providers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has
achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Tier one shall be
reimbursed two percent (2%) above the prevailing base rate for step 1 and step 2 providers, three
percent (3%) above prevailing base rate for step 3 providers, and four percent (4%) above the
prevailing base rate for step 4 providers; tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the
prevailing base rate; tier three shall be reimbursed eleven percent (11%) above the prevailing base
rate; tier four shall be reimbursed fourteen percent (14%) above the prevailing base rate; and tier
five shall be reimbursed twenty-three percent (23%) above the prevailing base rate.
(h) Through December 31, 2021, the maximum reimbursement rates paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families to licensed childcare centers shall
be consistent with the enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $273.00
Preschool Age $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $260.00
School Age $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $245.00
The maximum reimbursement rates paid by the departments of human services, and
children, youth and families to licensed family childcare providers shall be consistent with the
enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43
Preschool Age $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45
School Age $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30
(i) Effective January 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -19-)

departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall
be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $236.36 $244.88 $257.15 $268.74 $284.39
Preschool $207.51 $212.27 $218.45 $223.50 $231.39
School-Age $180.38 $182.77 $185.17 $187.57 $189.97
The maximum reimbursement rates for licensed family childcare providers paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families is determined through collective
bargaining. The maximum reimbursement rates for infant/toddler and preschool age children paid
to licensed family childcare providers by both departments is implemented in a tiered manner that
reflects the quality rating the provider has achieved in accordance with § 42-12-23.1.
(j) Effective July 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $265 $270 $282 $289 $300
Preschool $225 $235 $243 $250 $260
School-Age $200 $205 $220 $238 $250
(k) Effective July 1, 2024, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschool $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
School-Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -20-)

(l) Effective July 1, 2025, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant $334 $341 $355 $364 $378
Toddlers $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschoolers $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
School Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
SECTION 7. Section 42-7.2-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.2 entitled "Office of
Health and Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.2-10. Appropriations and disbursements.
(a) The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The state controller is hereby
authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such
sum or sums, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her
of proper vouchers approved by the secretary of the executive office of health and human services,
or his or her designee.
(b) For the purpose of recording federal financial participation associated with qualifying
healthcare workforce development activities at the state’s public institutions of higher education,
and pursuant to the Rhode Island designated state health programs (DSHP), as approved by the
Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMC) October 20, 2016, in the 11-W-00242/1
amendment to Rhode Island’s section 1115 Demonstration Waiver, there is hereby established a
restricted-receipt account entitled “Health System Transformation Project” in the general fund of
the state and included in the budget of the office of health and human services.
(c) There are hereby created within the general fund of the state and housed within the
budget of the office of health and human services two restricted receipt accounts, respectively
entitled “HCBS Support-ARPA” and “HCBS Admin Support-ARPA”. Amounts deposited into
these accounts are equivalent to the general revenue savings generated by the enhanced federal
match received on eligible home and community-based services between April 1, 2021, and March
31, 2022, allowable under Section 9817 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Pub. L. No.
117-2. Funds deposited into the “HCBS Support-ARPA” account will be used to finance the state
share of newly eligible Medicaid expenditures by the office of health and human services and its
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -21-)

sister agencies, including the department of children, youth and families, the department of health,
and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. Funds
deposited into the “HCBS Admin Support-ARPA” account will be used to finance the state share
of allowable administrative expenditures attendant to the implementation of these newly eligible
Medicaid expenditures. The accounts created under this subsection shall be exempt from the
indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
(d) There is hereby created within the general fund of the state and housed within the budget
of the office of health and human services a restricted receipt account entitled “Rhode Island
Statewide Opioid Abatement Account” for the purpose of receiving and expending monies from
settlement agreements with opioid manufacturers, pharmaceutical distributors, pharmacies, or their
affiliates, as well as monies resulting from bankruptcy proceedings of the same entities. The
executive office of health and human services shall deposit any revenues from such sources that
are designated for opioid abatement purposes into the restricted receipt account. Funds from this
account shall only be used for forward-looking opioid abatement efforts as defined and limited by
any settlement agreements, state-city and town agreements, or court orders pertaining to the use of
such funds. By January 1 of each calendar year, the secretary of health and human services shall
report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and
the attorney general on the expenditures that were funded using monies from the Rhode Island
statewide opioid abatement account and the amount of funds spent. The account created under this
subsection shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27. No
governmental entity has the authority to assert a claim against the entities with which the attorney
general has entered into settlement agreements concerning the manufacturing, marketing,
distributing, or selling of opioids that are the subject of the Rhode Island Memorandum of
Understanding Between the State and Cities and Towns Receiving Opioid Settlement Funds
executed by every city and town and the attorney general and wherein every city and town agreed
to release all such claims against these settling entities, and any amendment thereto. Governmental
entity means any state or local governmental entity or sub-entity and includes, but is not limited to,
school districts, fire districts, and any other such districts. The claims that shall not be asserted are
the released claims, as that term is defined in the settlement agreements executed by the attorney
general, or, if not defined therein, the claims sought to be released in such settlement agreements.
(e) There is hereby created within the general fund of the state and housed within the budget
of the executive office of health and human services a restricted receipt account, respectively
entitled "Minimum Staffing Level Compliance and Enforcement". Funds deposited into the account
will be used for workforce development and compliance assistance programs as included in § 23-
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -22-)

17.5-33.
SECTION 8. Section 42-7.4-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.4 entitled "The
Healthcare Services Funding Plan Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.4-3. Imposition of healthcare services funding contribution. [As enacted in 2014.]
(a) Each insurer is required to pay the healthcare services funding contribution for each
contribution enrollee of the insurer at the time the contribution is calculated and paid, at the rate set
forth in this section.
(1) Beginning January 1, 2016, the secretary shall set the healthcare services funding
contribution each fiscal year in an amount equal to: (i) The child immunization funding requirement
described in § 23-1-46; plus (ii) The adult immunization funding requirement described in § 23-1-
46; plus (iii) The children’s health services funding requirement described in § 42-12-29; and all
as divided by (iv) The number of contribution enrollees of all insurers.
(2) The contribution set forth herein shall be in addition to any other fees or assessments
upon the insurer allowable by law.
(b) The contribution shall be paid by the insurer; provided, however, a person providing
health benefits coverage on a self-insurance basis that uses the services of a third-party
administrator shall not be required to make a contribution for a contribution enrollee where the
contribution on that enrollee has been or will be made by the third-party administrator.
(c) Beginning calendar year 2026, in addition to the assessment collection pursuant to
subsection (a), there shall be an additional amount assessed pursuant to (i) and (ii), to support
primary care and other critical healthcare programs totaling thirty million dollars ($30,000,000),
which shall be deposited as general revenues.
(c) The secretary shall create a process to facilitate the transition to the healthcare services
funding contribution method that: (i) assures adequate funding beginning July 1, 2016, (ii) reflects
that funding via the healthcare services funding contribution method initially will be for only a
portion of the state’s fiscal year, and (iii) avoids duplicate liability for any insurer that made a
payment under the premium assessment method in effect prior to January 1, 2016, for a period for
which it would also be liable for a contribution under the healthcare services funding contribution
method as described in this chapter.
42-7.4-3. Imposition of healthcare services funding contribution. [As amended by P.L.
2024, ch. 423, § 1; See Compiler’s Note.]
(a) Each insurer is required to pay the healthcare services funding contribution for each
contribution enrollee of the insurer at the time the contribution is calculated and paid, at the rate set
forth in this section.
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -23-)

(1) Beginning July 1, 2024, the secretary shall set the healthcare services funding
contribution each fiscal year in an amount equal to: (i) The child immunization funding requirement
described in § 23-1-46; plus (ii) The adult immunization funding requirement described in § 23-1-
46; plus (iii) The children’s health services funding requirement described in § 42-12-29; plus (iv)
The psychiatry resource network funding requirement described in § 23-1-46.1 and all as divided
by; (v) The number of contribution enrollees of all insurers.
(2) The contribution set forth herein shall be in addition to any other fees or assessments
upon the insurer allowable by law.
(b) The contribution shall be paid by the insurer; provided, however, a person providing
health benefits coverage on a self-insurance basis that uses the services of a third-party
administrator shall not be required to make a contribution for a contribution enrollee where the
contribution on that enrollee has been or will be made by the third-party administrator.
(c) The secretary shall create a process to facilitate the transition to the healthcare services
funding contribution method that: (i) assures adequate funding beginning July 1, 2016, (ii) reflects
that funding via the healthcare services funding contribution method initially will be for only a
portion of the state’s fiscal year, and (iii) avoids duplicate liability for any insurer that made a
payment under the premium assessment method in effect prior to January 1, 2016, for a period for
which it would also be liable for a contribution under the healthcare services funding contribution
method as described in this chapter.
SECTION 9. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art10
RELATING TO HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
(Page -24-)

=======
art.011/6/011/5/011/4
=======
ARTICLE 11 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 1. Sections 31-2-1 and 31-2-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-2 entitled
"Division of Motor Vehicles" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-2-1. Establishment — Duties — Chief of division.
Within the department of revenue there shall be a division of motor vehicles. The division
will be responsible for activities assigned to it by law, including, but not limited to, motor vehicle
registration, testing and licensing of motor vehicle operators, inspection of motor vehicles, and
enforcement of laws relating to the issuance, suspension and revocation of motor vehicle
registrations and drivers’ licenses. The division shall administer the financial responsibility law.
The chief of the division shall use the title and designation “registrar” or “administrator” on all
licenses, registrations, orders of suspensions, financial responsibility notices or orders, or any other
official documents issued or promulgated by the division. He or she shall exercise all powers and
duties prescribed by chapters 1 — 27 of this title and shall supervise and direct the promotion of
highway traffic safety.
On or before January l, 2027, the administrator in consultation with the department of
transportation is hereby directed to submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
general assembly regarding options to index or update fees charged in § 31-6-1 (27)(i) and any
other related changes for battery electric vehicles, plug-in hybrid electric vehicles, and hybrid
electric vehicles. The report at a minimum shall include information and practices in other states.
31-2-27. Technology surcharge fee.
(a) The division of motor vehicles shall collect a technology surcharge fee of two dollars
and fifty cents ($2.50) three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) per transaction for every division of
motor vehicles’ fee transaction, except as otherwise provided by law and provided no surcharge
fee is assessed on motor vehicle inspection transactions conducted pursuant to § 31-38-4. One
dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) collected pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the information technology investment fund established pursuant to
§ 42-11-2.5 and shall be used for project-related payments and/or ongoing maintenance of and
enhancements to the division of motor vehicles’ computer system and to reimburse the information
technology investment fund for advances made to cover project-related payments. The remaining

one dollar ($1.00) All technology surcharge fees collected pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into a restricted-receipt account managed by the division of motor vehicles and restricted
to the project-related payments and/or ongoing maintenance of and enhancements to the division
of motor vehicles’ computer system.
(b) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 1].
(c) Beginning July 1, 2022, the full two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be deposited
into the division of motor vehicles restricted account and restricted to the project-related payments
and/or ongoing maintenance of and enhancements to the division of motor vehicles’ computer
system.
SECTION 2. Section 31-6-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-6 entitled "Registration
Fees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-6-1. Amount of registration and miscellaneous fees.
The following registration fees shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for the
registration of motor vehicles, trailers, semi-trailers, and school buses subject to registration for
each year of registration:
(1) For the registration of every automobile, when equipped with pneumatic tires, the gross
weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty dollars ($30.00).
(2) For the registration of every motor truck or tractor when equipped with pneumatic tires,
the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty-four dollars
($34.00).
(3) For the registration of every automobile, motor truck or tractor, when equipped with
pneumatic tires, the gross weight of which is:
(i) More than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), but not more than five thousand pounds
(5,000 lbs.): forty dollars ($40.00);
(ii) More than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.), but not more than six thousand pounds
(6,000 lbs.): forty-eight dollars ($48.00);
(iii) More than six thousand pounds (6,000 lbs.), but not more than seven thousand pounds
(7,000 lbs.): fifty-six dollars ($56.00);
(iv) More than seven thousand pounds (7,000 lbs.), but not more than eight thousand
pounds (8,000 lbs.): sixty-four dollars ($64.00);
(v) More than eight thousand pounds (8,000 lbs.), but not more than nine thousand pounds
(9,000 lbs.): seventy dollars ($70.00);
(vi) More than nine thousand pounds (9,000 lbs.), but not more than ten thousand pounds
(10,000 lbs.): seventy-eight dollars ($78.00);
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -2-)

(vii) More than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.), but not more than twelve thousand
pounds (12,000 lbs.): one hundred six dollars ($106);
(viii) More than twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.), but not more than fourteen thousand
pounds (14,000 lbs.): one hundred twenty-four dollars ($124);
(ix) More than fourteen thousand pounds (14,000 lbs.), but not more than sixteen thousand
pounds (16,000 lbs.): one hundred forty dollars ($140);
(x) More than sixteen thousand pounds (16,000 lbs.), but not more than eighteen thousand
pounds (18,000 lbs.): one hundred fifty-eight dollars ($158);
(xi) More than eighteen thousand pounds (18,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty thousand
pounds (20,000 lbs.): one hundred seventy-six dollars ($176);
(xii) More than twenty thousand pounds (20,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-two
thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.): one hundred ninety-four dollars ($194);
(xiii) More than twenty-two thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-four
thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.): two hundred ten dollars ($210);
(xiv) More than twenty-four thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-six
thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.): two hundred thirty dollars ($230);
(xv) More than twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-eight
thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.): two hundred ninety-six dollars ($296);
(xvi) More than twenty-eight thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty
thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.): three hundred sixteen dollars ($316);
(xvii) More than thirty thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-two
thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.): four hundred and twenty-two dollars ($422);
(xviii) More than thirty-two thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-four
thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.): four hundred and forty-eight dollars ($448);
(xix) More than thirty-four thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-six
thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.): four hundred and seventy-six dollars ($476);
(xx) More than thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-eight
thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.): five hundred and two dollars ($502);
(xxi) More than thirty-eight thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.), but not more than forty
thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.): five hundred and twenty-eight dollars ($528);
(xxii) More than forty thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-two thousand
pounds (42,000 lbs.): five hundred and fifty-four dollars ($554);
(xxiii) More than forty-two thousand pounds (42,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-six
thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.): six hundred and eight dollars ($608);
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -3-)

(xxiv) More than forty-six thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty thousand
pounds (50,000 lbs.): six hundred and sixty dollars ($660);
(xxv) More than fifty thousand pounds (50,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-four thousand
pounds (54,000 lbs.): seven hundred and twelve dollars ($712);
(xxvi) More than fifty-four thousand pounds (54,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-eight
thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.): seven hundred and sixty-eight dollars ($768);
(xxvii) More than fifty-eight thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-two
thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.): eight hundred and sixteen dollars ($816);
(xxviii) More than sixty-two thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-six
thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.): eight hundred and seventy-six dollars ($876);
(xxix) More than sixty-six thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy
thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.): nine hundred and twenty-four dollars ($924);
(xxx) More than seventy thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy-four
thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two dollars ($972);
(xxxi) Over seventy-four thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two
dollars ($972), plus twenty-four dollars ($24.00) per two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.) gross
weight.
(4) For the registration of every semi-trailer to be used with a truck-tractor, as defined in §
31-1-4(f), shall be as follows: an annual fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) for a one-year registration;
for multi-year registrations the fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a five-year (5) registration; and
eighty dollars ($80.00) for an eight-year (8) registration. However, when in use, the weight of the
resulting semi-trailer unit and its maximum carrying capacity shall not exceed the gross weight of
the original semi-trailer unit from which the gross weight of the tractor was determined. A
registration certificate and registration plate shall be issued for each semi-trailer so registered.
There shall be no refund of payment of such fee, except that when a plate is returned prior to ninety
(90) days before the effective date of that year’s registration, the pro rate amount, based on the
unused portion of the multi-year registration plate period at time of surrender, shall be refunded. A
multi-year semi-trailer registration may be transferred to another semi-trailer subject to the
provisions and fee set forth in § 31-6-11. Thirty percent (30%) of the semi-trailer registration fee
shall be retained by the division of motor vehicles to defray the costs of implementation of the
international registration plan (IRP) and fleet registration section.
(5) For the registration of every automobile, motor truck, or tractor, when equipped with
other than pneumatic tires, there shall be added to the above gross weight fees a charge of ten cents
(10¢) for each one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) of gross weight.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -4-)

(6) For the registration of every public bus, the rates provided for motor vehicles for hire
plus two dollars ($2.00) for each passenger that bus is rated to carry, the rating to be determined by
the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.
(7) For the registration of every motorcycle, or motor-driven cycle, thirteen dollars
($13.00). Three dollars ($3.00) from that sum shall be turned over to the department of education
to assist in the payment of the cost of the motorcycle driver’s education program as enumerated in
§ 31-10.1-1.1.
(8) For the registration of every trailer, not including semi-trailers used with a truck-tractor
as defined in § 31-1-4(d), with a gross weight of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) or less, five
dollars ($5.00). Trailers with a gross weight of more than three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) shall
be assessed a registration fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.).
(9) The annual registration fee for a motor vehicle, commonly described as a boxcar and/or
locomotive, and used only by La Societe Des 40 Hommes et 8 Chevaux for civic demonstration,
parades, convention purposes, or social welfare work, shall be two dollars ($2.00).
(10) For the registration of every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer owned by any
department or agency of any city or town or district, provided the name of the city or town or
district or state department or agency owning the same shall be plainly printed on two (2) sides of
the vehicle, two dollars ($2.00).
(11) For the registration of motor vehicles used for racing, fifteen dollars ($15.00).
(12) For every duplicate registration certificate, seventeen dollars ($17.00).
(13) For every certified copy of a registration certificate or application, ten dollars ($10.00).
(14) For every certificate assigning a special identification number or mark as provided in
§ 31-3-37, one dollar ($1.00).
(15) For every replacement of number plates or additional pair of number plates, without
changing the number, thirty dollars ($30.00).
(16) For the registration of every farm vehicle, used in farming as provided in § 31-3-31:
ten dollars ($10.00).
(17) For the registration of antique motor vehicles, five dollars ($5.00).
(18) For the registration of a suburban vehicle, when used as a pleasure vehicle and the
gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as charged
in subsection (1) of this section shall be applicable and when used as a commercial vehicle and the
gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as
provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be applicable. The rates in subsection (3) of this
section shall be applicable when the suburban vehicle has a gross weight of more than four thousand
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -5-)

pounds (4,000 lbs.), regardless of the use of the vehicle.
(19) For the registration of every motor bus that is used exclusively under contract with a
political subdivision or school district of the state for the transportation of school children, twenty-
five dollars ($25); provided that the motor bus may also be used for the transportation of persons
to and from church and Sunday school services, and for the transportation of children to and from
educational or recreational projects sponsored by a city or town or by any association or
organization supported wholly or in part by public or private donations for charitable purposes,
without the payment of additional registration fee.
(20) For the registration of every motorized bicycle, ten dollars ($10.00).
(21) For the registration of every motorized tricycle, ten dollars ($10.00).
(22) For the replacement of number plates with a number change, twenty dollars ($20.00).
(23) For the initial issuance and each reissuance of fully reflective plates, as required by §§
31-3-10, 31-3-32, and 31-3-33, an additional eight dollars ($8.00); provided, however, for the initial
issuance of new license plates as required by § 31-3-33(c) that feature the 2022 approved design,
the fee shall be waived when the plate is issued for a vehicle with an existing registration.
(24) For the issuance of a trip permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue seventy-two-hour
(72) trip permits for vehicles required to be registered in the International Registration Plan that
have not been apportioned with the state of Rhode Island.
(25) For the issuance of a hunter’s permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue hunter’s
permits for motor vehicles based in the state of Rhode Island and otherwise required to be registered
in the International Registration Plan. These permits are valid for thirty (30) days.
(26) For the registration of a specially adapted motor vehicle necessary to transport a family
member with a disability for personal, noncommercial use, a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) assessed.
(27)(i) For the registration of every automobile, motor truck, or tractor, there shall be added
to the above gross weight fees:
(A) A fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for each battery electric vehicle;
(B) A fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each plug-in hybrid electric vehicle; and
(C) A fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each hybrid electric vehicle.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions shall apply:
(A) “Battery electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle which operates solely by use of a
battery or battery pack. The term includes a motor vehicle which is powered mainly through the
use of an electric battery or battery pack but which uses a flywheel that stores energy produced by
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -6-)

the electric motor or through regenerative braking to assist in operation of the motor vehicle.
(B) “Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that can deliver power to the
drive wheels solely by a battery-powered electric motor but which also incorporates the use of
another fuel to power a combustion engine. The battery of the vehicle must be capable of receiving
energy from an external source, such as an outlet or charging station.
(C) "Hybrid electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle which is primarily powered by an
internal combustion engine, (gasoline, diesel, or alternative fuel) in conjunction with an electric
motor.
SECTION 3. Section 31-8-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-8 entitled "Offenses
Against Registration and Certificate of Title Laws" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-8-1. Operation of vehicles without evidences of registration.
No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly permit to be operated, upon any
highway or bicycle trail or path, any vehicle required to be registered pursuant to this title unless
there has been issued for it a valid registration card and unless there is attached to it and displayed
on it, when and as required by chapters 3 — 9 of this title, a valid registration plate or plates issued
for it by the division of motor vehicles for the current registration year except as otherwise expressly
permitted in those chapters. Any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of eighty-
five dollars ($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100).
SECTION 4. Section 31-10-6.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-6.4. Violations.
It is unlawful for the holder of a limited learner’s permit, a temporary permit or a limited
provisional license to drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions that apply to that permit
or license. Failure to comply with a restriction concerning time of driving or the presence of a
supervising driver in the vehicle constitutes operating a motor vehicle without a license. Failure to
comply with any other restriction, including seating and passenger limitations, is an infraction
punishable by a monetary fine of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100) for the
first offense, ninety-five dollars ($95.00) one hundred ten dollars ($110) for the second offense,
and one hundred dollars ($100.00) one hundred forty dollars ($140) for a third or any subsequent
offenses.
SECTION 5. Section 31-23-51 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-23 entitled "Equipment
and Accessories Generally" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-23-51. Earphones and headsets prohibited.
(a) No person shall operate a bicycle or motor vehicle upon any highway while wearing
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -7-)

earphones, a headset, headphone, or other listening device. Any person who violates this section
shall be fined: (1) eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, (2)
ninety-five dollars ($95.00) one hundred ten dollars ($110) for the second offense, and (3) one
hundred forty dollars ($140) for the third and each subsequent offense.
(b) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Any emergency vehicle operator using an integrated intercom system;
(2) Any person operating a motorcycle who is using a headset installed in a helmet and
worn so as to prevent the speakers from making direct contact with the user’s ears so that the user
can hear surrounding sounds;
(3) Any person using a headset in conjunction with a cellular telephone that only provides
sound through one ear and allows surrounding sounds to be heard with the other ear;
(4) Any person using a headset in conjunction with the communicating with the central
base operation that only provides sound through one ear and allows surrounding sounds to be heard
with the other ear;
(5) Any person using a hearing aid(s) or instrument for the improvement of hearing.
(c) The department of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6. Section 31-25-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-25 entitled "Size,
Weight, and Load Limits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-25-16. Authorized weight shown in registration — Exceeding limit.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall insert in the registration card
issued for a vehicle the gross weight for which it is registered. If it is a truck tractor to be used for
propelling semi-trailers, he or she shall separately insert the total permissible gross weight of the
truck tractor and semi-trailers to be propelled by it. It shall be unlawful for any carrier to operate
or permit to be operated any vehicle or combination of vehicles of a gross weight in excess of that
registered by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, permitted by the department of
transportation, or in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “carrier” means and includes any company or person
who furthers their commercial or private enterprise by use of the vehicle.
(c)(1) Penalties for violations of this section will be calculated on the legal weight in
comparison to the actual weight and shall be heard and adjudicated at the traffic tribunal.
(2) The overweight penalties for vehicles with ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) gross
vehicle weight or less shall be eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100) per thousand
pounds overweight or portion of it.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -8-)

(3) The overweight penalties for vehicles exceeding ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.)
gross vehicle weight shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per five hundred pounds
(500 lbs.) overweight or portion of it.
(4) The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred four
thousand, eight hundred pounds (104,800 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be one thousand twenty-
five dollars ($1,025) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(5) The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred thirty
thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.
SECTION 7. Section 31-27-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-6. Lanes of operation.
(a) Any bus, commercial vehicle, camper, vehicle registered as a camper, trailer, or vehicle
carrying a camper or trailer traveling on Rhode Island interstate highways shall be allowed to travel
only in the first two (2) right hand lanes, except in cases of left hand exits, in which case the vehicle
shall be allowed to enter the third and fourth left hand lanes one mile prior to an exit.
(b) For the purpose of this section, “commercial vehicle” means any vehicle registered for
commercial purposes and designed and used primarily for the transportation of goods, wares, or
merchandise. “Bus” means any vehicle designed for carrying ten (10) or more passengers and used
primarily for the transportation of persons.
(c) The provisions of this section shall only be effective during the period that official
traffic signs are in place to notify operators of the provisions of this section. Any persons violating
the provisions of this section upon conviction shall be fined not more than eighty-five dollars
($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100).
SECTION 8. Sections 31-36-7 and 31-36-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-36 entitled
"Motor Fuel Tax" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-36-7. Monthly report of distributors — Payment of tax.
(a) State requirements. (1) Every distributor shall, on or before the twentieth (20th) day of
each month, render a report to the tax administrator, upon forms to be obtained from the tax
administrator, of the amount (number of gallons) of fuels purchased, sold, or used by the distributor
within this state and the amount of fuels sold by the distributor without this state from fuels within
this state during the preceding calendar month, and, if required by the tax administrator as to
purchases, the name or names of the person or persons from whom purchased and the date and
amount of each purchase, and as to sales, the name or names of the person or persons to whom sold
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -9-)

and the amount of each sale, and shall pay at the same time to the administrator tax at the rate of
thirty-two cents ($0.32) per gallon on all taxable gallons of fuel sold or used in this state for periods
ending on or before June 30, 2025.
(2) Every distributor shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, render a report to
the tax administrator, upon forms to be obtained from the tax administrator, of the amount (number
of gallons) of fuels purchased, sold, or used by the distributor within this state and the amount of
fuels sold by the distributor without this state from fuels within this state during the preceding
calendar month, and, if required by the tax administrator as to purchases, the name or names of the
person or persons from whom purchased and the date and amount of each purchase, and as to sales,
the name or names of the person or persons to whom sold and the amount of each sale, and shall
pay at the same time to the administrator, tax at the rate of forty cents ($0.40) per gallon on all
taxable gallons of fuel sold or used in this state for periods beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
(b) Federal requirements. In the event the federal government requires a certain portion of
the gasoline tax to be dedicated for highway improvements, then the state controller is directed to
establish a restricted receipt account and deposit that portion of gasoline tax receipts which brings
the state into federal compliance.
(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, and every other year thereafter, through June 30, 2025, the
gasoline tax shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all
Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics determined
as of September 30 of the prior calendar year; said adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest one
cent ($.01) increment, provided that the total tax shall not be less than provided for in section (a)
(1).
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, and every other year thereafter, the gasoline tax shall be
adjusted by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-
U) as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of
the two (2) prior calendar years; said adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest one cent ($0.01)
increment; provided that, the total tax shall not be less than provided for in subsection (a) (2).
31-36-20. Disposition of proceeds.
(a) Disposition of proceeds. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
all moneys paid into the general treasury under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 37 of this
title, and title 46 shall be applied to and held in a separate fund and be deposited in any depositories
that may be selected by the general treasurer to the credit of the fund, which fund shall be known
as the Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund; provided, that in fiscal year 2004 for the months of
July through April six and eighty-five hundredth cents ($0.0685) per gallon of the tax imposed and
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -10-)

accruing for the liability under the provisions of § 31-36-7, less refunds and credits, shall be
transferred to the Rhode Island public transit authority as provided under § 39-18-21. For the
months of May and June in fiscal year 2004, the allocation shall be five and five hundredth cents
($0.0505). Thereafter, until fiscal year 2006, the allocation shall be six and twenty-five hundredth
cents ($0.0625). For fiscal years 2006 through FY 2008, the allocation shall be seven and twenty-
five hundredth cents ($0.0725); provided, that expenditures shall include the costs of a market
survey of non-transit users and a management study of the agency to include the feasibility of
moving the Authority into the Department of Transportation, both to be conducted under the
auspices of the state budget officer. The state budget officer shall hire necessary consultants to
perform the studies, and shall direct payment by the Authority. Both studies shall be transmitted by
the Budget Officer to the 2006 session of the General Assembly, with comments from the
Authority. For fiscal year 2009, the allocation shall be seven and seventy-five hundredth cents
($0.0775), of which one-half cent ($0.005) shall be derived from the one cent ($0.01) per gallon
environmental protection fee pursuant to § 46-12.9-11. For fiscal years 2010 and thereafter through
FY fiscal year 2025, the allocation shall be nine and seventy-five hundredth cents ($0.0975), of
which of one-half cent ($0.005) shall be derived from the one cent ($0.01) per gallon environmental
protection fee pursuant to § 46-12.9-11. For fiscal years 2026 and thereafter, the allocation shall be
eleven and seventy-five hundredths cents ($0.1175) of which one-half cent ($0.005) shall be
derived from the one cent ($0.01) per gallon environmental protection fee pursuant to § 46-12.9-
11. One cent ($0.01) per gallon shall be transferred to the Elderly/Disabled Transportation Program
of the department of human services, and the remaining cents per gallon shall be available for
general revenue as determined by the following schedule:
(i) For the fiscal year 2000, three and one-fourth cents ($0.0325) shall be available for
general revenue.
(ii) For the fiscal year 2001, one and three-fourth cents ($0.0175) shall be available for
general revenue.
(iii) For the fiscal year 2002, one-fourth cent ($0.0025) shall be available for general
revenue.
(iv) For the fiscal year 2003, two and one-fourth cent ($0.0225) shall be available for
general revenue.
(v) For the months of July through April in fiscal year 2004, one and four-tenths cents
($0.014) shall be available for general revenue. For the months of May through June in fiscal year
2004, three and two-tenths cents ($0.032) shall be available for general revenue, and thereafter,
until fiscal year 2006, two cents ($0.02) shall be available for general revenue. For fiscal year 2006
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -11-)

through fiscal year 2009 one cent ($0.01) shall be available for general revenue.
(2) All deposits and transfers of funds made by the tax administrator under this section,
including those to the Rhode Island public transit authority, the department of human services, the
Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, and the general fund, shall be made within twenty-four
(24) hours of receipt or previous deposit of the funds in question.
(3) Commencing in fiscal year 2004, the Director of the Rhode Island Department of
Transportation is authorized to remit, on a monthly or less frequent basis as shall be determined by
the Director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation, or his or her designee, or at the
election of the Director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation, with the approval of the
Director of the Department of Administration, to an indenture trustee, administrator, or other third
party fiduciary, in an amount not to exceed two cents ($0.02) per gallon of the gas tax imposed, in
order to satisfy debt service payments on aggregate bonds issued pursuant to a Joint Resolution and
Enactment Approving the Financing of Various Department of Transportation Projects adopted
during the 2003 session of the General Assembly, and approved by the Governor.
(4) Commencing in fiscal year 2015, three and one-half cents ($0.035) shall be transferred
to the Rhode Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority to be used for maintenance, operations, capital
expenditures and debt service on any of its projects as defined in chapter 12 of title 24 in lieu of a
toll on the Sakonnet River Bridge. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is authorized to
remit to an indenture trustee, administrator, or other third-party fiduciary any or all of the foregoing
transfers in order to satisfy and/or secure its revenue bonds and notes and/or debt service payments
thereon, including, but not limited to, the bonds and notes issued pursuant to the Joint Resolution
set forth in Section 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 23 of the Public Laws of 2010. Notwithstanding any
other provision of said Joint Resolution, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is expressly
authorized to issue bonds and notes previously authorized under said Joint Resolution for the
purpose of financing all expenses incurred by it for the formerly authorized tolling of the Sakonnet
River Bridge and the termination thereof.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all other funds in the fund
shall be dedicated to the department of transportation, subject to annual appropriation by the general
assembly. The director of transportation shall submit to the general assembly, budget office and
office of the governor annually an accounting of all amounts deposited in and credited to the fund
together with a budget for proposed expenditures for the succeeding fiscal year in compliance with
§§ 35-3-1 and 35-3-4. On order of the director of transportation, the state controller is authorized
and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payments of any sum or
portion of the sum that may be required from time to time upon receipt of properly authenticated
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -12-)

vouchers.
(c) At any time the amount of the fund is insufficient to fund the expenditures of the
department of transportation, not to exceed the amount authorized by the general assembly, the
general treasurer is authorized, with the approval of the governor and the director of administration,
in anticipation of the receipts of monies enumerated in this section to advance sums to the fund, for
the purposes specified in this section, any funds of the state not specifically held for any particular
purpose. However, all the advances made to the fund shall be returned to the general fund
immediately upon the receipt by the fund of proceeds resulting from the receipt of monies to the
extent of the advances.
SECTION 9. Section 31-36.1-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-36.1 entitled "Fuel
Use Reporting Law" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-36.1-17. Penalties.
(a) Any motor carrier failing to secure or display upon demand the license or identification
device required in § 31-36.1-3, or under the International Fuel Tax Agreement shall be guilty of a
civil violation and subject to a fine not exceeding: (1) eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred
dollars ($100) for the first offense and (2) not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) one hundred
ten dollars ($110) for subsequent offenses. Any motor carrier willfully violating any other
provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a civil violation and subject to a fine not
exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense and not exceeding five hundred dollars
($500) for subsequent offenses.
(b) Filing of a false statement to obtain credit or refund. Any person who willfully and
knowingly makes a false statement orally, in writing, or in the form of a receipt for the sale of motor
fuel, for the purpose of obtaining, attempting to obtain, or to assist any other person, partnership,
or corporation to obtain or attempt to obtain a credit or refund or reduction of liability for taxes
under this chapter, shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both.
(c) Failure to file return or pay tax. When any motor carrier fails to file a return within the
time prescribed by this chapter for the filing of it or fails to pay the amount of taxes due when they
are payable, a penalty of ten percent (10%) or fifty dollars ($50.00), whichever is greater, shall be
added to the amount of the tax due, and the penalty shall immediately accrue, and the tax shall bear
interest at the annual rate provided by § 44-1-7, as amended, until the tax is paid. The tax
administrator may waive all or part of the penalties provided in this chapter when it is proved to
the tax administrator’s satisfaction that the failure to file the return or pay the taxes on time was
due to reasonable cause.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -13-)

SECTION 10. Section 31-41.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-41.1 entitled
"Adjudication of Traffic Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-41.1-4. Schedule of violations.
(a) The penalties for violations of the enumerated sections, listed in numerical order,
correspond to the fines described. However, those offenses for which punishments may vary
according to the severity of the offense, or punishment that requires the violator to perform a
service, shall be heard and decided by the traffic tribunal or municipal court. The following
violations may be handled administratively through the method prescribed in this chapter. This list
is not exclusive and jurisdiction may be conferred on the traffic tribunal with regard to other
violations.
VIOLATIONS SCHEDULE
Section of Total
General Laws Fine
8-8.2-2 DOT, DEM, or other agency and department violations $85.00100.00
24-10-17 Soliciting rides in motor vehicles 85.00100.00
24-10-18 Backing up prohibited 85.00100.00
24-10-19 Advertising motor vehicle for sale on state highways 100.00
24-10-20 Park and ride lots 85.00100.00
24-12-37 Nonpayment of toll 100.00
31-3-12 Visibility of plates 85.00100.00
31-3-18 Display of plates 85.00100.00
31-3-32 Driving with expired registration 85.00100.00
31-3-34 Failure to notify division of change of address 85.00100.00
31-3-35 Notice of change of name 85.00100.00
31-3-40 Temporary plates – dealer issued 85.00100.00
31-4-3 Temporary registration – twenty-day (20) bill of sale 85.00100.00
31-10-10 Rules as to armed forces license 85.00100.00
31-10-30 Driving on expired license 85.00100.00
31-10-32 Notice of change of address 85.00100.00
31-10.1-4 No motorcycle helmet (operator) 85.00100.00
31-10.1-5 Motorcycle handlebar violation 85.00100.00
31-10.1-6 No motorcycle helmet (passenger) 85.00100.00
31-10.1-7 Inspection of motorcycle required 85.00100.00
31-12-12 Local motor vehicle ordinance 85.00100.00
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -14-)

31-13-4 Obedience to devices 85.00100.00
31-13-6(3)(i) Eluding traffic light 85.00100.00
31-13-9 Flashing signals 85.00100.00
31-13-11 Injury to signs or devices 85.00100.00
31-14-1 Reasonable and prudent speed 95.00
31-14-3 Condition requiring reduced speed 95.00
31-14-9 Below minimum speed 95.00
31-14-12 Speed limit on bridges and structures 95.00
31-15-1 Leaving lane of travel 85.00100.00
31-15-2 Slow traffic to right 85.00100.00
31-15-3 Operator left of center 85.00100.00
31-15-4 Overtaking on left 85.00100.00
31-15-5(a) Overtaking on right 85.00100.00
31-15-6 Clearance for overtaking 85.00100.00
31-15-7 Places where overtaking prohibited 85.00100.00
31-15-8 No passing zone 85.00100.00
31-15-9 One way highways 85.00100.00
31-15-10 Rotary traffic islands 85.00100.00
31-15-11 Laned roadway violation 85.00100.00
31-15-12 Following too closely 85.00100.00
31-15-12.1 Entering intersection 100.00
31-15-13 Crossing center section of divided highway 85.00100.00
31-15-14 Entering or leaving limited access roadways 85.00100.00
31-15-16 Use of emergency break-down lane for travel 85.00100.00
31-15-17 Crossing bicycle lane 85.00100.00
31-15-18 Unsafe passing of person operating a bicycle 85.00100.00
31-16-1 Care in starting from stop 85.00100.00
31-16-2 Manner of turning at intersection 85.00100.00
31-16-4 U turn where prohibited 85.00100.00
31-16-5 Turn signal required 85.00100.00
31-16-6 Time of signaling turn 85.00100.00
31-16-7 Failure to give stop signal 85.00100.00
31-16-8 Method of giving signals 85.00100.00
31-16.1-3 Diesel vehicle idling rules first offense not to exceed 100.00
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -15-)

second and subsequent offense not to exceed 500.00
31-17-1 Failure to yield right of way 85.00100.00
31-17-2 Vehicle turning left 85.00100.00
31-17-3 Yield right of way (intersection) 85.00100.00
31-17-4 Obedience to stop signs 85.00100.00
31-17-5 Entering from private road or driveway 85.00100.00
31-17-8 Vehicle within right of way, rotary 85.00100.00
31-17-9 Yielding to bicycles on bicycle lane 85.00100.00
31-18-3 Right of way in crosswalks first violation 85.00100.00
second violation or any subsequent violation $100.00
31-18-5 Crossing other than at crosswalks 85.00100.00
31-18-8 Due care by drivers 85.00100.00
31-18-12 Hitchhiking 85.00100.00
31-18-18 Right of way on sidewalks 85.00100.00
31-19-3 Traffic laws applied to bicycles 85.00100.00
31-19-20 Sale of new bicycles 85.00100.00
31-19-21 Sale of used bicycles 85.00100.00
31-19.1-2 Operating motorized bicycle on an interstate highway 85.00100.00
31-19.2-2 Operating motorized tricycle on an interstate highway 85.00100.00
31-20-1 Failure to stop at railroad crossing 85.00100.00
31-20-2 Driving through railroad gate 85.00100.00
31-20-9 Obedience to stop sign 85.00100.00
31-21-4 Places where parking or stopping prohibited 85.00100.00
31-21-14 Opening of vehicle doors 85.00100.00
31-21-18 Electric vehicle charging station restriction 85.00100.00
31-22-2 Improper backing up 85.00100.00
31-22-4 Overloading vehicle 85.00100.00
31-22-5 Violation of safety zone 85.00100.00
31-22-6 Coasting 85.00100.00
31-22-7 Following fire apparatus 85.00100.00
31-22-8 Crossing fire hose 85.00100.00
31-22-9 Throwing debris on highway – snow removal 85.00100.00
31-22-11.5 Improper use of school bus – not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500)
for each day of improper use
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -16-)

31-22-22(a) No child restraint 85.00100.00
31-22-22(a) Child restraint/seat belt but not in any rear seating position 85.00100.00
31-22-22(b), (f) No seat belt – passenger 40.00
31-22-22(g) No seat belt – operator 40.00
31-22-23 Tow trucks – proper identification 275.00
31-22-24 Operation of interior lights 85.00100.00
31-23-1(b)(2) U.S. department of transportation motor carrier safety rules
and regulations Not less than 85.00100.00
or more than $500.00
31-23-1(e)(6) Removal of an “out of service vehicle” sticker 125.00
31-23-1(e)(7) Operation of an “out of service vehicle” 100.00
31-23-2(b) Installation or adjustment of unsafe or prohibited parts,
equipment, or accessories:
(first offense) 250.00
(second offense) 500.00
(third and subsequent offenses) 1,000.00
31-23-4 Brake equipment required 85.00100.00
31-23-8 Horn required 85.00100.00
31-23-10 Sirens prohibited 85.00100.00
31-23-13 Muffler required 85.00100.00
31-23-13.1 Altering height or operating a motor vehicle with an
altered height 85.00100.00
31-23-14 Prevention of excessive fumes or smoke 85.00100.00
31-23-16 Windshield and window stickers (visibility) 85.00100.00
31-23-17 Windshield wipers 85.00100.00
31-23-19 Metal tires prohibited 85.00100.00
31-23-20 Protuberances on tires 85.00100.00
31-23-26 Fenders and wheel flaps required 85.00100.00
31-23-27 Rear wheel flaps on buses, trucks, and trailers 85.00100.00
31-23-29 Flares or red flag required over four thousand pounds
(4,000 lbs.) 85.00100.00
31-23-40 Approved types of seat belt requirements 85.00100.00
31-23-42.1 Special mirror – school bus 85.00100.00
31-23-43 Chocks required (1 pair) – over four thousand pounds
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -17-)

(4,000 lbs.) 85.00100.00
31-23-45 Tire treads – defective tires 85.00100.00
31-23-47 Slow moving emblem required 85.00100.00
31-23-49 Transportation of gasoline – passenger vehicle 85.00100.00
31-23-51 Operating bike or motor vehicle wearing ear phones
(first offense) 85.00100.00
second offense 95.00110.00
for the third and each subsequent offense 140.00
31-24-1 through
31-24-54 Times when lights required 85.00100.00
31-25-9 Leaking load 85.00100.00
31-25-11 Connections between coupled vehicles 85.00100.00
31-25-12 Towing chain, twelve-inch (12") square flag required 85.00100.00
31-25-12.1 Tow truck – use of lanes
(first offense) 85.00100.00
second offense 95.00110.00
for the third and each subsequent offense 100.00140.00
31-25-17 Identification of trucks and truck-tractors
(first offense) 85.00100.00
(second offense) 95.00110.00
for the third and subsequent offenses 125.00140.00
31-25-24 Carrying and inspection of excess load limit 350.00
31-27-2.3 Refusal to take preliminary breath test 85.00100.00
31-28-7(d) Wrongful use of handicapped parking placard 500.00
31-28-7(f) Handicapped parking space violation:
First offense 100.00
Second offense 175.00
Third offense and subsequent offenses 325.00
31-28-7.1(e) Wrongful use of institutional handicapped parking
placard 125.00
31-33-2 Failure to file accident report 85.00100.00
31-34-2 Proof of insurance – motor vehicle rental 85.00100.00
31-34-3 Operation by person other than lessee 85.00100.00
31-36.1-17 No fuel tax stamp (out-of-state) 85.00100.00
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -18-)

and not exceeding ($100) for
subsequent offense
31-38-3 No inspection sticker 85.00100.00
31-38-4 Violation of inspection laws 85.00100.00
31-41.3-15 Automated school zone speed enforcement system 50.00
31-47.2-6 Heavy-duty vehicle emission inspections:
First offense 125.00
Second offense 525.00
Third and subsequent offenses 1,025.00
37-15-7 Littering not less than 55.00,
not more than five hundred dollars ($500)
39-12-26 Public carriers violation 300.00
SPEEDING Fine
(A) One to ten miles per hour (1-10 m.p.h.) in excess of posted speed limit $ 95.00
(B) Eleven miles per hour (11 m.p.h.) in excess of posted speed limit with 205.00 minimum
a fine of ten dollars ($10.00) per mile in excess of speed limit shall be
assessed.
(b) In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a judge may impose the following
penalties for speeding:
(1) For speeds up to and including ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) over the posted speed
limit on public highways, a fine as provided for in subsection (a) of this section for the first offense;
ten dollars ($10.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the second offense if
within twelve (12) months of the first offense; and fifteen dollars ($15.00) per mile for each mile
in excess of the speed limit for the third and any subsequent offense if within twelve (12) months
of the first offense. In addition, the license may be suspended up to thirty (30) days.
(2) For speeds in excess of ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) over the posted speed limit on
public highways, a mandatory fine of ten dollars ($10.00) for each mile over the speed limit for the
first offense; fifteen dollars ($15.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the
second offense if within twelve (12) months of the first offense; and twenty dollars ($20.00) per
mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the third and subsequent offense if within twelve
(12) months of the first offense. In addition, the license may be suspended up to sixty (60) days.
(c) Except for a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11, any person
charged with a violation who pays the fine administratively pursuant to this chapter shall not be
subject to any additional costs or assessments, including, but not limited to, the hearing fee
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -19-)

established in § 8-18-4.
SECTION 11. Section 37-15-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-15 entitled "Litter
Control and Recycling" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-15-7. Penalties.
(a) Any person convicted of a first violation of this chapter shall, except where a penalty is
specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred
dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine
imposed hereunder, the person so convicted may be ordered to pick up litter for not less than two
(2), nor more than twenty-five (25), hours.
(b) Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter shall, except
where a penalty is specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than three hundred dollars
($300), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine imposed
upon a second or subsequent violation of this chapter, the person so convicted may be ordered to
pick up litter for not less than four (4), nor more than fifty (50), hours.
(c) Jurisdiction to punish violators of the provisions of this chapter is conferred on the
traffic tribunal.
(d) Any person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall, in addition to all other
penalties, be liable for the removal of all litter or ordered to pay restitution for the cost of removal
of all litter illegally disposed of by that person. The traffic tribunal may hold the registration of any
vehicle owned by the violator and used in the act of littering until the aforementioned liability is
satisfied.
(e) The funds received by a state law enforcement agency shall be deposited as general
revenues; provided, however, that thirty percent (30%) of any fine collected pursuant to a complaint
filed by a local law enforcement agency shall inure to the benefit of that agency, with remittances
to be made not less often than once every three (3) months.
(f) Penalties of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) one hundred dollars ($100) for violations of
this section may be disposed of without the necessity of personally appearing before the traffic
tribunal. Said penalty may be handled administratively by mailing a check or money order, together
with the properly executed form provided, to the appropriate address as set forth in the summons
issued by the enforcing agent.
SECTION 12. Sections 39-18.1-4 and 39-18.1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-18.1
entitled "Transportation Investment and Debt Reduction Act of 2011" are hereby amended to read
as follows:
39-18.1-4. Rhode Island highway maintenance account created.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -20-)

(a) There is hereby created a special account in the intermodal surface transportation fund
as established in § 31-36-20 that is to be known as the Rhode Island highway maintenance account.
(b) The fund shall consist of all those moneys that the state may, from time to time, direct
to the fund, including, but not necessarily limited to, moneys derived from the following sources:
(1) There is imposed a surcharge of thirty dollars ($30.00) forty dollars ($40.00) per vehicle
or truck, other than those with specific registrations set forth below in subsection (b)(1)(i). Such
surcharge shall be paid by each vehicle or truck owner in order to register that owner’s vehicle or
truck and upon each subsequent biennial registration. This surcharge shall be phased in at the rate
of ten dollars ($10.00) each year through June 30, 2016. The total surcharge will be ten dollars
($10.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, twenty dollars ($20.00) from July 1, 2014,
through June 30, 2015, and thirty dollars ($30.00) from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016,
December 31, 2025 and forty dollars ($40.00) from January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter.
(i) For owners of vehicles or trucks with the following plate types, the surcharge shall be
as set forth below and shall be paid in full in order to register the vehicle or truck and upon each
subsequent renewal:
Plate Type Surcharge
Antique $5.0010.00
Farm $10.0015.00
Motorcycle $13.0018.00
(ii) For owners of trailers, the surcharge shall be one-half (½) of the biennial registration
amount and shall be paid in full in order to register the trailer and upon each subsequent renewal;
(2) There is imposed a surcharge of fifteen dollars ($15.00) twenty dollars ($20.00) per
vehicle or truck, other than those with specific registrations set forth in subsection (b)(2)(i) below,
for those vehicles or trucks subject to annual registration, to be paid annually by each vehicle or
truck owner in order to register that owner’s vehicle or truck and upon each subsequent annual
registration. This surcharge will be phased in at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) each year through
June 30, 2016. The total surcharge will be five dollars ($5.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30,
2014, ten dollars ($10.00) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and fifteen dollars ($15.00)
from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016 December 31, 2025, and twenty dollars ($20.00) from
January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter.
(i) For registrations of the following plate types, the surcharge shall be as set forth below
and shall be paid in full in order to register the plate, and upon each subsequent renewal:
Plate Type Surcharge
Boat Dealer $6.2511.25
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -21-)

Cycle Dealer $6.2511.25
In-transit $5.0010.00
Manufacturer $5.0010.00
New Car Dealer $5.0010.00
Used Car Dealer $5.0010.00
Racer Tow $5.0010.00
Transporter $5.0010.00
Bailee $5.0010.00
(ii) For owners of trailers, the surcharge shall be one-half (½) of the annual registration
amount and shall be paid in full in order to register the trailer and upon each subsequent renewal.
(iii) For owners of school buses, the surcharge will be phased in at the rate of six dollars
and twenty-five cents ($6.25) each year through June 30, 2015. The total surcharge will be six
dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, and twelve dollars
and fifty cents ($12.50) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015 December 31, 2025, and
seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50) from January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter.
(3) There is imposed a surcharge of thirty dollars ($30.00) forty dollars ($40.00) per license
to operate a motor vehicle to be paid every five (5) years by each licensed operator of a motor
vehicle. This surcharge will be phased in at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) each year through June
30, 2016. The total surcharge will be ten dollars ($10.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014,
twenty dollars ($20.00) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and thirty dollars ($30.00) from
July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016 December 31, 2025, and forty dollars ($40.00) from January
1, 2026, and each year thereafter. In the event that a license is issued or renewed for a period of
less than five (5) years, the surcharge will be prorated according to the period of time the license
will be valid;
(4) All fees assessed pursuant to § 31-47.1-11, and chapters 3, 6, 10, and 10.1 of title 31,
shall be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account, provided that for fiscal
years 2016, 2017, and 2018 these fees be transferred as follows:
(i) From July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016, twenty-five percent (25%) will be deposited;
(ii) From July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2017, fifty percent (50%) will be deposited;
(iii) From July 1, 2017, through June 30, 2018, sixty percent (60%) will be deposited; and
(iv) From July 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, one hundred percent (100%) will be
deposited;
(5) All remaining funds from previous general obligation bond issues that have not
otherwise been allocated.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -22-)

(c) Effective July 1, 2019, ninety-five percent (95%) of all funds collected pursuant to this
section shall be deposited in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account and shall be used only
for the purposes set forth in this chapter. The remaining funds shall be retained as general revenues
to partially offset cost of collections
(d) Unexpended balances and any earnings thereon shall not revert to the general fund but
shall remain in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account. There shall be no requirement that
monies received into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account during any given calendar
year or fiscal year be expended during the same calendar year or fiscal year.
(e) The Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be administered by the director,
who shall allocate and spend monies from the fund only in accordance with the purposes and
procedures set forth in this chapter.
39-18.1-5. Allocation of funds.
(a) The monies in the highway maintenance fund to be directed to the department of
transportation pursuant to § 39-18.1-4(b)(1) — (b)(3) shall be allocated through the transportation
improvement program process to provide the state match for federal transportation funds, in place
of borrowing, as approved by the state planning council. The expenditure of moneys in the highway
maintenance fund shall only be authorized for projects that appear in the state’s transportation
improvement program.
(b) Provided, however, that beginning with fiscal year 2015 and annually thereafter, the
department of transportation will allocate necessary funding to programs that are designed to
eliminate structural deficiencies of the state’s bridge, road, and maintenance systems and
infrastructure.
(c) Provided, further, that beginning July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2025, five percent (5%)
of available proceeds in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually
to the Rhode Island public transit authority for operating expenditures.
(d) Provided, that beginning July 1, 2025, ten percent (10%) of available proceeds in the
Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually to the Rhode Island public
transit authority for operating expenditures.
(d)(e) Provided, further, that from July 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, in addition to the
amount above, the Rhode Island public transit authority shall receive an amount of not less than
five million dollars ($5,000,000) each fiscal year, except for the period July 1, 2019, through June
30, 2022, during which such amount or a portion thereof may come from federal coronavirus relief
funds.
(e) Provided, further, that the Rhode Island public transit authority shall convene a
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -23-)

coordinating council consisting of those state agencies responsible for meeting the needs of low-
income seniors and persons with disabilities, along with those stakeholders that the authority deems
appropriate and are necessary to inform, develop, and implement the federally required coordinated
public transit human services transportation plan.
The council shall develop, as part of the state’s federally required plan, recommendations
for the appropriate and sustainable funding of the free-fare program for low-income seniors and
persons with disabilities, while maximizing the use of federal funds available to support the
transportation needs of this population.
The council shall report these recommendations to the governor, the speaker of the house
of representatives, and the president of the senate no later than November 1, 2018.
SECTION 13. Section 44-34.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-34.1 entitled "Motor
Vehicle and Trailer Excise Tax Elimination Act of 1998" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-34.1-2. City, town, and fire district reimbursement.
(a) In fiscal years 2024 and thereafter, cities, towns, and fire districts shall receive
reimbursements, as set forth in this section, from state general revenues equal to the amount of lost
tax revenue due to the phase out of the excise tax. When the tax is phased out, cities, towns, and
fire districts shall receive a permanent distribution of sales tax revenue pursuant to § 44-18-18 in
an amount equal to any lost revenue resulting from the excise tax elimination.
(b)(1) In fiscal year 2024, cities, towns, and fire districts shall receive the following
reimbursement amounts:
Barrington $ 5,894,822
Bristol $ 2,905,818
Burrillville $ 5,053,933
Central Falls $ 2,077,974
Charlestown $ 1,020,877
Coventry $ 5,872,396
Cranston $ 22,312,247
Cumberland $ 6,073,469
East Greenwich $ 2,417,332
East Providence $ 11,433,479
Exeter $ 2,241,381
Foster $ 1,652,251
Glocester $ 2,381,941
Hopkinton $ 1,629,259
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -24-)

Jamestown $ 622,793
Johnston $ 10,382,785
Lincoln $ 5,683,015
Little Compton $ 366,775
Middletown $ 1,976,448
Narragansett $ 1,831,251
Newport $ 2,223,671
New Shoreham $ 163,298
North Kingstown $ 5,378,818
North Providence $ 9,619,286
North Smithfield $ 4,398,531
Pawtucket $ 16,495,506
Portsmouth $ 2,414,242
Providence $ 34,131,596
Richmond $ 1,448,455
Scituate $ 1,977,127
Smithfield $ 7,098,694
South Kingstown $ 3,930,455
Tiverton $ 1,748,175
Warren $ 2,090,911
Warwick $ 25,246,254
Westerly $ 5,765,523
West Greenwich $ 1,331,725
West Warwick $ 5,673,744
Woonsocket $ 9,324,776
Lime Rock Fire District $ 133,933
Lincoln Fire District $ 208,994
Manville Fire District $ 64,862
Quinnville Fire District $ 13,483
(2) In fiscal year 2024, funds shall be distributed to the cities, towns, and fire districts as
follows:
(i) On August 1, 2023, twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds.
(ii) On November 1, 2023, twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds.
(iii) On February 1, 2024, twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -25-)

(iv) On May 1, 2024, twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds.
The funds shall be distributed to each city, town, and fire district in the same proportion as
distributed in fiscal year 2023.
(3) For the city of East Providence, the payment schedule is twenty-five percent (25%) on
November 1, 2023, twenty-five percent (25%) on February 1, 2024, twenty-five percent (25%) on
May 1, 2024, and twenty-five percent (25%) on August 1, 2024.
(4) On any of the payment dates specified in subsections (b)(2)(i) through (b)(2)(iv), or
(b)(3), or (d) of this section, the director of revenue is authorized to deduct previously made over-
payments or add supplemental payments as may be required to bring the reimbursements into full
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(c) When the tax is phased out to August 1, of the following fiscal year the director of
revenue shall calculate to the nearest thousandth of one cent ($0.00001) the number of cents of
sales tax received for the fiscal year ending June 30, of the year following the phase-out equal to
the amount of funds distributed to the cities, towns, and fire districts under this chapter during the
fiscal year following the phase-out and the percent of the total funds distributed in the fiscal year
following the phase-out received by each city, town, and fire district, calculated to the nearest one-
hundredth of one percent (0.01%). The director of the department of revenue shall transmit those
calculations to the governor, the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the chairperson
of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the house fiscal
advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor. The number of cents, applied to the sales taxes received for
the prior fiscal year, shall be the basis for determining the amount of sales tax to be distributed to
the cities, towns, and fire districts under this chapter for the second fiscal year following the phase-
out and each year thereafter. The cities, towns, and fire districts shall receive that amount of sales
tax in the proportions calculated by the director of revenue as that received in the fiscal year
following the phase-out, subject to a maximum two percentage point increase from the previous
fiscal year. For fiscal year 2026 only, the increase shall be based on the amount received pursuant
to subsection (b)(1) or subsection (c) of this section whichever is greater.
(d) In fiscal years 2025 and thereafter, twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds shall be
distributed to the cities, towns, and fire districts on August 1, 2024, and every August 1 thereafter;
twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed on November 1, 2024, and every November 1
thereafter; twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed on February 1, 2025, and every February
1 thereafter; and twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed on May 1, 2025, and every May 1
thereafter.
(e) [Deleted by P.L. 2024, ch. 400, § 1 and P.L. 2024, ch. 401, § 1.]
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -26-)

SECTION 14. Section 8-18-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-18 entitled "State and
Municipal Court Compact" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-18-6. Joint violation fines — Distribution of funds.
Cities or towns with municipal courts shall dedicate four dollars ($4.00) for reimbursement
from each summons to the general fund. Cities or towns without a municipal court shall dedicate
six dollars ($6.00) for reimbursement from each summons to the general fund. State agencies shall
dedicate twenty-two dollars ($22.00) from each summons to the general fund. Provided that cities,
towns and state agencies shall also dedicate all revenues generated directly as a result of fee
increases effective July 1, 2002 and, July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2025, to the general fund.
SECTION 15. Sections 1, 13 and 14 shall take effect upon passage. Sections 3 through 7
and sections 9 through 11 shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to offenses committed on
July 1, 2025 and thereafter. Sections 8 and 12 shall take effect on July 1, 2025. Section 2 shall take
effect upon January 1, 2026.
Art11
RELATING TO MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION
(Page -27-)

=======
art.012/3/009/1
=======
ARTICLE 12

RELATING TO LEASES
SECTION 1. This article consists of a Joint Resolution that is submitted pursuant to Rhode
Island General Law § 37-6-2, authorizing various lease agreements for office space and operating
space.
SECTION 2. Department of Children Youth and Families (101 Friendship Street,
Providence).
WHEREAS, the Department of Children Youth and Families currently occupies
approximately 99,500 square feet at 101 Friendship Street in the City of Providence; and
WHEREAS, the Department of Children Youth and Families currently holds a lease
agreement, in full force and effect, with Provident Property, LLC for approximately 99,500 square
feet of office space located at 101 Friendship Street, in the City of Providence; and
WHEREAS, the existing lease expires on November 30, 2025, and the Department of
Children Youth and Families wishes to renew this lease for an additional ten-year term; and
WHEREAS, the State of Rhode Island, acting by and through the Department of Children
Youth and Families attests to the fact that there are no clauses in the lease agreement with Provident
Property, LLC that would interfere with the Department of Children Youth and Families’ lease
agreement or use of the facility; and
WHEREAS, the leased premises provides a critical location for the offices of the
Department of Children Youth and Families from which the Department can fulfill its mission; and
WHEREAS, the annual fixed rent in the agreement in the current fiscal year, ending June
30, 2025 is $2,089,500.00; and
WHEREAS, the annual fixed rent of the agreement in each of the first five (5) years of the
renewal term will not exceed $2,293,826.79 and shall not exceed $2,490,076.79 in each of the
remaining years of the renewal term [or in each of years six (6) through ten (10) of the renewal
term]; and
WHEREAS, the payment of the annual fixed rent will be made from funds available to the
Department of Children Youth and Families for the payments of rental and lease costs based on
annual appropriations made by the General Assembly; and
WHEREAS, the State Properties Committee now respectfully requests the approval by the

Rhode Island House of Representatives and the Rhode Island Senate of the lease agreement
between the Department of Children Youth and Families and Provident Property, LLC for leased
space located at 101 Friendship Street, Providence; now therefore be it
RESOLVED, that this General Assembly of the State of Rhode Island hereby approves the
lease agreement, for a term not to exceed ten (10) years and an aggregate fixed rent not to exceed
$23,919,517.90; and it be further
RESOLVED, that this Joint Resolution shall take effect upon passage by the General
Assembly; and it be further
RESOLVED, that the Secretary of State is hereby authorized and directed to transmit duly
certified copies of this resolution to the Governor, the Director of the Department of Children Youth
and Families, the Director of Administration, the State Budget Officer, and the Chair of the State
Properties Committee.
SECTION 3. Rhode Island Emergency Management Agency (2700 Plainfield Pike,
Cranston).
WHEREAS, the Department of Administration currently holds a lease agreement which
was enacted during the Covid-19 emergency, with EIM Plainfield Pike, LLC for approximately
73,770 square feet of warehouse space located at 2700 Plainfield Pike, in the City of Cranston; and
WHEREAS, the existing lease expires on July 31, 2025, but the warehousing needs
continue; and
WHEREAS, the annual gross rent in the agreement in the existing lease is $684,585.60;
WHEREAS, the Department of Administration and Rhode Island Emergency Management
officials received and reviewed proposals for warehouses that would meet Emergency Management
Agency needs; and
WHEREAS, upon completing an evaluation of the submitted lease proposals, the Rhode
Island Emergency Management Agency wishes to enter into a ten-year lease agreement with EIM
Plainfield Pike, LLC for approximately 73,770 square feet of warehouse space located at 2700
Plainfield Pike in the city/town of Cranston.
WHEREAS, the aggregate base rent for the ten-year lease will not exceed $7,188,368.21.
WHEREAS, the payment of the annual base rent will be made from funds available to the
Rhode Island Emergency Management Agency for the payments of rental and lease costs based on
annual appropriations made by the General Assembly; and
WHEREAS, the State Properties Committee now respectfully requests the approval of the
Rhode Island House of Representatives and the Rhode Island Senate for the lease agreement
between the Rhode Island Emergency Management Agency and EIM Plainfield Pike, LLC for lease
Art12
RELATING TO LEASES
(Page -2-)

space located at 2700 Plainfield Pike; now therefore be it
RESOLVED, that this General Assembly of the State of Rhode Island hereby approves the
lease agreement, for a term not to exceed ten (10) years and an aggregate base rent not to exceed
$7,188,368.21; and it be further
RESOLVED, that this Joint Resolution shall take effect upon passage by the General
Assembly; and it be further
RESOLVED, that the Secretary of State is hereby authorized and directed to transmit duly
certified copies of this resolution to the Governor, the Director of the Rhode Island Emergency
Management Agency, the Director of Administration, the State Budget Officer, and the Chair of
the State Properties Committee.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
Art12
RELATING TO LEASES
(Page -3-)

=======
art.013/3/013/2/012/2
=======
ARTICLE 13 AS AMENDED

RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
SECTION 1. Subject to the conditions, limitations and restrictions hereinafter contained in
this act, the following general revenue amounts are hereby appropriated out of any money in the
treasury not otherwise appropriated to be expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.
The amounts identified for federal funds and restricted receipts shall be made available pursuant to
§ 35-4-22 and chapter 41 of title 42. For the purposes and functions hereinafter mentioned, the state
controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw the state controller’s orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required from time to
time upon receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.
FY 2025 FY 2025 FY 2025
Enacted Change FINAL
Administration
Central Management
General Revenues 3,654,794 597,932 4,252,726
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,000,000 0 33,000,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Public Health Response Warehouse Support 778,347 1,150,625 1,928,972
Health Care Facilities 10,000,000 0 10,000,000
Community Learning Center Programming
Support Grant 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure 0 7,333,768 7,333,768
Total - Central Management 49,433,141 9,082,325 58,515,466
Legal Services
General Revenues 2,491,594 158,027 2,649,621
Accounts and Control
General Revenues 5,355,257 253,964 5,609,221
Restricted Receipts - OPEB Board Administration 155,811 (6,839) 148,972
Restricted Receipts - Grants Management

Administration 2,477,997 36,372 2,514,369
Total - Accounts and Control 7,989,065 283,497 8,272,562
Office of Management and Budget
General Revenues 9,915,379 (302,716) 9,612,663
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 101,250 0 101,250
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
CPF Administration 484,149 2,640,104 3,124,253
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Pandemic Recovery Office 1,345,998 493,772 1,839,770
Restricted Receipts 300,000 0 300,000
Other Funds 617,223 557,597 1,174,820
Total - Office of Management and Budget 12,763,999 3,388,757 16,152,756
Purchasing
General Revenues 4,232,292 6,930 4,239,222
Restricted Receipts 461,480 267,080 728,560
Other Funds 571,626 28,904 600,530
Total - Purchasing 5,265,398 302,914 5,568,312
Human Resources
General Revenues 943,668 (45,916) 897,752
Personnel Appeal Board
General Revenues 159,290 (71) 159,219
Information Technology
General Revenues 1,838,147 (116,807) 1,721,340
Restricted Receipts 3,379,840 8,246,510 11,626,350
Total - Information Technology 5,217,987 8,129,703 13,347,690
Library and Information Services
General Revenues 1,949,487 59,554 2,009,041
Federal Funds 1,606,151 (27,693) 1,578,458
Restricted Receipts 6,990 0 6,990
Total - Library and Information Services 3,562,628 31,861 3,594,489
Planning
General Revenues 1,175,750 (45,799) 1,129,951
Federal Funds 3,050 0 3,050
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -2-)

Restricted Receipts 50,000 50,000 100,000
Other Funds
Air Quality Modeling 24,000 0 24,000
Federal Highway - PL Systems Planning 3,597,529 127,414 3,724,943
State Transportation Planning Match 454,850 27,487 482,337
FTA - Metro Planning Grant 1,453,240 39,827 1,493,067
Total - Planning 6,758,419 198,929 6,957,348
General
General Revenues
Miscellaneous Grants/Payments 510,405 (510,405) 0
Torts Court Awards 1,350,000 100,000 1,450,000
Wrongful Conviction Awards 811,446 0 811,446
Resource Sharing and State Library Aid 11,855,428 0 11,855,428
Library Construction Aid 2,232,819 0 2,232,819
Federal Funds- Capital Projects Fund
Community Learning Center Municipal
Grant Program 0 79,639,111 79,639,111
Restricted Receipts 700,000 398,187 1,098,187
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Security Measures State Buildings 975,000 99,137 1,074,137
Energy Efficiency Improvements 1,000,000 (1,000,000) 0
Cranston Street Armory 250,000 0 250,000
State House Renovations 2,209,000 4,815,744 7,024,744
Zambarano Buildings and Campus 4,740,000 17,646,243 22,386,243
Replacement of Fueling Tanks 700,000 507,587 1,207,587
Environmental Compliance 725,000 195,892 920,892
Big River Management Area 754,154 166,155 920,309
Shepard Building Upgrades 435,000 1,790,307 2,225,307
RI Convention Center Authority 3,590,000 0 3,590,000
Pastore Center Power Plant 250,000 344,982 594,982
Accessibility - Facility Renovations 288,928 656,986 945,914
DoIT Enterprise Operations Center 6,550,000 361,968 6,911,968
Cannon Building 700,000 (550,000) 150,000
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -3-)

Old State House 2,000,000 437,783 2,437,783
State Office Building 675,000 133,679 808,679
State Office Reorganization & Relocation 250,000 1,448,690 1,698,690
William Powers Building 2,400,000 3,252,693 5,652,693
Pastore Center Non-Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 10,405,000 7,851,068 18,256,068
Washington County Government Center 800,000 (552,137) 247,863
Chapin Health Laboratory 350,000 88,000 438,000
560 Jefferson Blvd Asset Protection 1,600,000 (750,000) 850,000
Arrigan Center 75,000 42,080 117,080
Civic Center 3,550,000 0 3,550,000
Pastore Center Buildings Demolition 9,900,000 (502,075) 9,397,925
Veterans Auditorium 400,000 0 400,000
Pastore Center Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 2,400,000 (863,305) 1,536,695
Pastore Campus Infrastructure 22,195,000 12,618,431 34,813,431
Community Facilities Asset Protection 925,000 197,300 1,122,300
Zambarano LTAC Hospital 7,099,677 1,462,514 8,562,191
Medical Examiners - New Facility 50,000 2,229,462 2,279,462
Group Home Replacement & Rehabilitation 5,000,000 492,766 5,492,766
Hospital Reorganization 25,000,000 0 25,000,000
Expo Center 1,220,000 0 1,220,000
Group Homes Consolidation 4,325,000 0 4,325,000
Statewide Facility Master Plan 500,000 607,069 1,107,069
BHDDH DD & Community Facilities –
Asset Protection 0 294,872 294,872
BHDDH DD & Community Homes – Fire Code 0 143,473 143,473
BHDDH DD Regional Facilities –
Asset Protection 0 340,998 340,998
BHDDH Substance Abuse Asset Protection 0 18,341 18,341
BHDDH Group Homes 0 157,947 157,947
State Land Use Planning Study 0 250,000 250,000
Total - General 141,746,857 134,061,543 275,808,400
Debt Service Payments
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -4-)

General Revenues 164,837,664 (5,329,893) 159,507,771
Other Funds
Transportation Debt Service 32,887,674 1 32,887,675
Investment Receipts - Bond Funds 100,000 55,477 155,477
Total - Debt Service Payments 197,825,338 (5,274,415) 192,550,923
Energy Resources
General Revenues 500,000 (500,000) 0
Provided that $250,000 is allocated to support the electric bicycle rebate program and
$250,000 is for the electric leaf blower rebate program.
Federal Funds 15,042,632 (15,042,632) 0
Restricted Receipts 25,217,475 (25,217,475) 0
Other Funds 4,064,322 (4,064,322) 0
Total - Energy Resources 44,824,429 (44,824,429) 0
Rhode Island Health Benefits Exchange
General Revenues 3,529,116 (1,497,514) 2,031,602
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 10,758,473 0 10,758,473
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Auto-Enrollment Program 0 166,065 166,065
Restricted Receipts 16,139,854 1,674,514 17,814,368
Total - Rhode Island Health Benefits
Exchange 30,427,443 343,065 30,770,508
Division of Equity, Diversity & Inclusion
General Revenues 2,152,119 (426,605) 1,725,514
Other Funds 110,521 (9,172) 101,349
Total - Division of Equity, Diversity
& Inclusion 2,262,640 (435,777) 1,826,863
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
General Revenues 9,931,679 (144,456) 9,787,223
Statewide Personnel and Operations
FEMA Contingency Reserve
General Revenues 5,000,000 (3,500,000) 1,500,000
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby
reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -5-)

Pension Plan Revisions
General Revenues 20,600,000 (20,600,000) 0
Federal Funds 3,600,000 (3,600,000) 0
Restricted Receipts 1,100,000 (1,100,000) 0
Other Funds 2,200,000 (2,200,000) 0
Total - Statewide Personnel and Operations 32,500,000 (31,000,000) 1,500,000
Grand Total - Administration 554,103,575 74,255,557 628,359,132
Office of Energy Resources
General Revenues 0 500,000 500,000
Provided that $250,000 is allocated to support the electric bicycle rebate program and
$250,000 is for the electric leaf blower rebate program. Provided further that unexpended or
unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 0 21,404,650 21,404,650
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Electric Heat Pump Grant Program 0 14,033,712 14,033,712
Restricted Receipts 0 26,431,400 26,431,400
Other Funds
National Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Formula
Program 0 4,674,978 4,674,978
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Energy Efficiency Improvements 0 1,329,411 1,329,411
Grand Total – Office of Energy Resources 0 68,374,151 68,374,151
Business Regulation
Central Management
General Revenues 3,999,763 136,544 4,136,307
Banking Regulation
General Revenues 1,904,080 114,285 2,018,365
Restricted Receipts 63,000 (14,500) 48,500
Total - Banking Regulation 1,967,080 99,785 2,066,865
Securities Regulation
General Revenues 880,722 69,016 949,738
Insurance Regulation
General Revenues 4,844,248 228,325 5,072,573
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -6-)

Restricted Receipts 1,872,951 294,587 2,167,538
Total - Insurance Regulation 6,717,199 522,912 7,240,111
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner
General Revenues 3,058,281 (63,685) 2,994,596
Federal Funds 403,180 110,000 513,180
Restricted Receipts 527,468 42,859 570,327
Total - Office of the Health Insurance
Commissioner 3,988,929 89,174 4,078,103
Board of Accountancy
General Revenues 5,490 0 5,490
Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics Licensing
General Revenues 949,709 261,856 1,211,565
Restricted Receipts 1,046,895 (40,122) 1,006,773
Total - Commercial Licensing and Gaming
and Athletics Licensing 1,996,604 221,734 2,218,338
Building, Design and Fire Professionals
General Revenues 8,449,335 (341,477) 8,107,858
Federal Funds 345,863 503 346,366
Restricted Receipts 1,948,472 117,086 2,065,558
Other Funds
Quonset Development Corporation 67,300 (16,614) 50,686
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Fire Academy Expansion 7,056,000 (4,556,280) 2,499,720
Total - Building, Design and Fire Professionals 17,866,970 (4,796,782) 13,070,188
Office of Cannabis Regulation
Restricted Receipts 6,697,782 350,047 7,047,829
Grand Total - Business Regulation 44,120,539 (3,307,570) 40,812,969
Executive Office of Commerce
Central Management
General Revenues 2,264,703 50,640 2,315,343
Quasi-Public Appropriations
General Revenues
Rhode Island Commerce Corporation 8,506,041 0 8,506,041
Airport Impact Aid 1,010,036 0 1,010,036
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -7-)

Sixty percent (60%) of the first $1,000,000 appropriated for airport impact aid shall be
distributed to each airport serving more than 1,000,000 passengers based upon its percentage of the
total passengers served by all airports serving more than 1,000,000 passengers. Forty percent (40%)
of the first $1,000,000 shall be distributed based on the share of landings during calendar year 2024
at North Central Airport, Newport-Middletown Airport, Block Island Airport, Quonset Airport,
T.F. Green International Airport and Westerly Airport, respectively. The Rhode Island commerce
corporation shall make an impact payment to the towns or cities in which the airport is located
based on this calculation. Each community upon which any part of the above airports is located
shall receive at least $25,000.
STAC Research Alliance 900,000 0 900,000
Innovative Matching Grants/Internships 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 1,245,050 0 1,245,050
Polaris Manufacturing Grant 500,000 0 500,000
East Providence Waterfront Commission 50,000 0 50,000
Urban Ventures 140,000 0 140,000
Chafee Center at Bryant 476,200 0 476,200
Blackstone Valley Visitor Center 75,000 0 75,000
Municipal Infrastructure Grant Program 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Infrastructure Bank – Statewide Coastal
Resiliency Plan 750,000 0 750,000
Industrial Recreational Building Authority
Obligations 452,553 0 452,553
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Port of Davisville 0 45,635,990 45,635,990
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 646,180 357,329 1,003,509
I-195 Park Improvements 3,000,000 (1,000,000) 2,000,000
Quonset Carrier Pier 2,250,000 0 2,250,000
Quonset Infrastructure 2,500,000 0 2,500,000
Total - Quasi-Public Appropriations 26,501,060 44,993,319 71,494,379
Economic Development Initiatives Fund
General Revenues
Innovation Initiative 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -8-)

Rebuild RI Tax Credit Fund 10,085,000 0 10,085,000
Small Business Promotion 750,000 0 750,000
Destination Marketing 1,400,000 0 1,400,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 20,000,000 0 20,000,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Assistance to Impacted Industries 2,000,000 1 2,000,001
Total - Economic Development Initiatives Fund 35,235,000 1 35,235,001
Commerce Programs
General Revenues
Wavemaker Fellowship 4,076,400 0 4,076,400
Provided that at least $500,000 shall be reserved for awards for medical doctor, nurse
practitioner, and physician assistant healthcare applicants who provide primary care services as
defined in § 42-64.26-3.
Air Service Development Fund 1,200,000 0 1,200,000
Main Street RI Streetscape Improvement Fund 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Minority Business Accelerator 500,000 0 500,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
Broadband 0 25,786,500 25,786,500
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Minority Business Accelerator 0 2,406,662 2,406,662
Bioscience Investments 0 42,999,400 42,999,400
Small Business Assistance 0 2,457,517 2,457,517
Total - Commerce Programs 6,776,400 73,650,079 80,426,479
Grand Total - Executive Office of Commerce 70,777,163 118,694,039 189,471,202
Housing
General Revenues 9,840,596 (4,672,883) 5,167,713
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 18,530,670 (124,406) 18,406,264
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Homelessness Assistance Program 17,300,000 5,795,840 23,095,840
Development of Affordable Housing 0 60,055,876 60,055,876
Home Repair and Community Revitalization 0 17,502,101 17,502,101
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -9-)

Homelessness Infrastructure 0 17,615,951 17,615,951
Housing Related Infrastructure 0 3,000,000 3,000,000
Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative 0 1,887,465 1,887,465
Municipal Planning 0 2,300,000 2,300,000
Predevelopment and Capacity Building 0 256,825 256,825
Preservation of Affordable Housing Units 0 500,000 500,000
Proactive Housing Development 0 1,400,000 1,400,000
Site Acquisition 0 900 900
Statewide Housing Plan 0 1,961,351 1,961,351
Targeted Housing Development 0 26,000,000 26,000,000
Workforce Housing 0 16,327,497 16,327,497
Restricted Receipts 12,664,150 5,493,793 18,157,943
Grand Total - Housing 58,335,416 155,300,310 213,635,726
Labor and Training
Central Management
General Revenues 1,563,445 (7,028) 1,556,417
Restricted Receipts 305,765 170,565 476,330
Total - Central Management 1,869,210 163,537 2,032,747
Workforce Development Services
General Revenues 1,109,430 5,176 1,114,606
Provided that $200,000 of this amount is used to support Year Up.
Federal Funds 23,836,453 2,996,115 26,832,568
Other Funds 0 44,531 44,531
Total - Workforce Development Services 24,945,883 3,045,822 27,991,705
Workforce Regulation and Safety
General Revenues 4,833,768 186,338 5,020,106
Income Support
General Revenues 3,692,213 5,036 3,697,249
Federal Funds 18,875,141 7,316,530 26,191,671
Restricted Receipts 2,721,683 1,653,177 4,374,860
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 278,906,931 (167,513) 278,739,418
Employment Security Fund 222,700,000 8,250,000 230,950,000
Total - Income Support 526,895,968 17,057,230 543,953,198
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -10-)

Injured Workers Services
Restricted Receipts 10,630,130 360,638 10,990,768
Labor Relations Board
General Revenues 541,797 16,290 558,087
Governor’s Workforce Board
General Revenues 6,050,000 2,201,728 8,251,728
Provided that $600,000 of these funds shall be used for enhanced training for direct care
and support services staff to improve resident quality of care and address the changing health care
needs of nursing facility residents due to higher acuity and increased cognitive impairments
pursuant to § 23-17.5-36.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Enhanced Real Jobs 0 5,943,056 5,943,056
Restricted Receipts 18,304,506 4,430,860 22,735,366
Total - Governor’s Workforce Board 24,354,506 12,575,644 36,930,150
Grand Total - Labor and Training 594,071,262 33,405,499 627,476,761
Department of Revenue
Director of Revenue
General Revenues 2,883,605 47,165 2,930,770
Office of Revenue Analysis
General Revenues 1,015,848 85,700 1,101,548
Lottery Division
Other Funds
Other Funds 422,981,930 24,049,073 447,031,003
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Lottery Building Enhancements 690,000 160,000 850,000
Total - Lottery Division 423,671,930 24,209,073 447,881,003
Municipal Finance
General Revenues 2,241,697 (415,854) 1,825,843
Taxation
General Revenues 35,972,773 179,004 36,151,777
Restricted Receipts 4,826,512 (166,033) 4,660,479
Other Funds
Motor Fuel Tax Evasion 175,000 0 175,000
Total - Taxation 40,974,285 12,971 40,987,256
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -11-)

Registry of Motor Vehicles
General Revenues 31,206,744 4,034,290 35,241,034
Provided that all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 relating to the
implementation of a mobile DMV are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 805,667 (77,575) 728,092
Restricted Receipts 3,659,640 220,000 3,879,640
Total - Registry of Motor Vehicles 35,672,051 4,176,715 39,848,766
State Aid
General Revenues
Distressed Communities Relief Fund 12,384,458 0 12,384,458
Payment in Lieu of Tax Exempt Properties 49,201,412 0 49,201,412
Motor Vehicle Excise Tax Payments 234,712,307 6 234,712,313
Property Revaluation Program 1,887,448 0 1,887,448
Tangible Tax Exemption Program 28,000,000 (2,096,772) 25,903,228
Restricted Receipts 995,120 0 995,120
Total - State Aid 327,180,745 (2,096,766) 325,083,979
Collections
General Revenues 965,438 (16,677) 948,761
Grand Total - Revenue 834,605,599 26,002,327 860,607,926
Legislature
General Revenues 53,358,280 10,788,584 64,146,864
Restricted Receipts 2,431,651 158,758 2,590,409
Grand Total - Legislature 55,789,931 10,947,342 66,737,273
Lieutenant Governor
General Revenues 1,447,015 (76,912) 1,370,103
Secretary of State
Administration
General Revenues 5,076,740 384,272 5,461,012
Provided that $100,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Council for the
Humanities for grant making to civic and cultural organizations, and $50,000 to support Rhode
Island’s participation in the We the People Civics Challenge.
Corporations
General Revenues 2,807,730 36,451 2,844,181
State Archives
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -12-)

General Revenues 349,562 5,070 354,632
Restricted Receipts 384,347 9,315 393,662
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Rhode Island Archives and History Center 500,000 0 500,000
Total - State Archives 1,233,909 14,385 1,248,294
Elections and Civics
General Revenues 2,689,990 (19,106) 2,670,884
Federal Funds 2,001,207 0 2,001,207
Total - Elections and Civics 4,691,197 (19,106) 4,672,091
State Library
General Revenues 649,250 2,486 651,736
Provided that $125,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Historical Society and
$18,000 be allocated to support the Newport Historical Society, pursuant to §§ 29-2-1 and 29-2-2,
and $25,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Black Heritage Society.
Office of Public Information
General Revenues 888,969 (64,230) 824,739
Receipted Receipts 25,000 0 25,000
Total - Office of Public Information 913,969 (64,230) 849,739
Grand Total - Secretary of State 15,372,795 354,258 15,727,053
General Treasurer
Treasury
General Revenues
General Revenues 3,022,950 156,313 3,179,263
Medical Debt Relief 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby
reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 335,037 8,779 343,816
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 247,266 (8,275) 238,991
Tuition Savings Program - Administration 353,760 16,155 369,915
Total -Treasury 4,959,013 172,972 5,131,985
State Retirement System
Restricted Receipts
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -13-)

Admin Expenses - State Retirement System 11,808,078 366,679 12,174,757
Retirement - Treasury Investment Operations 2,149,961 150,864 2,300,825
Defined Contribution - Administration 287,609 (26,029) 261,580
Total - State Retirement System 14,245,648 491,514 14,737,162
Unclaimed Property
Restricted Receipts 2,981,837 123,688 3,105,525
Crime Victim Compensation
General Revenues 892,383 29,071 921,454
Federal Funds 427,993 15,000 442,993
Restricted Receipts 380,000 (130,000) 250,000
Total - Crime Victim Compensation 1,700,376 (85,929) 1,614,447
Grand Total - General Treasurer 23,886,874 702,245 24,589,119
Board of Elections
General Revenues 5,682,615 44,023 5,726,638
Provided that $500,000 be allocated to support election-related technology, including items
such as poll pads or campaign finance system upgrades, and that all unexpended or unencumbered
balances at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made
immediately available for the same purpose.
Rhode Island Ethics Commission
General Revenues 2,234,502 180,709 2,415,211
Office of Governor
General Revenues
General Revenues 8,321,265 502,554 8,823,819
Contingency Fund 150,000 0 150,000
Grand Total - Office of Governor 8,471,265 502,554 8,973,819
Commission for Human Rights
General Revenues 2,055,616 166,381 2,221,997
Federal Funds 450,110 97,750 547,860
Grand Total - Commission for Human Rights 2,505,726 264,131 2,769,857
Public Utilities Commission
Federal Funds 711,984 14,133 726,117
Restricted Receipts 13,895,536 421,324 14,316,860
Grand Total - Public Utilities Commission 14,607,520 435,457 15,042,977
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -14-)

Central Management
General Revenues 58,336,613 (9,188,647) 49,147,966
Provided that $250,000 will be available for the Hospital Care Transitions Initiative if the
program receives approval for Medicaid match and $275,000 to assist nonprofit nursing facilities
transition licensed occupancy availability from nursing home beds to assisted living ones, of which
$200,000 shall be provided to Linn Health & Rehabilitation.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 210,410,919 (46,459,980) 163,950,939
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics 0 6,959,131 6,959,131
Pediatric Recovery 0 129 129
Restricted Receipts 47,669,671 (612,326) 47,057,345
Provided that $5.0 million is for Children’s Mobile Response and Stabilization Services
(MRSS) subject to CMS approval. Children’s MRSS program provides on-demand crisis
intervention services in any setting in which a behavioral health crisis is occurring including homes,
schools and hospital emergency departments. This state sanctioned mobile crisis service for
children and youth ages 2-21 shall be delivered through Care Coordination Agreements with an
organization that is certified as an Emergency Service Provider pursuant to Title 40.1, Chapter 5-
6(a)(2) of the General Laws of Rhode Island and 214-RICR-40-00-6 and has previously
participated in the state’s Children’s MRSS pilot program, and $250,000 shall be for the executive
office to develop an Olmstead Plan.
Total - Central Management 316,417,203 (49,301,693) 267,115,510
Medical Assistance
General Revenues
Managed Care 456,944,195 (12,596,621) 444,347,574
Hospitals 124,241,089 461,260 124,702,349
Nursing Facilities 173,311,380 13,731,120 187,042,500
Home and Community Based Services 97,185,377 12,223,483 109,408,860
Other Services 162,460,512 (9,963,903) 152,496,609
Pharmacy 96,904,515 (3,202,866) 93,701,649
Rhody Health 247,034,551 (18,960,820) 228,073,731
Federal Funds
Managed Care 613,138,381 (19,885,955) 593,252,426
Hospitals 242,897,784 6,938,739 249,836,523
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -15-)

Nursing Facilities 220,488,620 17,468,880 237,957,500
Home and Community Based Services 124,018,299 15,172,841 139,191,140
Other Services 789,376,252 (37,587,861) 751,788,391
Pharmacy (404,515) 1,602,866 1,198,351
Rhody Health 312,007,950 (16,281,681) 295,726,269
Other Programs 31,921,606 (3,647,319) 28,274,287
Restricted Receipts 9,808,674 290,472 10,099,146
Total - Medical Assistance 3,701,334,670 (54,237,365) 3,647,097,305
Grand Total – Executive Office of Health and
Human Services 4,017,751,873 (103,539,058) 3,914,212,815
Children, Youth and Families
Central Management
General Revenues 15,565,996 3,828,383 19,394,379
The director of the department of children, youth and families shall provide to the speaker
of the house and president of the senate at least every sixty (60) days beginning September 1, 2021,
a report on its progress implementing the accreditation plan filed in accordance with § 42-72-5.3
and any projected changes needed to effectuate that plan. The report shall, at minimum, provide
data regarding recruitment and retention efforts including attaining and maintaining a diverse
workforce, documentation of newly filled and vacated positions, and progress towards reducing
worker caseloads.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 8,718,289 6,964,234 15,682,523
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Provider Workforce Stabilization 1,200,000 767,672 1,967,672
Total - Central Management 25,484,285 11,560,289 37,044,574
Children's Behavioral Health Services
General Revenues 7,732,064 (808,070) 6,923,994
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 9,693,607 (1,324,936) 8,368,671
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility 0 5,781,955 5,781,955
Total - Children's Behavioral Health Services 17,425,671 3,648,949 21,074,620
Youth Development Services
General Revenues 22,893,954 2,590,896 25,484,850
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -16-)

Federal Funds 224,837 419,755 644,592
Restricted Receipts 144,986 (143,486) 1,500
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Training School Asset Protection 250,000 127,152 377,152
Residential Treatment Facility Facilities 15,000,000 13,591,079 28,591,079
Total - Youth Development Services 38,513,777 16,585,396 55,099,173
Child Welfare
General Revenues 214,966,186 (5,616,953) 209,349,233
Federal Funds 101,906,773 (9,858,258) 92,048,515
Restricted Receipts 558,571 917,877 1,476,448
Total - Child Welfare 317,431,530 (14,557,334) 302,874,196
Higher Education Incentive Grants
General Revenues 200,000 0 200,000
Provided that these funds and any unexpended or unencumbered previous years’ funding
are to be used exclusively to fund awards to eligible youth.
Grand Total - Children, Youth and Families 399,055,263 17,237,300 416,292,563
Health
Central Management
General Revenues
General Revenues 3,569,508 75,186 3,644,694
Primary Care Training Sites Program 2,700,000 (1,997,668) 702,332
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby
reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 9,348,930 (1,975,351) 7,373,579
Restricted Receipts 18,260,961 (3,203,664) 15,057,297
Provided that the disbursement of any indirect cost recoveries on federal grants budgeted
in this line item that are derived from grants authorized under The Coronavirus Preparedness and
Response Supplemental Appropriations Act (P.L. 116-123); The Families First Coronavirus
Response Act (P.L. 116-127); The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-
136); The Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (P.L. 116-139); the
Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (P.L. 116-260); and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
(P.L. 117-2), are hereby subject to the review and prior approval of the director of management and
budget. No obligation or expenditure of these funds shall take place without such approval.
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -17-)

Total - Central Management 33,879,399 (7,101,497) 26,777,902
Community Health and Equity
General Revenues 1,151,326 11,217 1,162,543
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 83,451,102 7,743,317 91,194,419
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Public Health Clinics 0 984,027 984,027
Restricted Receipts 80,924,334 (16,867,302) 64,057,032
Total - Community Health and Equity 165,526,762 (8,128,741) 157,398,021
Environmental Health
General Revenues 7,155,472 138,305 7,293,777
Federal Funds 11,442,251 3,114,788 14,557,039
Restricted Receipts 968,283 43,075 1,011,358
Total - Environmental Health 19,566,006 3,296,168 22,862,174
Health Laboratories and Medical Examiner
General Revenues 13,340,120 218,938 13,559,058
Federal Funds 2,515,810 589,112 3,104,922
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Health Laboratories & Medical Examiner
Equipment 800,000 5,013 805,013
New Health Laboratory Building 2,221,762 4,977,348 7,199,110
Total - Health Laboratories and Medical Examiner 18,877,692 5,790,411 24,668,103
Customer Services
General Revenues 8,969,365 (49,469) 8,919,896
Federal Funds 7,882,616 151,072 8,033,688
Restricted Receipts 6,103,607 2,963,215 9,066,822
Total - Customer Services 22,955,588 3,064,818 26,020,406
Policy, Information and Communications
General Revenues 998,588 29,401 1,027,989
Federal Funds 4,095,600 (151,099) 3,944,501
Restricted Receipts 1,812,550 (40,489) 1,772,061
Total - Policy, Information and Communications 6,906,738 (162,187) 6,744,551
Preparedness, Response, Infectious Disease & Emergency Services
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -18-)

General Revenues 2,169,568 53,500 2,223,068
Federal Funds 17,503,333 1,047,588 18,550,921
Total - Preparedness, Response, Infectious
Disease & Emergency Services 19,672,901 1,101,088 20,773,989
COVID-19
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 68,869,887 15,523,843 84,393,730
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
COVID-19 Operational Support 0 12,233,311 12,233,311
Total – COVID-19 68,869,887 27,757,154 96,627,041
Grand Total - Health 356,254,973 25,617,214 381,872,187
Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 6,793,641 (462,857) 6,330,784
Of this amount, $400,000 is to support the domestic violence prevention fund to provide
direct services through the Coalition Against Domestic Violence, $25,000 for the Center for
Southeast Asians, $450,000 to support Project Reach activities provided by the RI Alliance of Boys
and Girls Clubs, $300,000 is for outreach and supportive services through Day One, $800,000 is
for food collection and distribution through the Rhode Island Community Food Bank, $500,000 for
services provided to the homeless at Crossroads Rhode Island, $600,000 for the Community Action
Fund, $250,000 is for the Institute for the Study and Practice of Nonviolence’s Reduction Strategy,
$200,000 to provide operational support to the United Way’s 211 system, $125,000 is to support
services provided to the immigrant and refugee population through Higher Ground International,
and $50,000 is for services provided to refugees through the Refugee Dream Center and $100,000
for the Substance Use and Mental Health Leadership Council of RI.
The director of the department of human services shall provide to the speaker of the house,
president of the senate, and chairs of the house and senate finance committees at least every sixty
(60) days beginning August 1, 2022, a report on its progress in recruiting and retaining customer
serving staff. The report shall include: documentation of newly filled and vacated positions,
including lateral transfers, position titles, civil service information, including numbers of eligible
and available candidates, plans for future testing and numbers of eligible and available candidates
resulting from such testing, impacts on caseload backlogs and call center wait times, as well as
other pertinent information as determined by the director.
Federal Funds 8,012,780 33,689 8,046,469
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -19-)

Of this amount, $3.0 million is to sustain Early Head Start and Head Start programs.
Restricted Receipts 300,000 1,473,640 1,773,640
Total - Central Management 15,106,421 1,044,472 16,150,893
Child Support Enforcement
General Revenues 4,624,506 (1,318,723) 3,305,783
Federal Funds 9,988,214 455,814 10,444,028
Restricted Receipts 3,823,859 1,177,659 5,001,518
Total - Child Support Enforcement 18,436,579 314,750 18,751,329
Individual and Family Support
General Revenues 44,747,836 (756,944) 43,990,892
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 130,770,837 14,461,303 145,232,140
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Child Care Support 0 2,689,791 2,689,791
Restricted Receipts 705,708 (85,000) 620,708
Other Funds
Food Stamp Bonus Funding 298,874 (298,874) 0
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Blind Vending Facilities 165,000 73,773 238,773
Total - Individual and Family Support 176,688,255 16,084,049 192,772,304
Office of Veterans Services
General Revenues 32,935,642 11,519 32,947,161
Of this amount, $200,000 is to provide support services through veterans’ organizations,
$50,000 is to support Operation Stand Down, and $100,000 is to support the Veterans Services
Officers (VSO) program through the Veterans of Foreign Wars.
Federal Funds 16,618,112 (429,470) 16,188,642
Restricted Receipts 1,360,000 907,294 2,267,294
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Veterans Home Asset Protection 760,000 139,669 899,669
Veterans Memorial Cemetery Asset Protection 500,000 19,547 519,547
Total - Office of Veterans Services 52,173,754 648,559 52,822,313
Health Care Eligibility
General Revenues 10,634,812 (950,859) 9,683,953
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -20-)

Federal Funds 16,821,865 733,061 17,554,926
Total - Health Care Eligibility 27,456,677 (217,798) 27,238,879
Supplemental Security Income Program
General Revenues 16,588,320 85,460 16,673,780
Rhode Island Works
General Revenues 10,139,902 (19,105) 10,120,797
Federal Funds 97,508,826 (2,869,356) 94,639,470
Total - Rhode Island Works 107,648,728 (2,888,461) 104,760,267
Other Programs
General Revenues
General Revenues 2,102,900 (218,480) 1,884,420
Retail SNAP Incentives Pilot Program 0 3,811,980 3,811,980
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 361,440,000 16,745,002 378,185,002
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Retail SNAP Incentives Pilot Program 0 4,500,000 4,500,000
Restricted Receipts 8,000 0 8,000
Total - Other Programs 363,550,900 24,838,502 388,389,402
Office of Healthy Aging
General Revenues 14,223,241 (918,797) 13,304,444
Of this amount, $325,000 is to provide elder services, including respite, through the
Diocese of Providence; $40,000 is for ombudsman services provided by the Alliance for Long
Term Care in accordance with chapter 66.7 of title 42; $85,000 is for security for housing for the
elderly in accordance with § 42-66.1-3; and $1,400,000 is for Senior Services Support and
$680,000 is for elderly nutrition, of which $630,000 is for Meals on Wheels.
Federal Funds 18,548,799 (495,501) 18,053,298
Restricted Receipt 46,200 183,215 229,415
Other Funds
Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund 4,273,680 18,396 4,292,076
The Office shall reimburse the Rhode Island public transit authority for the elderly/disabled
transportation program expenses no later than fifteen (15) days of the authority’s submission of a
request for payment.
Total - Office of Healthy Aging 37,091,920 (1,212,687) 35,879,233
Grand Total - Human Services 814,741,554 38,696,846 853,438,400
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -21-)

Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Central Management
General Revenues 2,780,069 5,273,028 8,053,097
Federal Funds 1,276,605 1,303,705 2,580,310
Restricted Receipts 0 559,071 559,071
Total - Central Management 4,056,674 7,135,804 11,192,478
Hospital and Community System Support
General Revenues 1,463,642 (1,463,642) 0
Federal Funds 400,294 (400,294) 0
Restricted Receipts 167,548 (167,548) 0
Total - Hospital and Community System Support 2,031,484 (2,031,484) 0
Services for the Developmentally Disabled
General Revenues 210,802,707 8,185,076 218,987,783
Provided that of this general revenue funding, an amount certified by the department shall
be expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that of this general revenue funding, $982,957 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services, of which a total of $583,021 shall be expended specifically on those who self-direct for
creation of regional service adjustment models and pool of substitute staff. All unexpended or
unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to
the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 262,600,057 11,029,127 273,629,184
Provided that of this federal funding, an amount certified by the department shall be
expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -22-)

Provided further that of this federal funding, $508,803 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services. All unexpended or unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year
shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same
purpose.
Restricted Receipts 1,444,204 (143,338) 1,300,866
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DD Residential Support 100,000 98,462 198,462
Total - Services for the Developmentally Disabled 474,946,968 19,169,327 494,116,295
Behavioral Healthcare Services
General Revenues 4,118,531 653,546 4,772,077
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,919,356 (313,825) 33,605,531
Provided that $250,000 from Social Services Block Grant funds is awarded to The
Providence Center to coordinate with Oasis Wellness and Recovery Center for its support and
services program offered to individuals with behavioral health issues.
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
9-8-8 Hotline 1,875,000 (162,342) 1,712,658
Crisis Intervention Trainings 0 1,649,886 1,649,886
Restricted Receipts 6,759,883 7,776,177 14,536,060
Provided that $500,000 from the opioid stewardship fund is distributed equally to the seven
regional substance abuse prevention task forces to fund priorities determined by each Task Force.
Total - Behavioral Healthcare Services 46,672,770 9,603,442 56,276,212
Hospital and Community Rehabilitative Services
General Revenues 53,030,624 1,269,060 54,299,684
Federal Funds 53,088,129 2,199,437 55,287,566
Restricted Receipts 4,535,481 3,138,883 7,674,364
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Hospital Equipment 500,000 111,974 611,974
Total - Hospital and Community Rehabilitative
Services 111,154,234 6,719,354 117,873,588
State of RI Psychiatric Hospital
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -23-)

General Revenues 33,499,422 1,229,687 34,729,109
Grand Total - Behavioral Healthcare,
Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 672,361,552 41,826,130 714,187,682
Office of the Child Advocate
General Revenues 1,891,426 (127,686) 1,763,740
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
General Revenues 782,651 (119,971) 662,680
Restricted Receipts 131,533 10,296 141,829
Grand Total - Comm. On Deaf and
Hard-of-Hearing 914,184 (109,675) 804,509
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities
General Revenues
General Revenues 765,088 160,733 925,821
Livable Home Modification Grant Program 765,304 640,539 1,405,843
Provided that this will be used for home modification and accessibility enhancements to
construct, retrofit, and/or renovate residences to allow individuals to remain in community settings.
This will be in consultation with the executive office of health and human services. All unexpended
or unencumbered balances, at the end of the fiscal year, shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal
year, and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 340,000 81,579 421,579
Restricted Receipts 66,539 651 67,190
Grand Total - Governor’s Commission on Disabilities1,936,931 883,502 2,820,433
Office of the Mental Health Advocate
General Revenues 981,608 (250,935) 730,673
Elementary and Secondary Education
Administration of the Comprehensive Education Strategy
General Revenues
General Revenues 39,044,536 815,249 39,859,785
Provided that $90,000 be allocated to support the hospital school at Hasbro Children’s
Hospital pursuant to § 16-7-20; and that $395,000 be allocated to support child opportunity zones
through agreements with the department of elementary and secondary education to strengthen
education, health and social services for students and their families as a strategy to accelerate
student achievement; and further provided that $450,000 and 3.0 full-time equivalent positions be
allocated to support a special education function to facilitate individualized education program
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -24-)

(IEP) and 504 services; and further provided that $130,000 be allocated to City Year for the Whole
School Whole Child Program, which provides individualized support to at-risk students; and further
provided that all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025, relating to the
Learn365RI program are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Special Education Settlement 0 1,860,000 1,860,000
Provided that this amount shall be allocated to provide compensatory special education
services, related administrative costs, and attorneys’ fees pursuant to a legal settlement authorized
by the Rhode Island board of education, of which all unexpended or unencumbered balances at the
end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately
available for the same purpose until the requirements of the settlement agreement have been
satisfied.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 268,294,480 26,071,474 294,365,954
Provided that $684,000 from the department’s administrative share of Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act funds be allocated to the Paul V. Sherlock Center on Disabilities to
support the Rhode Island Vision Education and Services Program.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Adult Education Providers 127,822 3,423,444 3,551,266
Out of School Time Education Providers 0 4,000,000 4,000,000
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 1,654,727 623,099 2,277,826
HRIC Adult Education Grants 3,500,000 0 3,500,000
Total - Admin. of the Comprehensive Ed. Strategy 312,621,565 36,793,266 349,414,831
Davies Career and Technical School
General Revenues 18,131,389 108,374 18,239,763
Federal Funds 1,782,145 219,967 2,002,112
Restricted Receipts 4,667,353 92,789 4,760,142
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Davies School HVAC 1,050,000 188,361 1,238,361
Davies School Asset Protection 750,000 (308,989) 441,011
Davies School Healthcare Classroom
Renovations 6,886,250 (6,886,250) 0
Davies School Wing Renovation 32,000,000 (29,551,398) 2,448,602
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -25-)

Total - Davies Career and Technical School 65,267,137 (36,137,146) 29,129,991
RI School for the Deaf
General Revenues 8,675,430 (469,222) 8,206,208
Federal Funds 304,316 50,886 355,202
Restricted Receipts 570,169 526,831 1,097,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
School for the Deaf Asset Protection 167,648 228,324 395,972
Total - RI School for the Deaf 9,717,563 336,819 10,054,382
Metropolitan Career and Technical School
General Revenues 11,131,142 0 11,131,142
Federal Funds 500,000 0 500,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
MET School Asset Protection 2,000,000 1,622,014 3,622,014
Total - Metropolitan Career and Technical School 13,631,142 1,622,014 15,253,156
Education Aid
General Revenues 1,219,745,842 (1,381,686) 1,218,364,156
Provided that the criteria for the allocation of early childhood funds shall prioritize pre-
kindergarten seats and classrooms for four-year-olds whose family income is at or below one
hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines and who reside in communities
with higher concentrations of low performing schools and that at least $2.0 million of the allocation
of career and technical funds shall be coordinated with the career and technical education board of
trustees to be directed to new programs to provide workforce training for jobs which there are no
active programs.
Federal Funds 46,450,000 3,699,320 50,149,320
Restricted Receipts 42,626,878 (4,794,346) 37,832,532
Total - Education Aid 1,308,822,720 (2,476,712) 1,306,346,008
Central Falls School District
General Revenues 53,634,574 407,315 54,041,889
Federal Funds 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Total - Central Falls School District 54,634,574 407,315 55,041,889
School Construction Aid
General Revenues
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -26-)

School Housing Aid 106,198,555 (416,527) 105,782,028
School Building Authority Capital Fund 0 416,527 416,527
Total- School Construction Aid 106,198,555 0 106,198,555
Teachers' Retirement
General Revenues 132,268,922 7,103,897 139,372,819
Grand Total - Elementary and Secondary
Education 2,003,162,178 7,649,453 2,010,811,631
Public Higher Education
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner
General Revenues 30,122,180 (82,981) 30,039,199
Provided that $455,000 shall be allocated to Onward We Learn pursuant to § 16-70-5,
$75,000 shall be allocated to Best Buddies Rhode Island to support its programs for children with
developmental and intellectual disabilities. It is also provided that $7,378,650 $6,864,864 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island promise scholarship program; $151,410 shall be used to support
Rhode Island’s membership in the New England Board of Higher Education; $3,375,500
$3,351,748 shall be allocated to the Rhode Island hope scholarship program, and $200,000 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island School for Progressive Education to support access to higher
education opportunities for teachers of color.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 4,900,773 24,104 4,924,877
Guaranty Agency Administration 60,000 0 60,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Foster Care Youth Scholarship 1,021,859 0 1,021,859
Fresh Start Scholarship 0 3,002,747 3,002,747
RI Reconnect 0 7,196,921 7,196,921
RIC Cybersecurity Center 0 1,595,322 1,595,322
Restricted Receipts 7,854,557 110,071 7,964,628
Other Funds
Tuition Savings Program - Scholarships
and Grants 3,500,000 0 3,500,000
Nursing Education Center - Operating 3,120,498 50,200 3,170,698
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
WEC Expansion - Annex Site 1,220,000 (1,220,000) 0
Total - Office of Postsecondary
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -27-)

Commissioner 51,799,867 10,676,384 62,476,251
University of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 110,775,396 170,825 110,946,221
Provided that in order to leverage federal funding and support economic development,
$700,000 shall be allocated to the small business development center, $125,000 shall be allocated
to the Institute for Labor Studies & Research and that $50,000 shall be allocated to Special
Olympics Rhode Island to support its mission of providing athletic opportunities for individuals
with intellectual and developmental disabilities.
Debt Service 31,664,061 0 31,664,061
RI State Forensics Laboratory 1,784,983 6,320 1,791,303
Other Funds
University and College Funds 794,703,980 31,311,160 826,015,140
Debt - Dining Services 744,765 (1) 744,764
Debt - Education and General 6,850,702 (1,124,822) 5,725,880
Debt - Health Services 118,345 (116,482) 1,863
Debt - Housing Loan Funds 14,587,677 20,000 14,607,677
Debt - Memorial Union 91,202 1,001 92,203
Debt - Ryan Center 2,377,246 0 2,377,246
Debt - Parking Authority 531,963 0 531,963
URI Restricted Debt Service - Energy
Conservation 524,431 0 524,431
URI Debt Service - Energy Conservation 1,914,069 0 1,914,069
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 14,006,225 102,772 14,108,997
Mechanical, Electric, and Plumbing
Improvements 7,858,588 2,454,468 10,313,056
Fire Protection Academic Buildings 3,311,666 201,843 3,513,509
Bay Campus 6,000,000 4,298,591 10,298,591
Athletics Complex 8,882,689 855,142 9,737,831
Provided that total Rhode Island capital plan funds provide no more than 80.0 percent of
the total project.
Stormwater Management 2,221,831 (1,777,240) 444,591
Fine Arts Center Renovation 8,000,000 82,531 8,082,531
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -28-)

PFAS Removal Water Treatment Plant 1,015,192 3,736,815 4,752,007
Total - University of Rhode Island 1,017,965,011 40,222,923 1,058,187,934
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2025 relating to the university of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year
2026.
Rhode Island College
General Revenues
General Revenues 67,902,836 272,475 68,175,311
Debt Service 8,178,392 0 8,178,392
Rhode Island Vision Education and Services
Program 1,800,000 0 1,800,000
Other Funds
University and College Funds 107,027,705 6,529,958 113,557,663
Debt - Education and General 714,519 742,700 1,457,219
Debt - Student Union 207,150 0 207,150
Debt - G.O. Debt Service 1,602,610 0 1,602,610
Debt - Energy Conservation 742,700 0 742,700
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 5,785,000 5,871,046 11,656,046
Infrastructure Modernization 5,675,000 5,759,392 11,434,392
Master Plan Phase III 5,000,000 (2,408,329) 2,591,671
Phase IV: Whipple Hall 500,000 0 500,000
Total - Rhode Island College 205,135,912 16,767,242 221,903,154
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2025, relating to Rhode Island college are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2026.
Community College of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 61,231,829 247,881 61,479,710
Debt Service 1,054,709 0 1,054,709
Restricted Receipts 814,584 111,983 926,567
Other Funds
University and College Funds 104,016,119 9,286,836 113,302,955
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 2,719,452 1,350,305 4,069,757
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -29-)

Data, Cabling, and Power Infrastructure 4,200,000 (3,864,892) 335,108
Flanagan Campus Renovations 5,700,000 (3,950,000) 1,750,000
CCRI Renovation and Modernization Phase I 16,000,000 (10,498,882) 5,501,118
CCRI Accessibility Improvements 200,000 0 200,000
Total - Community College of RI 195,936,693 (7,316,769) 188,619,924
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2025, relating to the community college of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to
fiscal year 2026.
Grand Total - Public Higher Education 1,470,837,483 60,349,780 1,531,187,263
RI State Council on the Arts
General Revenues
Operating Support 1,205,211 17,281 1,222,492
Grants 1,190,000 0 1,190,000
Provided that $400,000 be provided to support the operational costs of WaterFire
Providence art installations.
Federal Funds 996,126 15,654 1,011,780
Other Funds
Art for Public Facilities 585,000 75,000 660,000
Grand Total - RI State Council on the Arts 3,976,337 107,935 4,084,272
RI Atomic Energy Commission
General Revenues 1,180,419 51,220 1,231,639
Restricted Receipts 25,036 0 25,036
Other Funds
URI Sponsored Research 338,456 9,556 348,012
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 50,000 0 50,000
Grand Total - RI Atomic Energy Commission 1,593,911 60,776 1,654,687
RI Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
General Revenues 1,898,100 (275,889) 1,622,211
Provided that $30,000 support the operational costs of the Fort Adams Trust’s restoration
activities and that $25,000 shall be allocated to Rhode Island Slave History Medallions.
Federal Funds 1,267,431 346,458 1,613,889
Restricted Receipts 419,300 0 419,300
Other Funds
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -30-)

RIDOT Project Review 142,829 (7,389) 135,440
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Archaeological Collection Facility 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - RI Historical Preservation and
Heritage Comm. 3,727,660 113,180 3,840,840
Attorney General
Criminal
General Revenues 21,173,986 1,214,582 22,388,568
Federal Funds 3,231,773 570,854 3,802,627
Restricted Receipts 1,473,682 1,320,124 2,793,806
Total - Criminal 25,879,441 3,105,560 28,985,001
Civil
General Revenues 7,005,430 (37,266) 6,968,164
Federal Funds 0 100,000 100,000
Restricted Receipts 3,616,629 420,135 4,036,764
Total - Civil 10,622,059 482,869 11,104,928
Bureau of Criminal Identification
General Revenues 2,164,423 175,106 2,339,529
Federal Funds 33,332 31,215 64,547
Restricted Receipts 2,847,793 (409,195) 2,438,598
Total - Bureau of Criminal Identification 5,045,548 (202,874) 4,842,674
General
General Revenues 4,759,579 221,439 4,981,018
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Building Renovations and Repairs 150,000 115,000 265,000
Total - General 4,909,579 336,439 5,246,018
Grand Total - Attorney General 46,456,627 3,721,994 50,178,621
Corrections
Central Management
General Revenues 22,522,753 1,226,436 23,749,189
Federal Funds 0 139,354 139,354
Total – Central Management 22,522,753 1,365,790 23,888,543
The department of corrections shall conduct a study to evaluate recidivism trends and
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -31-)

outcomes of existing correctional programs intended to promote rehabilitation and reduce
recidivism. The report shall include, but not be limited to, historical recidivism rates including
demographic data, and regional comparisons; prison population projections and driving factors; an
inventory of evidence-based rehabilitative practices and programs; and a review of correctional
industries and its alignment to workforce needs. On or before March 1, 2025, the department of
corrections must submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the house and the president of the
senate including a summary, relevant data and findings, and recommendations to reduce recidivism.
Parole Board
General Revenues 1,526,785 78,988 1,605,773
Custody and Security
General Revenues 163,902,830 7,657,778 171,560,608
Federal Funds 1,333,277 921,383 2,254,660
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Intake Service Center HVAC 23,946,648 (15,641,264) 8,305,384
Total - Custody and Security 189,182,755 (7,062,103) 182,120,652
Institutional Support
General Revenues 34,243,329 (118,062) 34,125,267
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 4,100,000 1,400,000 5,500,000
Correctional Facilities – Renovations 3,179,677 (2,929,677) 250,000
Total - Institutional Support 41,523,006 (1,647,739) 39,875,267
Institutional Based Rehab/Population Management
General Revenues 14,780,027 (294,315) 14,485,712
Provided that $1,050,000 be allocated to Crossroads Rhode Island for sex offender
discharge planning.
The director of the department of corrections shall provide to the speaker of the house and
president of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 1, 2022, a report on
efforts to modernize the correctional industries program. The report shall, at minimum, provide
data on the past ninety (90) days regarding program participation; changes made in programming
to more closely align with industry needs; new or terminated partnerships with employers,
nonprofits, and advocacy groups; current program expenses and revenues; and the employment
status of all persons on the day of discharge from department care who participated in the
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -32-)

correctional industries program.
Federal Funds 455,919 492,232 948,151
Restricted Receipts 44,800 1,933,496 1,978,296
Total - Institutional Based Rehab/Population Mgt. 15,280,746 2,131,413 17,412,159
Healthcare Services
General Revenues 34,782,837 1,138,147 35,920,984
Restricted Receipts 1,331,555 (1,331,555) 0
Total - Healthcare Services 36,114,392 (193,408) 35,920,984
Community Corrections
General Revenues 21,987,526 86,008 22,073,534
Federal Funds 30,639 8,949 39,588
Restricted Receipts 10,488 (7,397) 3,091
Total - Community Corrections 22,028,653 87,560 22,116,213
Grand Total - Corrections 328,179,090 (5,239,499) 322,939,591
Judiciary
Supreme Court
General Revenues
General Revenues 35,952,258 2,156,535 38,108,793
Provided however, that no more than $1,375,370 in combined total shall be offset to the
public defender’s office, the attorney general’s office, the department of corrections, the department
of children, youth and families, and the department of public safety for square-footage occupancy
costs in public courthouses and further provided that $500,000 be allocated to the Rhode Island
Coalition Against Domestic Violence for the domestic abuse court advocacy project pursuant to §
12-29-7 and that $90,000 be allocated to Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. to provide housing and
eviction defense to indigent individuals.
Defense of Indigents 6,075,432 1,800,000 7,875,432
Federal Funds 123,424 71,260 194,684
Restricted Receipts 4,182,232 44,126 4,226,358
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Judicial Complexes - HVAC 500,000 0 500,000
Judicial Complexes Asset Protection 2,250,000 251,388 2,501,388
Judicial Complexes Fan Coil Unit Replacements 500,000 0 500,000
Garrahy Courthouse Restoration 1,125,000 146,644 1,271,644
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -33-)

Total - Supreme Court 50,708,346 4,469,953 55,178,299
Judicial Tenure and Discipline
General Revenues 174,997 7,230 182,227
Superior Court
General Revenues 27,995,998 1,526,150 29,522,148
Restricted Receipts 665,000 (340,000) 325,000
Total - Superior Court 28,660,998 1,186,150 29,847,148
Family Court
General Revenues 26,940,842 1,569,855 28,510,697
Federal Funds 3,678,496 1,558,511 5,237,007
Total - Family Court 30,619,338 3,128,366 33,747,704
District Court
General Revenues 16,384,243 948,092 17,332,335
Federal Funds 616,036 89,233 705,269
Restricted Receipts 60,000 0 60,000
Total - District Court 17,060,279 1,037,325 18,097,604
Traffic Tribunal
General Revenues 10,812,491 618,112 11,430,603
Workers' Compensation Court
Restricted Receipts 9,931,788 494,206 10,425,994
Grand Total - Judiciary 147,968,237 10,941,342 158,909,579
Military Staff
General Revenues 3,276,320 (80,602) 3,195,718
Federal Funds 86,857,534 (936,362) 85,921,172
Restricted Receipts
RI Military Family Relief Fund 55,000 0 55,000
RING Counter-Drug Program 0 11,000 11,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Aviation Readiness Center 3,294,818 87,195 3,382,013
Asset Protection 1,799,185 713,816 2,513,001
Quonset Airport Runway Reconstruction 1,339,988 629,379 1,969,367
Quonset Air National Guard HQ Facility 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Counter-Drug Training Facility 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -34-)

Sun Valley Armory 0 262,475 262,475
Grand Total - Military Staff 101,622,845 686,901 102,309,746
Public Safety
Central Management
General Revenues 13,318,898 (93,568) 13,225,330
Provided that $400,000 shall be allocated to support the Family Service of Rhode Island’s
GO Team program of on-scene support to children who are victims of violence and other traumas.
It is also provided that $11,500,000 $11,524,954 shall be allocated as the state contribution for the
statewide body-worn camera program, subject to all program and reporting rules, regulations,
policies, and guidelines prescribed in the Rhode Island General Laws. Notwithstanding the
provision of § 35-3-15 of the general laws, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2025 from this appropriation are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2026.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 15,542,257 961,562 16,503,819
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence 10,000,000 (651,071) 9,348,929
Restricted Receipts 309,252 99,125 408,377
Total - Central Management 39,170,407 316,048 39,486,455
E-911 Emergency Telephone System
Restricted Receipts 11,103,966 267,535 11,371,501
Security Services
General Revenues 30,711,397 (703,191) 30,008,206
Municipal Police Training Academy
General Revenues 299,114 2,584 301,698
Federal Funds 417,455 86,969 504,424
Total - Municipal Police Training Academy 716,569 89,553 806,122
State Police
General Revenues 91,080,925 8,525,424 99,606,349
Federal Funds 6,784,981 3,595,726 10,380,707
Restricted Receipts 1,096,000 370,000 1,466,000
Other Funds
Airport Corporation Assistance 150,630 (297) 150,333
Road Construction Reimbursement 3,354,650 22,950 3,377,600
Weight and Measurement Reimbursement 248,632 215,769 464,401
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -35-)

Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DPS Asset Protection 3,425,000 291,082 3,716,082
Southern Barracks 21,500,000 536,972 22,036,972
Training Academy Upgrades 1,550,000 (725,000) 825,000
Statewide Communications System Network 245,048 0 245,048
Total - State Police 129,435,866 12,832,626 142,268,492
Grand Total - Public Safety 211,138,205 12,802,571 223,940,776
Office of Public Defender
General Revenues 16,585,559 591,377 17,176,936
Provided that up to $750,000 is used for legal staff salary-grade promotions and one-time
retroactive payments for employees of the office of the public defender who were appointed to a
promotional position as of April 20, 2025. These employees shall have their appointment date
adjusted retroactively to the pay period including July 1, 2024. Any unexpended or unencumbered
balances as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 85,035 0 85,035
Grand Total - Office of Public Defender 16,670,594 591,377 17,261,971
Emergency Management Agency
General Revenues 7,007,474 55,122 7,062,596
Federal Funds 28,880,583 6,435,123 35,315,706
Restricted Receipts 412,371 7,527 419,898
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
RI Statewide Communications Infrastructure 140,000 524,198 664,198
State Emergency Ops Center 80,000 0 80,000
RI Statewide Communications 700 MHZ Project 0 1,388,188 1,388,188
RI Statewide Communications Warehouse 0 250,000 250,000
Emergency Management Building 0 250,000 250,000
Grand Total - Emergency Management
Agency 36,520,428 8,910,158 45,430,586
Environmental Management
Office of the Director
General Revenues 9,024,403 373,181 9,397,584
Of this general revenue amount, $180,000 is appropriated to the conservation districts and
$100,000 is appropriated to the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island for a
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -36-)

veterinarian at the Wildlife Clinic of Rhode Island.
Federal Funds 40,100 314,875 354,975
Restricted Receipts 4,894,237 1,700,867 6,595,104
Total - Office of the Director 13,958,740 2,388,923 16,347,663
Natural Resources
General Revenues 32,344,157 (523,805) 31,820,352
Provided that of this general revenue amount, $150,000 is to be used for marine mammal
response activities in conjunction with matching federal funds.
Federal Funds 23,602,130 10,446,377 34,048,507
Restricted Receipts 6,078,419 141,524 6,219,943
Other Funds
DOT Recreational Projects 762,000 0 762,000
Blackstone Bike Path Design 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Dam Repair 5,386,000 (4,886,030) 499,970
Fort Adams Rehabilitation 300,000 91,194 391,194
Port of Galilee 13,300,000 (6,248,811) 7,051,189
Newport Pier Upgrades 500,000 121,578 621,578
Recreation Facilities Asset Protection 750,000 171,908 921,908
Recreational Facilities Improvements 5,729,077 1,213,495 6,942,572
Natural Resources Office and Visitor's Center 250,000 211,165 461,165
Fish & Wildlife Maintenance Facilities 200,000 102,443 302,443
Marine Infrastructure/Pier Development 950,000 0 950,000
Total - Natural Resources 91,151,783 841,038 91,992,821
Environmental Protection
General Revenues 15,870,312 (1,073,838) 14,796,474
Federal Funds 12,377,846 289,910 12,667,756
Restricted Receipts 10,332,134 4,113,851 14,445,985
Other Funds
Transportation MOU 41,769 48,595 90,364
Total - Environmental Protection 38,622,061 3,378,518 42,000,579
Grand Total - Environmental Management 143,732,584 6,608,479 150,341,063
Coastal Resources Management Council
General Revenues 3,607,384 350,043 3,957,427
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -37-)

Federal Funds 2,319,579 4,599,430 6,919,009
Restricted Receipts 250,000 0 250,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Pawcatuck Resiliency Elevation Study 0 50,000 50,000
Little Narragansett Bay Study 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - Coastal Resources Mgmt. Council 6,176,963 5,049,473 11,226,436
Transportation
Central Management
Federal Funds 15,122,388 (1,356,995) 13,765,393
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 8,265,215 1,001,931 9,267,146
Total - Central Management 23,387,603 (355,064) 23,032,539
Management and Budget
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 4,243,682 (267,118) 3,976,564
Infrastructure Engineering
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 402,650,393 35,983,120 438,633,513
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Municipal Roads Grant Program 7,000,000 16,183,415 23,183,415
RIPTA Operating Grant 15,000,000 0 15,000,000
The Rhode Island public transit authority shall conduct a thorough review of its transit
operations and administration. The aim of this review is to uncover ways to enhance efficiency and
streamline costs, ensuring a more effective use of resources. This evaluation shall encompass a
range of areas, including but not limited to, a comprehensive analysis of the fixed-route service.
Analysis should include operating expenses, ridership figures, cost per rider, and other pertinent
data across all routes and serviced regions. A review focusing on the cost-effectiveness of the
agency’s diverse transit services will be a key component of this study. Additionally, the study
shall explore different transit service delivery models, incorporating successful strategies from
other transit systems; financial planning strategies; agency management structure, capital plan
development, and funding strategies; project management; and transit master plan scope and
schedule. By March 1, 2025, the Rhode Island public transit authority shall compile and present a
report to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. This report will
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -38-)

summarize the findings of the study and include recommendations aimed at fostering sustainable
and effective transit operations.
Washington Bridge Project 35,000,000 0 35,000,000
Turnpike and Bridge Authority –
Safety Barriers Study 0 641,764 641,764
Restricted Receipts 6,116,969 48,848 6,165,817
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 71,061,818 1,145,797 72,207,615
Land Sale Revenue 6,568,333 (346,898) 6,221,435
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Highway Improvement Program 141,102,060 (11,800,000) 129,302,060
Bike Path Asset Protection 400,000 0 400,000
RIPTA - Land and Buildings 11,214,401 (5,434,903) 5,779,498
RIPTA - Pawtucket/Central Falls Bus Hub
Passenger Facility 3,424,529 75,471 3,500,000
RIPTA Providence High-Capacity Transit
Corridor Study 0 250,000 250,000
RIPTA – Kingston Station Mobility Hub 0 1,140,000 1,140,000
Total - Infrastructure Engineering 699,538,503 37,886,614 737,425,117
Infrastructure Maintenance
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 39,244,619 1,058,869 40,303,488
The department of transportation will establish a municipal roadway database, which will
include information concerning the name, condition, length, roadway infrastructure, and pedestrian
features of each municipal roadway, updated annually by municipalities. The database will serve
as a comprehensive and transparent list of municipal roadway conditions.
Rhode Island Highway Maintenance Account 119,070,245 143,944,444 263,014,689
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Maintenance Capital Equipment Replacement 1,800,000 2,009,769 3,809,769
Maintenance Facilities Improvements 500,000 145,246 645,246
Welcome Center 150,000 300,028 450,028
Salt Storage Facilities 1,150,000 318,759 1,468,759
Train Station Asset Protection 475,585 654,377 1,129,962
Total - Infrastructure Maintenance 162,390,449 148,431,492 310,821,941
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -39-)

Grand Total - Transportation 889,560,237 185,695,924 1,075,256,161
Statewide Totals
General Revenues 5,594,861,257 2,736,816 5,597,598,073
Federal Funds 5,066,548,689 546,106,800 5,612,655,489
Restricted Receipts 463,143,051 28,500,321 491,643,372
Other Funds 2,838,671,543 227,017,665 3,065,689,208
Statewide Grand Total 13,963,224,540 804,361,602 14,767,586,142
SECTION 2. Each line appearing in section 1 of this article shall constitute an
appropriation.
SECTION 3. The general assembly authorizes the state controller to establish the internal
service accounts shown below, and no other, to finance and account for the operations of state
agencies that provide services to other agencies, institutions and other governmental units on a cost
reimbursed basis. The purpose of these accounts is to ensure that certain activities are managed in
a businesslike manner; promote efficient use of services by making agencies pay the full costs
associated with providing the services; and allocate the costs of central administrative services
across all fund types, so that federal and other non-general fund programs share in the costs of
general government support. The controller is authorized to reimburse these accounts for the cost
of work or services performed for any other department or agency subject to the following
expenditure limitations:
Account Expenditure Limit
FY 2025 FY 2025 FY 2025
Enacted Change FINAL
State Assessed Fringe Benefit Internal Service Fund 36,946,270 261,300 37,207,570
Administration Central Utilities Internal Service Fund 30,029,111 (70,288) 29,958,823
State Central Mail Internal Service Fund 8,419,019 68,509 8,487,528
State Telecommunications Internal Service Fund 3,748,530 42,501 3,791,031
State Automotive Fleet Internal Service Fund 15,496,081 5,458,171 20,954,252
Surplus Property Internal Service Fund 44,789 0 44,789
Health Insurance Internal Service Fund 272,804,635 (91,576) 272,713,059
Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund 63,854,008 0 63,854,008
Capitol Police Internal Service Fund 1,466,975 122,219 1,589,194
Corrections Central Distribution Center
Internal Service Fund 7,659,339 960,340 8,619,679
Correctional Industries Internal Service Fund 8,247,332 201,181 8,448,513
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -40-)

Secretary of State Record Center Internal Service Fund 1,166,547 38,749 1,205,296
Human Resources Internal Service Fund 17,669,248 405,918 18,075,166
DCAMM Facilities Internal Service Fund 53,327,083 619,088 53,946,171
Information Technology Internal Service Fund 62,092,295 1,431,481 63,523,776
SECTION 4. Departments and agencies listed below may not exceed the number of full-
time equivalent (FTE) positions shown below in any pay period. Full-time equivalent positions do
not include limited period positions or, seasonal or intermittent positions whose scheduled period
of employment does not exceed twenty-six consecutive weeks or whose scheduled hours do not
exceed nine hundred and twenty-five (925) hours, excluding overtime, in a one-year period. Nor
do they include individuals engaged in training, the completion of which is a prerequisite of
employment. Provided, however, that the governor or designee, speaker of the house of
representatives or designee, and the president of the senate or designee may authorize an adjustment
to any limitation. Prior to the authorization, the state budget officer shall make a detailed written
recommendation to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. A copy
of the recommendation and authorization to adjust shall be transmitted to the chairman of the house
finance committee, senate finance committee, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor.
State employees whose funding is from non-state general revenue funds that are time
limited shall receive limited term appointment with the term limited to the availability of non-state
general revenue funding source.
FY 2025 FTE POSITION AUTHORIZATION
Departments and Agencies Full-Time Equivalent
Administration 683.6 667.6
Provided that no more than 419.1 of the total authorization would be limited to positions
that support internal service fund programs.
Office of Energy Resources 16.0
Business Regulation 181.0
Executive Office of Commerce 5.0
Housing 38.0
Labor and Training 461.7
Revenue 599.5
Legislature 298.5
Office of the Lieutenant Governor 8.0
Office of the Secretary of State 62.0
Office of the General Treasurer 91.0
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -41-)

Board of Elections 13.0
Rhode Island Ethics Commission 12.0
Office of the Governor 45.0
Commission for Human Rights 15.0
Public Utilities Commission 57.0
Executive Office of Health and Human Services 233.0
Children, Youth and Families 714.5
Health 572.6
Human Services 779.0
Office of Veterans Services 267.0
Office of Healthy Aging 33.0
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities
and Hospitals 1,221.4
Provided that 18.0 of the total authorization would be limited to independent facilitators
positions to comply with the Consent Decree Addendum.
Office of the Child Advocate 13.0
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing 4.0
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 5.0
Office of the Mental Health Advocate 6.0
Elementary and Secondary Education 156.1
Provided that 3.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by the healthy environments advance learning grant at the school building authority.
School for the Deaf 61.0
Davies Career and Technical School 123.0
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner 46.0
Provided that 1.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds, 12.0 would be available only for positions at the state’s higher
education centers located in Woonsocket and Westerly, 10.0 would be available only for positions
at the nursing education center, and 7.0 would be available for the longitudinal data systems
program.
University of Rhode Island 2,571.0
Provided that 353.8 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island College 949.2
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -42-)

Provided that 76.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Community College of Rhode Island 849.1
Provided that 89.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island State Council on the Arts 10.0
RI Atomic Energy Commission 8.6
Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission 15.6
Office of the Attorney General 264.1
Corrections 1,461.0
Judicial 745.3
Military Staff 93.0
Emergency Management Agency 38.0
Public Safety 633.0
Office of the Public Defender 104.0
Environmental Management 439.0
Coastal Resources Management Council 32.0
Transportation 755.0
Total 15,772.8
No agency or department may employ contracted employee services where contract
employees would work under state employee supervisors without determination of need by the
director of administration acting upon positive recommendations by the budget officer and the
personnel administrator and fifteen (15) days after a public hearing.
Nor may any agency or department contract for services replacing work done by state
employees at that time without determination of need by the director of administration acting upon
the positive recommendations of the state budget officer and the personnel administrator and thirty
(30) days after a public hearing.
SECTION 5. The appropriations from federal funds contained in section 1 shall not be
construed to mean any federal funds or assistance appropriated, authorized, allocated or
apportioned to the State of Rhode Island from the state fiscal recovery fund and capital projects
fund enacted pursuant to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for fiscal year 2025
except for those instances specifically designated.
The State fiscal recovery fund and capital projects Fund fund appropriations herein shall
be made in support of the following projects:
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -43-)

Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA- Pandemic Recovery Office. These funds shall be allocated to finance the pandemic
recovery office established within the department of administration.
DOA - Public Health Response Warehouse Support. These funds shall be allocated to the
proper storage of PPE and other necessary COVID-19 response related supplies.
DOA – Auto-Enrollment Program. These funds shall support a program for automatically
enrolling qualified individuals transitioned off Medicaid coverage at the end of the COVID-19
public health emergency into qualified health plans to avoid gaps in coverage, administered by
HealthSource RI.
DOA - Health Care Facilities. These funds shall address the ongoing staffing needs of
nursing facilities related to the COVID-19 public health emergency. Ten million dollars
($10,00,000) shall be distributed to nursing facilities based on the number of Medicaid beds days
from the 2022 facility cost reports, provided at least eighty percent (80%) is dedicated to direct care
workers.
DOA - Community Learning Center Programming Support Grant. These funds shall be
distributed to municipalities that have approved community learning center projects under the
coronavirus capital projects fund community learning center municipal grant program. An equal
amount of funding will be allocated to each approved community learning center project that
reaches substantial completion as defined by the U.S. Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026.
Municipalities with projects that do not reach substantial completion as defined by the U.S.
Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026, shall return their funding no later than November 15,
2026, for redistribution among other qualified community learning centers. These funds must be
used to support the establishment of U.S. Department of the Treasury compliant health monitoring,
work, and or education programming that will take place in a community learning center.
DOA – Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to provide
matching support to cities and towns to make significant public safety facilities infrastructure
improvements including new construction. Funding priority shall be based on project readiness and
limited to those for which the total costs exceed $1.0 million. Matching funds to any municipality
will be limited to $5.0 million for projects that serve a regional purpose and $1.0 million for others.
Office of Energy Resources (OER)
OER - Electric Heat Pump Grant Program. These funds shall support a grant program
within the office of energy resources to assist homeowners and small-to-mid-size business owners
with the purchase and installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps, with an emphasis on
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -44-)

families in environmental justice communities, minority-owned businesses, and community
organizations who otherwise cannot afford this technology. The office of energy resources shall
report to the speaker of the house and senate president no later than April 1 of each year the results
of this program, including but not limited to, the number of grants issued; amount of each grant and
the average grant amount; and the expected cumulative carbon emissions reductions associated
with heat pumps that received a grant.
Department of Labor and Training (DLT)
DLT – Enhanced Real Jobs. These funds shall support the real jobs Rhode Island program
in the development of job partnerships, connecting industry employers adversely impacted by the
pandemic to individuals enrolled in workforce training programs.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC – Minority Business Accelerator. These funds shall support a program to invest
additional resources to enhance the growth of minority business enterprises as defined in chapter
14.1 of title 37. The initiative will support a range of assistance and programming, including
financial and technical assistance, entrepreneurship training, space for programming and co-
working, and assistance accessing low-interest loans. Commerce shall work with minority small
business associations, including the Rhode Island Black Business Association (RIBBA), to advance
this program.
EOC – Bioscience Investments. These funds shall support a program to invest in the
biosciences industry in Rhode Island in conjunction with the Rhode Island life science hub as
established in chapter 99 of title 23. This program will include, but is not limited to, the
development of one or more wet lab incubator spaces in collaboration with industry partners; the
creation of a fund that will support wrap-around services to aid in the commercialization of
technology and business development, growth of the biosciences talent pipeline, and support for
staff to implement the bioscience investments initiative.
EOC - Assistance to Impacted Industries. These funds shall be allocated to provide
assistance to the tourism, hospitality, and events industries for outdoor and public space capital
improvements and event programming.
EOC – Small Business Assistance. These funds shall be allocated to a program of financial
and technical assistance to small businesses and COVID-impacted industries as follows: twelve
million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) shall be provided as direct payments to
businesses for lost revenue; seventeen million three hundred thousand dollars ($17,300,000) shall
support technical assistance for long-term business capacity building, public health upgrades,
energy efficiency improvements, and outdoor programming; and one million five hundred thousand
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -45-)

dollars ($1,500,000) shall be allocated to support administration of these programs. To be eligible
to receive funds or support under this program a business must have less than two million dollars
($2,000,000) in annual gross revenues and demonstrate a negative impact from the COVID-19
pandemic as determined by the Rhode Island commerce corporation. Under this program, total
support in the form of direct payments, or technical assistance grants shall not exceed ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) per eligible business through either program. Total support in the form of direct
payments, technical assistance, and grants for public health upgrades, energy efficiency and
outdoor programming shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in the aggregate. Provided
further that at least twenty percent (20%) of all funds must be reserved for awards to assist minority
business enterprises as defined in chapter 14.1 of title 37. Of the aggregate funding described above,
two million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000) of funds that are unexpended as of July 1,
2024, shall be allocated to a program to assist small businesses impacted by the closure and
reconstruction of the northern span of the Washington Bridge. Of those funds, one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) shall be allocated to the city of East Providence, eight
hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) shall be allocated to the city of Providence, and six hundred
thousand dollars ($600,000) shall be allocated to the executive office of commerce. Funds shall be
used to provide direct grants or any such other forms of assistance as deemed appropriate, and shall
not be subject to the criteria, limitations, and reservation requirements described above.
Department of Housing
Housing – Development of Affordable Housing. These funds shall expand a program at
the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to provide additional investments in
(1) the development of affordable housing units in conjunction with general obligation bond funds
and other sources of available financing according to guidelines approved by the coordinating
committee of the housing resources commission or (2) site acquisition and predevelopment
expenses for affordable housing. Of this amount, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be
available to Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to establish a pilot program
that shall direct funds to support low income public housing through project-based rental assistance
vouchers and financing for pre-development, improvement, and housing production costs. Within
six (6) months, any money available for the pilot that is not yet allocated to viable projects, or
which has been awarded to public housing authorities which are unable to demonstrate substantial
completion of all work within eighteen (18) months of receipt of any such funds, shall be returned
to this program and no longer be included in the pilot. Determination of viability and substantial
completion under the pilot shall be at the sole discretion of the secretary of housing.
Housing – Targeted Housing Development. These funds shall create a program at the
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -46-)

department of housing to develop housing in targeted areas and/or priority projects. Of this overall
program, twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) shall be allocated into a priority project fund
that advances the following categories: permanent supportive housing, housing dedicated to
vulnerable populations, individuals transitioning out of state care, and extremely low-income
Rhode Islanders. Of this overall program, four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be allocated to
support the development of transit-oriented housing as approved by the secretary of housing.
Housing – Site Acquisition. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation toward the acquisition of properties for redevelopment as affordable
and supportive housing to finance projects that include requirements for deed restrictions not less
than thirty (30) years, and a non-recourse structure.
Housing – Workforce Housing. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation to support a program to increase the housing supply for families
earning up to 120 percent of area median income.
Housing – Home Repair and Community Revitalization. These funds shall expand the
acquisition and revitalization program administered by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage
finance corporation to finance the acquisition and redevelopment of blighted properties to increase
the number of commercial and community spaces in disproportionately impacted communities and
or to increase the development of affordable housing. Residential development will serve
households earning no more than 80 percent of area median income. Commercial and community
spaces must serve or meet the needs of residents of a census tract where at least 51 percent of the
residents are low-and moderate-income persons. Of this amount, four million five hundred
thousand dollars ($4,500,000) will support critical home repairs within the same communities.
Housing – Preservation of Affordable Housing Units. These funds shall support a program
to preserve affordable housing units at risk of foreclosure or blight.
Housing – Predevelopment and Capacity Building. These funds shall support a program to
increase contract staffing capacity to administer proposed affordable housing projects. These funds
will support research and data analysis, stakeholder engagement, and the expansion of services for
people experiencing homelessness.
Housing – Municipal Planning. Of these funds, one million three hundred thousand dollars
($1,300,000) shall support a housing development-focused municipal fellows program within the
department of housing and one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall support municipalities to study
and implement zoning changes that up-zone or otherwise enable additional housing development
in proximity to transit.
Housing – Homelessness Assistance Program. These funds shall support a program to
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -47-)

expand housing navigation, behavioral health, and stabilization services to address pandemic-
related homelessness. The program will support services for people transitioning from
homelessness to housing, including individuals transitioning out of the adult correctional
institutions.
Housing – Homelessness Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to support a program to
respond to and prevent homelessness, including but not limited to, acquisition or construction of
temporary or permanent shelter and other housing solutions and stabilization programs.
Housing – Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative. These funds shall be used to support
a program to award grants to cities and towns for public safety expenses and other municipal
services that support individuals and families experiencing homelessness.
Housing – Proactive Housing Development. These funds shall be used to support the
creation, staffing, and initial activities of a proactive development subsidiary of the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation, established pursuant to § 42-55-5.1.
Housing – Housing Related Infrastructure. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode
Island infrastructure bank as established in chapter 12.2 of title 46 to support physical infrastructure
that is necessary to produce additional housing. All expenditures made with these funds must be
for the pre-development and development of site-related infrastructure for housing that meets
affordable housing pricing and/or income criteria and other criteria established by the department
of housing.
Housing – Statewide Housing Plan. These funds shall be allocated to the development of a
statewide comprehensive housing plan to assess current and future housing needs, consider barriers
to home ownership and affordability, and identify services needed for increased investments toward
disproportionately impacted individuals and communities. These funds shall be used to support
municipal planning efforts to identify and cultivate viable sites and housing projects.
Quonset Development Corporation (QDC)
QDC – Port of Davisville. These funds shall be allocated to expand a program developing
port infrastructure and services at the Port of Davisville in Quonset in accordance with the
corporation’s master plan.
Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS)
EOHHS - Pediatric Recovery. These funds shall support a program to provide relief to
pediatric providers in response to the decline in visitation and enrollment caused by the public
health emergency and incentivize providers to increase developmental and psychosocial behavioral
screenings.
EOHHS - Certified Community Behavioral Clinics. These funds shall be allocated to a
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -48-)

program to support certified community behavioral health clinics to bolster behavioral health
supports, medical screening and monitoring, and social services to particularly vulnerable
populations in response to a rise in mental health needs during the public health emergency.
Department of Children, Youth and Families (DCYF)
DCYF – Provider Workforce Stabilization. These funds shall be allocated to support
workforce stabilization supplemental wage payments and sign-on bonuses to eligible direct care
and supporting care staff of contracted service providers.
DCYF - Psychiatric Treatment Facility. These funds shall be allocated to expand existing
psychiatric residential treatment facility capacity to provide intensive residential treatment options
for adolescent girls and young women who face severe and complex behavioral health challenges.
Department of Health (DOH)
DOH – COVID-19 Operational Support. These funds shall be allocated to continue
COVID-19 mitigation activities at the department of health and to address the public health impacts
of the pandemic in Rhode Island.
DOH - Public Health Clinics. Of these funds, $649,527 shall be allocated to the RI Free
Clinic to improve statewide access and quality of primary care for uninsured adults; to increase
access to dental care for uninsured adults integrated into medical care at the clinic; and, to build
infrastructure for telehealth and electronic medical records, Additionally, $334,500 shall be
allocated to Rhode Island Public Health Foundation/DBA Open Door Health to support the
purchase of existing land and facilities in order to expand services for people who are
disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic. These funds may be used to support the
purchase of land, the costs of acquiring a building or constructing a facility, as well as related costs.
The terms and conditions of the allocation shall require Rhode Island Public Health
Foundation/DBA Open Door Health to execute a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2024,
for any part of the allocation that is used for the purchase of land. For any part of the allocation that
is used for the acquisition or construction of a facility a contract for such purpose must be executed
by June 30, 2024. Any part of the allocation that is not used for the execution of a purchase and
sale agreement or under contract for the acquisition or construction of a facility shall be returned
to the state by July 31, 2024. Any part of the allocation that is unexpended by December 31, 2026,
regardless of the purpose for which it was obligated, shall be returned to the state no later than
January 31, 2027.
Department of Human Services (DHS)
DHS – Child Care Support. To address the adverse impact the pandemic has had on the
child care sector, the funds allocated to this program will provide retention bonuses for direct-care
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -49-)

staff at child care centers and licensed family providers in response to pandemic-related staffing
shortages and start up and technical assistance grants for family child care providers. Retention
bonuses shall be paid monthly or as often as administratively feasible, but not less than quarterly.
The director of the department of human services and the director of the department of children,
youth and families may waive any fees otherwise assessed upon child care provider applicants who
have been awarded the family child care provider incentive grant. The allocation to this program
will also support quality improvements, the creation of a workforce registry, and additional funds
for educational opportunities for direct care staff.
DHS – SNAP Retail Incentive Pilot. The funds allocated to the Supplemental Nutritional
Assistance Program (SNAP) Retail Incentive Pilot shall be used to reimburse the expenditures
made from general revenue prior to January 1, 2025, in support of the Rhode Island Eat Well, Be
Well Rewards Program. The Rhode Island Eat Well, Be Well Rewards Program is the first and
only statewide retail SNAP incentive program in the United States and provides SNAP recipients
an additional fifty cents ($0.50) for every one dollar ($1.00) of SNAP benefits spent on eligible
fresh fruit and vegetable purchases, up to twenty-five dollars ($25).
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals (BHDDH)
BHDDH – Crisis Intervention Trainings. To respond to the increased volume of mental-
health related calls reported by police departments, these funds shall be allocated to the crisis
intervention training program to provide training every three years for law enforcement as well as
continuing education opportunities.
BHDDH - 9-8-8 Hotline. These funds shall be allocated for the creation and operation of a
9-8-8 hotline to maintain compliance with the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020
and the Federal Communications Commission-adopted rules to assure that all citizens receive a
consistent level of 9-8-8 and crisis behavioral health services.
Rhode Island Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (ELSEC)
RIDE - Adult Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed through the
office of adult education to nonprofit adult education providers to expand access to educational
programs and literary services.
RIDE – Out of School Time Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed
through the office of student, community and academic supports to expand access to educational
programs.
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner (OPC)
OPC – RI Reconnect. These funds shall support a program to improve postsecondary
degree and credential attainment among working-age Rhode Islanders. The program will assist
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -50-)

students in addressing barriers to education completion, particularly among communities of color
and lower socio-economic strata. A portion of these funds will be used to address barriers to the
attainment of teacher certification as a second language education teacher, grades PK-12, and as an
all grades special education teacher.
OPC – RIC Cybersecurity Center. These funds shall support the establishment of the
institute for cybersecurity and emerging technologies at Rhode Island College, which will provide
certificate, baccalaureate, and master’s level courses with focuses on research and developing
highly skilled cybersecurity professionals. Funding shall be appropriated through the office of
postsecondary commissioner.
OPC – Fresh Start Scholarship. These funds shall support a program to provide
scholarships to adult students with some college credits, but no degree, with a focus on students
who dropped-out of the community college of Rhode Island. This program will target students who
are not meeting satisfactory academic progress requirements, which makes them ineligible for
federal financial assistance.
OPC – Foster Care Youth Scholarship. These funds shall support a last dollar scholarship
program for DCYF foster care youth exiting the system to attend Rhode Island college and would
fully fund tuition, room and board, and/or support services, including during the summer months.
Funding would be distributed through the Rhode Island college foundation.
Department of Public Safety (DPS)
DPS – Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence. These funds shall be allocated to invest
in the nonprofit community to provide additional housing, clinical and mental health services to
victims of domestic violence and sexual assault. This includes increased investments for therapy
and counseling, housing assistance, job training, relocation aid and case management.
Department of Transportation (DOT)
DOT - Municipal Roads Grant Program. These funds shall support a program to distribute
grants with a required local match for the replacement, rehabilitation, preservation, and
maintenance of existing roads, sidewalks, and bridges. These funds shall be distributed equally to
each city and town provided that each municipality is required to provide a sixty-seven percent
(67%) match.
DOT – Turnpike and Bridge Authority – Safety Barriers Study. These funds shall be used
by the Turnpike and Bridge Authority to conduct a study to identify and evaluate the options to
prevent and address the risk of suicide on bridges under its purview.
DOT - RIPTA Operating Grant. These funds shall provide operating support to the Rhode
Island public transit authority.
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -51-)

DOT - Washington Bridge Project. These funds shall support the non-federal share or
matching requirement on federal funds for priority transportation projects, including but not limited
to the Washington Bridge project.
Federal Funds - Capital Projects Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA - CPF Administration. These funds shall be allocated to the department of
administration to oversee the implementation of the capital projects fund award from the American
Rescue Plan Act.
DOA – Community Learning Center Municipal Grant Program. These funds shall be
allocated to a program for cities and towns that renovate or build a community wellness learning
center that meets the work, education, and health monitoring requirements identified by the U.S.
Department of the Treasury.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC – Broadband. These funds shall be allocated to the executive office of commerce to
invest in broadband projects to provide high-speed, reliable internet to all Rhode Islanders. The
secretary of commerce, in partnership with the director of business regulation, will run a series of
requests for proposals for broadband infrastructure projects, providing funds to municipalities,
public housing authorities, business cooperatives and local internet service providers for projects
targeted at those underserved by the current infrastructure using the evidentiary bases authorized
by the United States department of the treasury for the capital projects fund. These funds shall be
used in accordance with the statewide broadband strategic plan and may not be obligated nor
expended prior to its submission in accordance with the requirements of the Rhode Island
broadband development program set forth in chapter 162 of title 42.
SECTION 6. The pandemic recovery office shall monitor the progress and performance of
all programs financed by the state fiscal recovery fund and the capital projects fund. On or before
October 31, 2023 and quarterly thereafter until and including October 31, 2026, through April 30,
2025, the office shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and senate president, with copies
to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees, on a quarterly basis and biannually
thereafter until and including October 31, 2026, identifying programs that are at risk of significant
underspending or noncompliance with federal or state requirements. The report, at a minimum must
include an assessment of how programs that are at risk can be remedied. In the event that any state
fiscal recovery fund program underspends its appropriation or receives program income as defined
by U.S. Treasury and would put the state at risk of forfeiture of federal funds, the governor may
propose to reallocate reclassify unspent funds or program income funding from the at-risk program
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -52-)

to the unemployment insurance trust fund other eligible uses as determined by U.S. Treasury. This
proposal will shall be referred to the General Assembly. For a state fiscal recovery fund program,
if the amount of the underspend or receipt of program income is less than or equal to one million
dollars ($1,000,000) and less than or equal to twenty percent (20%) of its total appropriation, the
governor’s proposed reclassification shall take effect immediately. For a state fiscal recovery fund
program, if the amount of the underspend or receipt of program income is greater than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) or greater than twenty percent (20%) of its total appropriation, the governor’s
proposed reclassification shall within the first ten (10) days of November to go into effect thirty
(30) days hence after its referral to the General Assembly by the governor, unless rejected by formal
action of the house and senate acting concurrently within that time.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the department of
environmental management shall transfer to the state controller the sum of three million dollars
($3,000,000) from the underground storage tank trust fund restricted receipt account by June 30,
2025.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island student
loan authority shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of two million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000).
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of two million
dollars ($2,000,000).
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the department of revenue
shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of five hundred seventy-nine thousand
seven hundred eighty-eight dollars ($579,788) from the Marijuana Trust Fund restricted receipt
account.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the state controller shall
transfer the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
by June 30, 2025.
SECTION 12. Article 1, Section 20, of Chapter 79 of the 2023 Public Laws is hereby
amended to read as follows:
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer $114,998,958 from the information technology restricted receipt account to the large
systems initiatives fund by July 14, 2023. Appropriations herein to the large systems initiatives
fund (LSIF) shall be made in support of the following projects:
Enterprise resource planning. For the project already in progress, at an estimated project
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -53-)

cost of $68,700,000 $84,500,000, of which no more than $50,000,000 $55,100,000 shall be
supported by the LSIF, these funds support the implementation and roll-out of a new enterprise
resource planning software system.
Comprehensive child welfare information system. For the project already in progress, at
an estimated project cost of $54,700,000, of which no more than $24,650,000 shall be supported
by the LSIF, these funds support the replacement of the existing case management system with a
new comprehensive child welfare information system.
DEM legacy modernization. For the project already in progress, at an estimated project
cost of $5,800,000, these funds support the modernization of the permit application and license
tracking and processing systems.
Wi-Fi and tech at the ACI. For the project already in progress, at an estimated project cost
of $3,300,000, these funds support upgrades to the networking infrastructure at the department of
corrections.
RIBridges mobile access and child care tracking. For the project already in progress, at an
estimated project cost of $6,700,000, these funds support an expansion of the existing mobile
application.
Gateway to Government. For the project already in progress, at an estimated project cost
of $7,500,000, these funds support the transition of licensing processes toward a paperless platform
housing digital identities and credentialing information.
DLT mainframe legacy modernization. For the project already in progress, at an estimated
project cost of $19,400,000, these funds support the modernization of obsolete hardware and
applications at the department of labor and training.
Electronic Medical Records System medical records system. For the project already in
progress, at an estimated project cost of $22,400,000, these funds support implementation of a
comprehensive system to track clinical, administrative and financial needs of these hospitals.
SECTION 13. This article shall take effect upon passage.
Art13
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
(Page -54-)

=======
art.014/1/013/1/012/1
=======
ARTICLE 14

RELATING TO EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 1. This act shall take effect as of July 1, 2025, except as otherwise provided
herein.
SECTION 2. This article shall take effect upon passage.